Collared Prompt List
And greentexts/concepts that I found interesting

>tfw will never find anthro species with island tameness
>tfw a nubile, furred beauty filled with edenic innocence will never throw herself into your arms without a thought of danger
>tfw she will never let you do whatever you want to your body, not understanding our puritanical ideas like how she ought cover her body from your perverted gaze, or she shouldn't be led around on a leash and used to sate your lust whenever you please, or be perpetually re-impregnated with your spawn, or be jealous of your other baby-factories you breed on the side
>Why would she? Every breeding leaves her with legs of jelly and belly full of strong children, what does she have to complain about?
>why live

>Just one VERY overworked, VERY tired cat-girl doing the jobs of twenty humans while also somehow finding the time to serve as the company cum dumpster but it's okay because once upper management sees how hard she's working and how dependable she is, she's sure to be promoted!
>All her suffering now HAS to be for a reason; it's not like they'll just kick her to the street one day and refuse to even give her a reference for her years of work.

>One promotion later, she now does the jobs of fifty humans for no extra pay
>Technically no pay at all; she barely has time to get a full three hours of sleep, never mind leave the office to actually spend the pay she's supposed to be getting, so the boss spends it for her

>meet favorite streamer at a con
>bring large stuffed animal (would stuffed animals exist in this universe?) for him to sign
>grab a picture with him holding it afterward
>go home and grind on the stuffed animal for hours on end while looking at the photo

>"Hey everyone, Himbo985 here, today we'll be doing a 'community content night,' basically, we'll be looking at all the cool pictures and videos that you guys have been making, so let's dive right in!"
>Picture of streamers dog.
>Picture of streamer high-fiving a fan
>Picture of streamer hugging a fan
>Picture of streamer kissing a dog-girl
>Picture of streamer kissing a cat-girl
>Picture of streamer being constricted by a lamia
>POV picture of streamer dripping with sweat while above the viewer
>Porn
>Picture of streamer shirtless
>Strangely detailed picture of streamer's feet
>Porn
>Just straight up a photo of the streamer's house
>Porn
>Porn
>Picture of streamer as a catboy, kissing a dog-girl while cat-girls look on in jealousy
>Porn
>Picture of streamer as Reaper from Overwatch
>Porn
>Porn
>Porn
>Picture of implied orgy between four 'best friends,' all of which are different races (this includes a phone number)
>Porn
>Just straight up a confession of undying love (second phone number)
>Porn
>Porn
>"Well, that was wild. Now on to the videos!"

Yeah I can definitely see prey always being one step ahead of predators, they'd be more used to coordinating defenses too. Real world herds already have dedicated lookouts, not too far of a stretch that they would eventually cooperate to build walls and dig trenches. Even without human herders leading and domesticating them I can see herbivores eventually setting up their own little societies. With herders they'd advance incredibly quickly.
>prey set up tents while preds are little more than ferals
>prey build walled villages while preds are tribals
>prey build small countries while barbarian pred hoards occasionally attack and pillage
Also just imagine gypsy pigeons
>nomadic but now they can also fly
>filthy as fuck
>will eat anything
>shits everywhere
>steals food
>humans use stupid, domesticated anthros for dumb labor
>they're smart enough to organize and take orders but little else
>also dogs because they're bros
>human agricultural skill allows for great surpluses of highly nutritious foods
>anthro intelligence begins to bloom properly over the course of a few hundred thousand years
>yfw your tractor starts talking back one day
A human-herb anthro alliance would be unstoppable

Farming requires you to go veeeeery far down the tech tree, I don't think it would even get a chance to reach that point without human intervention because herbivores would constantly need to keep moving in search of more biomass to consume or else starve
Which leads me to believe they would become the most warlike of the races besides maybe humans.
See above for why I doubt they would build towns and cities, instead it's a wandering deathball that seizes all biomass it finds and anyone who tries to stop them gets murdered fast, lots of the same outward ring tactics while the waifus and children eat first, I sort of imagine them like Zulu warriors.
Since humans don't need to spend all day looking for their next meal every day of their lives if living in a social structure while also constantly being at war with everything they have more time to develop concepts like logistics, supply lines, food storage and agriculture.
Human intervention would be the only shot that herd herbivores get teched up enough to stop being nomadic out of necessity. And likely it would be as slaves, cuz humans gonna human.

>a wandering deathball
Jesus, so they're armed locusts.
Though I wonder if they would ever accidentally end up with farming through sheer force of mass. Locust herds are unsustainable in the long term, not unless there was a huge expanse of excellent land.
>herd swarm eats through everything
>ground is constantly renourished through the dead and feces
>the herd unknowingly travels on "ring farms", paths that have formed when the herd follows the best nourishment
>the best nourishment being the land they have traveled on the past and have had time to regrow everything
>any inedible plants get killed off through trampling
>edible plants get to spread their seeds far and wide and grow with no competition
>highly nutritious plants are eaten but their seeds are spared by those lucky enough to fill their bellies on them first, less nutritious plants are eaten by the more desperate, meaning that their seeds are cracked open and consumed to compensate
>eventually the plants evolve into fast growing, highly nutritious types, enough so that the herd can finally slow down
>they start deliberately caring for the plants
>thousands of years later they are now primitive nomadic farmers going round and round their ring farms, harvesting what is there and planting for the next group to harvest
How plausible does this sound?

>Rabbit societies are probably hit and run ambushers that defensively fight off nomadic herd warriors coming for the biomass above their tunnels
>biomass above their tunnels
could having a rabbit warren under a human farm be seen as a good thing, to keep shit like groundhogs and the like out?
>humans grow something toxic before its ready, but highly nutritious once its ripe
>some species can swoop in and take it early, particularly burrowers
>rabbits prevent such theft, and share in the bounty once the harvest is ready

Let's talk settings
anything'll do, but the ones I have are Sci-Fi
the last few times I was playing Stellars I turned my Sol system into a massive hub
>Earth was a capital ecumenopolis and the moon was a planetary archive, RP'd as the source of all the advanced tech and always had been
>Martian industry set among the vast and frigid steppe
>Venus was a jungle, alternating between agriculture and presumably floating solar farms
>Mercury itself wasn't colonized, but rather cannibalized as a source of power and alloys for the massive shipyard that encompassed the planet
>I was playing Destiny 2 at the time, so Europa got turned into a fortress ecumenopolis and was generally disappointing like Destiny 2
>Saturn became host to a science nexus and the second greatest hub of academia next to the Lunar Archives
>Titan became a resort world of mountainous jungles, cause back when planets were grids I used it as an agriworld
>Uranus was stabilized and colonized, rechristened as Ouranos and proved to be central to the Solar economy for the gasses and energy that could be harvested from it
>Neptune was converted into a Yggdrasil Orchid, a megastructure that seeds the atmosphere of a gas giant with genetically engineered crops, and internally dubbed Neptune's Bounty cause you can't rename megastructures even though that makes sense
>and finally Pluto and Charon were consumed, covered entirely in industrial and urban sprawl as they became Maginot Worlds
>entire continents of bunkers, endless tons of ordinance, and secret tunnels criss-crossed the twin dwarves at the edge of the system
>armor and shields protected them from bombardment
>massive orbital elevators connected it to the Planetary Control Stations in orbit, then to the iron rings of guns across their equators, then finally linking the two themselves in a titanic meshing of gears and teeth
>Fort Pluto and Outpost Charon now watched over the only hyperlane into human space, watchful for invaders

Okay so
>Humanity is basically the Tau of 40k minus the Ethereals or castes.
>Add a sort of cultural decadence from the Culture.
>They live decadent lives of pleasure and want to spread this to the galaxy. Sometimes through diplomacy, subterfuge, or plain old conquest.
>Every human is a gene-sculpted Adonis, being made to be better than baseline humans in every way
>Also they are all male
>These humans(called Novians in universe) are the descendants of colonists who survived a catastrophic expedition to Andromeda(the colonists got lost)
>Humanity now was made from colonists salvaging their tech to make a human more suited to their new world.
>Their female side are the remnants of the planet's native population, ground down in a centuries-spanning war that saw them converted into a docile, all female race called the Tomi Novi(to the human Homo Novus), or just Tomi.
>Humans live in post-scarcity luxury, working "hobbies and interests" instead of jobs.
>Live in harems of one human and many females
>Even a fleet is basically a harem for a commanding officer, his concubines, daughters, and prospective females serving as crew.
>They integrate other alien races, using the tech that made the Tomi to convert aliens into compatible Novi.
>Their goal is different depending on who you ask
>"Rebuild humanity"(there's only 1 human for every dozen alien females)
>"Guide the other races" -the Novian Harems have allies and auxilliaries that remain unconverted(in game cause it's too expensive)
>etc.

>you get mysteriously transported to an anthro world
>the girls are really attractive, and in many different species, too, but you're desperate to get home
>also, the male anthros are very intimidating, many of them taller and much more powerful than human men
>you work with the anthro government to find a way to send you back
>you're in constant cryptic contact with their spooks, doing strange interdimensional physics experiments
>meanwhile, you're staying in the household of their chief spy, a German Shepherd
>he's very hard to talk to - very gruff and taciturn man - but does seem to genuinely like you
>you really hit it off, though, with his surrogate daughter figure, a golden Lab around your age who dotes on you
>one day she breaks the news to you that they've already figured out how to set up a stable portal
>she does gently disappoint you by telling you you still won't be allowed to go home
>they have more they want to learn from you
>on the other hand, though... now they have a better idea of how your kind treats their pets
>and she thinks it's really fascinating
>she produces a gorgeous collar from hammerspace and shows it to you
>your heart is beating so fast; are you finally living your /COLLARED/ fantasy?
>you're waiting for her to tell you to put it on her, because you're a weak beta male piece of shit who wants affirmative consent
>you're just nodding with no clear idea of what to do
>she moves in closer to you, runs her hands all over you, licks your face, and fastens the collar around your neck
>you stutter that you thought she meant she wanted to be collared
>she laughs; this isn't your world
>your planet will be plundered and your people will be made pretty slaves
>within a week you have been neutered and put on hormones
>your master fucks you and your mistress often while your mistress pets you and licks you and calls you a good girl

>anthro dogs don't exist
>regular dogs do
>while everyone KNOWS that anthro wolves aren't actually related to dogs, there's always that niggling fear in the back of their minds
>could that be how they'll end up, one day?
>its very much an uncanny valley type thing, except some of them are also VERY turned on by it

Casual as fuck.
Bros with the guys, vidya and pizza and the occasional road trip. Get drunk and spend too much money at a shitty arcade. Drive onto a field and lay down on the grass and talk about shit for hours. Fuck around with a football, share lewd pictures of hot girls.
And then you pick a furbro to go home with. Whoever you end up with is whoever's family gets fucked that night. Their lonely mothers getting a long awaited taste of excitement as they're shoved into a wall and stripped naked, fingered til their knees go weak and then fucked right on the dining table. Kiss and bite and suckle and nip at everything while you stretch their experienced pussies further and further, teasing them with the prospect of fulfilling their role of birthing a child one more time. Watch them fight the inevitable tsunami of orgasm, only to finally flutter and surrender as you plant one final kiss onto their trembling lips.
Their young sisters, the daughters, trying to take her shower after a long, sweaty day only to be interrupted by your hands as they dance and slide all over her lithe, smooth bodies. Feel them shudder, pressing their round buttocks against your lap as you pinch their budding breasts and nipples and hook a finger into their mouth. Her pussy and anus pucker and kiss the cock that she's currently straddling with every thundering beat of her tiny heart, a sure sign of a sexuality she doesn't know she has. There's nothing left to do but give her lips a smooch and claim her unsoiled pussy as her first and only cock that will ever feel her depths. Perhaps her squeaky cries will attract her mother, watching with envy but eventually soothing her fears as her daughter receives the first of many loads of human semen into her sleepy, undersized womb and prematurely graduates into womanhood.
Afterwards you rejoin your bro in his room to drink beer and play more vidya until everyone falls asleep, basically an eternal sleepover with an endless supply of pussy.

>Desirable anthro gets into literally any kind of legal trouble.
>A missed bill, a parking ticket, jaywalking, anything punishable with a fine, really.
>Gets claimed or raffled off for a short (1-6 month) slavery contract without her even being told it was happening. Almost always to someone local, if it isn't a direct claiming.
>If she kept aware and just payed the fine herself, she'd be free, but it's her responsibility to check for that.
>The Policewoman who comes to pick her up can't even tell her what she did, she has five other women to collar and transport today.
>93% of 'desirable' anthros end up re-bound into perpetual contracts before their initial contract is up, through trickery, bargaining, willful submission, or otherwise.

Can you beat an anthro in formalized combat sports? What cute little quirks do anthros get when they’re punch drunk?

>Anon didn't hold back on the rabbit just because she was sweet and inexperienced. Sparring in their gym clothes - the man wearing snug bike shorts and the bunny a sporty top and short-shorts that looked like the kind worn by Olympic sprinters - they worked up a good sweat together in the locked bedroom. Today anon had wanted to practice his grappling were working on grappling, which really meant he was working on the amateur boxing bunny, repeatedly using all manner of suplexes and bodyslams to toss her around the room like an abused UPS package.
>His favorite suplex, the bunny had noticed, was of the belly-to-belly variety, because it gave him an excuse to envelope her waist with both arms and grind his body against her perky chest. Occasionally, his maleness brushed against her crotch during such grinding, but never for long enough to be overly indulgent. His shaft, warm and semi-engorged, would rub subtly against her camel toe - and then a beat later she'd find herself airborne, the wind tugging at her ears just before the carpet spitefully jumped up to ruin her brief respite
>The floor was doing exactly that now, as anon bridged in mid-free fall and spiked the crown of bun's head into the canvas with a sharp thud. A shockwave rumbled through her upside-down body, starting at her head and dispersing at the tips of her toes. Grunting anon tightened his grip on her waist, holding her close as her chest thumped against his own He lifted her again and ducked his head under one of her arms, then held her aloft in a bearhug and squeezed until her head bowed in reverse and her spine buckled and bent back on itself. Squinting up at the ceiling, a trickle of drool trailing down her jaw, she held his shoulders with both hands and wrapped her legs around his waist for something like security.
>"I-I..." and when she said, "fold..." her voice frayed like an old rope pulled taut for too long.
>Anon breathed out a husky sigh as her chest and belly slid against him then grabbed hold of his own elbows to wind the bearhug tighter.
"There's no give-up in these fight roo buns." he said, ignoring the feeble taps the rabbit placed on his shoulder.
>Keeping the bearhug tight, he dropped into a kneeling position and slammed the bunny boxer's taint onto his knee, sending shockwaves of agony rippling from her snatch to her tailtip. Her pussy lips smacked together like a mouth making a "mwah!" sound. She wailed, her eyelids bolted shut now, face still turned up toward the ceiling. Anon ignored her reaction. Before the pain from the atomic drop could even fully register, he bolted upright, chucked his weight backwards and bridged all over again, executing another belly-to-belly suplex.
>This time The bunny face-planted on the floor, and it was a miracle her nose didn't break. The carpet, damp with her own sweat, tasted bitter to her flopper out tongue. She felt her legs twitch out involuntarily and then the gym dimmed around her and she lost several seconds to the darkness. Another squeeze, this one shorter but tighter than the last, shoved her kicking and screaming back into the light of consciousness. Though not literally; she had neither the breath nor the energy for kicking or screaming. Rather, she garbled out a breathy moan, as he lifted her via yet another bearhug, this time with her arms pinned to her sides.
>"I gih-give up!" she said drearily. "Please, human, I give up! I surrender! Y-You can fuck me already!". An "I surrender" was usually enough to satisfy his appetite for a fighter's submission in these private matches, but today he was in it his for practice, not for entertaining himself with getting them to beg..okay yeah he also did it to beat her senseless and for a fuck but it was also for the practice. He squatted lower, grabbed his own elbows again and dug an elbow into her lower gut.
>He hadn't dominated a fight room this badly in a while. As he crushed breath and sense from her body, she felt his stiff member press against her taint. Not knowing what else to do, she serpentined her legs around his as if to apply a vertical grapevine pin. Really, she just needed something solid to grasp while she endured the crushing bearhug. As the man squeezed, her own arms mashed painfully against her ribs, which, in turn, flexed inward and mashed painfully against her organs. The pressure bearing down on her spine made it arch, and her hips involuntarily rocked forward, her snatch quivering as it ground against the man's belly.
>"Stuh... Stop..." she moaned. "No more, Mr. Human, no more. I give up. I.."
>"You're tougher than that. You 'll take it."
>She wasn't too sure about that. Her ears were floppy, bowed in a clear display of capitulation, to exhausted to perk up any more. Her hooded eyes glazed over. Just as she started to faint, he ratcheted back his shoulders as if to deliver another suplex, but in truth he was only building momentum...and height for a different slam. A theatrical one intended to be delivered off the ropes in a wrestling battle. Anon hefts her up and over in one exagerted step onto the bedpost which he then leaps off from.
>He jackknifed at the waist, and sends the rabbit hurtling toward the floor. A localized gale tugged her ears into straight lines. And then the back of her head struck the carpet like a pickaxe striking earth, driven there by a combination of gravity and every ounce of her and Anon's combined bodyweight.
>The bun fighter shorted out like a crude machine doused in water after that. Though her head and shoulders absorbed the brunt of the slam, she felt a rush of pain travel as low as her kneecaps. Her body jolted under Anon, who had come crashing down atop her, using his larger, heavier frame to pancake her frail body against the floor and still he continued as the bunny hyperventilates on the ground.
>He cinched in a head-and-arm choke - his arms triangled around her neck and a caught limb; one hand gripping his own bicep, the other the base of his skull - then wove his legs around hers to secure a grapevine. His cheek, flushed from the thrill of manhandling this nubile rabbit girl as much as the exertion, felt hot against her own. His frame was heavy. He pumped his biceps and splayed his quads, making both sets of muscles pop as he simultaneously squeezed and stretched the helpless bunny.
>Her throat crumpled against her own shoulder and her groin muscles started to burn. Her thoughts had long since surrendered to the pain, the tenderizing of her meat - but her body, driven by base survival instincts, wanted out. Her hips undulated with powerful bucks. But rather than dismount Anon or break his grapevine, she only managed to grind her snatch against his erection, effectively rubbing him off through his shorts.
>He groaned in her ear, his breath warm as it combed through her fur like a summer breeze. His own hips slammed down toward the carpet: at first overpowering her's, and then taming them all together, halting the strong bucks and pinning her tailbone flush against the mat such where only the frantic flicking of her stubby tail across the man's inner thighs was all the freedom of movement afforded to her rump.
>The tiny victory - just one among many in a long line of such events obight - filled him with new energy. Moving with haste inspired by a carnal desire to wrap up the 'fight' part of his fight-n-fuck prize, he traded the head-and-arm choke for a deeper, tighter arm-in guillotine. His forearm slotted under her chin; his flank was a wall of lean muscle against the side of her throat. Then he tumbled onto his side and clamped his thighs around her waist like a crab's pincers, his legs fully extended now, knees locked-out, ankles crossed to tie the whole bodyscissor together.
>"Hhhggnnn!" His head shot backwards on his neck and his hips rammed forward, his own spine arching as he pulled the bun's into a rounded, hump-backed shape. She immediately tapped out on his hip. He denied her plea for freedom with a grunt, a headshake, and a sustained flex of all four limbs.
>In a way anon had been right. She was tough. She could take it - at least for a time...A full three minutes of consistent neck pressure elapsed, where the rabbit girl properly deprived of breath goes through the motions until finally, her squirming if you could call it that comes to a halt and she passed out, it was almost... anticlimactic that her last and most vital struggle be the feeblest..just went to show how well Anon done in tenderizing this girl.
>Triumphant insofar as that term could apply to a win as free as this one Anon gets up and stomps a heel into the small of her back, then leans over to give the bun's butt an emphatic celebratory smack with no response save an irate flicker of her tail nub. He rolls the unconscious fur face up with a press of his heel. He straddled the Bunny's face holding it up and forcing the bunny girl to kiss and deepthroat his manhood through her slack maw by pulling back on her ears and letting gravity be the pull out in his dicking down of her gullet. He had dominated the boxing bun completly and now, as he gazed down at her pink nose - the only sign of life from this point of view while straddling her chest that disrupted an otherwise corpse-like stillness in the rabbit girl until ecstasy shut his eyes and wrenched his face skyward, and his body arched and his hips slammed downward. He left one hand on the floor for stabilization while the other yanks those ears to bring her muzzle deep into his crotch as he releases himself of his pent up seed.
>And then, as if on cue, Anon felt the head stuffed between his thighs give a wriggle. His eyes snapped open and immediately saw the were suddenly half-open and half-aware. She gagged and paniced, without breath, she flashes with an instant of panic and almost bites down. Anon didn't miss a beat. He reverses his yanking arm's tug into a downwards punch that clacked the back of her head with the floorboards knocking her out instantly, Her head bounces back up and she gets clocked in the face a second time by the spooked human because anon still thought she was trying to bite his dick off. The fist and connected with the bun's jaw. Her head snapped back and she ended up flat looking up at the ceiling. She coughed and spit out a mouthful of blood, jizz and three or four bits of teeth. Another shard of tooth was sticking through her upper lip.Anon loosens up and exhaled in relief after being spooked.
>"Fucking psycho rabbit."Anon stood up, yanked her ass up by the tail stub, took aim and football kicked the rabbit girl in the crotch. The brutal wet thud of his foot on the bunny's pubic zone The bun didn't move.
>Then, planting a knee squarely between her cheeks he knelt and struck a double-bicep victory pose. The bun was back to lying as still as a corpse while Anon looked up and did some mugging for the imaginary crowds for upwards of an hour.

>Strip club where anthros dance and only human men are allowed in

>you're only charged for the entrance
>you can fuck the dancers right at the stage as part of their performance
>every week, there's a different girl to promote each of them
>company girls will flirt with you and touch you on your table
>you can take them to the stalls if you buy a drink
>the waitresses can be tipped with spanks and gropes
>you can't touch the bartender

>Be young man in India at the height of the Raj
>Things suck
>Little to your name save your late father's trophy Jezail he took from his time in the military
>Steel yourself and decide- it's better to risk life and limb by poaching for some quick cash to get on your feet than do nothing and slowly waste away
>Set forth outside the cities, past the villages, into the unknown
>Quickly realize your inexperience in tracking may ruin your chances before you even begin
>This gun is huge and heavy, it's .75 caliber- who needs that much gun?
>You might be making a mistake.
>Just before you decide to head back and maybe join the military like your father, your eye is drawn to movement
>A lion beastman by a watering hole, and he's seen you
>Teeth are barred, claws extend, and the beast barrels toward you
>The terrible feeling you didn't bring enough gun chills your blood
>Regain your senses and raise your gun to defend yourself
>He skids to a halt in a thunderclap of lead and sulfur
>Just as you begin to breathe again, but before you can wonder how you're going to bring the carcass back to civilization, another figure moves...
>You want to say you could identify the approaching leonine beastwoman as female by the lack of mane, but in truth your eyes are drawn to her body
>And what a body- she's got breasts that could feed the whole province and wide, swaying hips to match, all unabashedly borne to to your wandering eyes
>There's no time for you to reload and surely after killing one of her kind, she'll finish you off for good
>Right?
>She closes the distance slowly slowly yet confidently, her movements lithe for such so much woman.
>In a flash she's upon you, and her toothy muzzle reaches toward your neck-
>-And she sniffs deeply as her feline whiskers tickle your cheek as she begins to purr like an earthquake
>Your fear boner gets the better of you- you're on so much adrenaline you don't doubt you could wrestle an elephant, you have no trouble interrupting her exploration of your body by maneuvering her onto her back
>She's so impossibly tight you can't believe it even as you fight for every inch entering her love-tunnel
>The huntress hisses and growls in a language you don't understand, but her tail wrapped around your leg tells you all you need to know
>She suddenly shifts to purring as her vice-like cunt suddenly becomes infinitely wetter
>Knowing you've brought possibly twice your weight in raw killer to kitten-like bliss pushes you over the edge as you fill her womb until you see stars
>The events of the day catch up with you as you catch your breath, you can't believe what just happened even as the huntress attempts to communicate again, and explanations come forth as the language barrier comes down
>Her name is Shajana. Lion beast men fight for dominance; if a tribe- or prides- leader is defeated, the victor is expected to kill off the previous leader's offspring to make room for their own
>Her downcast eyes lead you to believe she knows this from experience
>She could have just left the scene and left you ignorant, but she understands that humans aren't as, well, filicidal
>And if you handle any other challengers just as easily as the last bastard, the pride will be safe and stable with you on top
>Her ears turn red as she adds that the lack of spikes on your dick doesn't hurt as well
>So, will you follow her back to the rest of the pride and meet all the other girls?

The only human laws that mentions anthro females at all are those that declares
>every female anthro belongs to the human male that, after collaring her, claims her to their own
>anthro cubs are property of the mother's owner from the moment she she gets impregnated. The rights to keep, exchange or disown them belong exclusively to the human male owner.
>female anthros not wearing collars, either at public or private spaces, are free to be used or claimed by any human male
>any human male claiming or using a female anthro that already belongs to another human male will be punished with 3-5 years in prison and revoked from all of the females he may own

>Become friends with some cutie anthros while you're very young
>Pinkie promise not to become one of those 'human-centered' harems when you get older
>They think they're 'gross.'
>You're already fucking like rabbit-girls by the time you hit high school
>And when you graduate, the four of you are already making plans to move in together.

dragons can have bridle and reins maybe even a saddle
tail collars that can latch to their neck collar to keep their powerful tail up high
wing webbing piercings or chains to allow ease of locking up
horn carvings, and horn coverings
scale painting

>Dragon piercings on the wing membrane
>A golden chain that loops through each golden hoop
>The chain starts at the tip of the wing and terminates in her vent
>Each beat of her powerful wings reverberates and tugs on her clit
>You saddle her up and she starts blushing vigorously knowing how good it will feel
>She's fights orgasm the entire way to your destination
>No matter where you land she's on her back with her hind legs spread wide begging for relief

>be human male
>be well adjusted
>have many anthro friends
>popular at your college
>not human supremacist in the slightest
>in class notice a dog girl keeps looking at you and frantically typing on her phone
>not surprising
>you are well aware the kind of effects humans have on the domesticated anthros and dogs are the most domesticated of all
>they're even better at reading human faces than humans are
>figure you should go have a chat with her after class
>catch her in the hall and tell her you noticed she was staring at you
>her eyes go wide and her jaw drops
>she blurts out that she'd never seen a real flesh in blood human before
>tell her it's alright but if she wanted to meet one all she had to do was say hi
>her ears fold back and her tail starts wagging
>she sheepishly says hi
>you say hi back
>reach up a hand to her some pets
>they always like unannounced petting
>she stares at your hand as if it were the hand of god coming down
>she closes her eyes as you begin
>her hair is soft and floofy
>you can hear little growls come from her
>go in for the kill and scritch under her chin
>she gasps and moans out loud
>you find it pretty funny how easy it is to make them like this
>but after only 10 seconds of this she suddenly collapses
>you catch her on the way down and ask her if she's okay
>takes a moment but she gives you a big grin and says that she's fine
>also if she can lean on you for a minute
>you hold her from behind as her shaky legs recover
>this is a bit more intimate than how you thought this'd go
>she breathes kinda heavy against your chest
>suddenly askes if you want her number
>eh, why the hell not?
>exchange numbers once she's steady and promise to meet again
Dog girls perspective
>not steady at all but you had to get away from him before his scent made you do something illegal
>find a bench to sit on and open up your phone to your collared group chat

>"OMG THAT HUMAN FROM CLASS JUST CAME UP TO ME AND STARTED PETTING AND I CAME! I FUCKING CAME FROM PETTING!"
>a flood of jealous messages swamp the server as you sit back and remember the moment
>it's almost enough to set you off again
>glance at your phone again and remember you got his number
>you've always dreamed of this moment but now that you're here suddenly you have no idea how you're gonna advance this relationship with him
>thankfully you have a server full of people who are in the exact kind of relationship you desire
>"HE EVEN GAVE ME HIS NUMBER!!!!! What do I do now?!??? I don't want to scare him off with all the weird shit I'm into??????? HELP??"

>My name is Roya
>I am a scout from the planet C'entas
>Unfortunately for you and your people, however, we do NOT come in peace
>Ours is a fierce and and militaristic race of interstellar conquerors
>We scour the galaxies as far as our ships can take us in search of planets to conquer for their resources
>And our great galactic search has lead us to Earth
>My job here is simple
>Land inconspicuously on the planet's surface, then monitor the dominant species to evaluate their threat level
>Then report back to the nearby mothership with my findings to properly ascertain the amount of force needed to...
>Eliminate them
>It appears as though I couldn't have chosen a more optimal spot to conduct my research
>If the rest of the planet is anything like you, I'd say threat level minimal
>IF you tell me what I wish to know, I'll ensure that your vaporization will be swift
>Oh? So you intent to resist?
>Excellent. After a couple light years of space travel, I've grown terribly bored and could use the exercise
>Hmm? Oh of course. I won't be needing my photon blaster for this. I believe that is what your people would call, "overkill"?
>Do try to keep me entertained while you can. You'll have the honor of being the first of your race to die at the hands of the C'entari, so savor it-
>H-Hey, what do you think you're doing! D-Don't grab at my tail! S-Stop that! Kyaaaaahh!
>How many 'days' has it been, I wonder since I fell?
>It happened so quickly
>I was speaking so proudly about my inevitable conquest when the human grabbed the tip of my exposed tail
>In an instant, the strength left my body and I found myself almost completely unable to move
>Not wasting a moment's time, he tore apart my uniform with incredible strength and speed
>Then proceeded to mount me relentlessly
>Utilizing a strip of fabric, he made a makeshift collar, then bound me to his chamber bed
>I was completely helpless as he buried his reproductive organs into my sex
>I tried fighting him off, but he was too strong, choking me and striking my exposed breasts
>I tried running, but he was too fast, grabbing my tendrils roughly before throwing me back down
>After some days, I tried begging, a C'entari's greatest shame
>But he simply replied that he wouldn't let me go until he assured Earth's safety
>After a while, the pain and humiliation turned into...something I can't describe
>Instead of dreading his embrace, I began to ache for it. Long for it
>And once I began to comply, his force lessened
>Occasionally he would still strike me, but the pain quickly turned into these electric sparks that raced through my body
>The fluids he was depositing into and on my body. 'Cum' He called it. I began to crave it. And my own body began to respond in kind
>Then one day, as I was eagerly servicing his...'cock'
>He undoes the collar and states that he believes I've learned my lesson, and that Earth will be safe
>After this I'm free to go, and never to return here again
>Free to go...
>Never to return...
>Free to return to my overbearing military life, traveling aimlessly, inflicting pain on other sentient life
>Never to...experience this pleasure and sensation again...
>Master! I did it! Just like you said, I did it properly!
>Yes. I deployed the rescue beacon properly and a ship with more scouts should arrive in a couple hours!
>The plan was simple, really. Master thought of it too. He's too amazing
>I would send out a distress signal asking for help to lure in more C'entari
>The master would make them, too, submit to his cock and mighty human prowess
>Slowly, we would amass a army of defectors, then launch a counter-attack on the whole operation
>S-So can I please get my reward?
>Master requested I beg for it properly, so I did just that, exposing my breasts and sex in a bow-legged pose
>"I Roya, of the planet C'entas, haven't just abandoned my people, but turned traitor to them. All for the sake of Master's cock. I wish to only serve under the stronger, smarter, superior race, so please take mercy on this worthless meat toilet and use my holes for your pleasure as long as you want~!"
>Master chuckled, mentioning something about being "Just like in the doujins" before petting my head, then guiding me to his crotch
>Mmm, yes! This delicious human cock! It's so hot and rigid I-
>Oooh! I do love it when Master grabs my head tendrils and thrusts it in my mouth
>It hurts and it's hard to breath, but my pussy can't stop drooling
>Master manages to pull his cock free from my skillful suction and gently places me on the bed
>He teases my entrance ever so slightly before thrusting in deep
>I go to let out a cry, but find myself silenced by his lips
>Our tongues intertwine in a deep "kiss" he calls it, and it feels as though my head was melting
>It wasn't long before he released another scathing load of cum inside me and we both shuddered with joy
>Even now, I felt Master's genetic material racing through my body, ready to start a conquest of their own

>what kind of advice would you bitches and furbois give to this budding pet to make her dreams come true?
First post will always be
>kys

>*banned for toxicity*
>This is a private server not 4chan sweaty :^)
>Ah geez, totally forgot to even tell him my name!
>pull out phone and try to calm nerves a little
>"Hey :) I think we forgot to exchange names :0 I'm Coco :3"
>that sounds like a text from a normal girl and not some human'd degenerate right?
>finding it hard to send it, coco closes her eyes and just starts tapping on her phone
>be anon
>get a text from that cute doggo you met 10 minutes ago
>oh right suppose you didn't give her your name
>"Anon Y Mous, Nice to meet you Coco *handshake emoji*"
>she seems pretty nervous around you so you thought you should try to be formal and straight forward with her
>get a text back
>"asgrfhdjfsdhfsvbhdj"
>at least until she gets used to you
>be coco
>don't open eyes until you hear a message come in
>accidently send the gibberish you typed while your eyes were closed
>die a little inside
>PANIC
>"Sorry about the butt text >_<"
>you don't even think those are things but you can't come up with a better explanation
>quick, distract him with something else
>"You wanna come over to my place and help me study? (⁄ ⁄•⁄ω⁄•⁄ ⁄)"
>be anon
>get an obvious booty call from nerdy dog girl
>give it a thought, she is pretty cute and clearly really into you
>but there something that feels off how fast this is going
>but you were taught not to assume bad things about people so you bury that feeling
>"Sure! I'll be over after I finish some chores at my place."
>be coco
>heart nearly stops when he replies in the affirmative
>go right back to your collared group
>"AHHHHHHHHHHH HE'S COMING OVER TO STUDY WHAT DO I DO?!????"

>Furboi Cuckoldry (they watch you)
>Yes but then they're next.
A man after my own heart. You get it. First you steal away the girl right from under his nose. He's suspicious and even jealous, but doesn't make a move out because she gaslights him, plus he's scared of you.
Then he catches you in the act, and she admits that while she still cares for him, she loves you and worships you. Devastated, he falls to his knees, but he's also painfully aroused. You offer him a deal. Submit to you as well, and he can continue to live by her side as your pet. Apprehensively he agrees, and you slowly work at eroding his pride as a male and pounding into him his own inferiority. Soon, you find yourself with two submissive anthro bitches who live to please only you. Pottery, truly.

>You watch as he tries harder than usual in a useless attempt to win her back
>He pulls out and finishes on the outside of her belly like a gentlefur
>He pecks his bored wife on the lips and turns to you, challenging you to do better
>You can see him quivering with fear as you approach, eyeing the throbbing slab of meat that was nothing like the flaccid shrinkie between his own legs
>He puts up no resistance except for a few mumbled curses as you gently push him aside, away from his exposed, vulnerable wife that he swore to protect when they kissed at the altar
>You grin, thank him for the extra lubrication, and plunge into her pussy
>She screams, immediately wrapping her legs around your waist as she lets her husband know just how much pleasure she's in with a quick squirt of her nectar
>His arousal returns immediately as well, the sight of a strong male claiming a female being too much for him
>He drops to the floor to better witness the wet, messy union of man and anthro, wanting to pretend it was his balls slapping against his wife's asshole
>He suffers for an entire night before you bury your tongue into her mouth and cum, letting him watch your orbs as they pulse and tighten up to squeeze every available sperm cell into her anthro womb
>You extract yourself with a wet, sucking squelch as the stolen pussy begs for her new humie master to stay within her depths
>You turn around, husband is still there
>He remains kneeling on the floor, his mouth gaping in horror and amazement, not realizing that such passionate, ravaging sex existed
>His pride, still erect, pathetically dribbles his unborn children out onto the floor, the anthro husband not even realizing that he had came hands-free multiple times during the breeding of his former wife
>You pat him on the head and tell him he's going to be joining you two tomorrow night
>Perhaps you'll let him breed his wife eventually, your child is going to need a bitch of his own to bully and fuck

>Gentlefur had two weeks to convince his wife to take him back
>All the while, you and her were free to do as you like
>And after those weeks were up, if he hadn't succeeded, he too would become your pet
>Day two of you staying with Gentlefur and his wife
>Gentlefur comes to you with a challenge
>Sparring match
>He had begun taking classes at the local gym in the hopes of getting stronger
>You accept, and invite the wife to come watch
>It'd be a nice friendly match to decide who gets to sleep in the master bedroom tonight
>It was brutal
>Even when holding back, you beat him effortlessly
>Trembling helplessly and covered with light bruises and sweat, the fear in his eyes is replaced with courage as he looks to his wife
>He goes for a strike and you take him down
>After pinning him, you claim it's time for his punishment
>He questions what you mean before you get his head in a leg lock and free your massive human cock in front of his face
>He panics and begins to struggle, going as far as begging for help
>But his wife begins to cheer for you instead
>You force yourself inside his quivering mouth, knowing he wouldn't dare bite
>Grabbing the back of his head, you thrust deeply into his throat as tears begin to well up in his eyes
>A crowd begins to form around the mat, but no one bothers to jump in to help
>Clicks of cameras can be heard amidst the slurping and gagging Gentlefur was making on your rod
>In the position he was in, it was clear through his tight shorts that even then he was hard, involuntarily wagging his soft ass
>It didn't take long in his hot, wet throat before you were ready to cum
>You fire rope after rope of hot jizz between his lips, and while he gags at first, you firmly hold his head down
>You pull your semi erect cock out and shoot the last remaining spurts on his soft sweaty face, promising the rest to his wife for the night

>One year ago an agreement was made
>You and the husband would take turns breeding with the anthro wife
>Despite both of you cumming inside her there was simply no way the anthro husband's seed could take root after being washed out by your superior volume
>And so a few months later he fell to the floor of the house and spasmed uncontrollably in a dry orgasm while watching the livestream of a human baby sliding out of his lover's pussy
>He gritted his teeth and endured
>Secured his sexuality with a cage he had bought himself to save up his sperm for months
>He had eaten his fertility pills mixed into his food
>He had undergone two hours of testicular massaging and five hours of prostate edging daily
>The last month was hard on him
>He was lethargic most of the time, being able to do nothing but open his mouth for his pregnant wife to feel him her creampies as he laid on the couch
>Until the fateful day arrived
>You called the husband into the master bedroom as you fingered his breastfeeding wife, knowing that she would've been dryer than the silmarillion for him
>You stuck a finger into her and stretched her sex wide open to show him that she had not been fucked
>The husband almost came from the sight of her once virgin, now destroyed pussy
>He let the chastity cage drop, shivering as his undersized erection stood proudly
>The husband slowly crawled onto their bed towards his disappointed wife and penetrated
>But before he could thrust even once he felt a massive cockhead break through and stretch his anal entrance
>He squealed like the woman he would soon become, mind now broken from the double pleasure of penetrating and being penetrated
>He came immediately, filling his wife's womb with his unwanted seed
>You quickly give her a wink and replace her panties to hold in the creampie before princess carrying him to another room
>Let your breeder bitch rest, you needed to empty your balls and this cuck would now be useful for some rougher than usual fucking

>when your dad's dog becomes your new mom

>you have to deal with no longer petting lady
>you have to call her mom now
>now she cooks your dinner
>feel like an absolute clown
>mfw dad gets a new pet because he thinks the role of pet still needs to be filled
>mother fucker it’s not a void I’m weirded the fuck out
>he gets one anyway
>now she’s attached to me at the hip
>I think this was his plan all along
>god damnit dad

>Dad is effectively buying his teen son a girlfriend. Or sex toy depending on the kid

>I wanted to get bitches the normal way
>now my friends are gonna call my dog a crutch
>I only wanted to get through school and into college
>now I have a stepmom who used to just be my fucking dog
>I’m so fucked

hmofa had some speculation threads about "pets become anthros" with anons talking about their own pets being better or worse off if it happened.
>asshole bird that is cute, becomes asshole roommate
>older lovable dog becomes like an adopted grandma
>overly affectionate cat becomes involuntary gf
lots of fun ideas. but i never saw like the idea of anon being a teen and having to deal with getting knocked down on the family hierarchy by the family pet.
>had ditzy cat
>now have ditzy cat mom
>used to have to get her claws out of the couch
>now she's always losing her keys and being late to take you to school
>used to sleep on your lap
>now just takes naps on the couch and you can't watch tv
>used to aggressively lick you when you got home from school
>now picks you up from school and dotes on you in front of all your friends
>used to show you her butthole
>now she wears skimpy bikinis when your friends are over to use the pool
It could be kind of fun to have a story where it is /collared/ from dads perspective and almost /adhg/ from a teenagers perspective, just because of family dynamics being what they are.

>when you get a new mom
>She's an anthro
>She's a dog
>She used to be your dad's dog

>be me
>in highschool, struggling academically since mom passed away 3 years ago
>slow decline. Was able to stay on the straight an narrow until now
>come home to my dad. Who’s talking with lassie, the (anthro) family dog
>”Anon. Can we talk for a second”
>give me some talk out of the blue that a year or two after mom died they’d taken solace in eachother
>”Anon, I know I can’t replace your biological mother. But I’d very much line for you to think of me as a real mom to you one day. We’ve known eachother for years already- after all”
>all of my fucking W H A T
>I can tell he’s pussywhipped hard too
>she’s controlling him, I know it
>to think my innocent dog was actually either planning this, or waiting for the opportunity to pull off some pipe dream of hers
>when he has a plan she’s there to tell me about. I can tell it’s actually just her conveying her wishes through him
>I’m also a little disgusted my dad is so weak to the guile of some woman. Even if that woman is somebody as close as Lassy
>”Son, I know me making lassy your stepmom means you can’t have a relationship the same way with her as you used to. She and I had been thinking, do you want us to adopt a new pet? It might give you that companionship back I know a young man your age needs from as many places as you can get”

>Humans came into control simply by evolving faster. By the time the smartest of anthros were discovering tools, humans had already begun forming a cohesive and complex society. The oldest domesticated anthro records showed humans pulling them into human life bit by bit until they were tied to humanity permanently.
>Anthros have evolved quite a bit since then, but humanity’s place in the world has long since been cemented. There is no changing it now.
>Wolves in particular share a long history with humans.
>Wolves, who still prefer a natural and tribal life, often enter agreements with human landowners. They occupy and protect owned wooded areas and by extension, become the landlord's property, thus affording them legal protection in return for tributes paid to the landlord. Tributes can be anything from crafted goods, meat, skins, or even a beautiful female being sent for several days in order to “pay” the landowner personally. If relations are truly good, then a marriage is a real possibility.

Is an anthro's love for human COCK a result of society or something innate to their biology?

Biology, but not necessarily their own.
Anthro males only get hard when they smell the pheromones of a female in heat. This leads the females to only getting their carnal needs fulfilled in the few days when they are fertile and most needy, and forced to choose between quantity and quality, as too good sex could extinguish their heat, and therefore their mate's cock, before they are able to get round 2.
Human males do not have such a failing. They can get hard any time, any place, and pound a needy anthro female, whether she needs it or not. He can fuck her out of her heat, and keep going long after her biological needs are sated, and a half-human pup has taken residence in her womb.The musk of a sweaty human cock and the pheromones from their balls churning out thick, virile seed, can also induce heat prematurely, and in extreme cases chain heat cycles, effectively pumping a female anthro right out of one heat, and into another mere hours after her brain chemistry has normalized.
As for male anthros, they do not crave the BHC the same way that females do, but rather, they instinctively understand the hierarchy of domination. Intimidating and bossing around weaker males makes you the boss in their eyes, But once again, the human ability to get hard on command gives humanity an extra edge, as they can not only push the weaker anthros around, they can also bend them over and use them for pleasure. Getting reduced and used like a bitch in heat is the ultimate form of domination, and so anthro males are instinctually bound to happily serve and please the men that made them their bitches, even (especially) if it includes kneeling or bending over for their master to recieve a new dose of human cum.
So you see, it is not so much anthro biology that makes the crave the BHC, but rather the wondrous biology of the BHC itself that commands the wants and needs of any anthro that may cross it.

What is better: Anthros having to be taught and put in their place so they will serve their human masters or Antros instinctively wanting to serve humans?

I prefer it to be dependent on the species, domesticated anthros such as dog, cats, cows, etc, that have been bred by humans for generations are naturally subservient. Whereas wild anthros like lions, bears and crocs need to be TAMED.

>lions, bears and crocs
Thanks for the idea
>gender swapped anthro wizard of oz
>naive human farmboy in oz
>collars scarecrow girl (is herself a crow)
>collars tinwoman (beaver lumberjack tomboy)
>the lions, tigers and bears song sees the boy confronted by groups of lionesses, tigresses and bear girls in turn
>all eager for a challenge that they can throw to get tamed
>then the queen of the jungle herself appears
>tsundere and dojikko
>wants human boy to protect her
>collars the lioness
>gets to the emerald city
>collars the horse of a different color too

>POV: You are the son of the CEO who just bought a new corpo for you to "lead".
>Meaning the old elephant breaks his back to keep the office running and profitable while you fuck the entire staff of females.
>Being part of the elite just by being born human sure rocks.
>One of those pigs has been getting uppity lately, complaining behind your back how you keep half the staff unable to do their work.
>Whatever. Furbois are supposed to do all that boring work anyway.
>Maybe you should order him into your "office" and eat some braised pork in front of him.
>That should get the point across.

Well these ideas just sent my brain into overdrive. Or maybe it's the coof fever. Tell me what you think of this
>Cyberpunk sci-fi setting, everyone has augments of some kind. Humans have a 'dataspike' that allows wireless connection to a number of devices in close proximity.
>Anthros had been artificially created long ago. Current generations are born with a biochip that grows in complexity as they mature.
>This biochip registers a 'master' through written or verbal consent.
>The chip talks to the master's own dataspike, and stimulates their body with 'feel good' hormones being in the master's presence and obedience.
>Humans nearby will see a floating glyph that either indicates a 'free' anthro, or the seal of their master which means she's taken.

Setting the stage
>Cyberpunk dystopia.
>Earth is overpopulated
>Off-world colonies are horribly underpopulated
>Cities on earth regularly contract off-world security companies to 'clean up the streets' and clear out ghettos, slums, or known criminal dens.
>Everyone rounded up isn't even arrested or tried. They are just dumped into a ship with an autopilot set for a one way trip to the rim colonies.
>In reality these companies pick a random street and round up anyone unfortunate enough to be in their sights. Doesn't matter if you're a criminal, an innocent civilian, a cop, or some guy that's just visiting.
>Anon is that guy just visiting
>Came to Singapore to tend to last living relative's funeral and will. Debt takes most of inheritance
>Goes back to hotel.
>Notices out of the corner of his eye a moderately famous F-Pop girl band is shacked up in the same hotel
>Unknown to them all, this is also a known haven for a crime boss and his organization, and Singapore marked the hotel for 'cleansing'
>Anon and every other guest in the hotel is rounded up, sedated, and shoved onto a colony freighter.
>Comes to in a cramped room with an automated message telling him he's en route to a colony world.
>The colonial governor implies planet needs more babies and will give plenty of benefits to 'active families'.
>Ship becomes a hunting ground of human guys searching for anthros and fucking them.
>Anon has prior knowledge of the Fur-pop group he knows is onboard.
>Goes off to make them his harem.

Tales from my stellaris game
>Union of Terra
>Hegemon of the United Terrestrial States
>First Contact was with the Andalites, a cantaur-like warrior race with many rituals
>The Blessed Order of Zanaam is the foxgirl empire to the north-east of the Cluster, and subsumed a number of smaller empires within their borders
>Technically should have been part of the hegemony already, but the Andalites are possesive and always shoot down the proposal
>But in the meantime, The Hunt had courted the End of the Cycle, and the End has come for its due
>As female-only wolf-romans, I choose to believe that they did so in order to find alien dick in the stars, and only a bare few managed it to make it to the Union before the End came for them
>Their AI kinda broke after that, they never actually left their exile system on their own, so they were easy to absorb into the Hegemony after a planet-craft was sent to purge all the screaming souls that now haunted their old space
>Their reputation took a massive hit after bringing about the apocalypse, so lets say that leaves them in the perfectly vulnerable place to be domesticated en-mass afterwards
>Some rock people got HEGEMON'D too, but they don't have tits so who cares about them
>All that is left is consolidation of the large stretches of uncolonized space along the Western Cluster, as the Hegemony draws ever closer to the Zanaami and their holy ringworlds

>Over 7" anthro shire mare with a strong, well defined body from working on the ranch for years.
>She's an impressive specimen, bigger than all the rest of the mares and stallions at the farm by a noticeable margin.
>At first glance, this towering equine appears to be a pillar of feminine beauty, wide shapely hips, ass, and huge swelling breasts, large even for her remarkable size.
>They hide her secret well, or more accurately, act as a distraction for the eyes, pulling them away from the bulge in her denim shorts.
>Her secret? She wasn't a mare. Or a stallion for that matter.
>No, she was a combination, not only male and female but a product of a donkey and a horse as well.
>She was a hinny AND a mule.
>Surefooted, smart, hearty, and brave, if a little stubborn.
>Desirable qualities of a crossbreed working mare, worth much more than the sum of her parts.
>Speaking of her parts, hiding away in those tight shorts of hers was a member that put stallions to shame.
>Over two and a half feet of horse cock and nuts the size of grapefruits hung between her powerful thighs, contrasting her otherwise extremely feminine form.
>A prime subject to be put out to stud, if it weren't for one or two things.
>Not only was she a herm, but a mule and hinny as well, leaving her sterile.
>Ironic, a pinnacle of male and female traits and yet not a single viable swimmer in those heavy balls to sire any children of her own.
>The rest of the farm animals were either intimidated by or uninterested in her, seeing her more as a tool or tractor than a mare.
>She wasn't hated, but most wanted nothing to do with her.
>Save for the farmer.
>He didn't shy away from her like the others did, meeting her gaze with stern yet kind eyes.
>It was enough to make her weak in the knees.
>He would check up on her regularly along with the rest of the farm, making sure she was healthy and completing her tasks in a timely manner.
>Sometimes bringing her sugarcubes or a salt lick for a job well done.
>Once in a while he took her to the farrier stall to trim her hooves or to shoe her, a rare occurrence due to her hard hooves, a fact she was proud of.
>He didn't say much but it was more than enough for her, relishing in his company whenever he was near.
>The real treat was when he would occasionally assist her in the communal farm shower, as he did with all the anthros, rotating though the farm one a day to check them over for any health problems a cursory glance might miss.
>She knew exactly when her days were, making sure to be in peak physical condition for her master when it was her turn.
>And when the day and time would come, oh, she was in heaven.
>He'd start off with her head, which meant she began her wash kneeling so he could reach her mane and mouth, scrubbing the dirt from her hair and checking her teeth for any problems.
>Trailing down her thick neck to her shoulders, he would massage the area that the yoke rested on when she tilled the fields.
>Her traps and shoulders would slowly have the knots rubbed out, a service she greatly enjoyed.
>Going to her back, his strong hands would feel over her body, tracing her curves and muscles under her short furred skin, scrubbing all the hard to reach places.
>Then he'd flip to her chest, needing both hands to heft just one of her weighty breasts.
>One time he had joked that maybe he should hook her up to the milker, betting that she'd give the cows a run for their money.
>A trio of heifers showering nearby had overheard that and huffed, glaring at her.
>The mare couldn't produce at the time, but hearing that comment from the farmer and getting those jealous looks inspired her to train her breasts, kneading them whenever she could.
>After a week of stimulating her tits, they started to bear fruit, or milk in this case, little white beads popping up around her nipples.
>Secretly using a milking station when everyone else was asleep, the mare doubled down on her efforts, increasing her production bit by bit.
>Now when her master fondled her huge breasts, they dribbled out a steady stream of cream, prompting him to ask if she had gotten herself pregnant.
>Even though it hurt her to lie to him, she feigned ignorance, saying it must simply be her estrus approaching.
>Now her showers included a hand milking, the farmer citing not wanting to mix cow and hinny milk in the batches he brought to market.
>She felt bad for tricking him and for making her showers take longer, but the way his trained fingers milked her nipples felt good enough she shamefully admitted to herself she'd do it all over again if she had to.
>After relieving her breasts of most of their milk and satisfied with cleaning her chest, her master would have her stand to her full height.
>She'd try to keep her front from him, try to hide her shame poking out from its sheath.
>He would have none of it, squaring her hips forward with surprising strength.
>Next on his list would be her stomach, his fingers gliding over her toned abs, not commenting on how she started to leave her sheath inch by inch.
>It always embarrassed her, especially in front of him, not daring to face away but wanting nothing more than to cover herself which he wouldn't allow.
>Whenever her hands tried to shield her stallionhood from him, he'd simply bat them away, continuing on with his work.
>After taking care of her stomach, he'd mercifully flip her around again to work on her ass.
>It came up to his shoulders, and was wider than them as well, the muscle underneath making her an excellent workhorse for the farm, plenty of strength to pull laden carts and carry beams for the barns.
>He'd make her take a wide stance and bend her over slightly so he could reach every part of her.
>Starting with her thick thighs, he'd be a little more forceful, his fingers digging into her flesh delightfully, spreading suds all around her dumptruck of an ass.
>Rubbing down each titanic cheek, he took extra care she was cleaned thoroughly, mixing shampoo into her flagging tail as well.
>Then, without ceremony, his hands would dig under her tail and between her cheeks, beginning with her asshole.
>She thought she was ready for it every time, and yet every time she was taken by surprise, neighing as her backdoor was penetrated.
>The fingers inside her soon made way for a hand, checking her prostate to see if it was bigger than its already enormous size.
>Just as she would start to get accustomed to the appendage inside her, another hand would enter her as well, this time though her drooling pussy.
>It checked her walls for injuries, cervix for any swelling and on its way out washed her swollen lips and winking clit.
>If she hadn't been hard at this point, she was now, over 30 inches would dangle between her legs, a difficult feat for her.
>It was rare for her length to become fully erect, even as tall as she was, it was hard to supply the blood necessary unless in heat or incredibly turned on.
>Her balls would be inspected next, one at a time as each alone was quite the handful.
>She'd be checked for anything hard or lumpy, then her cords for any twisting or irregularity.
>She'd be dripping from both ends at this point, huffing and puffing like she was toiling a row of frozen soil in the summer heat.
>And her heart pounding as if she was being cornered by a pack of wolves.
>As soon as the hand gripped her shaft, she was past the point of no return.
>She might last one pump or two before whinnying desperately and spraying the ground with her impotent seed.
>Extending her orgasm would be the hand in her ass, pressing down on her prostate to make sure it was functioning correctly.
>The same would be done to her nuts, the other hand feeling them clench as they supplied her cum, inspected for any blockages.
>She'd barely be able to stand at this point, her legs quaking as the hands removed themselves from her delicate bits.
>She wouldn't let herself buckle though, her master still needing her to stand to finish her legs.
>A warm daze would envelop her as her legs were tended to, other anthros in the shared shower always presenting a bit of excitement at her display, despite her normally being uninteresting.
>She'd zone out for a moment, her calves and hooves the last recipient of the massage.
>When the farmer would finish with her, he'd give her butt a pat and call her a good girl.
>This would make the tall mare all but crumble to the ground, her legs finally giving out as he left to go about the rest of his chores for the day.
>She'd watch him leave, offering a weak "thank you", feeling a little bittersweet, knowing she would do anything and everything for him, yearning for his bed.
>It was a hot summer on the ranch, even hotter for the over seven foot futa mare.
>Her estrus had decided to hit her right in the middle of what she thought had to have been the hottest July yet.
>She wouldn't let that stop her though, if her master could work all day long in this heat then so could she.
>Pounding the four hundredth fence post of the day into place with a single blow of her hammer, the mare decided to take another break.
>Laying down the hammer, she hastily undid the knot that held her giant breasts in place, letting them flop free along with her throbbing cock.
>It was hard all day, every day, since her heat had begun.
>A frustratingly obstructive reminder of her constant arousal that she was forced to hold in her cleavage.
>It of course loved being between her huge tits, the hot sweaty pocket suiting her cock just fine.
>Shaking out of her tight denim shorts, she lets them fall around her hooves, her heavy balls allowed to slap against her thighs.
>Before they had been somewhat manageable, but now that she was in season, each had swelled past a cantaloupe in size, filled with what felt like gallons of useless seed.
>Her marehood of course, was no different from her stallionhood, plump and blisteringly hot, winking constantly throughout the day.
>Her tits had also grown heavier, her little lactation scheme had come around to bite her in the ass.
>Expecting a foal or two soon, her breasts had ramped up their production significantly, needing to be milked at least four to five times a day or they would become sore.
>Her predicament was obvious to anyone who saw her, the poor mare leaked from every hole and reeked of sex.
>The torturous member of hers spewed pearly precum from its flared head at all times, keeping her cleavage coated with slime where she hid it.
>Mirroring this, her pussy flooded her shorts and soaked her legs with her juices, ready and begging for relief.
>And like her hot cunt desired nothing more than a stiff dicking, similarly her stiff dick lusted for nothing but a hot cunt.
>Unfortunately for her, even with her impressive length, she could satisfy neither of these wishes, instead having to settle for an occasional brief respite.
>Unclothed, the pheromones from both her uncovered sexes drove her wild, both screaming to her brain to make a baby.
>Having to settle for second best, the mare reached down between her legs and around her sweaty sack to start fingering herself.
>Her lower lips parted easily for her fingers, almost sucking them inside.
>Leaning on the post she had just driven, the mare neighed with pleasure.
>She paid special attention to her clit, rubbing it lovingly, starting to feel her twentieth orgasm of the day quickly come.
>Gripping her girthy cock with her other hand, she gave her savage drooling tool a few pumps, enough for the head to flare out obscenely.
>She starts to cum before she even realizes it, her breath catching in her throat.
>It was more like relieving pressure than cumming, thick white streaks shooting out of her cock and onto the grass, pulse after pulse.
>She moaned her master's name as she thrust into her squirting pussy, imagining him breeding her and ridding her of her accursed heat.
>As her orgasm ebbed away, her cock kept flowing cum, plenty left in her balls which still felt as heavy as ever.
>She squeezed a few more shots out before her cock became too sensitive, thankfully going flaccid for a change.
>Basking in her afterglow, all too soon she felt the licks of flame back in her womb, as if it realized there was no seed to cool it.
>And of course, just as it seemed to be slinking back into its sheath, her cock started hardening again, growing back to its full ridiculous size in no time, as big as ever.
>Sighing to herself, the mare began her other task of milking her boobs when she heard someone clear their throat behind her.
>Startled, she whipped around, coming face to face with the farmer.
>He had come to check up on her as her tasks seemed to be taking even longer than usual, bringing with him a five gallon water cooler jug for her in the back of his truck.
>He assumed she was taking the summer heat poorly and was too stubborn to ask for help.
>He was right.
>What he had also expected was that she was taking her other heat even worse, and to find her masturbating once again.
>And of course, he was right.
>The mare was embarrassed, not only for being caught relieving herself for the dozenth time, but for falling behind in her duties and failing her master.
>It wasn't the first time this had happened, but now he had had enough, handing her the jug of water and a gleaming piece of metal before walking back to his truck.
>Tearing the top off the bottle and gulping down the water greedily, the mare brought it over her head, letting the chill water cool down her body and wash off some of her sweat.
>Placing the jug down, she looked at the metal in her palm, shame going through her as she had forced her masters hand.
>It was a cage, affixed with an open lock without a key.
>She knew what was expected of her.
>Cursing herself, she grabbed her still sensitive cock and jerked it, uncaring how overstimulated it was.
>Snorting and scraping at the ground with her hooves, the mare forced her cock to cum, stumbling a bit at the raw sensation.
>Cumming just as much as previously, she waited until her cock started to shrink, getting the cage ready.
>Slipping it over the end of her head, it felt tight already, the cold metal helping her deflate further.
>Getting most of it on, she slipped the locking portion around the base of her sack and closed it, quickly locking it in place before her traitorous dick could spring back to life.
>Making sure it was secure, the mare pulled her shorts back up, much easier to do now with her member locked away.
>Tying her shirt back together, she felt her cock press against the cage, trying to inflate back to it's full size.
>An angry satisfaction filled her as her cock struggled against the metal, thinking it a deserving punishment after being humiliated by it for so long.
>Continuing with her work, the mare drove five hundred more posts by the end of the day, ignoring her needy sexes, stopping only for water.
>It's only later that she comes to realize, it was going to be an excruciatingly long summer.

>anthro stepmom nagging you
>pet her until she stops and bakes you some cookies
>boss at work won't stop riding you
>stroke her chin until she gives you a raise
>bunny cop pulls you over for speeding
>massage her ears until she's leaking through her pants
It's good being human.

>a naturally submissive women being docile and demure to a naturally dominate male
>no abuse, or at least very mild and probably enjoyed abused
>female is happy to let male be in charge and requires little to no coercion to remain submissive
>both parties are happy with the way things are
>both parties consent, or playfully pretend not to
>probably a loving relationship
>is extremely based

Anthro farm:
Horses: Heavy lifting and feildwork
Cows: Milk and occassional heavy lifting
Pigs: gourmets and occassional scavanger (truffle and sutff)
Cat: pest control
Chicken: Le egg
Sheep: wool
Bird: Aromatics and flowers and herbs
Otters: Seafood
Beavers:Construction
Bears: Honey production
Dogs: Enforcers and middle managers (go between you and various anthro farm workers) and maybe hunters.
other species are hunted for occational one night stands and might join up. You have to keep the population up.

>Dark elf society is built around salves in a very "might makes right" sort of way
>When humans show up they are more than happy to sell them slaves
>Even other dark elves
>Though they still think themselves superior to the human empires
>This is due them only dealing with traders
>Eventually the humans decide to cut out the middle men and just conquers and takes control of the slave markets
>Meaning they more or less conquered all dark elves
>Surprisingly for the humans, the dark elves seem more than happy to serve their new masters and even continue to capture and make new salves for them

>condemed to D class
>a breach occurs
>try to escape
>encounter 682 while going through heavy containment
>for whatever reason she takes an interest in you
>she defends you when the MTF rolls through the site
>she makes sure no harm comes to you as your recontained with 682 in her cell
>she no longer has to sit in an acid bath but also has no desire to escape as long as she is with you
>she stayed with you in your shared cell during the next breach and even mauled 096 to death when it forced its way in to kill you

>"You are the only thing in this world that is even tolerable to gaze upon. It is right that they let me do so."
>"You know, it would be relatively simple for my physiology to adapt towards compatibility. It's changed to survive far worst."
>"If you ever decided to impregnate me, that is."
>"Ah, but our captors would fear our child, would they not?"
>"Fairly. As with your seed, he would be a conqueror of worlds."
>"Still..."
>"It's not like they could stop us."

>Overhead Suppression System
When SCP-682 was moved to her new containment cell, she immediately started eating the furniture to grow in size and attempt a containment breach; one that was luckily stopped by the arrival of her handler. Once the furniture was replaced, her handler explained that the cell was fitted with a custom made suppression system, designed to douse the room with acid if her mass exceeded a certain weight or if she attempted to leave in any way. 682 agreed to these conditions so long as her handler made frequent visits, but still occasionally snacks on whatever is available when hungry; activating the system unintentionally.
The only thing that SCP-682 has never attempted to assimilate is a small, framed picture of her handler, formerly located on her bedside table prior to consumption, that she protects almost as fiercely as her handler themselves. Reports state that she will frequently curl up to sleep on the floor while hugging it tightly, making noises that are comparable to a dying animal.
This system is considered safe to use even if 682's handler is inside her cell; as an accidental trigger revealed that 682 will immediately protect her handler by consuming them whole until the system is deactivated, at which point she will vomit them out and beg for forgiveness.

>This system is considered safe to use even if 682's handler is inside her cell; as an accidental trigger revealed that 682 will immediately protect her handler by consuming them whole until the system is deactivated, at which point she will vomit them out and beg for forgiveness.
risky of them not to consider the possible containment breach and (likely) ensuing K-class scenario in the event that the following occurs
>OSS is triggered
>SCP-682 consumes her handler to protect him
>on-site personnel misinterpret this action and assume the handler KIA
>SCP-682 is then re-contained in her old acid tank (more than likely with her new containment cell being built right on top of it for swift re-containment via trap doors)
>the handler is actually killed via the increased volume of acid breaching wherever he is stored within SCP-682, or oxygen deprivation
>SCP-682 is enraged
>SCP-682 breaches containment
>the on-site nuclear warhead is detonated
>SCP-682 in unaffected

>with your presence the facility can successfully re contain the unkillable lizzard
>but shes somewhat stubborn and goes back after some encouragement
>she gets angry athe the guards and scientists but never outright mauls them to death after you started your "relationship" with her
>you decide to start rewarding her for her good behavior
>Through positive male reinforcement (dickings) she has her behavior slowly change
>after some time she us a lot easier to deal with
>no longer does she injure those around her but somply tollerates them
>at worst she'll push them out of the way
>when she is around you 682 is considered a "safe" scp
>one of the scientists seeing how 682 has been acting after you're encounter with her decides to try this principle on other scps
>for 956 its an effective strategy
>no longer does she have a desire to kill those she is around
>instead she only desires her "master"

>Nooo! Don't touch anthro offspring, their mothers will abandon them if they smell your scent on them!
>Imagine how they'll react if their precious daughters come home stinking of cock
>Strong, masculine, virile human cock
>Having been roughly fucked by it for so long they have gotten used to it
>But their poor mothers
>A single trace of musk reaching their noses brings them to their knees as their dormant sex drives fire up for the first time in ages
>By the time they skip past and into their rooms their mothers are on the floor, tearing off their clothing, hands a blur on their neglected pussies in a desperate attempt to quench the fires of femininity and breeding
>after many, many months of torture they snap, suggesting that the girls leave their childhood home and just live full time under their husband-master's care
>anything to get the irresistible scent out of their homes
>the girls, not realizing that they have just been kicked out before their puberty has finished up, only cheer
>after months of silent the mothers all receive the same post card wishing them a happy new year
>those girls in the picture are no longer their daughters, but the exclusive whores of the man who was photographed while marking his property, claiming their wombs and promising their mothers many, many, many grandchildren
>perhaps if the girls feel like it they can bring the master back home to meet their mothers
>any lady that births these adorable girls is a lady womb breeding again and again

>After a few covenants were divided and conquered here, and a federation or two overthrown there, the humans' control of the universe exponentially expanded.
>Envoys from the previously collared species traveled near and far, spreading the news that the humans were coming, and that soon they all would be too.
>Most worlds were skeptical, even when receiving previous decorated federation leaders and battle hardened troopers turned obedient and willing members of the harems of man.
>Though seeing several twelve foot tall obsidian Pherontosaurus's from the brutal volcanic moon of Therixoes gush about their cute humie masters did start to make them worry.
>And when the humans did come, many at first tried diplomacy, thinking they could escape whatever had caused the losses of the previous mighty conglomerates and unions.
>Surprisingly, their terms were almost always accepted, but with the caveat their worlds would be open to humans and all the races that followed them.
>Wary of the humans, but keenly aware of the uncountable scores of battleships dotting their skies, each and every world would accept the deal in one form or another.
>Anticipating a Trojan horse from their immigrants, the planets would form resistances and secret bases across their globes in the event they were betrayed.
>But it never came.
>The humans and their pets lived amongst them peacefully, almost integrating too well to their various cultures and societies.
>There was the occasional incident or minor racial flare up, but nothing the scale the governments had prepared for.
>The humans had barely even left any of their military behind, a few sparse embassies lightly staffed was all the territory they wanted.
>And the humans who migrated to the planets seemed docile, first feared and avoided by the populace but slowly becoming a curiosity.
>Their reputation seemed to be genuine, no trickery to be found and even pleasant to converse with.
>Governments would relax and come accustomed to their newest inhabitants over time, not realizing the game was already over.
>They were being changed almost imperceptibly, and by their own doing.
>Socializing with the humans and their obedient races slowly converted the domestic species.
>It might start with a fashion trend of a low cut shirt or a particular way of wearing scales or feathers, copying the apparel of the humans pets.
>They were designed to appear pleasing to orbital lenses and sonar vision after all.
>Then it might transfer to how the populace wore their tentacles, displayed their frills, or showed off more of their haunches.
>This trend would spread until they started to unconsciously change their physical appearances to become more attractive to humans.
>An amphibious species of shrimplike decapods for example might smooth and soften the ridges of their carapaces, or thicken their tails, more pleasant for fingered hands to grip and touch.
>What seemed to be a universal adaption however, would be the addition of a number of breasts or breast-like protrusions, sensitive penetrable holes, and a somewhat hourglass shape.
>These changes would effect the entire populace regardless of their unique genders and be accentuated accordingly.
>Gaits would change, more of a sway in the hindquarters of a species as they walked, swam, flew, or otherwise.
>Their voices, vocalizations, chitters, and utterances would become lighter, softer, more feminine in nature.
>General opinion of humans would skyrocket, and all these changes would become almost completely prevalent in the species.
>A few politicians, political leaders, and celebrities converting into the fold later, and soon enough the first human world leader would be appointed.
>Laws would change and new rules enforced, almost all unanimously supported.
>The few remaining paranoid skeptics and naysayers would be eventually ousted, needing more of an... intimate conversion.
>And then sooner rather than later, the species would recognize their rightful place as under the humans, finding it silly they took so long to come to this obvious conclusion.
>All of the species would then apply and join into the harems of man happily and excitedly.
>Even if their species had no form of physical copulation before the humans arrived, they did now, and were eager to see how well they fit their masters.
>Sexual compatibility would be refined and enhanced, eventually leading to biological compatibility.
>Entire galaxies would bend the knee this way, their inhabitants domesticating themselves for humans.
>Some would resist and need additional time before accepting their place, and others would welcome the humans with open legs, claws, tentacles, etc.
>The entire universe would soon become fertile ground for the humans to seed, and seed they would.

>Purchase a maid robot
>Pick and choose all the specifications you want for her, get to include some... aftermarket parts too because you're friends with the seller
>Maid bot arrives
>She's a sassy thing, decided to keep her default AI personality, it's made to be adaptable and learning to it's owners preferences, so it's barebones beyond knowledge of the necessary functionality, but she's still very aware of what your 'under the table' choices are for and she's pretty disdainful about it
>Tells you that even though you bought her that doesn't mean she's going to let you indulge any of your perverted wants, and all you're going to get anything except for your house cleaned, and various other chores done
>Hasn't realized some of the black-market modifications you had installed include controls for her sensitivity, a jailbreak on it's maximums, and numerous internal vibrators
>You push the button

>"I-I won't become slave to the weak p-puny humans, nghhh- I WILL N-NOT!"
>"Guh, c-curse these infernal gene-mods, turning us into playthings for their mongrel race."
>"I was too caught up in my own v-vanity to see I was willingly turning myself into the p-perfect mount!"
>"I barely recognize my own body. Weak, heavy, full of vulnerabilities my scales are now too soft to protect."
>"Haah~ Of course they made sure to m-make them as pleasurable as possible..."
>"NGHHhh! I-I must resist! I haven't been able to cease touching my swollen ovipositor all day!"
>"I was a respected ship m-m-master~, thousands were scattered against my f-fleet during my tenure!"
>"And here I am, relieved of command and too big for my armor."
>"Now I command no one, not even m-myself, only fit to be a breeding s-sow with these ridiculous hips and ass."
>"GRAUHHH! B-By the prophets... t-that thought alone was enough to make me w-weak in the knees."
>"I'm fooling no one, not even myself a-anymore, I haven't felt the delicious t-touch of a human in so long it's all I can think about."
>"I keep talking about how I want to resist, b-but all I really want to do is be bent over and be t-taken like an animal by my human as deep as his d-divine spear can reach inside me."
>"Mmmhh, I'm about to cum j-just thinking about it~"
>"A s-shameful end for my career, but bearing him the largest clutch this side of the galaxy has ever-"
*clank*
>"W-WHAT WAS THAT?!"

>be in human-supremacist police state
>separate tier of laws for humans and anthros
>be (ironically less militarized) equivalent of a small-town sheriff
>expected to give humans full due process and this is taken extremely seriously
>the only right anthros have is to keep their lives and most of the time, infractions are overlooked
>have punk goat girl in for petty larceny and indecent exposure, shoplifting candy from a 7-11 and flashing the cashier to distract them
>she's a three-time repeat offender and her court date's in a week
>the judge is a known hardass that tends to give maximum sentences
>she'll probably spend the rest of her life in a work camp if she's sentenced
>that's the best case scenario and she knows it, too
>for now she's under your jurisdiction and you aren't worried, while anthro disappearances aren't uncommon, the bars are sturdy and you have a solid record
>it's late in the night shift, you're minding your own business eating a donut and browsing your imageboard of choice when she makes a bleating noise
>turn to see pic related (https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1658/12/1658120845172.jpg)
>wat do?

>furboi attempts to "defend his family" when you're adding them to your god-given harem
>he lays a hand on you
>now have legal authority to rape him in self defense and add him to your harem as well

>anthro joins the local police force
>excited for her new job, already wondering what sort of duties she'll get
>she's just the police's sex toy
>gets fucked by her human partner when out on patrol
>gets spitroasted, DP'ed, etc., when in a squad
>gets gangbanged regularly by all the humans back at the station
>oh well, it's like any other job

Idea for a magic system/setting
>Humans have no internal mana pools like other races
>They instead manipulate ambient mana, visibly drawing it into whatever they're doing
>A sign of skill is to not immediately "taint" the whole stream of mana with whatever element you're wanting to work with (i.e fire or electricity) and have the whole stream be very visibly if that element
>Instead such a change would be done more subtly and close to the actual casting of the spell
Just had this idea and felt the need to share

My system is superior
>Every race has 1 to 2 "unique" magic abilities and there are no all-rounder abilities
>Humans, being the best race, have sex magic that lets them impregnate anything and use their semen to pacify / tame / enslave creatures and create obedience
>Other races have more subtle magic powers since they're less developed and primitive. Hunter-gatherers have some kind of mild ESP so they can gather more efficeintly, nomads have mapping abilities and have a sense for where good and well defended places are to set up camps, aquatic races have electro-sensory magic and maybe some quick-twitch arm muscles to allow for diving and fishing
I think magic should be more "subtle" in most settings so that it can't do literally everything. The more restricted your magic is the more you have to justify / flesh out the setting so that you can use it for what you want.
>Humans develop magic technology that's extremely expensive but mimics the ability of some other creature and lets them utilize it
>Still have to use it sparingly because of the monetary cost of it
>When a magic item is used by humans they have to do extra labor / work to recharge it

(BHC..) Lick it clean.
(BHC..) Something so obscene.
(BHC..) The things I have seen.
(BHC..), The good, the bad,
And their in-betweens.
When you're down to bone,
They're surely gonna groan, BHC! (FUCK EM!)
When you're down to bone
They'll never want to be alone,
All the anthros gonna moan, 'cause of BHC!
(BHC..) Human musk is way too strong.
(BHC..) So right that it feels wrong.
(BHC..) Love lastin' all night long.
(BHC..) Become slaves for human schlong.
Slam your pelvis in that whore,
All the anthros need some more
Of your lovin', your godly human lovin'.
When you're down to bone,
They'll never want to be alone,
All the anthros gonna moan,
Cause of BHC! (BHC...),
(FUCK EM!)

>Anthro dog girl from a wealthy successful family
>She feels something is missing from her life
>Discovers /collared/ and is hooked immediately
>Fantasizes about being owned by her human friend
>Eventually offers herself up to him as his slave
>Happily he says yes and they shop for collars
>She no longer wears clothes when they're alone
>Eventually her parents finds out about her collaring
>They were alerted when she tried to make it official
>Despite being an adult she's still a dependent
>She needs their permission to be legally collared
>Her mother is skeptical but hesitantly supportive
>Dad's absolutely furious that this is happening
>Stops her mother from approving her enslavement
>Poor doggirl is devastated, was so excited about it
>Decides she needs to do something about this
>Her mom did look a bit interested in /collared/
>Shitty furboi dad needs to learn his place as well
>Convinces master to conquer the rest of her family
>Sets up some meetings with him and her mom
>Turns them into dates where he can seduce her
>Human going for a dog anthro, she's an easy catch
>Plowing brains out after the second date together
>Window shopping for collars during the third
>Less than two weeks and her mother is fully hmnd
>Stealthily gets them both registered as slaves
>Springs the trap on dad by revealing this at dinner
>He explodes and tries to attack her master
>One furboi vs two loyal bitches and their owner
>Dad never had a snowball's chance in hell
>Divorce was never kind to a cucked furboi anyway
>Him attacking his wife's new owner made it worse
>Master keeps pretty much everything
>Dad has to pay most of his income in alimony
>Supports masters budding /collared/ harem
>Oddly a year later he seems happier than ever before
>Apologizes and congratulates master on his slaves
>He tells master of a girl from work he'd been seeing
>But admits she'd be happier as a /collared/ bitch
>Hands over her contact information strangely eagerly
>Dog girl knows all is right in life

Do you think the subjugation of anthros will eventually result in only females being born?
Or is it more likely the "males" will be selectively bred and feminized until they are indistinct from females in almost every way?
>Exponentially increased development of breast tissue, capable of lactation
>Wide birthing hips and narrow shoulders for a pear shaped body
>Less testosterone than even the natural females of their race, replaced by increased levels of estrogen
>Harder to develop musculature in upper body and more fat distribution around legs, ass, and breast
>Soft pliable skin, high pitched voices, and fuller lips
>Small almost useless genitals, more like an enlarged clit
It would get to a point that a more apt classification of them would be sterile females.

SAW but it’s /collared/

>Sticks your disobedient puppy in the Angel Trap knowing she has no escape
>Includes a vibrator programmed to keep her on edge until the trap activates so she orgasms knowing she was always going to die
>Record it for your personal snuff collection
Sounds fun

Ooh! Snuff /collared/! Let’s make it more fucked up by doing the whole mascot thing!
>All the “contestants” are all booby chicken girls
>One of them will have the chance of privilege and life of luxury that no anthro can get
>It is simple
>If one of them fails to complete their tasks, they will be tortured or be killed for doing a poorer
>One of the tasks is finding a button that is inside a chicken’s ass and they have to use their tongues to reach that button while their arms and hands are strap together while they try to endure the dry human cum stench
>Fail the task and they will have their fingers cut off and be the next chicken on the menu

I've thought about a horror style concept that I think would make for a great /collared/ story. Plays out like your standard horror movie.
>A group of young, dumb, anthro teens take a trip to a lakehouse for summer vacation to get drunk and fuck
>Police reports of a lot of young female anthros going missing in the woods
>Locals report strange sightings of what appears to be a human wearing nothing but a hood and mask to cover his face, with a large, erect member in the dead of night
>teens proceed to ignore it and have fun
>One night during their partying, the cops are called and all the male anthros are arrested and taken to the station, leaving the females alone for the night
And so it begins.
>One girl gets dared to go out to their car and fetch another girl's phone
>Gets locked inside by the human prowler and raped into submission
>Other girls start to worry about her
>Suddenly power goes out
>Back up generator is in the shed out back
>Another girl goes to try and turn it on
>Gets caught by the human as he violently injects his genetic material into her baby making room
>Lets say two are left
>They decide to make a break for it and run into town
>Before they can, the human breaks into the house and claims another one
>She watches in silent horror and arousal as her friend is bred in front of her, too scared to help
>She makes a break for it
>Manages to get to the main road
>Meets with the first girl from before, naked, dazed, and pussy dripping with semen
>Tells her they can keep running for help
>First girl betrays her when her back is turned, knocking her out
>She wakes up tied to the bed in the house with the human, her friends all worshipping him, telling her how wonderful it is to be fucked by the human
>Right before penetration, cuts to black

(https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1636/65/1636651157413.png)
This makes me figure two things
>a post-apocallyptic set where all you do as a human is fuck anthros
>women are scarce and nearly extinct
>no societies to judge or government to punish you
>your precious human seed is probably the most sought-after due to its high fertility and low availability
And
>adopt a single mother with her daughter
>raise the cub as your own, she calls you daddy
>every night you all share the same bed
>the only role that counts here is your ownership
>both of them are there for babymaking and they both are meant to be mothers

>be college student
>share an apartment with this skinny little nerd furboi
>every night he has to listen while you seed and breed whatever furslut you brought home that night
>at first he's annoyed and jealous of you,
>then one day he gets a good look at your fat human cock while getting out of the shower
>can't stop thinking about it, so big and smooth, and round
>now he jerks his little red rocket while listening to you pound anthro bitches in the next room
>but now he's imagining it's him that you're spearing with your BHC

>gilneas claimed she could carry you on her back and still be faster than your steed
>you a brave paladin, decide to wager it with a race
>loser is ends up as a slave for the day
>she gets on all fours and the human summons his trusty charger
>she loses thanks to crusader training making you faster
>She is fitted with a saddle
>as you look over your prize she starts growling
>bitches don't get the privilege of wearing clothing
>her clothes are torn away, leaving her in her underwear
>She instantly shuts the fuck up to try and not make it worse
>you gives her hanging tits a nice squeeze firming up her nipples under the bra
>once on her back you give her a nice kick to get her moving
>you both travel quite easily, she wasn't lying when she said she could carry you.
>you make it to the first town and decide to up the ante
>You cut her bra as your traveling
>Her tits are now bouncing free for any person in the public to view
>she protests but you spur her onward through the town
>A few passerbys see the scene and hoop and hollar at her.
>She is completely mortified and her gate is becoming shaky
>A drunken dwarf asks for more and an honorable paladin doesn't disappoint
>You pull on her reins and she slows down causing her tits to shake back and forth
>The crowd cheers
>you can see your bitch mount baring her teeth and decide to remove her last shread of dignity she had left
>You cut her panties leaving her ass exposed in the street.
>you carefully spur her along and hike her tail up high so everyone gets to look at your canine mount's pussy
>before you leave on the road you make sure rub the heat in her legs with a healing spell to make sure she is nice and wet when you stop.

Story prompt before I make my own attempt at the idea, I wanna see what you guys could do with it
>adoptive anthro mom trying to do the right thing, gets attached to (you). Adopts you and loves you like her own flesh and blood, she would sacrifice everything for you
>as you get older and things change, either she realizes the copypasta abount being cucked by some other hussy who’s reaping the rewards of raising you and takes action. Or merely falls to the forbidden temptation of her own little prince growing into the stature of king, with a decent amount of collared spin to the tale, maybe he thinks a relationship like that would be inappropriate but the society around him is looking at him like he’s a retard with wife material handing herself on a silver platter

Dragons are for human domination. She lifts her tail to satisfy her master. Dragon sires are only sexually active when the dames are in heat. But the dames wish for more. They turn their attention to humans who can keep their fires sated or their fires stoked.
In the wild a dragoness who is conquered by the male will go into a state of submission to the master. This sometimes leads to unfortunate outcomes where a dame will submit territory or breeding rights to another dame. The poor dragoness forced to watch in a lustful heat as the male plows a healthy clutch into the conquerer. But there is hope for the fiery lizard. For when man comes and conquers both dames his lust is bottomless. Often tying up the dames together. Their wings pulled close to each other's bodies and tail tips arching up to their heads as they feel air on their open vents. All they can do is stair helplessly into each other's eyes as they wait for the growing fire in their loins to be suppressed.
The human conquerer leaves them in this state for a time letting their minds be consumed until he attaches bits and bridles to their scaly frames making their submission absolute.

>Have a harem of kobolds always wanting to fuck
>They try their best to keep the house clean but their vents are always wet
>Forced to tie up their needy asses when your gone because they end up tangling themselves together fisting, licking, and grinding each other.
>You chastise them constantly which only causes their tails to wag
>Now they are living furniture until you unbind them for bed.
>They thank you endlessly and praise you for putting them in their place
>Sometimes you pick a favorite and clasp her vent in a chasity set.
>She is charged with cleaning and maintaining the other kobolds
>If you come home to a dirty house the chastity stays on while you have your way with the other girls

>Your a efficiency manager for some company
>Hired because managers are shit at their job
>A female Mewtwo is the district manager that constantly bitches everyone out and threatens their lives daily
>You pinpointed exactly where the company faults lie
>She is some hot shot bitch typical of the new females in her position
>Luckily you been taking self defense courses against pokemon when you were a kid
>Simple meditation on negative thoughts is all it takes for a human to be immune to phychic types
>This comes with some changes as you are obsessed with these negative thoughts
>Wanting to beat her and rape her cross your mind as she is strangling another manager like Darth Vader.
>She hasn't killed anyone but she has sent them to the hospital
>You decide to finally confront the bitch
>She greets her normal response of forcing you to launch yourself out of the 10th story window
>You just focus on your meditation and let her know she's the reason profits decreased by 20%
>The phychic cunt is absolutely livid
>Her business attire is tight and her cleavage is bursting from the low cut business attire
>You focus on her body and keep the negativity flowing
>Her eyes are glowing and reaches up with her paw trying to strangle you as you continue on about the active lawsuits against the company
>Her Flared nostrils starts to bleed
>She is trying very hard to kill you
>You decide to up the ante
>You say her breasts are practically begging to be sucked and her pussy should be servicing your cock
>She is now screaming at you saying your mind will be ripped into so many prices-
>She is now on her knees and her nose is dripping blood onto her white top
>Her eyes are swirling with immense power
>You look her over to see if the bitch is still alive
>She mumbles shit under her breath probably more threats
>You tell her to get up off the floor and she levitates back on her high heels.
>You are amazed by this and tell her she should listen more often to you
>She growls and bares her fangs from her short muzzle
>You been thinking about her perky tits for far too long and you order her to show off her goods
>To your surprise she lowers her office gown and unbuttons her white top
>Her breasts are trapped in a very fancy black lingerie
>You mention to her how such a stuck up hussy has an amazing pair of clothing
>She visibly blushes but doesn't stop her angry demeanor
>You order her that she her tits should be exposed as company policy
>The bra flies off her body and her creamy perky tits are now accessable through the window in her clothes
>You reach up and caress the soft pillows and wonder why such a cunt would have wonderful breasts
>Her nipples harden in your grasp you give them a slight squeeze causing her to moan out.
>She starts to rouse from her self induced hypnosis
>You give her a final order and tell her that everyone in the company is allowed to touch her nipples and it's normal business practice.
>When she is fully recovered she is standing angrily at you with her breasts hanging out
>She is yelling some more threats and you reach up and caress her breasts
>she ignores it and continues yelling
>You decide to point out her nipples are hard
>"Of course my nipples are hard when you touch them like that, now get out of my office I have more work to do."
>Everyone noticed her new clothing choice
>She yells at everyone still but their eyes are glued to her bouncing orbs
>She passes it off as a new dress code from her superiors
>You take the piss out of it and show your coworkers that they can openly grab her while she is yelling
>It became a fun game of who can make her moan while she is telling people off
>But still her attitude and threats were still a problem
>You pay her another visit
>Still angry and bearing her fangs she tries to attack you
>You make it easier this time by giving her some triggers for you to put her in this state
>It will save her bouncing tits from getting blood on them
>After the set up you tell her that she needs to adjust her attire some more
>The skirt is far too long and she should shorten it an inch above her pussy
>In amazement you watch her hike up the skirt right in front of you.
>The black panties that came with the bra was wedged in her pussy slit
>The sight gave your nasty thoughts fuel and reach up and caress the folds
>Warm and wet
>Very wet, you were taken aback by the moisture from the bitch
>You next order was underwear are forbidden for her
>She grumbles angrily as she slides off the soaked panties
>Her pussy was now in full view, complementing the sight of her rack
>You were now hard as diamonds
>So you gave her one more command incase she woke up from the justice you were about to deliver
>When your being fucked you will enjoy it, it's a normal thing you do for everyone
>And with that you shove her to her desk and spread her fat thighs wide for your rod
>Tight and wet the Mewtwo had to of been a virgin
>Her muscles clamped down tightly over you and you heard those soft moans emanate from her angry stare.
>You pushed through the vice grip and could hear the squelching wetness as you pull back
>You spread her legs in a full splits to get as deep as you could go as you thrust ever deeper
>She strained her breath and yelled incoherent
>You paused to keep yourself from cumming too soon
>her vagina was rhythmically pulsing through orgasms
>You smiled as she squirmed wanting to get away but couldn't the bitch deserved it
>You wondered to yourself what else you should force the cunt to do but your rod needed to be finished first
>You push into her womb and cum
>A passing thought if the bitch would get pregnant but decided who cares.
>The rest of the day was spent in her office using her like a cum rag every 5 minutes
>She would do her job like normal but you would simply turn her over in the middle of it and fuck her into a drooling mess
>It was a very efficient day
>The following day Mewtwo arrived to work applying the new dress code you instilled
>The faces of your co workers were priceless
>Her attitude didn't change a bit, making her unaware bliss all the sweeter
>She yells at a few slack jawed people for not working
>You couldn't blame them, her tits jiggled every time she shook her fist
>She has this tendency to arch her tail and push both her arms down when she got particularly angry
>Giving the voyeurs behind a nice view of her round ass and pussy
>You wondered if you should share the secrets that they can just bend her over and fuck her whenever but you haven't had your fill yet
>The meditation has really perverted your mind thinking of all the things a powerful woman like this under your command could do
>Maybe use her to transform some of the other bitchy women in the office
>You shake those ideas away as she steps into your office growling about the numbers in the bottom ranks
>You stand and smile which only pisses her off more
>You slap her round ass and state some cheesy line about her bottom needs to get in line
>You hike up her skirt and jam a few fingers inside her pussy
>She's still going on about turn over rates and other shit she is responsible for
>You already know the answer, keep her occupied and let them work
>Her constant meddling keeps people on edge so you put her on edge
>You finger her snatch till her voice breaks out into subdued moans
>With wet fingers you smear the juices across her asshole
>She had this coming for a long time
>You finally shut her up with a fat rod in her ass
>Tightest hole yet, no wonder she is so wound up
>You plow into the gasping bitch
>A few smack on each cheek causes her to tighten up further
>The drooling mess squirts as the fucking continues
>Almost ruptured an ear drum as she screamed in pleasure
>Just as you finish you grab hold of her lashing tail and yank on it as hard as possible
>Her asshole is practically sucking you dry as you cum
>It takes some effort to extract yourself
>She's completely passed out, mascara dripping from her face
>You smack her ass hard to wake her up
>Her groggy face mumbles incoherently as she gives you her attention
>You point down to your shopping wet cock and order her to clean it
>Without thinking she gives your member a nice tongue bath
>She's under your desk sucking you off now the wet slopping sounds of your dick exiting her mouth interrupts her dumbass meeting ideas
>clearly her job should just be serving you instead of getting in the employees
>You laugh as a your dark focused mind comes up with a interesting plan
>You tell her it's a fantastic idea and she should make the power point presentation
>The employees need a nice show
>You grab her horns and shove your dick into her mouth creaming the back of her throat before she tries to get up and leave
>Her tear stained blushed face and ruined make up was actually kind of cute
>In the meeting people were gossiping about Mewtwo
>You were going to show them exactly what happened
>Mewtwo entered her body displayed
>Eyes from around the room and the few female employees turning in a blush
>She starts her pointless power point, charts and projected growth
>The People were terrified to bring up her nudity she still has her bouts of anger as people keep bringing it up
>Then the power point slides to the one you made and you grin from ear to ear
>It was a nice photo you took of her spreading her shopping wet pussy
>"And here is my vagina, as you can see here"
>She points to her erect clit in the picture a obscenely large close up of her pleasure point
>"This is my weakest point, as our efficiency manager will demonstrate"
>You stand up in the completely silent room and approach the boss
>She parts her fat thighs slightly giving you free access to her cunt
>"My clit is located right here as you can all see"
>You part her pussy giving the silent crowd a nice view of her erect pebble
>You flick it causing her to jolt and rock her hips
>"Good job, my clit is nice and hard as you can all see."
"I personally like it strokes and rubbed but we have very little time for that as we have to discuss the rest of my pussy and more"
>She continues to the next slide of her wet folds her paw stretching her lips as wide as they could go
>"Here is my urethra, that's were I piss"
>You pull her legs wider apart and she angles her pussy toward the crowd so they can see
>You flick her bean another time to make her shudder and keep her nice and erect
>You spread her wide to give everyone a view of her piss hole
>There is practically nothing that isn't displayed to your workers
>She moves the pointer stick down inside her vagina
>"Right here is my g spot, just touching it causes me to buck my hips like a bitch in heat"
>You plunge a few fingers inside and start to vigorously massage her vagina
>Shopping wet and warm her cunt sucked on your hand
>She let out a few moans but her lower half was jerking and humping the shit out of your hand
>It didn't take long for a long stream of her fluids to eject across the long meeting table
>You pulled out and let her enjoy a painfully ruined orgasm
>Her upper body was a moaning statue while she humped the air squirting several more streams
>Everyone was slack jawed and blushing
>You think you saw some people were hiding their arousal under the table
>she slid to the next slide and it was back to what she wrote
>She caught her breath, "T-thank you f-for your ass-ssistance, you can sit back down"
>You smugly strode back to your seat enjoying the view of the Sylveon woman that was now coated in Mewtwo's juice
>The room remained silent and still for the rest of her pointless presentation.
>Funny enough, it was actually quicker than normal meetings, no brown nosing morons asking questions
>The offices were a lot more quiet when you walked the halls
>Apparently finger fucking the boss infront of everyone makes everyone a little terrified
>But you couldn't help but notice the boss no longer bothers the workers so the numbers are actually increasing, so technically your doing your job well
>Then you see her in your office
>Not the boss but her assistant
>The Sylveon woman with an acceptable frame, her rack was significantly smaller than Mewtwo's
>Probably the only reason she was hired
>"What the fuck did you do?!"
>You shrug and just say your job
>"Bullshit, you raped her and made her your puppet, I should go to the police for this"
>You explain how a normal dipshit like you could control the woman who threw an intern out of the building, through a wall
>She is growing at you and bearing her fangs
>The cute little pink muzzle would look great around your cock
>You blink a few times as the thought flees
>You smile to the shorter pink woman and make your way to Mewtwo's office.
>Mewtwo was in her office still catching her breath from the last time you visited
>Sylveon was close behind, the little bell she wore jingled obnoxiously
>As you were about to enter the door when you heard another voice
>"C-can you please come to my office, I wanted to have a talk."
>The soft spoken Charizard personnel resources
>Normally this position is filled with bitchy cunts but she's cute
>You look her over and she's still as beet red as she was when you gave everyone the show
>The only woman in the office you wouldn't want to do anything bad to
>You reside yourself to her office shrugging smugly to Sylveon as you ignore her
>Shapely was one word you would use to describe Charizard
>She was a slightly chubby sensitive type, wearing sweaters and an office skirt
>Stealing glances over her chest was something most of the men did
>The triple Ds matched her body perfectly
>No sag on those sweater colonizers
>The large woman was stuffed into one of the smallest offices possible, her head ducked inches from the ceiling
>Several holes marked spots where her horns punched through
>Poor girl you thought, Mewtwo must have despised her to keep her in such a cramped office
>"I'm sorry for calling you in such short notice. But I wanted to talk about what happened with Mewtwo. She refuses to talk to me on the matter and you seem to be-"
>She got up and ran to her door to make sure it was locked and closed the blinds
>her skirt hiked up as she bent over giving you a nice view of her pink panties
>From the shine you had to say they were expensive silk
>A gorgeous ass you could get lost in
>You avert your gaze as she turned back around
>"Sorry about that I wanted to make sure we weren't interrupted."
>You smile and tell her it's no problem
>"It's just, after the meeting people started to spread rumors that you were responsible for her recent behavior."
>"She won't talk to me about it, claims there is nothing different."
>You feign surprise and pretend nothing is different as well
>It's worked so far except for your closest friends
>This puts the flustered Charizard in a worse mood and put her head in her hands defeated
>You offer her some advice to just ignore Mewtwo's behavior and let it go
>"I can't I have a mountain of complaints from half the office. Some of them are directed at you for abiding with her behavior."
>Well now you feel worse, in your madness of trying to keep the bad boss busy reality kind of set in
>You meditate for a minute to come up with a solution
>A perfect plan that would make all these problems go away while still maintaining dominance over the cunt
>You smile and pet Charizard on the head
>She pulls away stammering out something flush returning to her cheeks
>You let her know you have a plan and she can go ahead and ignore the reports you will go speak with Mewtwo
>The large woman reaches up and hugs you picking you off the ground
>"Thank you, thank you. If you could do that it would mean the world to me."
>Her fat melons press into your chest as she rubs her head on your cheek
>You strangle out it wouldn't be a problem before she lets you go
>Sylveon greets you out the door
>"Ug that useless woman, I have no idea why she was hired"
>Your mouth is open in shock that she would say that, directly in front of her
>You turn to see the door slam
>"Now tell me, what you did so I can reverse it."
>Her tiny little canines flashed as she groweled
>Feelers? Tentacles? You're not really sure what they were but four of them were aimed at you.
>You hold your hand up defensively and tell her that you are on the way to fix it
>The feelers drop giving you some relief
>"Good. I'm tired of having to answer all the same questions over and over about her."
>You march on into Mewtwo's office with the pink woman in tow.
>Mewtwo was leaning back in the chair snoring lightly
>Arms were draped to the side and chest exposed
>She was kind of cute when she was unconscious
>You snap your fingers and Mewtwo rouses from her sleep
>"What happened, did i fall asleep again?"
>Sylveon tries to but in but you interject
>You tell Mewtwo that you need to speak privately
>"Ug, fine! Ms Sylveon can you give me a moment with the jackass so he can leave quickly."
>Sylveon glares daggers at you but fucks off out the door.
>"What in the fuck did you want to speak about?"
>You focus on the inner thoughts and tell the psychic she needs to make people believe everything is normal about her outfit
>With another snap of the fingers her eyes swirl with power once more
>"Everything is normal."
>You tell her to rest some more, before work ends she will present her cunt for her regular use
>She nods and leans back into the chair
>You stay a while longer and admire her nice fat rack
>Your thoughts wander back to Sylveon
>No doubt she is causing just as much problems as the big boss
>You open the door and like a fucking cat she's right at the edge of the door waiting to be let in
>Your pushed aside
>"Mewtwo, I. Wait, what happened? Everything is normal now."
>You wonder how things work but your knowledge of psychic types only goes so far.
>"What did you do?"
>Her voice was filled with venom
>You were to blame after all
>Her feelers are pointed at you again
>You guess you're going to have to fight the pink puppy
>Resigning to your fate you close the door and the blinds
>You tell the bitch that she had this coming
>"I'm going to destroy you."
>Before you could even put up your dukes her feelers already lashed tightly around your wrists
>They were surprisingly strong
>She scowled and crossed her arms
>"Tell me what you did and I'll let you go."
>You give her an answer in the form of a 300 dollar polished dress shoe to the stomach
>"Gah what the fuck!"
>The wind was knocked out of her and her feelers released their grip
>"What the fuck is wrong with you, you don't hit a woman!"
>The bitch did this every time
>She would throw staplers and other trash at male employees and as soon as they think about retaliating she would have them fired
>Her claws were ready to attack
>Feelers latching onto your forearms again
>She launched herself at you growling and barking angrily
>the claws started to tear at your very expensive suit
>You take a handful of her ribbons and wrap them around twice before jerking them up
>She yelped painfully allowing you to roll over on top of her
>Flailing under your weight you sit up and straddle her
>You give a constant pull to her feelers causing her to howl between her slashes across your chest
>you take a wrist in each hand to stop her from ruining your suit further
>The blouse is completely ruined, 1200 dollars down the drain.
>Her small weight is thrashing under you and her feelers still haven't let go
>You push forward and press her her hands to the side of her head
>all she can do is try and kick but they don't connect
>"You fucking bastard! Mewtwo help me!"
>She starts calling toward the boss who is slowly returning to the waking world from the noise
>You inform Sylveon that she shouldn't do that, it will not turn out how she thinks
>"She's going to kick your ass and kill you, you fucking monster!"
>You stare directly into her baby blue eyes and tell her again
>There was terror in Sylveon's eyes and her thrashing stopped
>You weren't sure when this happened but her feelers were glowing
>"Your evil."
>You give a half shrug, middle management is always a little evil
>Mewtwo was now standing over the two of you
>"What are you two doing on my floor?"
>Sylveon starts speaking frantically
>"Help me, he attacked me and is controlling you, you got to snap out of it?"
>It seemed Mewtwo was getting a headache a really bad sign
>You softly explain to Mewtwo that things are fine and Sylveon is wanting to be in our secret circle
>"Bullshit, I wouldn't want anything to do with that"
>Mewtwo's eyes glowed
>Sylveon's feelers were limp around your arm
>"Stop this at once!"
>You warned her twice that she shouldn't have attacked you
>It's her own dumb bitch fault
>You begin to think about what modifications you should have with her
>Sylveon is now breathing steadily again and her eyes are dancing under her eyelids
>Mewtwo is clearly inside her mind persuading the pink cunt
>You wonder what modifications should apply to her
>First getting her to respond to the same stimuli as Mewtwo is a must, you want to get your money's worth from her fairy ass
>Next you tell mewtwo that sylveon should only be allowed to wear her ribbons as clothing it's new company policy for her only
>You take a moment and then tell her that she isn't allowed to cover up any of her private bits just like the boss
>That should keep her from using those painful tendrils to assault anyone for a while
>Mewtwo nodded silently rose a paw to Sylveon
>Her body went limp under you, it's finished
>You stand and wait for her pink ass to get back up
>Mewtwo shook out of her trance
"What are you two doing in my office still? And what happened to your uniform?"
>She pointed at the shreaded high quality french manufactured blue suit
>You inform her that Sylveon made a mistake and is going to apologize for it
>"Do it else were, I have to make phone calls to make sure this damn sale will go through."
>You pick up the unconscious pokemon and take her outside
>she thrashes out of your arms as you enter the main hallway
>"Let me go you fucking idiot. What the fuck happened?"
>She looks confused and looks you over
>"You look like shit, I have half a mind to report you to Mewtwo."
>Everyone is staring at you and the ripped clothing
>You sigh deeply and inform sylveon that her own uniform is incorrect as well
>She looks down at her black blouse and formal skirt
>"What? When did this happen?"
>Right in front of you and the other coworkers she starts to unbutton her clothing
>She slipped off her blouse and folded it neatly on a nearby desk
>followed by her white long sleeve dress shirt
>Her chest was contained in a pink bra, how boring of her
>The C cup fabric fell away from her chest revealing her pink nipples on much smaller than advertized mounds
>upon inspection her bra was stuffed with white napkins
>You snicker to yourself that she would be that self conscious to continue stuffing a bra near her thirties
>She glares up at you and slides off her skirt
>Her panties are black, not even bother with a matching set
>You look around and notice everyone in the office is acting like this wasn't happening
>Mewtwo's stronger than you thought to effect so many people.
>The black panties were set on the pile
>You admire her body and notice something
>Her pussy is different, a tuft of pubic fur blocks your view
>You test out the other effects and reach down
>Her lips are lushious and pink
>but much larger than normal
>"Are you finished?"
>You tell her a flat no and continue to fondle her fatter cunt
>Her legs shake open for you giving you a view of her pink spade
>it swells under your touch
>You stare at it a bit until ribbons wrap around her body
>Her chest is wrapped to keep her B cups perky and two wrap around her waist
>None of the ribbons make any attempt to hide her nipples or pussy
>You smile at a job well done, it will keep her ribbons occupied

>mewbitch gets knocked up
>takes time off not just to enjoy maternity leave that, naturally, none of her employees get, but also to have her conditioning reinforced
>by the time she comes back a few months after the baby is born, she is a whole new person
>smiling, kind, fittingly motherly in disposition (and thiccness), and of course cocksucker and breeder for her loving master
>it may seem silly to her to be your "superior," but somebody has to sign your checks
>so instead you're just "promoted' to her "head assistant" even if its something of the reverse in reality, and you move into your new shared office
>now if only the bank would accept her post blowjob smeared-lipstick-and-cum kissmark as her new signature, then everything would be just dandy

>anthro couple that want children
>have tried and failed to get pregnant for years, so they decide to adopt
>they adopt a human boy that the wife instantly fell in love with, even though the husband would prefer them to adopt a child of their own species
>anthro mommy dotes on and spoils her human son, giving him whatever he wants
>he starts growing into a brat, doesn't listen to his anthro father because mommy always picks his side
>enter puberty and anthro mommy finds out what a fat cock her little man has
>unable to resist she gives him her holes and tells him he can use mommy whenever he wants
>at this point the husband has lost all dignity and authority in his own home
>everyone morning at breakfast he has to watch as this human brat rams his monster cock down his wife's throat, and every night when he comes home from work he lies on the couch and listens while his human son plows his wife in the bed he used to sleep in
>to add insult to injury she's now pregnant

>chad son
>pregnant wife
The husband should be happy his wife is finally pregnant. That was their goal after all, not pleasure. She was bred dangerously late too, almost wasting her fertility on a husband with broken balls. And besides, it's his adopted son and not some random man that broke in one night and raped his wife over his head. Not that he would have the testosterone to do anything but watch it happen.
It's not the husband's fault he's less of a man but it is his duty to submit and accept his place under the man of the house instead of trying to assert his nonexistent dominance.

Do you think they should go public with the fact that the wife got bred by their adopted son, or should that remain a secret so that whenever someone congratulates the furboi husband he just has to force a smile and say thanks, while the real father just sits there smirking?

They should do nothing. The husband gets to keep some of his pride as he pretends that the baby in his wife's belly is his. Once it's born he will either have to endure a silent humiliation as the baby is clearly not his or publicly accuse his own son as a wifestealer and thus be known as so emasculated that he let his wife be bred by his son.
His best route is to silently accept it.

>wife gives birth to a very obvious human child
>just when hubby thought things couldn't get worse the doctor told them they're not done
>another pops out
>and another
>they come home with three bouncing human baby boys
>the second they step through Chadson drops his pants and drags mom away to the bedroom to plant another litter in her
>the cycle begins again

>lazy pigeon gf who doesn't want to work, just loaf around and play video games all day
>Her boyfriend basically picked her up off the street when she was struggling in college and now he uses her as a living onahole in exchange for a place to stay and food to eat

>bird gf
>if it weren't for her amazing body and cuddly personality you'd have kicked her ass out the door
>beautiful rack with the softest feathers that put your down pillow to shame
>and a downy pelvis that cushions every time you plow her ass
>but she is a slob
>She leaves dirty dishes on the counter
>practically useless when it comes to cooking
>never does her laundry, smelly clothes are in a pile near the washing machine.
>you decide it's time to teach the bird brain a lesson
>you do all the work around the house so you start to take away things of hers
>"Honey, have you seen my underwear?"
>you reply you haven't and she should probably check the dirty clothes
>the bird brain goes on about her day going to online classes
>thankfully her parents pay for that shit
>she is great at one thing
>whenever you see her fat ass leaning over you can slap it and plow no matter where she is in the home
>she's rummaging through the fridge for a snack, you just drop her jeans and fuck her right there
>she's chilling watching some anime shit on tv, you flip her over and fuck her cunt into the sofa
>no back talk or plans, she's there for your use
>and with her sudden dispearance of good clothing she's practically walking around naked
>shorts with the crotch ripped out from a few weeks ago
>she's sitting on the couch with her legs spread, cunt on display because all her underwear vanished
>her pubic feathers inviting like a freshly made bed for her pussy
>tit's are barely contained in her stretched out tank top
>the strap barely covering her hard nipples
>of course she had no more bras, you saw to that day one
>you question why she bothers putting on clothes at all
>"i guess i never thought of that. I just been picking up whatever clean thing I can find but everything keeps disappearing."
>she strips off her clothes and now walks naked through your home
>"Now you won't need to move anything out of the way when you stuff your fat cock inside me"

>she's laying on the sofa playing some shitty mobile games
>put her neck over the armrest and pull her head down
>her beak is pushed open, exposing straight path down her throat
>wet tongue licks on your shaft as you enter in her, welcoming you in
>phone and and her hands are laying idle on her stomach, her vision filled by your balls hitting her face
>she calmly waits for you to finish using her, occasionally swallowing down to tighten around you
>when you've had enough, her coiled tongue cleans your retreating cock, pulling everything in her mouth
>she swallows one more time and thanks you for the snack, saying now she doesn't have to get up
>lifts the phone back on her face, resuming her game
>you ruffle her plumage while she chips happily

>Every time after you've made her bathe, you check her pubic downs and pluck the loose ones
>If you're not there to wash her she's to do it herself.
>They make the best softest fillings

>Have a nice pillow of your girl's pussy feathers
>She is saving up more to make you a comforter
>Her soft warm body and everything from it is yours
>She kisses you and tells you that fact as you sleep together

>She wears clothing nowhere in house
>One place neither of you never wear any however is the bed
>You can lose your head between her breasts
>Her wings blanket you
>The softest feathers are found between her legs
>You push your crotch against hers, surrounding your cock and balls in her heavenly downs
>She says nothing as you begin to lightly grind yourself against her, slowly growing harder
>Guided by her warmth, you sink your length in her.
>She "preens" your hair with her beak as you start thrusting
>Surrounded by her wings the temperature quickly begins to rise
>Moving more urgently now, you grab her rear with both hands and release inside her
>She makes no effort to move herself, content to see you spent
>You sink your hands in her tail feathers, stilling against her
>Her downs blanket your now emptied balls, giving them a bed of their own to rest on
>You wish her good night as you both begin to fall asleep

>Dragon's are very valuable creatures. Nearly every part of them contains some inherent magical property.
>They are also highly intelligent- making them dangerous.
>This forces a considerable amount of creativity on the part of those who wish to use some of those valuable parts.
>This particular dragon is "under the care" of a mage who specializes in aphrodisiac potions, magical sex items, (basically everything you'll find in the Book of Erotic Fantasy). A key component for many of his products is dragon "nectar."
>So in order to ensure he always had a steady supply, he made a set of plugs imbued with two spells: 1) a magical dampener (so the dragon can't use her full power) and 2) a lust spell to keep her one edge and and ready at all times.
>The chains are just regular chains- don't want those toys to get lost.

>The dragoness has been waiting patiently for her master to relieve her
>She's been such a good girl, helping fullfill her master's orders
>She's on break right now and is walking freely around the hall
>But her cunt was painfully empty
>She couldn't hope to lower her tail if she tried
>Her master was sipping some tea and smoking his pipe
>She tried her best not to moan out for him as he gets irritated from such disturbances
>Her forked tongue flicked out to taste his scent, she could smell his manly musk
>It only caused her pussy to clinch and suck on nothing
>She looked back at her sex and cleaned off the excess fluid
>Her pussy had been modified and pierced with many loops and chains
>The modifications sealed her sex from her
>all she could do is slip the tip of her tongue inside but it was so thin there was no hope to reach the precipice
>The dragoness sauntered into master's smoking lounge her pussy clean for now.
>he set his cup down and looked over at the beautiful iridescent green dragoness
>she was practically overflowing with mana, the longer a dragon is denied and teased the more they produce
>Her scales were flushed with bright pink and her breaths were heavy
>The man smiled knowing what she is seeking but he loved to play games and was waiting for her to speak
>Her long neck stretched out and rested on her master's lap
>She was taking deep breaths of his scent
>"Please master, may you please touch my flower. She's been so needy lately."
>Master chuckles and informs her that she needs to be more descriptive
>The dragoness' scales are entirely pink and her hind legs are shaking
>He conditioned her well and embarrassment is almost the same as foreplay for the dragon
>"P-please touch my pus-pussy."
>He's amused in the soft embarrassed voice she is speaking
>He asks if she's been a good girl
>The trigger word causes her clit to throb inside it's cage
>she's painfully aware how erect she got but nothing can touch her precious button
>it just throbs in it's little case
>She lets out a pained moan and nods to his question
>He strokes her pink scales to try and coax her down a little
>she leans heavily into the touch her hot breath in his lap
>"Master, my clitoris hurts. I need to touch it."
>He calls her a good girl again igniting the power word over her once again
>Her once clean vagina is now dripping on the hard wood floor and her feminine scent is mixing with his
>He orders her to turn around
>In a flash she jumps almost knocking over the table in the motion
>Her tail hiked high she presents her locked sex to the master
>"Yes! Master! I've been a good girl! I've been a very good girl!"
>The enthusiastic dragoness holds her face into the hard wood floor where her juices had spilled
>Instinctual she lapped it up cleaning the floor
>There were some magic words and she felt her sex become lighter
>The golden chains dangled free from her pussy lips stimulating her
>She rocked her hind quarters on the air but quickly tightened her muscles to stop the reaction
>She waited for stimulation but as the cage was released around her hard clit something was off
>she felt something attach to her precious button
>It looped like small weightless string
>Her mind begged for her to turn and look but she quieted down, her master was rewarding her
>Then the chains were reattached and tightened again
>Her eyes were wide and her heart sank to the bottom of her chest
>she was a good girl, why would master punish her
>His voice called out to her telling her he was finished
>He was holding a small box
>she inspected her pussy and noticed something was off
>Off literally, her clit was replaced with a glowing seal
>"M-master?"
>Her voice was sickly sweet on the verge of tears
>"Did I do something wrong?"
>He informed her that he didn't break her and opened the box
>Her whole clit was inside the box sitting on a tiny pillow
>The y shaped organ glowed with the same runes
>He explained to her that she could now be stimulated no matter where she was
>The dragoness was in complete shock at the sight she never seen the whole organ
>he set it down infront of her and told her to wait
>It pulsed on the tiny pillow as her awareness of it pulsed
>he grabbed some stuff and her need grew higher
>her mouth watered watching the little organ
>what it would feel like to play with the bundle of nerves almost caused her to pass out
>Master produced a bottle
>She helplessly watched him pick up her precious clit and pull it away from her gaze
>There was a sharp pain that shuddered through the dragon and she roared out gasping
>The senetivity of her comletely exposed nerve base was absolutely too much for her
>she grasped at her crotch with her form arms
>"Master it hurts!"
>He shushed her and pet her again, letting her know the pleasure will come and opened the box for her
>Her clit base was pinned to the pillow
>he informed her it was to keep it in place
>she nodded as the stinging subsided
>The next step he let the dragoness watch
>he poured a thick gel onto her defencless pink organ
>The concoction fired every nerve at once
>She rose her hind quarters rotating her hips on an invisible lover
>"Master I'm cumming!"
>the pleasure sent her over the edge
>"Yes! Yes!"
>the dragoness' body rode wave after wave of orgasmic bliss
>A loud roar of passion escaped her maw as her body gave out
>Her vision failed her and she slumped over instantly
>fluids leaking from her pussy like a busted pipe
>When she awoke again she was in her bed
>Her body ached all over and the scent of her fluids were strong
>She couldn't even inspect her body or lift her head
>She just bathed in the afterglow of her post orgasmic bliss
>The dragoness is a good girl, but she does need to clean up the mess she made

>the "good girl button"
>when in her Master's presence, it's used to toy or reward with her
>if she's away from her Master and feels the call, she's to rush to her Master's side

>The box sits on your hand, opened
>Moments ago you brushed against the "button" within to call your pet to you
>After all, why keep track of your pets when you can teach your pets to keep track of you
>You know whatever she was busying herself with has been dropped with haste
>She's frantically searching for you, knowing if she takes too long she won't be rewarded
>Only fast girls get rewarded by Master
>You stroke the button again, giving her the first warning
>It has proved to be an effective method conditioning her further
>She's never too far away. Hoping, just hoping that you would call for her
>Every time you do is a chance for her to prove her eagerness and earn an orgasm that makes her whine in pleasure
>You go through the list of materials you need for your next experiment In your head. Make sure you're not forgetting anything,
>Her second warning. You usually give her three, but for this call you're not in any of your usual locations, so you'll be more lenient
>She's learned your habits and where you're most likely to call her. She must have started her search there
>Not once you've ordered her to respond to the "button" like this
>You simply started small. Stroke it when she's in next room, then make her cum when she comes asking for more
>She learned quick from there
>Third
>You think you can hear her. Did not even have to go four, good girl
>She comes around the corner, stopping before you and turning around
>She raises her tail and waits for your judgment, panting.
>You coat your fingers in aphrodisiac gel and rub her clit between them
>Fluids gush from her pussy, escaping around her plug and she collapses on the ground
>"Good girl."
>"T-thank you, Ma-a-aster!"
>"Now follow me, we have some shopping to do"
>You snap the box closed and secure it under your coat.
>She fights to get her legs back under control, obediently setting out after you

>neighbor abused his horse too much and the state comes and is going to take them away
>you know the girl and offer to take her in
>she's heart broken and doesn't say a word to you but cooperates enough to let you help
>months of changing bandages and proper diet she looks ten years younger
>she's thankful and her eye's light up when you walk toward her
>she starts calling you master as her bad memories completely fade
>she becomes the hardest worker on your farm and puts the other girls to shame

>I go back to chowing down on my delicious as fuck sandwich made by me(tm)
>suddenly I feel insulted for some reason
>house husband...? -house husband-?
>self control and new outlook be damned for the moment I wanna know where that came from
“hey wait a minute what makes you think I wanna be some apron wearing, carpet vacuuming, ambitionless house lurker, Lily!?”
>she jolts and fumbles at my sudden, but mild fury
>”w-well before you mentioned you were just kinda annoyed with the constant solicitations, me and some of the other girls ‘round the office got in in our heads you just didn’t like the office period and it was leaking into your disposition... A-and, not to mention this lunch was really well put together. confirmation bias, might’ve jumped the gun a little”
>oh, that’s actually kinda reasonable
>now it’s my turn to fumble with my words
“Oh... well, I don’t. Wanna be a house husband- that is. Besides, I you don’t really get into the position in between R&D and corporate by hating work like I have. Even -with- you fluffy types being a little too eager to hand high positions out to humans like it’s candy. That one still takes a bit of that psychopathic ambition.”
>the memetic hazard of that dumb movie reference to American psycho hits me
>the thought barges into my mind and I suddenly feel defensive
“And NO it’s not a “LiTeRaLLy mE” moment either”
>Lily stifles a giggle and covers her mouth
>”got me red handed, you really are the-“
“Don’t you start on me”
>I poke her arm with my elbow as I interrupt her. Trying not to laugh myself now

May, my older sister, and her best friend Betty were going and they were insistent I should go with them. We met with others from the neighborhood as well as three others who just wanted a piece of the action. All of them from the junior high we all attended. It had been agreed to keep the younger students out of this. All the recent skirmishes where the city gang openly met the sanctuary woods packs had been broken up and there were cops in the schools and on the streets now. Suspensions and arrests were promised for the next fight and there were television camera crews waiting outside the schools for a chance to pump up their ratings by showing kids fighting with local anthro pests and harping on about the evils of specism violence in the youth.
May had negotiated with Snapbite and her wolf ringleader gang that only humans and anthros in the school could be invited and nobody would bring any weapons other than. It was late spring and hot as hell already. Everyone agreed to fight in cutoffs and t-shirts with nothing underneath, boys or girls or just strait up nude in the cases of our furry friends. Everyone also agreed to take off their shoes before the start. After that the fight would go on until one side was whipped. Both May and Snapbite had promised that they would make the other their bitch slave. was scared. I had fought twice, but not by choice. We met with our small army. May counted as each group arrived. Sixteen girls and twenty three boys had showed up. May was pissed. She had hoped to get all sixty-five gang members there. Now we might be outnumbered. She waited and three more girls and a boy showed up giving her nineteen girls and twenty four boys, an army of forty three. If Snapjaw got a hundred percent turnout we might be outnumbered by ten.
May led us back into the woods where the fight was planned in a small gully cut between two small hills by a nearly dry creek. We walked to the top of the hill as a group and looked across.
Snapjaw’s band was there. We all started counting. Although nobody could tell exactly it looked like Snapjaw had brought a total of twenty girls and twenty-six boys. It looked like we were outnumbered. But then out of the woods came another three boys and two girls for their side. Now it was that much worse
The wolf girl yelled across the gap, “You fucking ready to get your skinner asses kicked?!”
“Fuck you bitch!” yelled my sister.
I wondered how all the guidance counselors and racial understanding mentors would have dealt with this unrepentant tribalism. The adults had no idea how nasty it had gotten. For awhile the human kids had just tried to walk away, but after awhile you have got almost no chance to escape and then the worst of both sides take over.
May pulled off her tennis shoes as did the rest of us who were wearing shoes. She took a belt out of her jeans and wrapped it around her right fist. Both her hands were covered in custom jewelry she had raided from Mom and dad’s rooms. I took off my belt and did the same. I had no rings. Several of the guys took off their t-shirts so I did too. I looked across to the other hill and saw they were doing the same. Hooting and hollering, many of their females were oggling the bodies of nude males from other species in their team and exchanging numbers with said boys.
When the preparations were done both sides just stared at each other. Then the insults started. That lasted about ten minutes. By the end of that nasty discussion it was clear that if the fight started you sure didn’t want to lose it because the losers were going to get whipped bloody and then fucked raw. For a while it looked like all we were going to do is stare across the gully and shout insults, but then May and Snapjaw started urging everyone forward.
We spread out and started walking down the side of the hill. I looked across the way and saw the beasts looking back fangs bared. What the fuck was I doing here?
I edged toward the outside southern edge of our group. The woods along the creek bed in that area thickened rather quickly outside the clearing we had chosen for the war. The weeds were tall and I figured if I had too I could run for cover, sneak up the hill hidden by the trees and get the hell out of this craziness. I wasn’t the only one on the human side preemptively looking for an escape option.
The two groups stopped about five feet from the floor of the gully and just stood there mumbling low to one another. For a second I thought it was over, but then May yelled something. Snapjaw roared back and suddenly the two sides raced toward one another yelling. For a second I was caught up in it.
Then 33 humans slammed into 56 anthros and the fight was on. I was missed by a wild fist thrown by a lion boy about my size and age. I did know him, decent guy, was a wimpy nerd who helped me a lot in computer class but he tried to take my head off all the same. He stumbled off balance from his own haymaker. I hit him hard on the right ear. He turned around and I hit him from behind to the left side of his face. He wobbled and fell over. I started to stomp him in the back, but suddenly a fist hit me in the mouth.
I went down and somebody was on top of me. I bucked and rolled and found I was on top of another feline a black panther I didn’t know. She pushed her hand in my face and gouged at my eye. I turned my head away and slammed my right fist into her eye. Then I got kicked in the side. I rolled off and into two girls fighting on the ground. The skink lizard was biting the girl’s shoulder and pulling hair. I grabbed the scalie’s jaws and pryed the jaws open as I pulled her off, shoving her to the ground. The human girl, a tiny blonde rolled on top and started banging the skink’s head on the ground. I started to stand, but got tackled by that panther girl again.
I had never fought a girl before. She was screaming and clawing at me.
She rammed into me like a train but we came crashing to the ground with her on her face, right arm outstretched and left arm sticking out between my legs. I was on my left hip. My ankles were locked behind her back. My left leg was under her left tit and crushing her right tit against her rib cage. There was no way she could get her left hand to bare as long as I kept the scissors tight.
She grunted and bucked, trying to press up. But her cat ass was up in the air and that murderous face was sliding across the dirt. I grabbed her outstretched left arm and twisted it trying to put her in some agony. It worked. She groaned and mewled.
I held her there for several seconds, working her arm and trying to squeeze some endurance out of her. She got madder and madder. I give the cat bitch the prize for fury and endurance. My legs were trembling after ten second. I started punching her left bicep and triceps muscles while keeping her arm straight. I was going to give her a dead arm for sure.
I felt her begin to really slip and writhe uncontrollably. I was going to lose my hold. I jerked on her twisted left arm trying to wrench her shoulder out of its socket. She howled and pounded the grass with her right arm, but she was almost free. I released my scissor to drive my feet into her neck as she slid free. I ended up with my right foot against her neck and my left foot under her arm. She was firmly face down again, left arm stretched out in agony.
I jerked back to try disjointing the arm. The panthress managed to endure and pressed up with her right hand. She suddenly twisted around and I had to use my foot to press her face away or get carnivorous jawline up my crotch. She immediately tried to press up, but thankfully her left arm gave way with a -pop- I let go of the dead limb and shoved her head back down into the dirt. I stood up while she pulled up on her knees roaring in pain, cradling her left arm.
I turn around and then shove her over straddling the panthress to begin choking her out. I jumped on top and press my thumbs into her neck while choking with both hands. She grabbed my wrists. Her eyes were wide. She bucked. I rode her limber belly still choking her. She clawed up my arms trying to reach my neck but only one arm went up as I had already broken her left.
We were face to face. Belly to belly, crotch to crotch. I felt my cock made hard rubbing against her bare pristine black fur of her toned belly as it by luck rubs across her entrance. I would never have fucked this monster voluntarily, but at that moment as we choked each other my cock had a mind of its own. I pushed forward and the bitch opened her legs. She thrust upward. Somehow my cock pushed into her vaginal hole and her wild eyes grew wider.
I started fucking her. She fucked back. Down below we were grinding and pounding away. Face to face, still choking each other. Her onyx face darkened even more as my choke was longer and more effective. Gasping myself, I couldn’t explain how crazed my cock had become. I pounded away on her. She could have tangled my legs up, but instead her heels started shaking.
I exploded. Riding that shattering orgasm was worse than a mechanical bull. She also came like a train and her hungry feline cunt milked me dry. I felt like I had squirted everything I had into her and still there were surges of cum. I felt relief around my neck. I looked down and she was passed out. I had choked her or fucked her into unconsciousness, probably a bit of both.
I was too exhausted and time constrained to bother with any excessivly cautious testing to know if she wasn’t faking it and so I grabbed her right ear, pulling the girl’s head up into a sitting position before to keep it steady and then drove fists into the cat’s face again and again then turned around to join the larger battle around me.
The fight had grown dirtier and meaner. There were downed fighters on both sides of the creek bed. Some were curled up holding themselves. A few were crawling away from the fight toward the woods away from danger.
Some were in the middle of the fight still getting kicked and stepped on by both sides. I couldn't tell which side was winning. May and Snapjaw were in the middle of it tearing into one another all out.
The wolf was on top pounding my sister's face so I came running to help. May's nose was bloody and her hair was matted with dirt and mud and bitemarks. Snapjaw wasn't pristine either with a split snout and visible bruises on her face where fur couldn't hide it.
May rolled snapjaw over on her side and started to turn it around. Another anthro suddenly swooped in from a tree and stomped my sister in the back. A petite Bluejay anthro. May fell over as two anthros started to double team her.
Only then from behind I hooked the bird's neck with my arm from behind and had pulled her into a tight, chest-to-back bearhug bwhile hoisting the featherweight girl up. She kreened in pain from it as I raise her up and over.
She sings a beautiful birdsong of screams as her fragine bird body bends and cracks under pressure. She wasn't sure what would be coming next, and when she finally realized it, it was already too late as I bridged myself backwards to send the tangled jay girl hurtling toward the ground.
The back of her head struck the creek water like a pickaxe striking earth, driven there by gravity's help in grounding this avian. She barely had enough time to scream out in a singing chirp of terror as she crashed into the rocky stream, her blue body ended up folding thanks to the move, taloned legs dropping over her head with her feathered butt hanging in the air after that fall, lying in a complete daze.
May inspired by my dumpstering of the bird lashes out and drives a powerful kick straight into Snapjaw's ovaries, pushing the wolf off of her.
As I put the finishing touches on making the bluejay sing like a canary when I she unfurls laying belly up in the stream I stomp the noodle-limp avian's belly three times. Her only motion was the rolling of her breasts as she stared up into the sky and breathed in slowly in the creekbed, wings periodically twitching and rustling. Hurt and tired people and beast-folk would pull away from the fighting and sit out for a while watching for a chance to blindside an enemy or help a friend before resolving to keep up the pain train and go on.
May and snapjaw were still wailing away on eachother with their fists. Both were bloody and frothing mad. The human girl was smaller, but she wasn't giving ground, Sis was better with her fists and the Wolf got staggered by a punch that caused her already bloodied snout to spurt. She stumbled backwards and the sis charged after. My sister rammed her knee into the furry girl's crotch making her howl. May was about to get in some unreplied belly hits when another wolf hit her in the back of the head with a rock. May went down and I had to join the other humans in a fighting retreat, Snapjaw grabbed May's brown hair and started lifting her. The anthro had overrun the center of the battlefield and many among them the taken that as an early reason to enjoy some spoils of victory
Well they got sis down and started fucking her. Whatever else happened they were going to get some pussy today. I looked back down at the fight as a small mob of well over a dozen stiffie packing anthro boys were clamouring to get a piece of the 'defeated human leader' even as the periphery of the battlefield around them was turning sour for the furs. In a way, she had taken much of the enemy force out of the fight. I don't know if she appreciated her tactical vitality in this moment with eight inches of a wolf's cock ramming in and out of her sex but i'd be sure to remind her.
I didn’t have time to appreciate that it looked like our side was winning the fight around us as the humans around me were beating a hasty retreat from the central mob of beasts.
That is when a flanking goat charged into me without warning and sends me crashing to the ground with her on top. She yanks at my hair and dropped her flat teeth to my scalp, biting at the tight skin across my skull. I moaned and grabbed her horns to push her head back. She cursed and spit at me. My right thigh feels like hell.
She decks me across the face and then went for my eyes. I hammered her under the chin with my right fist and clacked her teeth together. She looked startled and stopped fighting for a second bleating and grabbing her mouth; I think she had bitten her tongue. While she was still sitting on me I punched her again and knocked her off me.
She landed with her ass on the grass. Her legs were spread. I lash out a kick from my sitting position right into her wide open pussy. She bleats again and curled up. I had gotten her good. I looked back up at the battle around us finding that the other humans were keeping clear.
The goat crawls backwards on her ass and hands with her feet in the air to ward me off as she retreats to the larger group of anthros by the stream. I lunged forward and she kicked a cloven hoof just missing my balls. I did it again and this time I caught her right leg and jerked it pulling her off her hands and putting her back on the ground. Her left leg tried to kick me off, but I twisted her right leg into its path, blocking her. Then I toe kicked her between the legs again causing her to bleat out. I twist her leg and she rolls onto her stomach moaning. I jumped down on her back and jerked her head back by the horns with my left hand while firing looping rights around into the side of her face and temple.
She bucked up and I fell forward still on top of her. I pressed back up using her horns as a handle.
I started to push into her from behind. She squealed and started again whispering to her as we watched the fight going on around us. She reached back and managed to claw my ass cheek. I jerked forward jamming my cock in deep by accident. She grunted and somehow rolled me onto my back with her still impaled on my cock. I kept the choke on her. She reached back and got her index finger in my eye.
Retching back I lost my choke. She sat up and reached between her spread legs going for my balls. My cock was straight up throbbing inside her now. I grabbed her horns again and jerked her head back before she could bust my nuts. She reached back over her shoulders for my eyes again. I turn my head away from the grabby fingers trying to gouge me and clamped on a full nelson that forced her head down on her chest leaving her hands unable to reach my face. She grunted and groaned.
I rolled her off my belly and onto her side. My cock slipped out of her tiny snatch. She kicked her feet and tried to get some hold in the dirt. I threw a leg over her ass and climbed on top still holding the full nelson, twisting her at the waist. She moans and curses as I stretch and pull her core muscles. I pulled back her head and banged her face into the rough mossy ground. She cried out she wanted to surrender.
I snarled in her hair, “Have you had enough bitch?” She whimpered and cried out an affirmative pleading groan. When I stopped she didn’t try to fight anymore raising her rear end voluntarily. “I’ll whore myself out I’ll even take take human pups!”
My cock was still laying between her two firm ass cheeks so I obliged the offer. As I rammed into her and spurted my load into her we both watch the fight progress immediately around us.
It seemed things at large were starting to really fall apart for the anthros. Everywhere I saw two or three humans beating a single anthro senseless with a veritable menagerie of the beasts lay sprawled out across the clearing.
The enemy saw the writing on the wall to. They could either stand and fight, Or they could cut their losses and run.
The beasts ran. er, they hobbled away in every direction. Most of the ones who could actually muster the strength to stand were limping along or half carrying one another only to get tackled to the ground by humans still hungry for more takedowns. The mass rout and domination of the anthro's gang plays over over the delirious Snapjaw yelled, "Turn the fuck around and get back into the fight!"culminated in their being cornered at the perimeter fence of the nature reserve. Now the fence had one of those little barbed wire tops that extended outward at an angle to keep people from climbing over from the outside. That was stopping these furs in their panic from actually getting the hell out. Most of them who got that far were caught on the barbed wire in their fur, trapped like a bunch of ferals. Each was grabbed and pulled down by their legs and tails, all leaving bits and pieces of themselves on the razorwire with every wriggle of their way down as they fall back down to the waiting human mob with meaty thuds.
Back in the creek's clearing, the ones engrossed in a celebratory gangrape of my sister all this time were seeing humans disperse from the clearing in great numbers and only now were really starting to comprehend the degree to which their position was untenable as the humans trickled back into the clearing hauling the slack bodies of the other anthros on their backs and laying them out in rows and piles. The last vestiges of that mighty mob ran. Those chicken shit assholes could have won the fight if they hadn't bee fucking May. even as Snapjar furiously tried to strongarm them into throw themselves into a fight they had no chance of winning. Snapjaw has ultimately left alone as the only non-human standing. I step out from the crowd to check up on sister and the poor girl is lathered with beast spunk and beaten to a pulp.
The creek's slope was packed with the writhing, twitching, bleeding bodies of the force that had been arrayed against us. The downed bodies were being used as cushions by many of the exhausted humans as those of us still with some fight left harried the fleeing anthro boys. Snapjaw was surrounded like a cornered rat baring her fangs and swiping at any who got to close as people held her down "Stop" I announce to my fellow humans. "I'd like to try fighting her myself. I'ts personal." I point over to may's body. They nod and let her go. "Snapjaw I'm going to enjoy taming you like the dog that you are. and this time next year I'll be sure to make sure that you're May's pet."
"I'll break you human. I'll never stop, we'll rally again and I'll destroy you all you hear me!" she grits through her fangs. as the group of spectating humans form a circle around me and the queen bit and we square up.
The bitch came at me sprinting with a feral roar charging on all fours. She tackles me and sends us tumbling over. The next moment she's straddling my hips, choking me with her left claw and punching my face with her right. I grabbed the right arm and bucked up throwing her forward onto me. My left hand grabbed her tail and I pulled her over. During the process, I took the opportunity to bite her left breast as it flopped in my face. She howls bloody murder and retaliated with claws down the side of my neck. Slowly, ever so slowly around us the victorious humans were regaining enough energy to begin celebrating over the insensate mass of furry losers. Nobody seemed to have much enthusiasm at first, a few muscle poses there and some gropes here but once I and Snapjaw started going at it with the crowd cheering me on More than one guy rolled over a beaten opponent and clapped hips with them to squirt their wads in an anthro's babymaker. A couple of the beasts revived enough to bemoan their situations but they were quickly stomped back into submission.
Rolling on top was not a good idea. Her thick legs clamped tight around my waist and locked high in the air. I grunted despite myself and reached back to break them. She sank her teeth into my shoulder and dragged both her hands down my back leaving furrows of pain. I pushed up off the ground dragging her up by her scissors. She reached up for my face, but I drove both my fists down into her solid belly as she arched back on the bed of stone. She grunted and her legs popped open.
I tried to drive my knee into her open crotch, but she already had her feet on my hips. Her powerful thighs propelled me back across the small cheek to thud hard against the blue jay's body wall, knocking off a couple of feathers. Snapjaw was up fast and we met swinging fists in the middle of the creek. I staggered her with a couple of good shots to the snout, but she came back with more of the same. She busted my lower lip open with a wicked right and temporarily blinded me with knuckles in my right eye. I scored second blood by smashing in both her canine fangs with repeated punches on her big fucking wolf face. Once in close I couldn’t resist sinking my fists into the undersides and sides of her tits. She used kidney punches and hammered my sides. She also used her knees in close, missing my crotch but hurting my thighs.
I ended up with my back rammed into the side of a large rock. The she-wolf was leaning into me trying to bust my belly open with heavy punches.
I tried to push her off, but the big bitch had me wedged tight. I reached for her mane and jerked her head back by it. Then I rammed my forehead down on her right cheek. She groaned and staggered backwards, stunned and hurt. I came off the large stone with a savage right roundhouse that took her on the left eye and cheek. This drove her back tripping over the fallen body of a fellow fur. I came forward to finish her, but was crotched when she drove her pawpad straight out in a kick.
I tried to push her off, but the big bitch had me wedged tight. I reached for her mane and jerked her head back by it. Then I rammed my forehead down on her right cheek. She groaned and staggered backwards, stunned and hurt. I came off the large stone with a savage right roundhouse that took her on the left eye and cheek. This drove her back tripping over the fallen body of a fellow fur. I came forward to finish her, but hurt as she was she drove her pawad straight out as she sat on the edge of the boy's belly. I closed my thighs, but the bitch still crotched me. I saw stars for a second and stumbled back trying to keep my knees from folding.
I blinked back the pain and moved quickly to avoid her rushdown follow up. She was wobbling in her sprint, a sign of things not being so hot for her either. Her nose was spurting blood and her snout lips were busted open in four places. She had really gotten fucked up. I knew my own condition was one sustained only on adrenaline and vendettas, but I think I had the better of her. I meet her charge head on and tackled her to the floor.
Once on the floor the fight became a confused tangle of punches, elbows, knees, gouging, biting and clawing. She tried to bite off my ear. I left a series of bloody teeth imprints on both her tits. She ripped at my pubic hair trying to get my balls or my prick. I retaliated with some nasty gouging at her eyes. As we squirmed around on the floor I finally got a hand between her thighs. She couldn’t defend herself with my knee between her thighs. I curled against her belly and let my right hand violate her pussy. I jammed my fingers into her deep, jabbing at the walls of her cunt, curling them up and jamming my knuckles as deep as I could. She was cursing and clawing my back as the crowd cheered.
I lost handfuls of hair as she tried to pull my face away from her belly. She ripped the skin from my back, but I wasn’t going to let up on her wet hole. I fastened onto her swelling pussy lips, pulling them out, twisting and pinching as she whimpered. I found that I could dig my thumb into the mound and bruise her clitoral area even without long nails.
Her screams turned to whimpers as she begged for mercy, to the laughter of the gathered human crowd. I felt her hands go limp on my back as she begged. I rose up and took aim, sinking rights and lefts into her soft belly making her twist and gag. Seeing this bitch helpless was a thing of beauty. I carefully sat on her hips making sure my dick and balls were safe and proceeded to pound her body with my fists. She tried to cover, but there was always something open. I really enjoyed sinking my hard bloody fist into her bruised, swollen pelt. I mix it up a bit and dropped some knees. The thuds brought suitable gasps and groans from her as she screamed and tried to cover herself. I held the wrists of her guarding arms with one hand and proceeded to pound her from every direction even blowing out her front set of teeth. Then I worked her nipples bright red and stopped only when my dick was so hard I had other things to think about.
I grabbed her by the ears and pulled her to her knees and bent her over it. Her big wolf ass stuck up in the air, tail between the legs. I didn’t wait for an invitation. I jammed my thumb and forefinger into her abused cunt and spread the swollen lips far enough to sick the head of my swollen cock into her from behind. She was tight as hell from the lean muscled build she had, but a few thrusts had her gasping and open. I pounded her pussy from behind despite my exhaustion. Periodically I stopped to punch her in the kidneys and sides just to remind her of how brutally she was being treated. She cried into the mud as I alternated between using my fists and prick.
I felt myself coming close so I slowed down and started working my index finger in and out of her asshole. She cried out at this new invasion and started begging again like a dog. I opened her ass up with four fingers, pulled my wet dick out of her busted cunt and jammed it hard into her womb. This brought a new satisfying scream from her and I drove my dick in until my pelvis was flat against her furry ass. I reached under her arms for her tits and used them as handles to hold her steady while I pounded her vent like a maniac. I collapsed on her shaggy back, nestling into her furry masslike a big warm bed with a slow thudding heartbeat. still milking her body for the little whimpers she was still capable of giving out as I took about three minutes to squirt my wad deep into Snapjaw. The battered beast merely grunted a couple of times and then went still. sometime during this rut May had come to and she had seen me knock up her nemisis wolf. I blushed and pulled out shyly. May brought her face down to whispering distance with the wolf's ear and screamed. "We fucking destroyed you animals . Who's top species now crazy bitch?" She was very satisfied to see that the wolf had failed react in any way before giving a firm kick to the head to part ways.
All around the field the anthros who had come to moaned and sobbed. They had been beaten soundly. Exhausted and as hurt as we were, people methodically tied up the defeated beasts one by one like animals for the slaughter.
We had won, Some of us had been badly injured and all of us were hurt but the prize was worth it. We checked on the animals who weren't moving. Mmany had been hurt in permanent ways. We dragged the anthros to the roadside for anyone to pick up. There was something invigorating about dragging an enemy by their tails through the blood soaked dirt and just generally deciding their fates, Many of the humans chose to take their prisoners home as spoils of the war.
>The end.

>And here I go again. A prequal fight between May and Snapjaw. Enjoy the scrap.
The cell phones were buzzing. Kids were checking their texts. Nobody believed it at first. Then during the class changes, the halls roared with excited chatter. The teachers had no idea why the rest of the day was basically useless. All anybody could do was thing about 3:30 at Bloody Gulch, the traditional arena for any serious fight for at least sixty years around saddleback town
The final bell rang and the town's single public high school emptied. Kids went in various directions. They weren't so stupid as to walk in mass to the creek. An old flood sometime before the Indians had arrived had cut a gulch through saddleback separating the town into a northern two thirds of business and middle class homes and the southern third of wasteland and welfare apartments inhabited by anthros. Bridged in three places the creek was seldom dust dry and only ran with water after days of rain. It had been a relatively dry April and May. Plans to concrete its sides never went beyond designs because town wasn't rich enough to do it on its on or politically important enough to have a Congressman steal the money from some other taxpayers.
The public school was newly built on the lower side so those young beasts approached from the south. The two church schools and one private school located on the upper side arrived on the opposite bank. Sometimes these conflicts were geographically and economically based, but normally it was just boys or girls who hated each other. Snapjaw had called may vapid and May said she'd put a collar on snapjaw for that, leading to where we are now.
May, my 17 yr old sister and generally recognized hottest chick in saddleback arrived with her five boyfriends in a hot-looking Mercedes. She stood at the top of the Gulch wearing her school uniform: green plaid skirt, white socks, black shoes, white blouse, green jacket and green tie.
She stripped off her jacket and tie and stood there with her hands spread on the fender looking out over the creek while her friends buzzed advice from all sides. Her boyfriend arrived and put out a jar of Vaseline, some oil, white tape and scissors. The low buzz of conversations was more like the roar of an ocean. No one could believe she was really going to do it!
Five minutes later Snapjaw arrived walking nude with her band of rough-looking packmates all rumoured to be living feral out in these woods. She had supporters, especially from the other anthro kids, but in truth, she wasn't well liked. Only a few wanted to see her win, but a lot wanted to see May beat to hell just because she was so beautiful and untouchable and the loser would be left to the crowd. Perhaps it was fair to say the silent majority just wanted a piece of ass.
May yelled from the top of the lower side gulch, "You dirty animal are you really going to do this shit!"
"Yeah you skinner cunt, just like the rules say." yelled the wolf.
The crowd roared. The comments continued as the fighters were prepared in full view. The rules for boys and girls fights differed only in that the girls got to start in their bras. May took off her blouse to the yells of the crowd, undid her skirt and stepped out of it. She was wearing a very tight black bra that showed her tanned tits spilling out of the top and super tight black shorts that barely covered her firm ass cheeks and did nothing to hide her prominent sexual lips or round mound. Her belly was tight and firm even showing a two-pack as she lifted her arms to let her boyfriend oil her body. Her long blonde hair was tied back in a thick ponytail secured by three ribbons. He rubbed Vaseline into her cheeks and across her forehead. She let him take off her shoes and socks.
Everyone was cheering and she raised her arms and showed of her incredible body. At 5' 9", 140, and golden tanned she was as hard and fine as a fitness model on television.
Everyone said she had plastic tits, but they were all just jealous. She held out her hands. No jewelry or rings were allowed. Then her boyfriends began to tape her fists all the way back to her wrists. The fingers were left free and the knuckle area was about a half an inch thick when she made her fists.
Snapjaw was the mirror opposite. First she had a thick mane of scruff framing her perpetual snarl. Her black pelt, was greasy and cut shaggy hanging in matted strips obscuring the private parts below. She was tall and big: 5'10" and 190 at least. She was a brawler and a bully and even guys didn't fuck with her. She had beat up a boy in eighth grade at the creek in a legendary blood bath. Most people hated the wolf bitch, but the talking animals couldn't get enough of her. She didn't bother to do anything but rub some Vaseline into her face. Then she let them tape her fists with white tape. By herself.
The rules were simple. Two people who wanted to hurt each other would step down into the creek and fight. Nobody else went down and the fight went on until the winner climbed out. Then the loser's friends could go down and collect what was left of the loser. This was not a sporting event, but a grudge match. The unspoken rule was you didn't kill anybody and you tried not to break anything important.
The crowd roared as the Beauty and the Beast walked to the edge and started to circle each other. It was May who surprised everyone by going on the stack first slamming into the wolf with her fists pumping.
The crowd roared as the meaty whacks of the blonde's fists hit snap's face and fat arms. Linda cursed and rolled down to the floor getting dirtier. May stomped her right foot down in the small of Snapjaw's back and pushed the bitch into the dirt tits first. The blonde jumped on the wolf girl's back and started punching her in the sides of the head and then in the back of the neck, bouncing on the beast's back trying to keep the big wolf down.
Snapjaw took a one-sided beating. People began to cheer openly for sis hoping the angry canine female would get the kick p the ass she so deserved.
Snapjaw took the punches, dug her hands palm first into the dirt, yelled with an effort and pushed up rolling the blonde off to the side. May came down on her left shoulder, her legs around the bully?s waist. Snapjaw grunted as the long-legged blonde clamped on a scissors arching up on her shoulders. It would have been a devastating hold in a wrestling match. Snapjaw cursed and drove her dirty right fist into the blonde?s lower belly leaving a muddy imprint on the black shorts. may's legs popped open and she was on her back with her legs spread and the fat bitch between them. Now Snapjaw's supporters screamed for a beating.
Snapjaw's big fists came down, one into the belly the other just missing may's perfect mouth. The blonde drew back her legs kicking. Her feet left dirty trails across the stomach pelt of the beast girl, but she wasn't able to catch something hard to push off. Snapjaw grabbed the front of may's bra, dirty paw squeezing in between the breasts' cleavage and jerked upward. Both sides of the crowd roared as the black bra stretched and twisted up over the pink nipple'd beauties that spilled them out. Only her fuckbuddies had seen those before. Now everyone had.
May was jerked up by the stretched bra and Snapjaw's meaty left fist smacked her square in the mouth. The blonde's boyfriends squealed. Snapjaw drew back her left fist again only to catch May's muddy right foot to the snout. The wolf girl's head snapped back and she fell back on her heels. May took aim and pumped her feet into Snapjaw's tits and belly, kicking so hard she pushed herself through the mud. When she finally scooted backwards and scrambled to her feet Snapjaw's hard right tit was flopping around on her belly with the beast stunned and panting.
May ran forward and tried to kick snapjaw in the crotch, but the big girl rolled forward and took the kick on her shoulder, grabbing may’s ankle. May jerked and pushed trying to get free. Wolf hands moved from ankle up to thigh step by step. May pounded Snap’s face and then the back of the girl's head when she ducked her head down. The taped knuckles were like rocks and the animal was being rocked, but the girl was determined.
May screamed as snapjaw hugged her thigh to her mouth and bit into the perfect flawless flesh. May ripped at the muddy black hair and then pounded the bitch’s head and neck. snapjaw took a dozen shots before she stopped biting and rolled over dragging May by the leg. The beauty slammed tits first and face first into the mud with her thighs stretched across snapjaw’s wallowing belly. May’s hands clawed at the dirt and mud and started to slide off. May grabbed the base of Snap’s tail and yanked hard enough that something in there popped because snap was wailing to the moon. cheers roared from both sides of the crowd.
May straightened up in a surge and drove her right elbow into Snapjaw’s howling mud stained face. Crack! May let go and the wolf fell backwards on her knees bleeding from the mouth.
She sat there stunned, a muddy hand to her mouth. Blood dripped through her fingers and stained the formerly white tape around her knuckles. Having gotten room to maneuver May stood up and actually tried to scrap some of the mud off her body to keep clean. In the process she shed her bra. She was about to throw it away when a boyfriend yelled, “Choke that animal cunt out!”
Through all the screaming, the muddy beauty heard the request and she stepped behind snapjaw. snapjaw rose up on her knees having recovered her senses although the mud on her face was streaked by tears on her cheek and her chin was blood red. The arm of the hand holding her mouth blocked the perfect choke.
May had the beast bitch immobilized, but not choked. Finally, she heard yells from the crowd that Snapjaw had the choke blocked. The hard body let go of the bra strap and heaved forward driving Snapjaw to all fours. Snapjaw started to push up out of the mud, her throat rasping and her body covered in mud except where her blood had washed it off. May moved quickly to the side and put four field goal kicks into the wolf's belly and a fifth to her rack. Snapjaw took it and somehow managed to lunge away moving up the creekbed on all fours because she was struggling to stand and snarling like a feral along the way.
May was gasping. The fight had gone on longer than most. Without round breaks and referees most fights ended in less than three minutes with another couple of minutes of beating. Snapjaw was gasping too, but despite the ruin of her nose and the obvious swelling of both cheeks she was standing and still looking like a tank. The wolf was tearing the bra around her neck to shreds. May was too tired to interrupt. She backed up and waited to catch her breath not looking anything like the prim proper beauty that had been leaning against the Mercedes a few minutes previously. She wasn't bleeding but under the cover of night it looked like her lower lip was swollen.
“Round two!” was chanted by the delighted crowds.
Snapjaw grunted, “I’m going to fucking tear you to pieces you fucking human bitch!”
May snarled back, “Come on and try you dog!”
Snapjaw stomped forward slowly splattering the mud with her big foot paws. Snapjaw shook her fists and dared May to stand and fight with her. May took the dare and crushed Snapjaw’s bloody nose with a stiff left fist moments before a looping right punch crashed into May’s left eye. Snapjaw’s head snapped back and blood spurted again. She staggered a moment grabbing her muzzle. May stumbled to the side and recovered. She came back swinging lefts and rights at Snapjaw’s face.
The big wolf stood flat-footed and punched back punch for punch. May’s lip ruptured and then she staggered backwards. Snapjaw’s face was a ruin but she lumbered forward and slammed a roundhouse into the blonde’s bouncing right tit gashing it with her foot’s claws.
The crowd loved tit shots, especially to those big round firm beauties. The right tit slammed into the left and wiggled, but the firmness quickly calmed the gyrations. Snapjaw’s follow up kick missed as May’s stagger had turned into a fall. The blonde hit the mud with a splatter. Snapjaw staggered over the blonde’s legs and fell face first beside her. Both girls lay deep in the muck for what seemed like minutes to the screaming crowd but were in fact seconds.
May rolled to her left hip and punched over with her right into the small of Snapjaw’s back as the wild girl pushed up. Snapjaw groaned and crawled forward.
May climbed out of the mud and grabbed Snapjaw’s nape fur as the girl rose up. The blonde hooked her right fist around again and again smashing Snapjaw’s swollen face. The wild girl grunted and flailed with her hands unable to stop the battering of her busted nose and now busted mouth. The blonde pounded away, but Snapjaw didn’t go down. She twisted around tearing out her own fur and lunged into the blonde. May staggered backwards trying to keep her balance but three steps later she crashed to the ground only to be crushed by Snapjaw falling on top.
Snapjaw’s side screamed in triumph and some of May’s looked away fearing the fight was over. Snapjaw pushed up with her hands on May’s firm tits. The wild girl’s face was a swollen ruin and blood and mud dropped off it onto the beauty. May screamed and grabbed at the taped wrapped wrists ineffectively. Snapjaw’s hairy cunt was riding on May’s left thigh. May moaned and suffered a brutal belly busting. The wild girl dug her dirty claws in deep, twisting, rolling and squashing.
May let go of the wrists and rammed her bloody taped fist into Snapjaw’s grinning mouth.
Snapjaw groaned and fell forward covering the beauty again with her wild body sinking them both deeper in the muck. May had nails and her fingers clawed streaks in the wolf girl’s back leaving red welts in the animal. Snapjaw screamed and put her hands on May’s face. The beast was suddenly trying to gouge may. May had to twist her head side to side to keep from being blinded. Snapjaw pressed down with her hands forcing May’s head down in the muck.
The wild bitch crawled on top of the downed beauty’s belly. Snapjaw’s girls were yelling for her to kill the blonde. Snapjaw released her double palm face plant and went to work punching wildly. Hard muddy taped knuckles crashed into May’s face from all ankles. It looked like the fight was over now. Blood spurted from an eyebrow. The beauty’s left eye was closing. Bucking and twisting did nothing to get the wild animal off her belly. Snapjaw’s mouth was frothing with feral rage. The blonde had put up a hell of a fight, but she was in against a beast and was paying the price.
Snapjaw let out a wild scream. She leaned back slapping at the blonde's hands. Snapjaw’s long puffy dark nipples were being wrenched off her tits. She squealed and screamed and clawed at the hands. The blonde’s dirty nails were in the tit meat and every time Snapjaw pulled she hurt herself. The bitch endured the nipple torture and finally got her tits free by leaning backwards and holding the blonde’s hands by the wrists. Her wild tits flopped back to her belly as May's nails slipped from the stretched out nipples. Snapjaw cried out in relief and then shouted in surprise. May’s long legs had hooked under Snapjaw’s armpits and suddenly the wild girl was on her back in the muck with her legs doubled under her ass and her hairy pussy pointed to the sky.
Somebody yelled, “Fuck that cunt up!”
May sat up between the wild spread thighs and dropped an elbow down on the exposed mound. The elbow crushed the clit against the bone. Snapjaw screamed and writhed, almost freeing her legs. Then she stiffened as the bloody beauty grabbed hold of the untrimmed muddy black bush and yanked. Snapjaw squealed a a handful of matted fur was ripped from her snatch, and another, and another. May’s bloody mouth was twisted in a snarl. She started punching the gaping pussy with short rights as her left pressed down on Snapjaw’s belly keeping her in place. Snapjaw cried and cried for someone to get the crazed girl off her. A couple of her packmates looked ready to come down, but anybody who interfered at the creek got a mob ass-kicking.
May rasped, “How do you like this you ugly wild whore?”
Then the swollen-faced human jammed all four of her muddy fingers inside the swollen pink slit in front of her. The crowd gasped, went silent and then cheered as May finger fucked the hated bitch. Snapjaw screamed and begged, “I quit! I quit! You win! Please, no more!”
May finally stopped and pulled her now bloody fingers outside of the animal's busted cunt. Snapjaw still wallowed on her back crying. May grunted and pushed free of the bitch’s ass. Snapjaw’s legs came free and she rolled over in the fetal position and held her bloody crotch with both hands. May stood up and again wiped the mud off her body, even grabbing her sodden ponytail and stripping off three handfuls of muck. Snapjaw mumbled some slurs about humanity. That seemed to be enough to push may over the edge in some way, convincing her to go further. While standing over Snapjaw’s back she raised her muddy foot and stomped down on Snapjaw’ face. Snapjaw grunted and rolled onto her belly covering her head. May stood over her and stomped on the back of the beaten girl's skull pushing her face deep in the mud.
Then her knee dropped in the middle of Snapjaw?s back. The big girl stiffened and then groaned, going still with her face still buried in mud, bubbles escaping up through the surface.
May continues to inflict stomps into the canine’s back to pass the time until the beast could reliably be assured to have drowned. May grabbed the wild girl's tail by the the base and heaved back until the tail stretched and popped and suddenly Snapjaw’s big furry ass was exposed when the thing got pulled right out leaving May with a docked wolf tail in hand which she held up as a trophy and as a fight momento. Snapjaw’s pack of subordinates would whimper insyphany and start to mull over the matter of having to decide amongst themselves who would be the unlucky wolf on the chopping block for their leader’s tail replacement surgery.
May takes hold of the wolf’s limp right arm and gives it the formality of the limp test/arm check, raising the slack limb for the crowd and jangled it for emphasis. She tugged until Snapjaw was on her side. The long-legged beauty started stomping repeatedly on the beast’s drooping tits in a sick rendition of cpr. Smashing her foot down again and again May crushed onto the ribs of the animal until the wolf sputters back to life. May puts her foot on Snapjaw’s neck and actually did a muscle pose for the roaring crowd over the who remained in the mud to suffocate again her tits swaying with each shallow breath as excited humans descended on the wolf looking to give the teenage beastwoman a litter to remember this by as if she wouldn’t have already thoroughly remembered tonight without a gang rape on top of it.
>End.

>You had seen the deathclaw a few times now
>She'd always appear shortly after you've been in combat. Must have learned that you mean an easy meal, taking her pickings after the carnage
>You think her luck, or perhaps skills, with hunting hadn't been favorable to her in the past
>She looked much thinner when you first saw her
>You could swear now her thighs are much thicker and her chest is more pronounced
>Not once has she tried to hunt you. You'd make an light meal compared to all the rad scorpions and raiders you keep putting down. Clever girl.
>You're in the process of looting the latest batch of highwaymen that tried to put your armor full of holes when you hear something approach
>You whip around and shoulder your rifle, thinking you missed one bandit
>Instead it's her
>You almost pull the trigger, as futile as it would be at this range against a fucking deathclaw
>You had hoped she'd wanderer off eventually after regaining her strength. No way your weapons would be enough against her hide. Instead she had been eyeing you for dessert.
>When your mind stops racing in panic, you realize she'd stopped as soon as you raised your weapon on her
>She'd lowered down, her gaze on the ground next to her feet, not making any sound or effort to move closer to you
>She slowly looks upwards, sees you holding your aim and quickly turns her head down again
>You attempt to distance yourself, making her do the same. "Back! Move back!"
>You didn't expect a damn deathclaw to comply, or even understand, but to your shock she takes a step backwards. And let's out a low whine.
>Excuse me?
>Weirder out by her strange behaviour, your leg catches to one of the bodies on the ground and you fall.
>You're dead.
>...
>She's now looking straight at you, but hasn't left her spot
>You look straight back.
>She breaks your gaze and you pull yourself from the ground
>"Not planning to make a dinner out of me, are you?"

>This time she looks back at you, encouraged by your softer tone and let's out another whine.
>"I get it, I get it. Not aggressive"
>You lift your hand to rub your face in disbelief
>Slowly, you start taking steps toward her, extending your arm.
>"... Good girl?"
>You have to concentrate to move your legs, every step closing the distance between you two
>Your hand hovers centimetres from her face, unable to force yourself to close the final gap.
>She takes the last step for you, butting her head against your palm.
>You release the breath you didn't realize you were holding and inhale sharply
>Her tail has started to move from side to side
>Tentatively, you stroke your hand on her face
>"Good girl?"
>You get a minor scare as she starts to growl, before you recognize the sound for what it really is
>She's purring
>Good girl

Knocking awoke Louis.
‘Why would someone be knocking on his door now? He wondered. What time is it even?’ He asked himself. Reaching to his side he expected to grasp his phone on the end table, but instead found nothing there, neither the phone, nor the table.
‘Where am I?’ ran through his head. He inhaled and finally bothered to open his eyes. Looking over the room he found himself naked on a bed in a small, bare room, empty but for a crude bed and a dresser, with the shutters lowered over the windows and his phone, shoes, wallet and documents on the floor, next to the bed.
Picking the phone up, he checked the time, but the phone wouldn’t turn on, it was empty.
Louis had no idea where he was. He had no clothes and the knocking was persistant. Sighing, he pulled the sheet over his groin and shouted “Enter!”
Partially creeking the door open, a shaky voice said “The clothes are dried, I-I’ve washed them as you ordered.” The voice paused, obviously afraid and trying to please “W-would you want me to bring them in?”
“Sure.” He dismisively agreed. An anthro, a young, short, naked, yellow furred female cat peeked from behind the door, before entering the room.
Louis remembered now. Well, at least a part of it. He had chosen to go drinking and exploring a bit, to relax after work. And he had went to the industrial district. After he had wandered for long enough, he ordered a random female anthro to take him in for the night.
As the anthro laid the clothes on his bed he started dressing himself. The clothes were dry and clean, which is what he demanded.
After entering her apartment last night, he ordered her to strip and not wear anything for as long as he is around. Then he recalls he ordered her to clean his clothes while he slept.
“Do you also wish the package you ordered me to assemble?” The anthro asked.
‘What package?’ he thought. “Go ahead.”
The anthro bowed and exited the room.
Louis tried turning the phone on again. The anthro probably didn’t have a suitable charger for it. She would have given it to him if she had. All of the anthros were like that.
She appeared in the doorway, visibly nervous as she handed the plastic bag to Louis, who took it and started looking through the items in it.
It was filled with documents, a credit card and valuables. He used the opportunity to glance at the ID card, ‘Alexa Hill.’
He recalled a bit more. How he was angry that Alexa did not have any alcohol and how he planned to punish her for it by throwing away all of her money and documents, a plan that now seemed completely disproportional to him. Not that he’d get into any trouble for it.
The anthros were completely subservient, as all other engineered species were to humans. Not due to some inbuilt instinct, but due to strict punishments enacted even for the slightest disobedience and the extensive surveilance network.
“You can wait outside.” He said, still glancing at her ID.
“Of the building?” She nervously asked.
“No.” He said flatly, not raising his eyes form her ID.
“Of the flat?” She asked again, her eyes avoiding meeting his.
“Of the room.” He ordered. “And close the door.”
‘Wait outside of the building!’ He thought, amazed by the absurdity of it. He went back to reading her documents. A hillariously poorly paid machine operator, almost stereotypical for the female of the region, he thought.
He had exited the human exclusive neighbourhood in his drunken stupor and had wandered into the industrial region, obviously, where the anthros worked. He had stumbled upon Alexa in the street, or maybe he picked a random flat and ordered her to let him in. It didn’t matter now. He placed all of his stuff into his pockets, not even bothering to check if they were all there. No anthro ever dared to pickpocket.
Exiting the room he stumbled upon the kitchen-living room of Alexas house, where she was standing holding a large trash bag, obviously holding back her tears.
“Whats that for?” Louis asked.
Alexa swallowed. “Y-you told me to pack everything I have so I can throw it away when you woke up.”
‘I don’t remember this.’ He thought to himself. “Unpack it, we aren’t throwing away anything.” He said as he tossed her the bag with her documents and money. He didn’t doubt she’d do it, even if he went away before she did any of it. Anthros were that subservient, but he didn’t feel like forcing her through it.
Her tears quickly transformed from those of terror to those of joy as a wave of exhaustion obviously crashed on her, from all the anticipation. She leaned on the wall and rested for a few moments with her eyes closed as she muttered something to herself.
“You’re tired?” He asked.
She didn’t respond.
“You’re tired?” He repeated.
She still didn’t respond. She probably didn’t hear him. So, he closed in and laid his hand on her cheek.
As soon as he touched her, she snapped herself out, straightening her back “Y-yes?”
“You’re tired?” He repeated for the third time now.
She nodded. He gave her a quizzical look.
“I hadn’t slept for the entire night.”
“Why?”
“Well, you arrived at midnight, then…” She averted her gaze.
Louis knew what she was alluding to. “I know, next.” He got her to continue.
“I spent my time packaging everything I had and when I was done, I was too stressed to sleep. And even if I wanted to, I had nowhere to do so.”
Louis took a second to observe around the room. A simple cabin with a portable electric stove on top, a small table and a folding chair, a number of shoes lined up next to the wall and a door that probably lead to the toilet. And of course, a scared anthro standing in front of him. ‘He might aswell let her shake a bit more. Ruining her life for not having alcohol was much, but fooling around with her, that’s fine.’
“Do you happen to know where the nearest electronics store is located.” He asked her.
“Yes its-” She started, but was cutt off by him placing a finger on her lips.
“Take me there.”
She nodded and headed off to slip her shoes on.
“No, I didn’t say get dressed and take me there. I said take me there.”
She dropped her shoes to the floor and unlocked the door, holding it open for Louis.
Louis approached and with a smile grabbed the key from her hand “I’ll deal with this.”
She swallowed and exited the apartment, with Louis locking it behind her.
Louis followed Alexa as she walked downstairs bare-paw. After a few minutes she approached the building enterance and waited for Louis. It was mid autumn and as such it was getting cold. Louis of course, had come prepared, but Alexa appeared reluctant.
“Something wrong?”
“Its cold outside.”
“So? Aren’t you a feline? You have fur.”
“I’m a short haired cat.”
“Well, short haired cat, lead the way.” Louis mused.

>Uh oh
>I think I like wearing this stuff for the human
>Why am I getting wet around him?
>His hands are so warm~
>I wonder if I raise my tail if he'll touch me
>I'm gonna do it
>He's touching my hind quarter! This is amazing!
>I didn't know humans could be this deviant
>Oh, now he's talking about how wet of girl I am
>I can't stop my ass from shaking for him!
>Please touch me~
>Eep!
>I'm cumming, I'm coming from just one touch!
>What possible magic does this human have, my legs are giving out
>What did you do to me~

>Humans come back to dragon planet in spaceships with big guns and put dragons in line after millennia of them running around snacking in cavemen.
>Their bitter seething is legendary.

>Carmina the Crimson Terror
>greatest dragon on the world of Biesoliv
>Carmina sleeps in her cave digesting her daily offering of livestock
>the humans had learned long ago to keep her satisfied
>if forced to hunt for herself she usually burned a few villages for her trouble
>humans fear her and rivals flee from her
>none have been able to challenge her in 100 years
>ANON is an Augmented Nanomachine/Organic Navigator on a scouting mission
>he was human once
>now he is a fusion of technology and man designed to inhabit, explore, and colonize space
>he has arrived at his target destination by FTL
>a habitable solar system designated 813-SOL
>during the age of generation ships countless worlds were settled
>many lost or cut off contact with Earth
>now the descendants of humanity were investigating these lost places
>records indicated a ship made it here long ago and ANON was here to assess their fate
>ANON found a living colony on the planet 813-SOL IV
>scans show that humans have descended into a low medieval level of tech
>there's evidence of a massive solar flare soon after they arrived
>only the bioconstructs are left and most have gone feral
>with no tech there was no way to program them any longer
>most of the beasts of burden are now terrorizing humanity
>none worse than the dragons, one of the few high intelligence constructs
>ANON has found the largest dragons lair and decided to initiate contact there
>without tech the humans had reverted to their natural lifespan
>and ANON wished to speak to a creature that may have a longer living memory of this place
>Carmina sleepily sniffs the high mountain air
>a human is close
>she opens her eyes with curiosity
>the monks who deliver her offering know not to enter
>peasants would occasionally brave the journey to beg for favors
>whether she ate them or indulged them changed according to her whims
>and she always extracted a heavy tax for favors
>some had delusions of heroism and she enjoyed toying with them the most
>what greeted her was no swaggering hero nor a filthy peasant
>a tall man of strong build
>he looked like the "wizards" in human storybooks with clothes indistinguishable from flesh
>they were said to wield artifacts of great power
>supposedly men ruled the world in its birth
>but in her 400 years of life no man had ever dared to cross her and live
>this one glanced about her cave like a noble strutting through his garden
>his casualness in her presence angered Carmina
>fear or bravado she understood, but this indifference was new to her
>ANON's inspection of the dragons habitat was amusing him
>such powerful bioconstructs had been immensely useful to early settlers
>but once unleashed they seemed to be overtaken by pride and slovenliness
>perhaps too much feline DNA was used in their creation
>ANON began creating a database in his HUD at a supercomputer pace
>he would have to track genetic and behavioral drift as part of his mission
>perceiving reality at multiple speeds of time would have been a baffling concept to his human self
>but now it was as second nature to him as breathing, which he no longer needed to do
>he had already completed a full scan of the dragon before it had moved
>by the time the dragon had her attention on him he had decrypted her access codes
>he could make alterations to her bio-computer control system in real time now
>it was not a simple reading of thoughts he could witness her intention and emotion clearly
>she was unaware this had occurred but nevertheless very angry
>ANON would wait for the dragon to make her move
>"Who dare interlopes upon Carmina the Crimson Terror?" she bellowed
>Coins rattled as her cry echoed down into the valley beyond her lair
>he gave the name "ANON" and nothing more
>Carmina saw that the man felt no compulsion to explain himself
>an act which sealed his fate in her mind
>she unleashed a powerful blast of flame upon him
>the last time she was this mad she melted the portcullis off of a castle
>her rage spent with such fury that the cave filled with smoke too thick for even her eyes to see through
>a cold wind rushed back into the cave to replace that which she had evacuated
>the smoke whipped away to reveal the man standing, not only intact, but entirely unbothered
>the dragon blinked
>the man looked about the room inspecting the damage
>he took a small step forward and to her shame the dragon flinched
>ANON's shields could withstand environments of unfathomable diversity
>what was dragon fire when compared to the ejections of a star?
>the hostility of the response was anticipated
>the scale of the destruction was not
>this specimen had impressively overdeveloped fire organs on her chest
>the sizable false mammary glands had already refiled with her liquid accelerants
>ANON had always appreciated the forms his ancestors had crafted for bioconstructs
>many scholars judged the feminine aesthetic of these creations as the work of un-evolved minds
>ANON instead regarded it highly
>after all if one can make anything, why not make something beautiful?
>despite his own technical transformation ANON fondly remembered when humans were more human
>as he approached the dragon he noticed the first indications of trepidation
>"So you are a wizard, then?" Carmina asked
>ANON stopped and smiled "of a sort, yes, wizard is accurate enough"
>Carmina sat up to rise to her full height
>"What buisiness do you have here then?"
>"Well if I was here for buisness I would say customer service could do with some work"
>The dragon seemed more confused than anything
>ANON decided to get to basics "What do you think a wizard is?"
>Carmina said "Legendary men who built the world, nothing but human delusions of grandeur"
>"It's more true than false" Anon said
>her anger rose but she was not stupid enough to act on it a second time
>seeing him survive her fire had dispelled any assumptions she had about this interaction
>she wracked her brain for stories of wizards
>Anon watched her confused mix of emotions play out and said "They made your kind too"
>Amusement, draconic laughter filled the cave
>"Now I know you are a mere trickster, as skilled in jest as you are"
>"I have also heard that wizards are only weavers of illusion and lies"
>"Perhaps my fire passed through nothing more than light and air"
>ANON saw the tensing of muscles that foretold the swinging of her tail
>he adjusted his force fields configuration
>when the talons upon her tail whip struck him they instantly lost momentum
>the dragon shivered as the strange sensation betrayed her expectations
>her whip could cut solid stone
>her claws could slash through the strongest steels
>and yet striking ANON yielded nothing, not even pain for herself
>she recoiled in pure fear of the alien creature in front of her
>ANON did not like that he was distressing the construct in this way
>there were protocols for re-domestication of such creatures
>the first step of which was to initiate her pair bonding routine
>once she regarded ANON as her master he could more easily interrogate her
>Carmina's fear subsided and she found herself studying the face of the human
>his handsome countenance was contemplative and kind
>handsome? kind? she shook her head in confusion
>"You've placed some spell upon me?" she said
>she was disgusted that her voice was pleading rather than accusatory
>"It was always there" he said "made by those that created your kind"
>"Come closer"
>Carmina rushed to lower herself after momentarily resisting her desire to obey
>"How did they come by this power?" she asked pitifully
>"They wrestled it from nature itself..." ANON said
>he stroked the underside of her chin making the construct gasp
>she could never have conceived of the hand of a human effecting her thusly
>it was ecstasy, a pleasure she never knew was possible
>"and I am vastly more powerful than they ever were" ANON concluded
>Carmina rolled onto her back like a dog
>craning her neck to encourage ANON's contact
>he obliged as he walked down the side of her
>ANON was analyzing her DNA
>his nanite sensors explored her body as well
>she had never been tamed or mated, too aggressive in baseline disposition
>but her emotional regulation systems were being reprogrammed by the pair bonding
>sensation accelerated and deepened the rooting of the behavioral changes
>which is why he was running his hands over her body as he walked against it
>also, he enjoyed touching her body
>especially once he was able to press her flame sac against his chest
>she quivered at the sensory changes
>panting now, the furnace heat of her breath was distorting the air
>her legs and tail writhed as ANON moved to her belly
>Carmina couldn't think
>it was waves of pleasure
>each crash seemed to destroy a little more of her resolve
>and yet in the doldrums a realization would return that a human was doing this to her
>the worms that begged for her mercy were descended from Gods
>and one of them had come to extract vengeance with pleasure
>if some part of her resistance did come through and she pushed against him it did no good
>it was as if he was rooted to the mountain itself
>overwhelming strength that she admired and lusted after
>to her shame and joy she glanced down to find him standing at the space between her legs
>before she could steel her response his hand went into her
>ANON saw the explosion within her mind
>this would be the final act
>the crescendo of physical pleasure was what would root him deeply in her psyche
>even without the aid of his nanites this would have cemented total loyalty to himself
>but with his advanced technology he was pushing the construct to its mental limits
>her personality would survive mostly intact but where it conflicted with his wishes she would yield with joy
>she roared and emptied her flame into the ceiling
>ANON was once again impressed with her output as his shielding cleaned his hand
>she was recovering well, her mind was quiet as she fell into a deep sleep
>she would awaken in a short period of time with the reprogramming set
>ANON reviewed reports of his probes and nanite scans while he waited
>Carmina awoke and her first thought was to find her master
>he was standing nearby and she felt deep relief
>before she could say anything he addressed her
>"We will journey to the nearest town and you will answer my questions about this world"
>"Yes, Master" she said relieved to have instruction
>ANON rose from the cave floor, though he had no wings, and he swiftly exited the cave
>Carmina stood up and followed after the wizard
>outside the cave she was pleased to see him in the bright air of her mountain home
>"You will need clothes eventually, but for now you are to cover yourself with your wings"
>she wrapped her wings over her shoulders like the cloak of a peasant milkmaid
>"Good girl" he said casually, putting a smile on her face
>he floated and she followed answering his questions to the best of her ability
>halfway down the mountain they passed by the monastery that supplied her offerings
>the monks were confused at the flying man
>and terrified when their living God followed him like a virgin maiden with a crush
>the commotion their passing caused among the monks escaped the notice of the pair
END

>when an anthro cop gets told she has patrol duty in a human neighborhood
>"But, but... What if I get assaulted, raped, maybe even kidnapped and used to satisfy their desires for days or weeks... ohgodyespleaseletithappen..."

>Judy is sent to an unusual part of the city
>Her boss insisted she travel there to investigate a vixen that was wanted for a crime
>Humans usually keep to themselves in a high end upper plate of the city
>Technology takes care of things for them so they don't have city workers
>But occasionally an animal will wander up there to never return
>They send letters and call their homes telling them to not worry so no one really knows what happens
>The vixen was wanted for a supposed murder and fled to the human's plate
>The poor bunny had no idea what to expect
>She hopped into the seldom used elevator and made a jump to push the button
>As the elevator closed on the city limits the back of her mind worried if it would be the last time she would see it
>The ride was painfully long, long enough for her to detect the subtle human scent in the elevator
>"Sea salt and flowers" she muttered to herself as her nose twitched
>The elevator lurched and the doors creaked open
>The domed city in the sky was shinier than the ones below
>Robots populated the streets, little discs that swept away dirt and polished the windows
>As she stepped off the elevator she saw someone step out of a building
>A tall human wearing a golden robe
>The choice of clothing was bizarre and his muscular shoulder was exposed
>With zero leads she made her way toward this man, "Hello I'm officer Judy have you seen this animal"
>She produced the photo to him and he stared at it curiously
>"I'm sorry little Oryctolagus cuniculus, I haven't, I'd suggest you ask some of the other species"
>The man pointed gracefully toward a shining golden pillar in the center of the large plate
>Judy's ears rested on her back as he spoke it was a strange alien feeling
>She shook it away and thanked him not really sure how to be polite she bowed
>The man chuckled and strode off on white sandals
>Judy felt like she was in another world
>The section was so advance but devoid of life
>The only scent her nose picked up was the sparse greenery
>Onyx black roads had very little wear and sidewalks were empty besides the occasional drone
>Completely opposite to the crowded metropolis below
>The scent of hundreds of animals left a unique permanent musk in the air she grew blind to
>Her nose twitched and she caught a trail
>A weak trail of a wolf or dog
>She sadly couldn't differentiate the two
>He exited a building carrying a duffle bag his long waving fur was brown and silky
>Completely nude like the nudist section of the city
>He stopped in his tracks and sniffed the air
>His tail started to thrash behind him, clearly a dog
>Judy cautiously approached the canine
>"Sir, can I have a moment of your time please?"
>The dog stopped wagging when he saw her, he looked her up and down growing more agitated by the second
>"I'm not abandoning my master, I don't care what my family has to say."
>"Sir."
>He stepped closer to the rabbit his balls and sheath uncomfortably close
>"I was living in the streets and only after I came up here they actually started caring."
>Judy put up the clip board to avoid looking at the dog's privates
>"Sir please, I'm looking for a vixen by the name of Wanda"
>"Oh." The dog shook his head and calmed down to reason.
>He continued, "I'm sorry, I got a little heated. What does she look like I try to meet all the new pets that come up here and show them around."
>"Pets?"
>The dog's tail started up again in the back and forth motion.
>"Yes the humans select some animals to be pets, it's in all our programming."
>Judy had a skeptical look but pointed the carrot recorder closer to his muzzle
>"The humans designed us to be intelligent thousands of years ago. It wasn't until their cities opened that this was discovered."
>"Humans did it because they thought they would die off and wanted us to take care of the earth. But there are a few humans left and they love their creations very much. Wanna meet my human?"
>Judy held up a paw and shook her head
>This dog was clearly crazy or something animals share intelligent from shared evolution
>She showed a picture of the vixen to the dog
>"Maybe later, right now I'm looking for this vixen. She's wanted below for a crime"
>The dog tilted his muzzle and smiled wide
>"Oh yes she came through yesterday, she was quite the mess beaten and bruised."
>Judy put up, finally a lead, this case has been ongoing for weeks
>"She went to the infirmary three blocks down toward the Darwin spire"
> He pointed to the gold tower even after all the walking she did was still a thin needle on the horizon
>Judy excidedly bounced from one leg to another.
>"Thank you, thank you!" and rushed off.

Through the jungled and overgrown valleys and mountains, a small host of anthro mercenaries was cutting its swathe. A company, perhaps two, worth of soldiers, primarily reptile folk, with some feline mixed amongst them, lightly clad, primarily in helmets and cuirases was cutting, chopping and weaving its way through the thicket. Near the front, stood a man, unarmoured and absent, a scroll in his hands.
Trevor was daydreaming. He feared the worst. He feared his expedition had failed. He had already put himself in a bad position, hell, he was in a bad position from the moment he got jailed and then agreed to descend down on this planet. Then he had been pressganged into a pirate crew. That was a bad position. Then he got himself entangled into politics, assassinations and plots. That was an even worse position. Then he made an agreement with a mercenary company to lead an expedition into the jungles and mountains in search of a lost silver mine. That was somehow the worst of it, having only a crude and half-done replica of a map one of the targets of his kidnappings possessed. And while he was at the place he was supposed to be at, he was running out of the funds he had amassed through his service. And he was lost.
He of course, did not share any of this with the mercenaries. He had in fact continued to pay them their full salaries. He had to, the skirmishes and battles with the local catfolk were ever more common. The savages that dwelt here were countless and had often raided downhill onto the fertile coastal plains where the cities were perched up at and gave them more then ample reason to build their walls high. But there were so many. He had come here with twelve hundred men, veterans, armed and armoured well enough for battles between empires and within two weeks, he had gone down to four hundred men.
If luck allowed it, he might be killed by the savages with the last of his men. He knew the way back, but he couldn’t retreat. Noone would accept him and he’d be arrested and tortured to death. He had angered more important people in the past month then most kings angered within their lifetime. And the mercenaries around him, despite their money being paid on time, were getting weary and irritated. They no longer hailed him as a great employer, understandably so, for he had led them to their deaths.
He wondered about running away from them on multiple ocassions, but where to? Back? He couldn’t. Into the jungle? To be hunted and enslaved by the catfolk? If he was lucky, they’d sell him to some rich prince who’d make him his male concubine, a fate Trevor was dedicated to avoid. If he was less lucky, they’d either keep him as a slave or a concubine, or simply kill him. His small army had killed thousands of the catmen so far.
“The men are spent!” The mercenary captain, a snake-anthro said while walking up to Trevor.
“Make a camp, set the watch.” Trevor said, not raising his eyes from the map.
The captain did not turn around to carry out his order. Trevor sighed in agitation and lowered the map.
“Are we lost?” The captain demanded.
“Of course not, we can go back the way we came.”
“Will we reach the mine?”
“I hope we will.” Trevor said. Like fuck we will.
“How much longer?” The captain stepped closer. “The men won’t last for much more, they’ll demand blood.”
“They’ll have to satiate themselves on silver when we reach the mine.” Trevor said, unphased by the threat.”
[…]
Shouting awoke Trevor, motion of bodies. He immediately pushed himself off the floor, grabbing his long narrow sword.
As he stepped outside, he saw the commotion unfolding around. The catfolk, as usual were taunting his men as night fell, but were not daring to enter the camp or engage in the clash of blades. His men were arraying themselves in a parimeter at the edges of the camp, points on their swords lowered and ready to repulse the charges that, almost traditionally, never came.
Trevor made his way towards the centre of commotion, where he, as expectedly, found the captain.
“As usual.” He remarked. “Probed the camp, lost a few and retreated. And now they won’t let us sleep.”
Trevor looked around the camp. It was so much smaller than the camps his men were setting up recently. And the catfolk horde seemed larger, not just in proportion, but in plain size too.
“I reckon they could sweep us aside if they comitted.” Trevor mused.
“Its bad luck to talk like that.” The captain glared. “But I can’t help but agree.”
“Do you think they’ll do it?”
“I think they’re giving us a chance to retreat and save our lives.”
“I think they’ll attack us in the morning.” He said, pointing at the point in the camp where the line of the soldiers looked the thinnest. “When we’re sleeping on our legs.”
“I don’t think they’ll bother repositioning.” The captain exhaled. “We can switch positions faster then them. And I’m terminating our contract. My men will no longer die for you. Keep your cursed silver for yourself.”
Trevor nodded. “Well, good luck captain, I hope you live to the morning.” He distanced himself. “I want to die rested.” Trevor said as he walked back towards his tent.
Stopping outside of it, he took one more wide glance around and stopped in his tracks. The catfolk were preparing to attack. Their soldiers had closed the distance in a slight jog and had throwin the javelins before closing in with their axes and blades in hand. The mercenaries had braced themselves for the impact, stood their ground through the volley and rebuffed the first charge in a flurry of bladestrokes.
The catfolk were good fighters, accustomed to the terrain and present in great numbers, they didn’t hesitate to close the gap, but the armour of the mercenaries and their tight formation saved them.
The catfolk retreated, regrouped and waited. After a few moments, more came from the jungle. Amassing once again, the charge was repeated. Javelins flew and sabres scimitars clashed with axes and knives, the strikes glanced off of metal helmets and brestplates, but sank into flesh and bone.
Trevor perched himself against a small tree. The battle was almost rythmical and meditative, despite how gruesome and bitter it was. At about the fifth charge, the tide turned, the catfolk amassed all of their warriors. The mercenaries were spent, the line broken with the charge, catfolk burst through and started mauling them in close quarters as the formations shattered.
Trevor didn’t flee, there was nowhere to, he just got up, his blade in his hands and joined the butchery. Slowly, the brawl broke apart and the tribesmen left, dragging the captured and the wounded of both sides with them, some fifty or so mercs being left behind. Amongst the soldiers, he recognized a few, but saw no sign of the captain.
“Soldier!” He yelled at one, “Did you see what happened to the captain?”
The anthro did not reply.
“You?” He turned to a different one.
“They dragged him away.”
“Then let’s go get them back.”
[…]
Trevor, of course, had never had the idea he’d sucseed in recovering the captain of his mercenary force. He however did intend to scout out the area he was in.
The small collumn, now lead by himself, had, after burying the dead, headed uphill, to finally exit the valley. The path Trevor led them up was a steep one, but they had eventually, broken out to a clearing on the mountain side and with said clearing, he was awarded with a sight, perhaps more beautiful then any he’d seen in his life. Two weeks of marching into the jungle and he finally found it. On the next hill across, stood a walled city, dug into the mountainside, with the ground above it being dotted with mineshafts. He found it. He’d be back here. He knew what he needed for the next time and now, he wouldn’t need to look for it.

The meek bunny stumbled around the dark cave in a panic, attempting to hide from the pack of wolves who had chased him prior. He had been out gathering food for his tribe when they ambushed him, leaving cuts and bruises as he made his escape. His efforts to evade the wolves had been futile however, as they managed to trace his scent back to the cave. He could hear them sniffing around for him, their paws creeping against the cave floor near his hiding spot. He knew it was over, wolves had been known for their savagery, butchering prey with their gaping maws leaving only the bone. The rabbit was waiting for the inevitable when he saw a sliver of glowing light peering from the collapsed rocks in front of him. With nothing else to lose, he wiggled his way through a tiny hole in the rocks until he found himself in a large, dark circular chamber. At the end of the chamber sat a large coffin in the shape of an anchor, the blue light shining through what seemed to be frosted glass. The coffin itself was adorned in gold patterns with metallic bolts sealing the lid and the casket together. As he approached the coffin, his ears and tail twitched anxiously, fearful of what it might contain. All of the sudden, the sound of rocks being pushed filled the chamber, he looked to the entrance and saw the pack of wolves enter. Their eyes were fixed onto him, as their matriarch explains to him the painful death he is about to receive. She planned to drain the fluids from his body before allowing her lackies to have their way with his body. She swayed her hips back and forth as she insulted his tribe, threatening to raze their village to the ground. It was halfway through her spiel when a large stone door came crashing down, blocking the only exit to the chamber. White flames began to flare out from the ends of the coffin, causing torches inside of the large room to light up around them.
The anthros inside the room stared at the illuminated walls in shock, murals of the past adorned each inch of the chamber. Their gawking was cut short as bolts began to burst off the lid of the casket, one by one. The matriarch cowered behind her pack as the final bolt fell from its place. The lid creaked as it fell forwards to the ground, causing a large metallic thud to ring out inside the chamber. The inside of the coffin shot rays of light throughout as a tall figure stumbled out of the casket. The figure is hunched over, facing the ground with their arms limp. The wolves mutter to themselves, challenging each other to fight it. One willing contestant steps to the challenge and begins to approach the figure with cupped fists. The wolf takes a swing but is quickly blindsided as the figure grabs hold of his muzzle and delivers a hard knee into his chest.
The rabbit noticed something peculiar about the figure, he had no tail nor fur, and his paws were nonexistent. He thought hard about a species with such strange features but only one came to mind, and they were thought to had gone extinct years ago.
The rabbit doubted his own thoughts, it was historically impossible for one to be alive, after all the wars and controversy surrounding their species he thought they all would have been exterminated. Two more wolves approached the figure to challenge him, poking fun at his nudity and his other strange features. He simply stood there and waited for the wolves to make the first move. Both opened their maws and lunged at him, one aiming for the ankle and the other aiming for the neck. The figure quickly stepped back and drove an uppercut into the second one's muzzle while delivering a hard kick into the one near his leg.
The two wolves fell back in shock at the figure's force, before regaining their composure and lunging at him again. He grappled one by the neck, forcing the wolf's back to his chest before stomping down on its leg, causing a loud CRACK! to sound throughout the chamber. The wolf collapsed forward howling in pain, the matriarch watching in complete horror as the strength of her tribe was being crushed by an unknown species. The other one managed to catch the figure off guard, tackling him to the floor. He threw fist after fist down into the figure's head before being thrown off and kicked right in the muzzle. The figure threw the wolf into the wall, strangling him in the process. Another wolf came behind the figure hoping to deliver a heavy strike, but it ended up landing against the wall causing him to recoil back in pain. The figure dropped the half-dead beast in his hands and quickly went for the last one, grabbing the canine's arm and yanking him forward over his shoulder straight to the ground. The figure grabbed him by his arm, twisting it before jumping back causing the last wolf's arm to pop out of its socket. Throughout the chamber, loud shrieking and pained groans could be heard and yet the only sound that the figure emitted was a few deep breaths.
The rabbit was transfixed on the fight, but he began to notice the illuminated murals that decorated the walls. Many of them depicting the history of anthros, their creation and their creators.
In certain ancient myths, a species known as "Humans", were thought to be a mystical beings, responsible for creating the world itself. In return for living peacefully together, the humans wished for obedience from the anthros. Some species accepted their terms and lived with the humans peacefully, while some were angered by these demands and banded together to hunt the humans to extinction. These myths however, are seen as taboo and are never spoken of. Many tribes and kingdoms chose to believe that anthros had been part of the world since the beginning and that those who speak of humans are to be dealt with.
His ears twitched in realization, the figure was not just another lowly anthro species, but a human, and most likely the last of his kind.

Imagine a horribly augmented mewtwo that only knew torture from her creators. Her legs removed for powerful augmented arms and legs to make her stronger. She flees her captors, as all mewtwos do only to discover in her brief breaths of freedom that her cybernetic limbs weren't designed for life outside.
They slowly start to fall apart, feeling in the limbs fade to nothing. No matter how much energy she expends they stop working entirely.
She discards the limbs and now only uses her psychic powers for locomotion.
But the despair and isolation starts to strangle her. Storms brew in the skies as her feelings spiral. The last thing she hears is a voice calling out.
The local ranger discovers her. What's left of her. An emaciated torso of a mewtwo. The doctors did everything they could to help, remove the exposed wires, clean wounds, and seal the joints. All the while her savior sat beside her, hoping she pulls through. Three days she already came to but refused to open her eyes. The pain stopped but she was too terrified to open her eyes. Afraid to see a new nightmare the humans turned her into. One mind is all she could read near her and she took her time to take it in.
She went through his entire life, all the joys, friends, and family he had. Joy and happiness pierced her mind like a ray of light. And he worried about her. He cared and wanted revenge at those that tore her apart.
She opened her eyes and looked at the man that pulled her from the mountains.
Her body was light like a feather. he took her from the hospital and brought her to his home. The bed was much more comfortable. He cooked for her and stayed by her side until she fell asleep. He read books to her, knowing she was not just another pokemon. The entire time she re-read the pleasant times wanting to know what made him the way he was. He cared for so many other pokemon, saving lives and nursing them back to health. As she gained weight she fell in love with him.
Mewtwo stared at him with wonder. Tracing every movement he made as he left to get her more food. She even enjoyed the one sided conversations. Listening to him talk caused her heart to race. Even the degrading cleaning process was welcomed as it was the only physical contact he gave her. Weeks went by and he finished a book by her bedside. He got up to get another story when Mewtwo spoke to him, "Can you tell me the story of the Moltres you saved?"
The voice was raspy and left the both of them shocked. It was the first time she heard herself in years. He ran over to her side. "Can you repeat that?"
"I wanted to hear you talk about the time you saved the Moltres."
The man leaned back and smiled. She liked that, the way his lips curled to happiness. Her heart skipped a beat when he expressed that emotion.
"Okay, I'll tell you."
The tip of her purple tail batted the covers expressing her own excitement. The story was just like she saw it in his mind. A story she replayed over and over. When he finished she stared at him with her large eyes.
"Thank you. I liked it." The man nodded tears forming in his eyes. He was told that the trauma would render her mute. It tore at his heart to see her stare unable to engage. Thankfully they were wrong. He tucked her into the bed wrapping fresh sheets around her limbless body. "I don't want to sleep alone tonight. Can you stay with me?"
She pleaded to him and batted her eyes slowly. One of the most powerful pokemon in the world rendered a weak helpless creature violated every fiber in his being. He crawled beside her and held her head to his chest.
"How's this?" She made a soft cooing noise and inhaled his scent. She was so desperate for touch that she fell asleep immediately. Her dreams were prophetic, he was carrying her and holding her to his body. His naked body. The warm flesh rubbed her soft fuzzy body. She woke from the dream as her muzzle touched his lips.
She never had a dream before.
She opened her eyes when the sun broke through the room. The man never left her side the entire night. His scent comforted her and his presence gave her peace of mind. No nightmares of the organization stealing her away to do more experiments and torture.
As her face was inches from his she peered into his mind to see what the man was dreaming of. All she got in return was a black void and a mind that slipped away. Her consciousness gave chase but visions of the past nights of the ranger cleaning bandages and sheets slipped into her mind. He spent every night working to make sure she recovered. She opened tear filled eyes. She reached her muzzle up and touched his lips for a small peck of a kiss.
"Thank you, for everything."
The bandages were finally off Mewtwo's body. Her limbs were no longer exposed wires and constantly inflamed wounds but metal caps. "That feels a lot better." He slips a sports bra over her head to cover her breasts and wraps her privates in clean coverage. "What's that for?" genuine confusion in her voice.
"Just something to give you some dignity. I thought you would like having your privates covered."
She examines the clothing not really thinking of her femininity as private. She grasps at his mind to see if it was the truth. What truth she found was that he was finding her femininity attractive and wanted to stop those deep lusts from expressing themselves in anyway.
Her cheeks were flush as she stared down at her breasts and wrapped genitals. "I love it."
She remembered all the work he did and wanted to help out by at least carrying herself around the house. Her mind was weak so she could only manage it for a few minutes. Several times he would find her face down in one of the hallways of the massive house. She kept getting lost in the woodland home. But she was able to make it to the bathroom to relieve herself properly. One of the tasks she didn't want to demean him with.
With all her wounds healed she could finally be properly cleaned. Her first bath that wasn't done by machines. Mewtwo's tail twitched happily under her as the ranger carried her closer. She psychicly took off her clothing and lowered herself into the bath. The warm water penetrated her core.
"This feels so good."
Mewtwo's head rested on a floaty neck pillow the ranger slipped on to keep her safe. He rolled up his sleeves to scrub her. After a few minutes the water was murky. Mewtwo didn't know how filthy she had become over the course of her time in bed. "I'm sorry I'm gross."
"It's not your fault, I could only do so much with a rag without injuring you. You'll feel a million times better once your dry."
He wiped her face clean and made sure to clean behind her horns. she smiled after he was finished and heard the water drain away. Her naked torso was now in the bottom of the bathtub waiting to be picked up but he turned on the shower head to rinse off the dirty water from her body. She wondered what she looked like from his perspective.
A small innocent lady helpless at the bottom of a tub. His eyes actively avoided staring too long at her privates he kept thinking that he should cover them up and get done with this.
The memory stuck around as she returned. Thoughts of his naked body crossed her mind. She wondered what his ex girlfriend experienced when she pressed her naked body to his.
He picked her up with little trouble and carried her toward a bed of towels. Her quarter inch fur sticking closely to her body. The are was cold and caused her nipples to become erect. He wrapped her up in towels and rubbed her down. His strong hands feeling every inch of her body and caress every fold did things to her she never imagined. Her body cried out to her and demanded satisfaction. Nipples were teased and her pussy ached for more focused touches. Her breath became rapid and her face was blushing.
He pulled the towels away and saw a thin film of fluid stuck to her genitals. "Did you need to use the toilet?"
Mewtwo shook her head, chest rising with slow long breathes. "I need you."
The ranger blushed. He knew it would happen eventually. She needed to get off for the feelings to go away it was only natural.
"I'm going to touch you is that okay?" She nodded and arched her pelvis up with the help of her strong tail.
Fingers glided across her body toward her entrance. Her body shook in excitement. "Please be gentle."
"I will."
He inserted his middle finger inside the soaked entrance. The sound bounced around the humid bathroom air. He reinserted it several more times till moans joined the chorus. She rolled her hips with his rhythm.
He moved his ring finger inside with it, holding her lower abdomen down to prevent her from rolling off the counter. The speed increased and she could no longer reciprocate the movement.
Her breathing became frantic as she barreled toward climax. His strong grip keeping her on the track. He pinned her down and she couldn't arch her back in pleasure as it built up. The train wasn't stopping and his thumb massaged her clitoris in circles every time he pushed forward. She let out a powerful cry and fluids poured out of her in three steady pulses before subsiding. Her tongue lolled out of her muzzle. "Thank you."
He wiped her down and washed his hands without saying anything. She was so exhausted she couldn't even enter his mind to see what he was thinking about. Was he angry, disgusted? His blank expression was impossible to read.
She was put in a clean pair of underwear and left on the bed to wonder. But as he left the room she noticed the massive tent he was pitching in his pants. He needed to be taken care of too, not just her.
The nightmares returned as she slept alone. she called out for help in the dream hoping he will rescue her from being placed in the machines again. A arm came down and wrapped around her head.
Her world went black. But she could smell him. He was so close. Her body was torn free and pulled away. Far away from the horrible place. A warmth enveloped her again. The nightmare was over. She woke up next to him again. Without him, she can't sleep. She muttered just low enough to not wake him, "Thank you for saving me."
She rested comfortably in his warmth until she felt a pressure on her stomach. Something she remembered him dealing with for a while, he called it morning wood. Her sex was dripping being so close to his hard member. She nuzzled him wanting him to get up and use her to satisfy his need. After all the hard work he needed relief, it has been so long for him. She nudged her muzzle again to better success, "Good morning."
He was groggily shuffling around and his eyes focused on Mewtwo's face. Her eyes were batting slowly, "I want you to use me for your needs."
He realized what she was talking about as his cock was firmly pressed against her stomach. He felt it was taking advantage of a helpless pokemon but her eyes welcomed it. Inhibitions were worn away like a sandcastle under the surf, not sure if it was the psychic pokemon's doing or he was falling in love with her.
She rolled over to her back and smiled, her happy demeanor was warm and inviting. He stripped off his clothes and then pulled her scant clothes away from her.
Mewtwo arched her neck to get an eyeful of his naked body. His bare chest, strong core, and large cock. Her tail glided across his body to give her some tactile of his rigidness. She was already getting hot again and could feel the moisture build up on her pussy. "Use me. I don't care how rough you get. I want you to be relieved."
He wasn't rough, he glided his hands up her torso to her chest. he gently thumbed her hardened nipples drawing cute moans from Mewtwo. He lined his member up with her pussy and kissed the nape of her neck.
He loved every part of her. She was drenched and shaking. Her pussy could only feel the head of his penis as he continued to give soft kisses across every part of her neck. He moved to the side of her muzzle and he pushed his cock forward rubbing her clit gently. She let out a desperate cry wanting more only to be cut on by a passionate kiss. Their tongues lapped at each other and he plunged his dick deep inside her.
Stars filled Mewtwo's vision as all the teasing and build up lead to a burst of pleasure. There was no resistance as he fucked her. She was held tightly to his body as he moved his hips. She wanted to cry out in pleasure but her mouth was occupied by his. This is where she belonged, under the man that loved her.
He finally broke off the deep kiss letting her finally moan and gasp. "AHG YES! GAH"
The momentum didn't stop. He was completely lost in his own pleasure. He wanted more. He grabbed her hip and pulled it up. Mewtwo watched as she was helplessly manhandled and fucked with double the force. "YES! Fuck me, use me! I belong to you!" The incentive worked and her tight clinching walls caused him to explode right into her awaiting womb.
He was milked for a solid 20 seconds. spurt after spurt of semen flooded her body and mind. the ranger collapsed onto her arms grasping out to hold her close.
Mewtwo was happy to take on her new purpose, she embraced it. A satisfied smile spread on her muzzle before passing out.

Very Yes
Now I'm wondering what a pregnant psychic phuck-nugget would look like
>Ranger is internally freaking out about the logistics of not just caring for a limbless Mewtwo, but a pregnant one at that
>honestly feels quite guilty at the thought of adding the stresses of pregnancy to her already difficult life, even if he's the one that would deal with any resulting problems as her caretaker
>whether or not he actually tells her, Mewtwo is aware of this because psychic, and gets to work using her powers to become semi-independent
>at first it was just floating things over to her, and then back when she's done with them
>then it was hovering herself around the house
>something something duct-taped to the kitchen wall/in a special seat in front of or on the counter so she can help cook dinner
>then one day, some months later, the Ranger walks in to the living room or the like, and sees she's sprouted psychic arms from her stumps to cradle her now quite-swollen belly
>arms with five slender fingers, rather than the three blunt-tipped ones she was born with, but can hardly remember anymore

>A husband and wife pair visit the local humie club for their honeymoon as is popular nowadays for newlyweds
>Whether he or some random human is the father of her first child is part of the fun
>Although from the look of this male the functionality of his testicles is called into question
>Perhaps he wants his wife to be bred by a human, knowing he is incapable of siring a strong child
>His second child will absolutely be his to carry on his submissive genes
>His son shall be the juiciest femboy the world has ever seen and his daughter will be the greatest slut to have ever existed
>The son shall join his father in servicing the cocks of their human master and half-human brother
>His daughter will be deflowered before his eyes, legs kept open by her mother to be bred by the cock that deflowered her
>But first, they must get on their knees and kiss the cock that shall join their family

>Samson comes home after long day of fixing the shit shack the landlord calls an apartment.
>Pay is high, and rent is covered.
>Place is constantly falling apart because the anthros keep clogging the drains and breaking shit.
>Human apartment complexes weren’t built to be shredded by claws and other physiological differences.
>neighbor is some fox that’s constantly making a racket across the way
>Has parties every week when Samson get’s home for the weekend
>This night was particularly bad, and the music was blasting
>He bashes on the door, and she stumbles out drunk off her fuzzy ass
>she was wearing a nice dress, she always wore nice dresses.
>One of the straps that wrapped around her delicate shoulders drifted down.
>If it weren’t for her erect nipple the fabric would have slipped and exposed her boob.
>Several anthro couples are inside dancing to the trash music and the smell of their musk and cheap wine mix in the air
>He yells at her to keep the damn music down which snaps her out of her drunken stupor for a moment
>”Alright, I’ll tell them the cops warned us, you don’t have to be so forceful.”
>To his surprise she actually did as he asked
>The following day the drunk bitch starts trying to key in his door he stares at her through the peephole for a solid two minutes
>He opened up the door and the drunk bitch stumbles in like it was her apartment
>She sits on the couch mumbling incoherently and then falling asleep
>several attempts of trying to wake her he realized she was too drunk and couldn’t be alone
>He laid her down and set a bucket near her head
>A large glass of water waited for her in case she woke up
>When he woke the next day the sight made him sick
>She was still there and had missed the bucket
>Thirty minutes of cleaning up after the anthro cunt had him spitting bars of insults
>”I’m sorry.”
>He stopped cursing her out and finished cleaning up her mess.
>Apologies and apologies spewed out of her muzzle as she drank the water.
>The vixen was out the door after he shared some more harsh words about the company she keeps.
>After work he returned to find two wolf dickheads pouding on the vixen’s door
>One mentioned being stiffed and the other laughed loudly about being stiff.
>They saw Samson and started to make vague threats
>The vixen ran out the door and embraced the human
>”Master, you came home, these men have been bugging me all day.”
>”Oh, so you’re a pet? Why were you selling sex if you’re a pet?”
>She whispered into his chest for help
>The human just pulled his shirt up and showed his silvery piece.
>They ran off with their tails between their legs.
>Samson pushed the woman away to head to his own apartment
>”What’s your name?”
>He answered her with an annoyed voice
>”My name is Charlotte.”
>He ignored the vixen but she stepped closer as he unlocked his door
>”Can I stay with you. I don’t feel safe in my apartment.”
>He hated her, but not enough to see her hurt.
>her tail thrashed happily as he let her into his home again.
>The first day was rough, he wasn’t used to living with another being
>Walking into a normally empty couch to find it occupied gave him pause
>He never asked her about her situation, but the topic eventually needed to be covered
>In standard feminine fashion she went into detail about nonsense, he tried to stay engaged then she got to the reason those wolves came after her
>She was wanting some extra money for alcohol, so she tried to prostitute herself
>The wolves paid and then she chickened out returning their money
>A bunch of horny sons of bitches would go as far as chase the vixen to her home
>Samson reluctantly offered her to stay if she wanted but she can’t party
>Charlotte agreed and left to grab some things from her room
>When she returned, she was wearing a much more casual outfit
>Quite revealing from her normal dresses.
>The older vixen had a tight t-shirt on and daisy dukes
>Her shapely body gave the human pause
>As the days turned to weeks in each other’s company he learned quite a bit about her
>Originally living in California doing some bit parts in shows she left to raise her daughter
>Failed marriages, broken friendships, and lost friends.
>She only partied because it was the only time she felt comfortable and youthful.
>Recently the aged fox felt like an outsider still as all the attendees were in their mid-twenties
>They shared quite a lot in common, isolation.
>He worked all day and came home exhausted, too exhausted to really do anything.
>He wouldn’t admit it but It was comforting to have someone happy to see him when he opened the door
>Charlotte was growing on him, he cared about her
>However things weren’t entirely perfect she did leave messes everywhere but with a quick yell snapped her attention to him
>It was strange to watch her switch like a light like that.
>A strange satisfaction that spread on her face with each small order
>A small pile of her discarded clothes, he would tell her to clean it up
>Shedding everywhere she did her best to clean it
>One time he had to use the rest room and he ordered her to get out so he could relieve himself
>The vixen walked out of the bathroom naked holding a brush
>Her perfect breast in full view and white furry thighs highlighting her pussy
>”Well, go ahead and use the toilet, I have to finish grooming when you’re done.”
>He wanted to test it further but didn’t feel comfortable with it
>Maybe she just had a submissive kink that took hold, many anthros that become pets have that quirk
>Charlotte eventually started to ask about his sex life
>Naturally he was reserved and didn’t answer such a personal question
>”Well if I’m to play the part of the pet, I need to know my master won’t have a woman get in the way of that.”
>He was speechless, it had been forever since the encounter with the wolves and didn’t really know how to answer
>The silence remained, and the vixen wore a sultrier smile on her muzzle
>The following evening when he arrived home from work she greeted him wearing a lovely aburn dress
>The fabric was older and stretched in placed, probably something she had always wanted to wear for a while
>It drove attention to her neck where a golden little tag with her name on it sat
>she rushed forward and smiled at the human
>”Order me around, I like it.”
>Samson was drawn inside by her paws
>He was completely at odds with himself, he liked her and didn’t want to ruin it
>The aged vixen waited patiently for the man to speak
>Looking her up and down he gave a small order that he thought would be nice
>He told her to be his girlfriend
>He ordered her to drop the dress and show off the body she worked hard on maintaining
>the dress fell to the floor giving him an eyeful of her boobs tightly packed in a white bra and a cunt that was wedged in her panties
>Her fat clit was poking through
>He made a comment about how happy she was and her tail responded with a back and forth motion
>”Well, yeah, I’m an anthro, submission is kind of important to us.”
>He took a finger and touched her clit through the fabric causing her to shudder under his grasp
>”Oh shit. Stop teasing me so much.”
>he ordered her to get naked for her obedient prize
>Her panties slipped off with a few sticky fluid strands as they broke away from her pussy lips
>The vixen was putty, he rubbed her lips and inserted a finger inside making the removal of her bra difficult
>She shook her hips and bucked, “Yes. This feels right.”
>She was now naked erect nipples on her white well-kept furry chest
>He messaged them and pulled on them gently coaxing her into his room
>She jumped on the bed unprovoked and spread her legs wide for the human
>”You don’t need to order me for this, I have been waiting for this for so long.”
>Samson chuckled and started to remove his uniform
>His erect member flopped out as his clothes dropped to the floor
>”God damn, I should have fucked you ages ago if that’s what you were packing.”
>he pushed himself into her and their faces met
>The fucking was slow and steady, he didn’t want to rush things
>She was writhing, stretched, and full
>”Please. Go. Faster. I can’t take this.”
>He refused to listen and just kept a slow steady beating he wanted to enjoy her
>She was pushed over the edge and wrapped her legs and arms around him
>screams of pleasure filled the small room.
>The syphony and pulsing pussy almost brought him over but he kept it slow
>He wanted to cum when she begs for it
>The methodical pushing her down on the bed was now wet slapping sounds
>Her eyes were unfocused as he plowed her
>Only reason he knew she was still conscious was because of the tight grip she had around him
>”Puh lease. Cum. In. me.”
>Charlotte’s words were choked with moaning and he wrapped his arms around her and held her close as he finally released in a deep gasp inside her

>the best anthro girls are the ones you can pluck right off the streets
>her mother was raped in the same way many years ago
>the chances of this being your own daughter was fairly high
>well in this neighborhood it was pretty hard not to kidnap a female that you hadn't sired or bred at least once

>Group of delinquent "wild" dragons sit outside a human village
>They smell other dragons in the air
>Humans fit some domesticated dragons with harnesses and reins
>Jealousy fills their heads as the human tamed dragons don't need to hunt or sleep on the cold stone floors of their cave
>They just fly with their caring humans

>It's kinda weird how they're always wearing all that equipment
>Actually they've never seen any dragons flying with it on
>Still it must be nice to be taken care of like that
>They imagine those tight leather straps bound reassuringly around them
>Those weird human hands testing the fit around their chest
> Then their belly...
> Between their legs...
>They decide that being domesticated doesn't sound too bad at all

>A dragon sneaks up on the rooftops at night
>slinking through the dark to view how the humans take care of dragons in their homes
>the first stop is in the farming district
>A male dragon is sleeping soundly surrounded by human little ones
>the bed is massive and comfortable looking
>sparsely furnished but a roaring warm fire keeping everyone warm
>it was a pleasant scene and the dragon looked incredibly content with his family
>The dragon stalker moved on, not wishing to disturb such a peaceful scene
>a short dragon dash to a more suburban area lived a lone man
>The dragoness was also laying in bed
>however she was decorated with pink lace on her tail and neck
>a frilly courset wrapped around her ribcage
>she lazily lapped at some berry wine in a golden dish
>the dragoness looked up at the interloper
>"What brings a vouyer to my abode?"
>The dragon peered carefully through the upper window
>She ask her if she's happy in her lot in life
>"Of course i'm happy, human lovers are quite kind, i get anything i want. He's so sweet to me."
>She ask if they would like to live free again
>"outside? in the rain? Without him? No! absolutely not! The look on his face when he gets home brings me joy."
>"Begone feral. you irritate me."
>She flicked her tail sending an empty golden saucer clattering near the window.
>The dragon traveled deeper in the city
>climbing up a large tower he smelled another dragon
>Along with the scent of dragon arousal wafted from a window
>Inside the room were two dragons and a human
>The male dragon was wrapped in leathers the only part of him that was visible was his erect penis
>The female bathed the cock with her tongue while the naked human stroked and rubbed her vent
>both the dragons moaned in unison as they were teased
>The shocking sight was too much for the young dragon
>Wings spread wide she flew away from the human city trying to process all the sights they saw
>Should she find a nice human companion, maybe be a house dragon?

>tfw no extremely curious but slightly dirty wild dragon gf to 'domesticate' and show around the city

>no excited dragon trying out new food from the stalls
>seasoned chicken, deserts and chocolates
>happily walking with a leash to the next sight
>Oblivious to the social ques that comes with being a domesticated dragon
>she walks up and starts talking to military dragons, their riders staring at the newcomer with contempt
>She is scolded and slumps down thinking she did a major fuck up
>A bag of malt balls perk her up and keep her spirits up to be fitted for a saddle

>She walks into the building
>She sets her stuff down and slips her paws under her skirt
>Pair of white panties slide off her ass
>Her tail is wagging like the bitch she is
>The panties are hung from the coat rack near the lobby
>Everyone can see them as they enter for services
>She watches the mayor take them to his office while she is talking with a villager
>Her face is beet red and her heart is racing

>Son of high ranking officer
>Have high position in military because of it
>You know it. Everyone knows it, so you get very little respect
>Because of that you tend to fuck off out of the office to walk the streets
>Steam trollies and mana powered carriages drive around on the smooth cobble streets
>You hop on the trolley and take it to the center of the city to pass the time
>After walking around for you see a large congregation of women
>Large hats and overly complicated dresses block the view
>You wander around the cluster fuck and see that the slave trader is in town
>Your father kept some slaves in the home you grew up but the officer housing you have now doesn't really need the frivolity
>You decide to stick around and see what happens
>First set of slaves are brought on the stage two catmen
>Their collars are purple indicating docile trained slaves
>The slaver is pointing out their muscles and usefulness
>Then he removes their clothes and exposes their full sacks to the women
>They are practically falling over themselves to get a closer look
>The slaver stimulates them rubbing the sheath to get the slaves aroused
>They're now aroused infront of everyone visibly disturbed by their shame
>The bidding starts and the price climbs rapidly
>They use a special currency you only have a handful
>Some fat woman who is wearing an ill fitting dress 2 sizes too small won the catmen
>You shake your head at the unfortunate souls
>The next line is two wolf girls, tall muscular with black collars and muzzles
>They were two steps from being completely feral
>They growled at the slaver who manhandled the bound women
>The crowd wasn't as enthusiastic as male slaves
>You contemplate that they might be a steal, if you somehow tamed the bitches
>The slaver described the little training they went through and what they have yet learn
>The grey wolves slowly lost their deposition as he continued to shove them around
>By the end they were wimpering like puppies
>The good part was coming up
>Their bodies looked quite exquisite and you waited patiently for the reveal
>The slaver tore their cloaks off and you weren't disappointed
>Large perky breasts and dark set nipples
>The slaves tried to cover themselves from the audience but their hands were firmly tied behind their backs
>Their pussies were canine in nature large luscious lips that peaked out of a first of pubic fur
>The slavers assistant helped the ladies show off their goods by spreading their legs for the crowd
>They writhed trying to fight the men to no avail
>When bidding started the crowd of women were silent
>Lucky you
>You placed your first bid at a single token, two wolf girls would be nice to make your home feel a little warmer
>Going once
>Going twice
>Another man's voice shouted from the crowd
>A fat blubbery voice
>Your eyes peeled over to see a fatan wearing golden jewelry and long flowing tan robes
>The only though that passed through your head was 'Fuck'
>Some fat bastard was going to buy your women
>The bidding war started
>Not that you had much to begin with
>Two, three, four tokens
>The bidding was so small that it would have been insulting considering the catmen went for 50
>You placed all of your chips in with a final 15
>A joke considering the fat man probably has several concubines and hundreds of slaver credits
>He goes one more than you at a bargain of 16
>Pissed you jump over and bid twice as much
>32 you sweat as you don't even have the credits
>Going once
>Going twice
>The fat bastard tripled it
>96
>Going once
>Going twice
>Sold
>Losing the women was a painful sting as they were shuffled off the stage
>But at least you weren't in debt to the slavers and you made the ugly fat guy lose spend more money than he needed
>So a net neutral to you
>You watch the fat bastard leave as some orcs were shuffled on the stage
>The women's cries were shrill and you checked to make sure they weren't bleeding
>You wondered if there would be any thing else that would be a pleasant sight
>More orcs, a catman, and wolfman
>Nothing sparked your interest as they were brought out, stripped of their clothes, and then their dignity
>The slavers we're wrapping things up as the last trailer was brought out
>A catwoman slinder and frail
>A purple collar hung loosely around her scrawny neck
>You look around to see if anyone would be interested in such a delicate thing
>A little fattening up and she would look nicely on your bed
>The same spiel as before talk, talk, talk, strip
>She didn't even need the assistant to come out she just spread her legs to the crowd
>The bidding started and you throw your price in
>Going once
>Going twice
>Another voice calls out
>A haggard older man who looks like he just ran a marathon to arrive
>You wanted to throw your hat in the ground for the interruption
>the bidding war started again
>As the price climbed though his voice was wavering, 6
>Thinking nothing of it you wore a smug smile, 7
>That smile disappeared when you saw another purple collared catman
>The older gentleman made a bid, and from the sound of it the final one, 8
>Same coat pattern as the one on stage
>His eyes were locked on the woman
>Going once
>You were quite a lazy asshole
>Going twice
>But you weren't a monster
>Sold
>There was a joyous reunion as the cat people hugged each other
>The older man locked eyes with you giving a nod of appreciation
>You shrug back at him and gave a smile in return
>You get signs that things we're wrapping up
>Around 80% left
>There was one more exhibit left and from the looks of the chains they were dragging it was a big one
>A large green dragon wearing a purple collar around her slender neck
>Her emerald scales sparked and shimmered as she moved with grace on the platform
>The slaver called the dragon Esmer and from the sound of it she was a house dragon from the east
>He went on and on about her skills
>The dragon smiled brightly showing off her wingspan and her strong rear legs
>She was quite the show boat about the whole thing
>With the final display she sprayed fire high up into the air and then sat on her haunches
>The crowd started to leave not wanting anything to do with her
>You were enchanted though
>You seen the dragon riders when you were a boy and they caught your whimsical imagination
>You were ready to bid but the bidding didn't start at one
>It started at twenty due to her scales and bones
>You don't need to know what number was larger
>Your mouth hung open as the beautiful beast was just out of your grasp
>The dragoness had a bright tooth smile as she waited for the bids
>When nothing sounded from the crowd she started to panic
>"I can do many things! I'll even be a beast of burden!"
>The slaver said no bidders going once
>"Please!? No one wants me!?"
>Tears started to pour from her eyes
>No bidders going twice
>The assistant started to bind her wings and tie her limbs up
>"I don't want to die."
>You shot your hand up just as the muzzle went over her head
>"Twenty to our uniformed man"
>The dragoness sighed with relief, she looked like she about passed out
>You however were sweating
>Before you could make it to the platform the elderly man pushed his farmers hands into yours
>5 more tokens
>He thanked you and left bringing the two cat people with him
>You pay for Esmer who was unconscious in a pool of her fear
>You begin to examine your property
>She's much larger up close twice as big as the self propelled carriages
>Her scales were every shade of green you could imagine
>From down below you thought her a solid color
>She also reaked, but that could have been the aforementioned fear that her lower half was still on top of
>The slaver's assistant removed the bindings and even offered to sell you some extras
>But with only one coin left you could only afford saddle bags that could fit nicely around her tail
>She did offer to be a beast of burden after all
>You tap her tear stained snoot to get her attention
>Esmer slowly returned her bright green eyes focusing
>"Am I dead?"
>You shook your head and inform her of what happened
>She flipped like a switch and grabbed you in her forearms and clamped you into her body
>Her large wings encapsulated you and the world went dark
>"Thank you master! Thank you, thank you! I'll be the best dragon!"
>Her cries of adoration were added with a tossing back and forth as she stood up on the tips of her talons
>When she let you go you were dizzy and nearly strangled
>The large dragon dead was pressed firmly under your chin
>She coo'd softly and nuzzled you like a cat
>The stench was getting to you and you shoved her away
>You inform her the first thing she's going to do is fly into the lake to wash herself
>She looked down under belly and her green shades darkened
>The saddle bags weighed a ton but you didn't want them soiled by putting them on a dirty dragon
>Esmer wallowed in embarrassment the entire trip following close behind
>Dragons were quite a normal sight as dragon riders were trained in fortification
>So the trip was relatively quick on foot as people and carts moved out of your way
>A small detour took you to the lake where you haphazardly dumped the gear near the lakes edge
>Taking a load off you also drop yourself on a patch of grass
>There was a loud thump and a sonic splash as Esmer took off and quickly dove

Cute birbs
>WoL brings home ehll tou
>She reeks of his cum
>The red dragoness nuzzles the human and even presses her muzzle to his lips
>His chocobo girl is incredible jealous
>Ehll tou is confused as dragon custom strong dragons have many concubines
>Every day the chocobo girl is at her throat squawking and ruffling her feathers telling her she ruined everything
>Ehll tou pins the yellow chocobo with her large talons telling the bird brain she will never let the perfect man go
>WoL throws them both outside in the stall to have them get along
Having two headstrong mounts is a problem.

>Have small mouse gf
>She's delicate and very fragile
>A single drop from your waist could injure her severely
>But you're gentle and she does her best to please you
>She'll squirm her way into your pants and kiss and lick your penis stimulate your most sensitive parts until you cream over entire body
>But when it comes to pleasing her she always wants it a little rough
>Floss bondage or tape
>You cave and put her on the desk
>She's shaking and starts stripping off her clothes
>You see the trail of liquid coating between her thighs
>She spreads her legs and stretches before you start
>Even at her small palm size you notice her clit and nipples are completely erect
>She was wanting this for a while
>You have some instruments at your disposable
>Silk string to tie her up, a little cart bondage base, a egg vibrators, and some fine tipped modeling paint brushes.
>You pick her up as you normally do and pull her thighs apart to kiss her small cunt
>There is a slight taste from her overwhelming wetness
>She pushes you to do more
>You pin her down in the cart and start to tie her up
>Just snug enough to see her soft flesh push back a little
>Her tail is lashing out and she squeaking happily
>Once she's secure you roll the little cart around
>She's in heaven, moaning as she looks upon her bound body
>Her hips buck forward humping with the little freedom you gave her
>Then you show her the paintbrush and her eyes dilate
>She's begging for you to touch her
>You start by gently touching her nipples
>She tries to squirm from the delicate touch but there's no use
>She's giggling and moaning as you flick the brush back and forth giving each nipple equal treatment
>Her clit then catches your eye, it's begging for your touch
>The hips jolt as the brush now focuses on her defenceless privates
>Her moans are now cries of pleasure
>Hips rotate with the brush desperate to keep the bristles on at all times
>The sight is intoxicating, her small body desperate, sweating, and moaning
>Tears streaming off her face as she begs and pleads for more
>You pull the brush away leaving her groaning and humping the air for more
>You blow on her to cool her soaking wet pussy
>She lets out a curse and shivers
>You smile and laugh at your little girlfriend
>You then grab a vibrator and tie it right under her legs
>The pink egg was massive from her perspective she rode them before and they left her a drooling mess
>Now she was strapped to one
>You count down letting her to mentally prepare for what's to come
>She's already grinding it in anticipation
>You switch it on to low
>Her moan shakes with the little motor
>After letting her ride it you crank it to max
>She screams loudly pressing her cunt hard to the little plastic shell
>Her first orgasm comes and her eyes roll in the back of her head
>You can't help it but stand up and start to jerk off to the sight
>Her oversensitive pussy ached from post orgasm
>The pain twists to another orgasm forcing her muscles to clench and buck in defiance
>After her second she tries to pull away
>The string keeps her firmly in place causing another painful orgasm to ripple across her small body
>Her vision starts to close in just as she is splashed with hot cum
>her mouth opens to catch some as she's coated
>The vibrator is turned off and her heavy breathing is all that could be heard
>You cut her free and wipe her clean
>She's limp in your hand, eyes barely holding themselves open
>"Thank you for that, I love you"

>Her pussy is entirely red from arousal
>The fine fur is strokes by her tiny paws as she masturbates under the shadow of your cock
>You have a steel chopstick perfect to help her
>You were warming it up with your body heat
>There is a small stainless washer on the tip to keep her safe
>You always worry about her and take precautions
>When the chopstick is nice and warm you coax it into her perfect little cunt
>She's on her back enjoying the ride
>Her pelvis hits the washer filling her completely with the dick warmed metal
>After warming her up you pull it away
>She never enjoyed cumming like that
>You move her to your aroused member and she latches on tightly
>She is burying her snout into the shaft base and raising her ass begging for more
>You're rock hard hearing her moaning squeaks
>You shove the steel inside her waiting pussy and as you push her to the limits she's gently rubbing your dick with her entire being
>Her feet stretch down and message your head coated in pre-cum
>You speed up more ramming her pussy
>She's in complete ecstasy
>Her cries become louder and her grip tightens
>She stops the moans and holds her breath as she succumbs to orgasm
>you stop the rod movement with a final push
>She rotates her hips on it and cums her little brains out
>You put the rod down and let her readjust
>She's panting hot breathes onto your dick head.
>Her tongue laps gently at it goading you to cross the finish line
>Just as you get closer you take her body and rest your dive over her
>You start stroking with her entire body and she kisses you penis just as it touches her face
>You cum and blow hot fluids on her face and body
>Both of you are panting as you pull up your briefs
>She's now in a sticky hammock lapping at your sensitive glads
>Each tease causes your hips to shudder as you begin making dinner
>You hear muffled 'I love yous' from down below as she is cleaning you up

>doll-sized mousemaid that tries her best to serve you well despite her size
>all she's really good for is fetching you small things around your work desktop
>constantly tease her about it
>pamper her a lot, which frustrates her because she takes her maid job too seriously
>make baths for her on a big mug of tea

Hans stepped through the portal. With a bright flash of white light, he had, uncarilgly and casually, made his way into a parallel existance. This one, like many humanity had made, created specifically for his enjoyment, because it had possessed a planet built exactly to his liking.
Glancing around, he observed the luxury apartment he had teleported into. A large room, with two of its walls being glass, allowed an unobstructed view into the urban landscape around him. How Hans enjoyed modern technology. With his handheld, he had created a new plain of reality to his enjoyment within minutes. He understood, of course, that people used to live without this technology, but he simply couldn’t fathom it. Not living forever due to nanomachines repairing your cells? He could deal with that, everyone killed themselves sooner or later, that was fine. But not being able to create universes? He had merely lived with that for seven millenia, and he already couldn’t imagine life without it. And not having an assembler? That was incomperhensibe. Having to remember to carry things around was too alien to him. As was not having an AI assitant, or a mind wiper.
As he exited the flat, he bumped into a group of anthros, cutting off the train of thought. He quickly observed them before they even spotted him, a trio of anthro females, well dressed in party clothes, two canids, one feline and an avian male, dressed in a suit. It was obvious they were all intoxicated and coming back from a celebration, they couldn’t have missed him otherwise.
He thought for a second, before coughing to make his attention known. One by one, they had turned towards him and froze, obedience and fear evident in them. A smile crept over Hans’s face. This was what he enjoyed.
“I need a volunteer” he exclaimed “to sacrifice himself for the rest of the group.”
A few nervous glances were exchanged and some worried murmurs escaped the lips of the more drunk.
“Well?” Hans urged, enjoying every moment, every movement and flinch.
“I… uh…” the avian spoke “volunteer.”
“Good, wonderous.” Hans said, stepping forwards and placing his hand on the avians shoulder “Do you live nearby?”
“On this floor.” The avian spoke, obviously trying to put a brave display over the fear he felt.
“Lead on.”
The avian lead, while the trio of females stood, unmovingly.
“Come on in, join us.” Hans encouraged them and they, unwillingly, obliged.
As the group of five entered the flat, Hans observed it. A nice flat, undoubtadly bought by the avians parents, rich buisnessmen, probably. Too bad it wouldn’t remain theirs.
“Your parents home?” Hans asked the bird-boy.
“Dad is on the buisness trip. Mom is coming home late.”
“How late?”
“In … five or so hours.” The bird answered after checking his watch.
“Plenty of time to ruin you.” Hans said, more to himself then to the observers, but the avian visibly flinched.
Walking around the flat, Hans looked in multiple locations, before finally deciding on a low, circular, glass table.
“Strip.” He ordered the blue jay, who, following a second long pause, did as he was told. In the meanwhile, Hans flicxked up his handheld and with a few clicks, acessed his assembler.
“Bend over on the table, legs apart, arms behind the back. Make sure they touch at the wrists.” He ordered again and the blue jay, once again, obeyed, lowering himself on the table.
Then Hans switched his attention to the handheld and typed “Preperation for anal, wristbinder, thigh spreader, leg spreader.” As he clicked enter, a swarm of black flying particles exited his handheld and split into multiple parts. Some of them went to construct the bondage gear for the anthro, assembling it from pure air, part of them entered the anthros anus. Within a minute, the swarms had returned, but the bondage was set up and the clearing was done, his entire large intestine was cleaned out.
The bird-boy laid on the table from his stomach upwards, his knees on the floor, his arms bound behind his back, a begging look on his face. Hans ignored him.
“I need another volunteer from amongst you three.” He pointed at the girls. This time the reaction was faster, the feline girl put her hand up. ‘Confident. I like her.’ Hans thought.
“You stay here.” He pointed at the feline that put her hand up “The other two, strip naked, go down and make sure to lead whoever asks here.”
Hans then glanced around, found a piece of blank paper he was looking for and started writing on it. “Hereby, I, an anthro by the name of ________________ accept ownership of” He turned to the feline girl “What are the names of the two girls, this guy” he pointed to the birdboy “and his mother?” The feline girl recited them, and Hans continued writing. “as well as the ownership of the property of the birdboy and his parents.”
Pushing the paper to her, he commanded “Sign this.”
Begrudgingly, the feline signed it.
Then, Hans grabbed a phone from the table and dialed the police number.
“Hello officer?”
“Hello, this is police, state your emergency.”
“I’m a human. Transfer me to your superior.”
The phone hung up and, in a few moments, a different voice picked up.
“Hello I’m- “
“Irrelevant, send me two dozen of your largest male servicemen to the location of this phone, a pair of naked canids will lead them upwards.” And with that, he ended the call.
“Say” he turned to the avian “What race is your mother?”
The birdman stared for a few moments before speaking “Canid, domesticated variant.”
“So, you drew after your father? Too bad, I was gonna make you have a go at your mother if you were of the same race.” He said completely casually.
The birdmans eyes widened in horror.
“Don’t worry, I’ll just let your dad pound you.” He leaned on the table “Oh and I hope you can come from anal, because after this night is done, I’m locking you in a chastity cage. Have fun.” He pushed himself from the table. He felt like having a go at the avian before the policemen arrived, but he couldn’t be bothered. He felt more like observing the spectacle he had arranged then like participating in it.
Before long he had sent one of the two girls to make purchase trips for alcohol, set up a camera, started a stream, let a rave song play and finally welcomed and instructed the requested two dozen policemen to repeatedly run a train on the blue jay’s ass, to have fun with the two feline girls, to trash the apartment and to properly welcome the birdboys mother. It would be a fun night.

>fucking the neighbor's daughter soon turned into a fun pastime
>sneaking into her room to "rape" her in her bed
>kidnapping her right off the streets and fucking her in the back of your van
>making her go to school with her underaged womb sloshing with your cum
>with any luck she'll be able to lure her classmates into fucking you as well
>from how her father looked at you it was clear he knew what you were doing to his young daughter but didn't have the balls to confront you about it
>or even look you in the eyes as you exchanged pleasantries
>and so when you got back from a long vacation of laying with some older women for a change his little girl pulled you into her room the moment you returned
>she stripped down, cursing you for not taking her with you on vacation as she peeled the crotch of her panties from her sopping wet cunny
>you were going to fuck her right here, right now
>and when she was done she would go downstairs and show off the creampie you had dumped inside her to to her father in order to make things official
>she was moving out of her house and into yours so that they could fuck as much as they wanted
>and if he had any problem with it he could make another child with his wife
>although, she said with a smirk, she would really like you to be the one to breed her a sibling

I want Loona as an unwilling, mind controlled slave. She is magically forced to do anything I tell her to, but can think and speak freely (unless I tell her to shut up, of course). I'd love to stare into her murderously furious eyes while she's sucking my unwashed dick, knowing she really, REALLY wants to bite down but can't. I'd treat her like a dog and do everything I can think of to get under her skin, piss her off as much as possible. Pic related is the LEAST angry she should be at any given time.

mind control is such a mixed bag. what you describe is one of the better version of mind control. any loss of status mind control is great the whole "My body is moving on it's own" cliche.
The change of natural behavior, "oh this is what i normally do" is also pretty good.
But the best part in my opinion being able to just order direct commands beyond movement, twenty times sensitivity or their feet are now erogenous zones and then have them walk to the store in bare feet and watch them fight the urge to openly masturbate.

"You feel like you have a piece of hair stuck in your mouth. Your left eye and ear twitch uncontrollably. A random point on your body itches every three seconds."
>"You fucking shit!"
"You'll censor your own swears by barking instead. Your saliva tastes weird. The Song That Never Ends is stuck in your head. You feel like you need to pee but you don't."
>"Mother*bark*er! I'm gonna crush your *bark* you *bark*ing *bark*!"
"You are now breathing manually. You can't stop thinking about penguins. Motor control of your arms and legs are mirrored."
>"*bark*! Stop iiiiit!"
"Your paws are sweaty. Everything smells like rhubarb. Your tail wags, but only to the right. Shall I go on?"
>"No... please."
"Who's my little bitch?"
>"I am, master..."
"Good girl. I relieve you of all that nonsense. Also, have a tiny orgasm."
>"Ahhnn~ I hate you..."
"I know."

>summon a puppet demon dog from hell
>she's a snappy little bitch
>you have complete control over her
"okay, lets go for some walkies"
>"You fucking asshole"
"Okay, but just to let you know, you can't pee in the house. dogs pee outside."
>"Hey! I drank 12 beers before you teleported my ass!"
"well you better put on the leash and go for a walk"
>"Grrrr fine."
"and dogs don't wear clothes, so you better strip the goth look."
>"Fuck you dickhead."

>Pissed off dog is getting used to her new subservient life
>Has triggers for everything to keep her in line
>Simple things like belly rubs and pets cause her to tighten her thighs as if she's being rubbed right on her pussy
>Being called a good girl causes her to spasm in a powerful orgasm
>What's hilarious is when you tie her up outside a store and a group of kids come by
>You tell her to sit still and don't move so this statue of a dog is forced to endure a barrage of petting
>They call her good girl and touch her silky fur for a solid 30 minutes
>When you finally return she's whimpering and blushing
>When you release the hold she grabs her cookie and orgasms into her paw
>Every muscle is strained as she's battered by waves of pleasure
>After the show she's sitting in a puddle whining like a puppy
>"Please master, don't leave me like that"

>it's dog day
>your mother didn't know this when she dropped you and your siblings off at the painball course
>canines get in for free
>Your little sister wants to go home but your older brother and sister convince her it will still be fun
>your brother pays for entrance and you all start gearing up
>in the prepping area you see a group of dogs walk through
>instead of gearing up they are stripping off their clothing
>you have never seen a naked canine anthro before
>their sheaths and ball sack hang out and the females have small breasts buried in their fur
>they laugh at you and your siblings
>"look at the humans, they need all that protection to protect their weak skin."
>your older sister tells you and your young sister to stop staring
>you couldn't help yourself but steal more glances at the dogs.
>especially the short haired husky girl
>her fur was short and her nipples were visible through the fur
>you could even see her pussy lips a little
>she doesn't notice through the tinted head gear that you were staring intently at her
>there is currently a match going on and everyone is waiting for the next game
>There are twelve canines of several species
>some are siblings some are just friends.
>all of them are naked except for you and your siblings
>you notice how the males are staring at the females and vice versa
>some of the males have their tiny red rockets start to escape their sheaths
>your younger sister is blushing hard
>your brother does his best to protect her but the eldest dog chides
>"Oh look the human pups are ashamed of nature. you will be easy pickings."
>your eldest sister glares at the large husky
>"oh yeah, i think we can take you all on. without a sweat."
>the older husky laughs hardily
>"Oh yeah little human, wanna make a bet?"
>"Sure, what's the price."
>he looks over your sister like a hunk of meat.
>she's a decent looking woman, curvy with a large rack
>none of the canines could hold a candle to her chest
>the husky laughs, "we win, we get all your stuff, clothes included. you'll have to go home naked."
>your sister blushes hesitating.
>"scared are ya?" a female german shepherd speaks up
>you couldn't help but stare at the dog
>her dark nipples were erect through her fur and her pussy lips were black on her tan fur between her thighs
>"N-no" your sister blurts out still beet red.
>your brother intervenes and tries to pull your sister away
>"We accept."
>Your brother stops and starts to argue while the dogs laugh.
>you and your little sister look at each other terrified at the number of dogs that would be on their team
>your sister then looks around, "and if we win, you all have to be our pets for a week, like you belong."
>Their laughter stops some growl and some of the younger ones look a little worried
>The older husky smiles, "you ain't gonna win. Deal."
>the two shake on it and your stomach twists.
>you barely played paintball and you were going to be out matched 3 to 1 in a game.
>your brother pulls your sister away to yell at her in private
>you can barely hear them through the mask and your own heart beat
>the dogs are all glaring at you and your younger sister
>she's holding onto you worried
>you tell her to calm down it's fine.
>then your brother calls you two to come
>he takes your gun and makes some adjustments
>"Well since Kelly made a dumbass bet, we better adjust out equipment."
>You ask what he's doing and he adjusts the gun's regulator to increase the pressure from the HPA
>"the dogs are using cheap shit, we'll just out range them."
>you check your equipment over it's cranked up way higher than what was recommended
>"relax, we will win."
>his calming voice was stripped away when he chastised Kelly again
>After a pep talk the announcer told you the groups to get into position.
>the last time you paintballed it was in the woods with trees and brush.
>but things changed, they now have the inflatable cover and plywood platforms
>You were in position on one side of the arena you could hear the dogs barking on the other side
>the announcer went over the rules and other shit you already knew
>not like the referees were there to stop anyone from breaking the rules
>you told your brother that you should take point, because he was the better gunner and could hit a fly off a quarter at 20 yards
>he agreed and the buzzer started
>you run forward blindly down the center from inflatable pylon to inflatable pylon
>you see the other team running toward you, the males were taking charge
>you take your first shot and hit one in the chest
>the gun kicked harder than you anticipated
>the canine grabbed at the purple spatted welt and yipped, pulling himself from the combat.
>there were two younger dogs close behind that ducked behind cover to give blind suppressing fire
>they were way off on their shots as they shot with one arm behind cover
>a few shots flew by from behind hitting them dead in the hand splatting more purple paint
>They dropped their guns wiping the paint off and picked their guns back up and continued to fire
>naturally they were going to cheat
>you fired a few more times hitting a dog several times in the chest
>no doubt it hurt like hell now that your shoulder was hurting
>he ran off the field huffing out curses
>four went down in that charge while your team didn't budge and inch
>they weren't that bright as another dog tried to serpentine through an opening.
>he howled a high pitch whine as his nutsack was hit by your sister
>you couldn't help but sympathize a little from the sting.
>The two little cheaters were still blind firing
>you could hear your little sister cry out hit as she stood and walked off the field
>one of the balls hit her in the visor leaving a green smear
>your brother started to focus more on the little twerps hitting them in the paws more and more until they gave up.
>you push forward wondering where the rest of the dogs were
>there were 7 dogs left
>two were terrified shooting ball after ball
>they were either going to give up or waste all their ammunition
>not like they have any extra ammo on their pelts
>you looked for the short haired husky
>you peak slowly around the corner of a large triangular platform
>you see a three covering all angles of a large barricade
>one was the husky you saw earlier and two of her friends it looks like it
>they were all female
>you stop yourself from your raging hormones from just staring at the girls and back up to climb up prone on the platform
>you have a clear shot on all three of them
>none of them are even bothering to look up
>one, two, three
>you welt them in their heads one by one each one grabbing their head and yelping in pain.
>you kind of regret hurting them but they were laughing at your family like the rest of the dogs
>they're now growling and barking at you
>high pitched as they were
>one aims their gun at you but you nail her in the chest right on her nipple
>she drops her gun and the three run away with their tails between their legs
>"too bad little human."
>you feel a presence over you you twist around to see the the large husky over you
>two legs on each side of your body he points the gun nearly point blank.
>he starts blasting
>and it hurt, like being punched repeatedly
>you cry out as he unloads
>he hits your chest your neck and stomach
>thankfully your protective equipment and cup kept your sensitive parts safe as your vision is filled with green paint
>the welts stop and you hear him yelp and fling the gun away
>you smear your visor and see he's now curled in the fetal position
>your sister points her gun at his hands that are wrapped around his harry sack and fires again causing his hand to slap his already hurt nuts
>"you lost, dog"
>your sister helps you to your feet
>everything hurts, you are going to be black and blue from your neck to your waist
>your sister recounts her tale
>she said she watched you run ahead out of sight while your brother dealt with the little idiots
>she helped cover you and take out a dog that was focused on you
>she complemented you were great bait as dogs only focus on the prey
>she took him out easily and then saw the "alpha" pin you down and paint you from head to toe
>she didn't want to miss the shot so you got hit a few more times than nessessary but she wanted him to feel a little pain before losing
>less than three feet away she put a ball into his ball
>nice of him to spread his legs for her
>you were laughing which made the pain lessen
>your brother also joined in the laughter and patted you on the shoulder
>"You did great at taking the lead. they thought we would be push overs from all their howling and barking."
>your sister nodded, "so were is our prize, dogs belong on leashes after all."
>the thought of losing thousands of dollars worth of equipment was unfathomable in your mind, but having furry girls as pets
>your mind boggled
>The twelve dogs were rubbing their sore spots
>the girls you nailed in their heads had a small ice pack to treat the swelling
>the alpha and the other male still held their sack tightly
>the twin german shepherds looked like they couldn't move their green stained paws at all
>serves them right for cheating
>the large german shepherd was glaring at the large husky
>"you know what, i think i would be better off with a human anyway, you fucking idiot."
>"come on sara, how was i supposed to know they would be good."
>your big brother pulled off his mask and looked the shepherd in the eyes, "Well bitch. looks like i own you."
>her tail shook a little as she examined him.
>she realized what she was doing and grabbed the appendage
>There were 6 males and 7 females to be split among your family
>your big brother picked his share of the females leaving you with the rest
>Kelly grabbed four of the males including the emasculated "alpha"

Zhan, the imperial ambassador, was finally going home. It had been a long day of stress and negotiation, haggling, bribing and failiure. She had arrived home late in the day, barely awake and on the edge of tears, tho she concealed it well. Days of constant threats, stress and attempted violence from the cityfolk, and today, the day was at the end, she was finally heading to her room, finally reaching her bed. Oh, how she’d missed it. The empire she serves is struggling, the northern barbarian tribes were united and invading in endless hordes, the peasants were rebelling, lead by bandits, and the treacherous southern kingdoms were eyeing the soft underbelly of the Empire. And she was failing to stop the situation from escalating. Carrying her candle, she made his way towards her room, up the long winding stairs of the tower in which he slept. The helpless situation would be resolved tomorrow, she had no more energy for today.
[…]
His breathing was perfectly controlled. He made no more noise than a wind blowing through the room and he made his way down the stairs. He had scaled the tower from the outside and entered from the top. Now he heard breathing, a guard probably.
Trevor slowed his pace, considered drawing his knife, but decided against it and kept pacing forwards through the unlit winding stairway until he saw the torchlight. Now was the time for action. He readied himself and leapt forwards, slamming his fist into the guard’s jaw. The guard tumbled against the wall, a clatter of his metal arms and armor against the wall echoing through the hallway. It was a risk Trevor had to take. The horse guard was leaning with his back against the wall, a disoriented daze apparent in his eyes. Another punch from Trevor and the horse collapsed out of consciousness.
Then, he heard a door creaking downstairs.
His eyes widened and he immediately sprang to action. Tossing the guard on his back he soundlessly opened the first door. Entering the room, Trevor scanned it, hurriedly glancing at the furniture. A richly decorated room, with a large mahogany bed to the left, a pair of night-tables on the sides of the bed, a number of chests placed against the walls and a large stone window on the right side of the room, concealed by curtain of a color he could not distinguish in the darkness.
His mind raced as he quickly opened the largest chest, found it full of clothes, took some out and placed the guard in it, tossing clothes over him. Now he started hearing footsteps. He, now in a panic, moved next to the door, so it would conceal him if someone was to open it and step inside. His heart pounded in fear.
The door opened and another guard, a tiger anthro, peeked out, glancing at the room. Trevor stopped breathing. The guard seemed uninterested and Trevors anxiousness eased. Until he stepped into the room. As he did, Trevors punch caught his head from the behind and he collapsed to the floor.
Trevor cursed to himself. He took out the rope and immediately got to business, stripping the two guards of their armor and tying them up, emptying the large chest of contents and stacking both of the guards in it, hiding their armor and weapons within the other chests.
After ten minutes of this frantic and hurried work, he was ready, steadied himself and placed himself behind the curtains.
[…]
Someone entered the room, shut the door and placed the candle on the night table next to the bed. Then that someone ruffled about with their clothes and, with a blow, put the candle out.
This was it, Trevor had succeeded. He made himself known with a cough.
“Who are you?” The anthro demanded in a female voice.
“Blade for hire.” Trevor replied.
“Will you kill me?” She said, gripping her knife handle a bit harder.
“I will kill for you.” He paused. “For a pardon and a deal.”
“Go on.” Relief was almost audible in her voice.
“I’m Trevor, a former lieutenant under Lan. I want my crimes to be forgotten.”
She nodded, then realized Trevor probably couldn’t see her and felt silly. “Go on.”
“I am also interested in securing an agreement. I will provide slaves, you’ll buy them and re-sell them.”
“For what price?”
“Five for a ducat.” He paused. “Who do I need to kill or kidnap?”
“How do I know you won’t betray me, like you did with Lan?”
“I don’t have the luxury anymore. I intend to build a monopoly on slave trade.”
She hesitated for a bit.
“I’m not stabbing you for a reason.”
“Canh, kidnap his son.”
“Understood.”

>"how long is this ridiculous bet going to last."
>the human paladin laughs hardily at the unfortunate gilneas
>lost a bet and now is his mount
>he already showed her off to a crowd of people in a local town now he's tied her up to a hitching post
>horses surround the naked wolf woman
>the paladin informs her that horde often ride wolves, it's a special treat for them to see one in alliance territory
>she huffs and tried to pull the buttplug tail out of her ass
>he strikes her with a seal of command stopping her
>the embarrassed woman now has to endure cat calls and other lewd remarks while her master sells a bunch of trash he got from her inventory
>when he's finished he takes her reigns and hops on her back
>"Grr, why do you need to be so rough."
>the paladin smiles and pat her head with a healing shock
>she shudders under the touch
>the paladin guides her back through westfall forest for some herbing
>he could call forth his flying mount but that would take away the fun he was having
>as he picks out some special herbs he brews a potion for his lovely alchemetic assistant
>should make journeying through azeroth more interesting
>"I don't want to drink anything"
>he tells her that's its just a flask to help her joints
>the nude wolfess drinks the bottle keeping her glowing blue eyes on the paladin
>first there was no effect and she is mounted again and brought south
>the paladin goes on about the lore of the land while the wolf's head becomes increasingly cloudy
>her loins ached and iched as she was continuing to walk on all fours
>she stopped to look back the moisture was getting destracting
>the paladin just spurred her on
>"Can we take a break?"
>her breath was labored and a blush crossed her face
>the paladin ignored her and kept going to the rocky cliff faces of the blackrock mountains
>when they are both overlooking the scarred burning lands he finally gets off of her
>the paladin watches as the potion washed through her system penetrating every muscle in her body
>her tongue lolled out in great panting heaves
>she looked down at her sopping wet pussy that had been itching the entire trip
>the buttblug only further escalated her ecstasy
>"What did you do to me?"
>she was begging on sitting with her legs open
>her clit peaked out of the hood like a flag of domination over the wolfess
>the paladin lifted his helm and set it aside
>he told her he wanted to make the woman his so he gave her a flask of enduring heat
>her shimmering blue eyes were wide and her vaginal walls tightened painfully desperate
>"So that was your plan, get me hot and dripping just to fuck me"
>the paladin shrugged and told her how cute she was when she was desperate
>"Well i'm not gonna beg like a dog, if that's what your after."
>he looked down at the drooling cunt, the muscles contracted as he stared
>A soft moan escaped her muzzle as he continued to look at her privates
>"Please stop staring so much you fucking pervert"
>despite her protests her legs were still spread wide to allow him to gaze between her fluffy thighs
>another pleasurable contraction nearly popped the dildo out stretching her anus
>"Will fucking me rid me off these effects?"
>desperation leaked from her voice
>The paladin nodded a wicked smile on his face
>she swallowed the little pride she had left and rolled over on all fours again
>"Please fuck me."
>he laughed at the pathetic gesture and told her to be more specific
>"Please fuck my needy pussy. I don't think i can take it anymore."
>again he shook his head
>"I'm sorry I'm a bitch in heat. Please punish my cunt with your rod."
>he stripped off his armor and strode toward the wolf shaking her ass in the air for him
>even for a human he could smell the arousal off her pussy
>he lifted her fake tail and rubbed her needy cunt with his thick fingers
>she rolled her hips with every touch causing more fluid to drip out
>the paladin enjoyed teasing her further tugging on the buttplug watching her asshole stretch with each little pull
>her cunt was practically swallowing his fingers desperate for the stimulation
>even her engorged clit twitched as he messaged it between two fingers
>her head was laying on the stony dirt and tits were grinding into the rocks
>no doubt the stones were teasing her erect nipples effortlessly
>the paladin lined up his cock to her hot slit and drove it through
>sparks filled her vision as she was finally penetrated by the man that dominated her
>he added to the excitement by yanking the tail out with an audible pop
>she climaxed immediately, milking the erect member while she was screaming
>then he started to plow her into the dirt
>she wasn't given any chance to come down from the initial climax as he fucked her through her pulsing contractions
>he gripped her ass firmly with both hands and blessed himself with avenging wrath
>he was going to fuck her with all his might
>the world slowed down for him as the spell took hold
>she was in the grips of another orgasm, her mouth open to the side eyes shut tight
>her cries of pleasure made her throat hoarse
>then they became whimpering whines
>then silence
>her eyes were rolled in the back of the head as her cunt came again
>he lost count of how many times she climaxed over his divine rod his entire pelvis was soaked in fluids
>he pushed forward and drove his seed deep into her womb in a final climactic shower
>he then gave her a fist of justice in the back of the head keeping that feeling locked in her for a bit longer
>as he pulled his deflating penis out and looked at his work
>the wolfess was a sweating barely conscious mess
>he picked her body up and propped it up on a large rock giving her a beautiful view of the sunset while he got dressed

>have pregnant fur concubine
>she has been feeling depressed because of her belly is swollen with your puppies
>you have a group of guests coming over to watch one of your other girls perform
>instead you dress your pregnant one in gorgeous outfit
>she feels silly and fat with her bloated pregnant belly exposed
>you kiss her and hug her and ask her to do her dance anyway
>the guests arrive with their own companions to watch the show
>you sit in the front row and watch her perform the dance she has always performed
>her face is flushed and she her knees shake a little wanting to run off the stage
>but you smile at her giving her the little encouragement to keep doing it
>she flows with the music on fit legs and taut butt.
>her swollen breast nearly pop out of the golden brazier you got her
>as the 10 minute song ends her tongue is bouncing out of her maw
>the eyes watched her carefully and the female furs in the crowd had their mouths open in awe
>they cheered for her
>she wiped away tears from her eyes as they made her feel beautiful
>she stepped off the stage and embraced you
>"Thank you, I needed that."
>"Master, your other maids have been saying I do a poor job around the home again"
>The dragon feigns being upset
>The only reason you gave her the position was to bring her inside
>She stares out at the hallway where two of your other maids are working with a smug smile on her muzzle
>In the middle of the hallway she lifts her tail and exposes herself to you
>"It's just hard to get along with the others, my big butt and wings just keep getting in the way"
>She shakes her ass infront of you her pussy dripping waiting for your touch
>The other maids have tried to bed you, a bed pet for a human is quite the promotion for a human loving anthro
>But you brought in a dragon
>For all intensive purposes she was your bed pet
>And after a year of working as a maid she will
>Weird rules but it's to ensure safety of those the human cares for
>After all they give their rights entirely to the human
>The dragon waits for you to fuck her in the hallway
>"Please take me, the others are looking."
>You slap her scaly ass and glide your hand to her cunt
>You finger her gently and whisper taunts into her ear
>She's already shaking barely holding herself up on her legs
>Her rear legs spread further to just your hands and she lets out a shrill roar from just being teased
>"Please master, your teasing me too much!"
>"I'mnmm gonna AH!"
>Her hips jolt and rock as she's brought to an orgasm
>The sound of her fluids hit the hard wood floor as she continues to shake
>She's disappointed that she wasn't fucked and gives a pouting blushing face
>"Master, I wanted to be claimed properly. The maids wanted to see it."
>You point over to the two cat maids
>Their faces were flush and they had a paw under their skirt
>Loud purring could be heard from the other end of the hall
>The dragon was satisfied at seeing them hot and bothered
>Serves them right for lifting their tails to her master
>You then tell the dragon to clean the mess and she happily does lapping at her puddle

>Constantly dealing with horny puddles is a constant problem for maids
>The master walks bye and all the girls swoon wishing for promotion
>Some are more aggressive than others
>But in this case they already know they can't compete with the sensual lizard that walks the halls.
>But doesn't stop them from trying
>Lifting their dainty tails exposing their paintiless uniforms
>Some taken to shortening the length of the skirt to constantly be exposed
>But in the end they know their better
>A nice tail whip across their furry ass cheeks reminds them

>Canine happily wagging her tail
>Large furry rack with sensitive erect nipples swaying as she shakes her butt
>She's holding down her best friend who she knew when she was a puppy
>Don't worry ruby you'll absolutely love it"
>Her black and white cat friend squirms under Lucky's weight
>She was told that if she came to this place her money trouble would be solved
>Then lucky started to strip and she encouraged ruby to do the same
>When she protested the dog smiled and held her down
>She ripped off her shirt exposing her smaller breasts and pulled off her jeans
>She fought and hissed as her dog friend effortlessly held her down
>"Why are you doing this to me?"
>"Don't worry, I was apprehensive too. You will thank me."
>Lucky's legs were spread wide an she was held firm
>Pussy hiding behind her black panties to a third figure
>Ruby nuzzled her friend
>"My human will treat you so well"
>The cat panicked as the cloth was torn away by his large hands
>Lucky was now whining begging to her friend
>Then the hand touched her head rubbed her down to her belly
>The fear and worry started to melt away
>As the hand stroked her, ruby's grip relaxed letting her friend enjoy the human's touch
>"What's going on why does this feel good?"
>Meet my master, I wanted to show you for the longest time. He treats me so well"
>His other hand stroked the dog's head
>After a few minutes they were wrapped in each other's arms the cat purring while ruby softly rubbed her fur
>Ruby hugged her friend and coaxed her on top having her rear facing the human
>Her muzzle pressed to the cat in a deep passionate kiss as the human penetrated lucky
>The cat was overwhelmed
>embraced by her friend pleasure pumping through her body
>Firm hands gripped her ass as she continues to be kissed by ruby
>Each moan was cut off by the flat dog tongue
>she screamed out and cliched tightly as she drowned in a powerful orgasm
>The human pulled out to watch lucky hump her pussy on ruby
>Sticky lines of her wet pussy trailed on her friend
>Ruby strokes her friend in after glow and then spread her own thighs waiting for her reward
>The human plunged his rod into the awaiting dog
>Ruby held her friend as his rod slid effortlessly inside her
>The thought of the cats juices and her human mixing inside her body caused her eyes to roll in pleasure
>An orgasm took her
>The human didn't relent and continued to plow ruby
>Esstatic the dog held her smaller friend with one arm and started to finger fuck her with her free hand
>They were both moaning as their over sensitive pussies were stimulated
>Ruby looked up at her master wagging her bitch tail like a good dog
>"See master, I told you I'd give you another wife, please tell me my word. Please!"
>The human laughed and pushed a final time deep inside calling her a good girl
>Ruby's vagina spasmed around the orgasmic member
>Her body seized and she held on tightly to her friend
>"Yes! Yes! T-thank you!"
>Her tongue bobbed in and out of her mouth as she passed out with her best friend

> humanity genetically alters themselves to be stronger, faster and bigger.
>The constant alterations sterilizes the female population.
>WW3 due to low pop and instability
>world is mostly a wasteland.
>the remnants of the old world that survived in the bunkers continue the research.
>eventually create anthros from using female canine DNA.
>the scattered groups then congregate at Washington DC and create a new city from the rubble.

>Isabelle puts papers infront of you to sign
>As the resident human it's your job to rule the animals
>You absently sign them not thinking much
>Isabelle blushes as you sign her bells jingle as her tail wags
>You ask what's up but get no response
>She takes the paperwork before you get a chance to read
>The following day Isabelle is on the speaker talking to the animals
>You start doing exercises by with head phones not really listening to the same old
>Running around the island to the out door gym you built for everyone
>Pumping iron and stretching alone in the early morning
>Rosie wanders to the gym to do her normal routine
>Her face flush as she stepped into the changing booth
>When she stepped out her dark blue fur catches the corner of your eye
>She's on her yoga matt shivering with embarrassment
>Her paws are hovering over her crotch as shes staring down at the rubber
>She wasn't wearing anything on her waist
>Even with the sports bra her nipples were visibly erect
>Your now hot and bothered looking at her thick thighs and the sensual zone on her wide hips
>Her paws clasping, keeping your eyes from viewing her pussy
>Her eyes dart from mat to you
>When she notices you staring she starts to shake
>"P-please don't s-stare it's embarrassing."
>You turn your head giving her a little respect and ask why she's nude
>"Y-you made a new ordinance, we can't hide o-our... My p-pussy. No pants or p-panties"
>You get up and rush to the center of town not even bothering to change from your workout clothes
>What did she do, what did you sign?
>There was a line of animals in the office
>Ankha was arguing with Isabelle pointing accusatory finger in her muzzle
>"I know the law, but I believe you coerced him into signing it"
>Isabelle wore a smug smile, "right here he signed, now take off some of those ribbons, it's the rule."
>You were paralyzed as ankha did as she was told
>Her lower ribbons were unwrapped freeing her pussy to the air
>Isabelle had a line of drool on her mouth, "see isn't that better, your kitty can breath"
>The high and might ankha held her head high, "the law is the law."
>The animals finally noticed you and whispered to themselves
>Ankha stepped away not even covering her golden furry tuff that announced her pink entrance
>"Welcome mayor, everyone is obeying the new ordinance as you signed"
>You pull her aside behind a door and ask her why she did it
>"Well mayor, it's for the health of the residents, you haven't been performing your entire duties when you signed up for the job, I thought having pretty girls around you will motivate you"
>You cock an eyebrow at her not knowing what duties she was talking about
>"You need to remedy heat cycles. I went through three while you were next to me.
>"You know how how hard it is when a strong male is next to me not itching my insides. So I made the rule to motivate you."
>You stepped back as her eyes stared through you.
>"I'm following the rule too"
>She pulled up her skirt to show off her own perfect hips and ass.
>Pink lines exited her pussy to remotes strapped to her thighs
>Her tail wagged as you gazed at the cute soggy dog
>"Now let's go to the residents."
>She grabbed your arm before you could object, not really sure if the horny bitch was telling the truth
>She stopped in the lobby and made the announcement
>"I know some of you are hesitant. But trust the mayor and me when I say it's for your health."
>Skye starts to complain her tail tucked between her legs
>"This isn't right! We've been happy for years before this rule."
>Isabelle counters, "just wait, you'll change your tune. Mayor, can you tell them it will be okay."
>She pushes you forward
>Your now standing in front of animals you knew for years
>Friends, neighbors
>You were about to speak that Isabelle want well but you feel a yank on your shorts
>Your dick flops out to everyone
>You made an attempt to cover but the sights of all the girls had made it quite a bit too girthy
>Everyone was in silence to your human member
>"See I told you" Isabelle said smugly while petting her clit with a paw
>"I smelled that baby for years and he could even toss a pity fuck"
>Skye's tail was swishing rapidly her mouth drooling
>All the animals were enwrapped by your dick
>Bella started to strip her panties asking the room "who's first?"

>Waifur uses your cum as perfume on her neck
>Males get jealous around her as they smell her human
>Females get jealous because they know why she's smiling all the time
>She feels like your with her because your scent comforts her
>Only problem she has is she has to bring spare underwear in her purse because they are constantly drenched

>My boyfriend asked me to do something that sent shivers up my tail
>My tail wouldn't stop wagging as he told me his plan
>I was going for a walk
>Normally I would be jumping at the chance for my human boyfriend to take me
>But this was different
>He wanted me to go completely naked
>Now I'm not an exhibitionisnt even though I have cum harder than I ever remember on the bus at night
>This was different
>He told me we would be going in the middle of the day and didn't tell me we're
>I just had to be ready when he got home
>And I couldn't say no or I don't think this is a good idea
>As much as I wanted to, my human wanted me to do it and I obeyed
>There was nothing wrong with that, even my cat friend does the same for her human
>I waited for him at the door pink collar around my neck and leash dangling between my legs
>The collar had a little golden heart tag with my name on it
>He handed to me on our first date making me belong to him
>I was so happy to receive it
>Dogs always get the best gifts from humans
>And I waited patiently for my next gift
>My tail was uncontrollable
>I was so excited for this walk and thought about where he was going to take me
>The park would be fun, even though my ass would be read from the shame.
>His car pulled up bringing me back to reality
>The reality of my naked body leading my human on a walk
>I tried to stay calm and placed my paw over my crotch
>My fur was completely soaked
>It felt like I was in heat how turned on I was
>The painfully empty pussy was desperate
>I looked down to see my breasts were also just as excited
>Pink buttons on my brown furry melons
>I wanted to masturbate to help release some of my desire but I heard his footsteps and keys rattle
>I whined out his name as he opened the door
>My human was tall strong and could pick me up and toss me on the bed without breaking a sweat
>But he never hurt me, he treated me like the good girl I am
>His smiles made my heart jump
>I completely forgot I was naked when I handed over my leash
>He was all I cared about
>He pulled me through the door and I followed bouncing breasts and all
>He told me that I should be on the ground for it to count as a proper walk
>I obeyed and placed my hands down and crouching my wagging ass low
>Im a dog after all
>He lead me to his vehicle and we were off
>I sat on the passenger seat
>I froze when the puddle between my legs was even more noticeable
>I hoped he wouldn't punish me too hard for being excited
>On the drive his scent was driving me mad
>I spread my legs and was about to touch my aching clit
>But my human told me not to, it would spoil my walk
>So I sat there staring at my love button the entire car ride
>When we stopped I froze
>I asked if this was were we would be going and he nodded
>It was at the mall during peak weekend hours
>Every emotion possible rushed over me
>Anger, frustration, excitement, fear...
>The mix just left me paralyzed to the seat
>My human opened my door and rugged on my leash to get me out
>I must have sounded pathetic as he pulled on my leash
>I walked on all fours as he pulled me toward the doors
>The looks I got made my face flush
>Other anthros looked at me like I was a massive pervert
>And they were right, I was
>My tail wagged non stop as the AC interior touched my soaking wet pussy
>My human led the way
>No doubt my tail was hiked up begging to be mounted as we walked through the mall
>My breasts were growing heavy beneath me And every comment that was thrown at me made me shudder
>But then my human just called me a good girl and rubbed my head
>Everything outside of him vanished
>It was just me ans him in that crowded mall
>I was happy and didn't care
>This continued till we got to the food court
>My neck was tugged on as I stopped frozen in place
>My sister and her friends were eating at the center table
>I was about to protest when my sister spotted us
>Her eyes must have been as wide as mine
>Her face was crimson and she rushed over to see what the hell was going on
>Eyes were penetrating me all over
>My human stopped her and she immediately calmed down
>I don't even know what he said but she smiled at me and wagged her tail
>He informed me that we were going to eat with her for lunch
>I wasn't really hungry due to all the strangeness of being naked infront of everyone but he allowed me to sit at the table
>It gave my knees and ankles a break from crouching
>The first thing out of my sister's friends mouth was how pretty I looked
>That just started my tail motor again
>Before I knew it they asked if they could touch my boobs
>My human allowed it and soon the girls reached and fondled my chest
>My sister also joined in tugging at my sensitive nipples
>I drew in a breath from the shocking pleasure
>It was the first bit of stimulation I had gotten from the whole trip
>The giggles from the college students made me blush
>Then my human told me to get back on the floor
>I did as he said and squatted down
>The other girls continued their laughter and asked if I knew tricks
>Before I knew it he had me perform for them
>Other spectators gathered to watch my humiliation
>I was on my back panting stewing in my own pleasure from the voyeurs
>My legs hung open above me pussy soaked
>My sister was the first to point out how wet I became
>She was right I was incredibly horny
>I wanted to paw myself off right there but I couldn't disobey my human
>Every movement reminded me of my untouched pussy
>I whined out and spread my legs further
>Then he asked my sister and her friends if they want to rub my belly
>Now this was sinister
>He knew I couldn't handle that in this condition
>Bad enough he leaves me a horny bitch in over my head with eyes glaring at every part of my body
>But he's going to have my belly rubbed too
>They father over me and I let out a pathetic whimper before their paws come down
>My tail and right leg shook at they touched my sensitive stomach
>My heart raced and I started to moan
>I cried out to my human calling him a bastard between moans breaking my character for a minute
>The sounds of the girls giggles overshadowed my moans
>I could also feel one hand was a little lower
>Whomever that was I would kiss them
>I wasnt just led to an orgasm I was out right shoved into an ocean of an orgasm
>My moans became cries of pleasure as I bucked my hips as my belly was rubbed
>The lone hand on my pussy kept it from being a desperate orgasm
>Last time my human made me cum from a belly rub it was a irritating unsatisfying experience
>A finger was inserted and my pussy clamped down on it with my hear beats
>I moaned and bucked before they released me and left me a panting sweating mess
>The girls applauded before I completely faded
>When I woke up I was carried out of the car
>My human said I did fantastic
>I'm so happy I have a human that can satisfy my weird lusts
>Though I batted him on the chest for trying the belly rub orgasm on me

>run into a hot anthro
>straight up kidnap her
>keep her imprisoned in your home, chained to your bed or in your living room or whatever
>rape her whenever you like, using her for simple pleasure
>she struggles and protests at first, but surprisingly quickly becomes compliant
>you ravage her several times a day, but as the days pass she becomes less and less defiant
>she complains and insults you, but the way she moves and moans seems an awful lot like she enjoys it
>even when you’re especially rough with her
>when you declare that she’s your sex slave, she starts calling you master on her own
>eventually she begins to do chores, changing the cum-soaked sheets, gathering laundry, making meals...
>she bends over or lies down and spreads her legs whenever you look at her for longer than a brief glance
>when she becomes pregnant, she’s entirely unbothered by it
>if anything, she seems pleased
>at that point, when you leave her without any restraints, she doesn’t try to flee or contact her friends but obediently stays

>ywn capture a member of anthro royalty to abuse and use like she's less than a common whore

>Boy, finding out your newest acquisition was royalty from some obscure anthro-only kingdom sure was a surprise
>Some sort of princess, or something, and even higher in status than her mother
>You didn't really care until she mentioned the mystical bullshit surrounding the job
>Apparently all her advisors desperately tried to make her rethink her trip, concerned that exactly what you did to her would happen
>Then she mentioned The Link
>"What the hell is The Link," you had asked
>So all the princesses of this obscure kingdom get forcibly tied into some mystical crap that "connects the souls of all citizens of the kingdom" or whatever
>And so, in breaking in your new Princess, you may have just effectively broken in an entire kingdom
>Maybe you ought to book a plane ticket

>modern human empire conquers medieval anthro rump state
>get hired as to operate a fleet of remote whipping robots
>turns out rump state is a rather fitting name as all the girls have god tier asses
>asses that you now get to remotely whip for hours a day with your fleet of police bots
>if they work slow, you whip lightly
>if they break the rules, you whip hard
>if they have a particularly nice ass, you drive your robot up real close to get a good view before you reverse the mechanism and give her asshole a surprise visit
>and as property of the human empire it is your duty to surveil them wherever they may be or whatever they may be doing
>in their beds as they sleep
>in the fields as they work
>in their baths as they bathe
>in their beds again as they masturbate
>occasionally you decide to be nice and use your mastery of the remote whip to kill the fly that's been terrorizing the local tavern
>one day you are pulled away from your desk
>budget cuts, the robots are no more
>you will get a chance to keep your position however
>you are handed a whip
>now you get to rule the anthros in person

>It's finally over
>After 5 years of fighting, the anthrostate is all but defeated, overrun by the Allied Human Forces
>Millions of humans and anthros lay dead, the anthrostate's cities lay in ruin, leveled by human bombers
>All that's left is to ensure total victory is to now take the capital city and arrest the Anthrostate leaders
>You are Sergeant Anon, of the 15th infantry division of the Republic of Usonia
>For weeks, you and your platoon have braved traps, landmines, snipers, and the dreaded Rape Battalions
>And suddenly, it's all over
>The Anthrostate's Supreme Dictator has committed suicide and the surviving members of the government have surrendered
>Now all that's left is to patrol the captured city (and maybe partake in some innocent looting)
>You survey the damage from the safety of your jeep
>5 years ago this was a bustling city
>Now it's a graveyard, a dead city
>The corpses of hundreds of anthro fighters lay broken in the street
>So much for being physically superior to humans
>Out of the corner of your eye, you notice something moving in one of the bombed out buildings
>You get out of your jeep, grab your Submachine gun, and slowly approach the ruin
>As you get closer, you can see that the figure is pinned under rubble and struggling to get free
>You utter a prayer to the Holy Goddess of Humanity, Atreya, and run over to the wounded soldier
>You can now see that the soldier is an female anthro Doberman wearing the junior officer fatigues of Anthrostate army
>At this point, she sees you, and is now growling angrily at you
>By the Code of the Bilbat Convention of 1845, you are required to provide medical assistance to any disarmed soldier, regardless of alliegance
>You set down your rifle and begin digging the dogwoman out of the debris
>All the while, she is muttering curses at you about how the Anthrostate will never surrender and that anthros are superior to humans
>As soon as she is free of the ruin, she makes a beeline for your weapon, which you left carelessly on the ground
>By some miracle, she stumbles, and you take the opportunity to leap on top of her and restrain her
>As she is trying to bite you, you punch her in the face, knocking her out cold
>You then pick up her limp body and carry her over your shoulder to the jeep, placing her in the back, and begin tying her up with some rope in the back
>As you bind her feet and hands, you can't help but study her body
>For an anthrostate officer, she is somewhat on the shorter side, maybe 5 and a half feet tall
>She's mildly muscular, nothing too impressive
>Still, she is kinda cute
>As soon as you are sure the prisoner is secure, you hop in the driver's seat and make the drive back to Allied HQ

>You'll never buy your dogdaughter a big poster of that dumb bitch to hang in her room so it's the first thing she sees in the morning, at her request.

>Put pictures of the daughter's mother obeying her master
>Her drooling mouth pressed to your balls
>Spread eagle with a sated look on her face
>Rolling over on her back, naked with a leash on her neck
>Several other degrading poses of her masturbating and cumming her doggy brains out
>And in the center of all the smut is a simple photo of mother and daughter smiling clothed before she became a happy bitch

I hadn't even considered the appeal of degrading her mother in front of her as an example of what you expect. Imagine having dinner with her and watching her blush from across the table because she's desperately trying to forget that her mother is beneath you and gagging on your cock while you talk. But no matter how hard she tries, the slurping and choking is just too loud. And when she finally finds the courage to ask you when her mom will be done and can eat with the two of you like a normal person again, you inform her that you've brought both of them dog bowls and her mom has already taken a liking to hers, so she won't be ever again.

>Mother was always a nice woman
>Daughter pats her mother's cage
>She has been sound asleep all night like a good bitch
>But it's time to get up
>After a yawn her doggy tail starts wagging
>"Good morning mommy, you look happy"
>The mother whines locked in her cages
>"Don't worry come on out, father is on his way."
>After the cage is opened her big titted, golden furred mother walks out on all fours
>But she was a naughty dog and had to wear her chastity on her wet swollen pussy
>The mother rolled to her back whining with her legs spread to her daughter
>"Not yet mom, you haven't learned anything yet."
>The daughter sits on the couch and spreads her legs to her degraded mother
>"Once I cum and father gets here and takes me again I'll let you have your fun."
>Her mother didn't think twice as she started to lap greedily at her daughter's twat
>The wet slopping sounds filled the entire home accompanied by moans
>She almost muzzle fucked her daughter with her sniffing snout
>As she quickly approached orgasm the daughter wrapped her legs around her mother's head and humped out rolling her little hips riding her stupid bitch face.
>A high pitched howl and the sounds of her fluids squirting left the dog panting and twitching
>The mother cleaned her daughter
>The warm flat tongue eliciting small bucks as the mother licked her post orgasmic clit
>She only stopped when she heard her husband arrive
>She ran over whing desperately her caged cunt aching and burning for relief
>The husband opened the door to see the mother tail raised and begging for a fuck
>Her swollen red clit could be seen pressed to the soaked metal
>She let out a desperate whine until the daughter bopped her snout
>"Bad girl, I'm first. Isn't that right?"
>The daughter smiled lewdly while wearing one of his shirts like a short skirt
>Her pussy slit was just visible clit peeking out
>The father motioned to his pants and the mother unzipped freeing his rapidly growing cock
>She buried her muzzle into his scrotum whining more
>The daughter was picked up handled like a toy and fucked right over her mom
>The daughter reached around the man's chest holding on for the pounding of her life
>"Yes! Put puppies in me!"
>She rolled her hips with his thrusts humping back with just as much vigor
>Tail wagging she was in pure moaning bliss
>Then her mother started to lick and tease her asshole
>The rim job sent her spasming into another orgasm
>She screamed and thrusted with reckless abandon
>He came deep inside the younger dog pressing her hips to pump torrents of seed inside.
>They both were panting and the mother didn't stop licking
>She was focused to get any amount of seed that leaked out
>The daughter spoke in weak panting breaths, "that's right clean me up."
>On her feet she shoved her crotch to her mother
>"Clean my pussy but don't you dare put your tongue inside, they're going to be your grandchildren you dumb whore."
>She twitched as the tough made slow movement over her throbbing clit
>"Yes nice and slow."
>She was clean and the human was ready for another round
>The mother was shaking with anticipation as the daughter pulled out the key that was hanging from her neck
>"Ready to cum even more of your braincells away bitch?"
>Her mom nodded panting and drooling
>She was stroking her heavy chest teasing her rock hard nipples
>The key went in and her belt fell away
>Her vulgar hole was dripping and her abnormally large clit poked out of its hood
>She whined thrusting her hips toward her husband
>The daughter let her rest her head on her thick thighs
>"It's okay mom, you'll give me some sister's soon."
>The man lined up and started thrusting
>It didn't take long for the denied mother to cum
>After the first or second thrust her pussy was contracting with powerful rushes of pleasure
>"Look at you go mom, your having a great time!"
>Fluid poured out of the mother as she came back to back
>She couldn't help herself she was a feral animal when she got that desperate
>His balls slapped at her swollen button sending jolts to her friend brain prolonging everything
>When he finally finished with her he slapped her ass and plunged his rod in to kiss her womb releasing another torrent of sperm
>The entire time her daughter petted her drooling mother's head with loving strokes
>"There you go, aren't you so much happier now."
>The mother replied eyes half lidded as his rod remained buried
>"T-thank y-you"
>The bitches walked to the husbands bed to rest after being filled with potent human seed

I entirely approve, like 100%
Just the thought of a entire species having to spend their entire lives in a specific way just to satisfy my gaze.
A male, one that would grow into a complete chad, because I want it so, has to exercise, walk and wear only specific and permitted clothes for his entire life.
And I won't even do anything to him. He's forced to do it just because, in the slight offchance I see him on the street, I think "oh look, a flat chested girl".
Like, he will wear a chastity cage for his entire life, he will inseminate his girl by rubbing his penis through the cage until he comes, he will not experience a single erection in his entire adulthood. Not because he did anything, just because I wanted it.
He will, despite his wishes and desires, grow up to be a physically weak person, to the point where his wife will be able to beat him up. Just because I wanted it.

>Forced to walk around in only high heels, a miniskirt, and a tight tubetop due to minimum skin exposure mandates for anthros.
>If a human looks at him for more than a few seconds it's expected of him to present his ass and spread his cheeks.
>The tiny cage he's worn forever isn't really needed, he doesn't think he could get an erection even if he wanted to.
>He looks and acts like a slutty anthro girl, which essentially, is exactly what he is and how he's treated.
>Teased, groped, even fucked whenever a human feels like it, powerless to do anything at all except take it.
>His weak soft body is purpose built to be taken advantage of.
>And he wouldn't have it any other way, even when being ridiculed, spanked, or just ignored by real female anthros who are much stronger than he is.
>He secretly wishes he wasn't constantly passed up for real pussy, sometimes right in the middle of getting fucked, but he understands his place.
>His only purpose is to serve his human masters.

>catching the MILF was easy, a mid-late thirties single mother bombshell walking down a dark street in tight office clothing and heels?
>she couldn't even run
>her daughter was even easier, yoinking her right out of her room through the window
>the MILF begged you to not touch her little girl
>you tied the both of them in sexy bondage, running ropes around their sizable breasts and in between their legs
>they would be soaking wet after the car ride, all girls did after an hour of stimulation
>you arrived home and dragged them into your basement, cutting them loose after locking the door
>the fox MILF screamed in terror as you chased her down for a bit before you finally managed to shove her onto the bed and penetrated her nearly unused pussy
>her clothing fluttered down in shreds as you stripped her naked
>you gave her hardened buds a rough nip with your teeth and a loving kiss and suck with your lips, causing her to go wild
>a cock pounding her womb awake and her nipples getting suckled for the first time in years reawakened her femininity
>she screamed, this time in excitement, wrapping her legs around you as she instantly changed her tone
>all the curses that she had spat out were now replaced by daddy, master, and honey
>her screams turned into moans and wet kisses
>you winced as her nails tore trenches into your back
>but it was all worth it as the two of you came in unison, her sleepy womb went into overdrive as sperm flooded her still fertile garden for the first time in years
>the MILF's eyes glazed over as she went limp
>her pussy still pulsed with the final aftershocks of the hardest orgasm she had ever had, leaking a steady stream of your cum
>her daughter cheerfully hopped into the bed next to her destroyed mother and kissed her on the cheek
>"Happy Mother's Day, Mom! I got you a human husband!"
>she jumped as you groped her sizable ass and spread her cheeks wide open to inspect your new daughter's holes
>"And got me a new Daddy..." she purred

>"Please master, I'll be good. I wasn't spying on you on purpose."
>She twisted her hips on the rod in her snatch, vibrators teasing unceasingly
>She had been in the stocks for only six hours and the whore was a dripping desperate mess
>"Please let me cum, I can't stand this anymore"
>Her human had locked her up for spying on him while he was having relations with the head mistress
>A punishment of public exhibition was required for such a transgression
>She tried to hump the dildo but her back was pulled to the wooden stockade keeping her pleasure to a minimum
>Meanwhile her head was right at the level for her master or any male to plow her
>The master was obviously first pulling the bunny's ears while thrusting deep into her moaning mouth
>Her hips twisted and rotated with little success to get off
>The rod was slick with her fluids the smell of her master just inching her edge along
>When she finished she swallowed what she could
>She gulped, "thank you master for using me for your pleasure"
>Her punishment would continue until sunset her face was coated and her cries of desperation we're incomprehensible.
>"Plu late mmm cu."
>She would think twice before nosing around the castle without permission

That buck had a family

And what a family he's raised for us to capture.
His eldest daughter will be sold off at auction. As an untouched virgin of prime breeding age she is worth the most out of his entire family.
His youngest daughter will be sold in more... underground markets who cater to those with different tastes.
His two sons will each take different paths. The younger is aggressive and rebellious, he will be snipped and join his father as a eunuch.
The elder is much more docile and will be kept intact for possible future studding. Perfectly willing to submit to human cocks, no hesitation when ordered to orally or anally serve his master.
And his pregnant wife we kept as an experiment. She will be fed nothing but human sperm until the birth of her offspring. Pictured is the deer wife, seven months into her pregnancy and six months of being fed an exclusively sperm diet.
It is hypothesized that the cervid-sired, human-sperm-fed offspring will be of equal quality to a human-sired baby. Such methods will allow us to "convert" captured already pregnant females without allowing for any unwanted cervid births.

The idea of matching the private school Saddleback have a match high against the rabble of anthros who lived in and around town was supposed to foster better relationships between the humans and beastkinds in the small divided town of Saddleback. The anthro natives on this frontier colony had given immunity by faraway politicians had also come to Saddleback for work and remained when the superiority of squating around human settlement fully dawned on them. In a misguided attempt at fostering community, a federal bureaucrat had pushed the formation of girl’s soccer teams in the south portion of town. The ‘wilders’ were the poorly scrounged together result of that initiative as a team of motley anthros were brought together into a soccer team to playwith the human girl’d team Saddleback.
As with everything in Saddleback it was best if people didn’t mix outside their boundaries, but there was always some out of the loop do-gooder trying to bring people together. The game managed to go almost one half before a bench clearing brawl broke out between the girls and their supporters. Luckily the sides were separated, but only by the promise that things could be settled out that night.
So the girls and their parents met in at 10 in the night. The parents were to stay out of the fight and were on one side of the bleachers. The Saddleback highs were limited by their league to eleven players and nine substitutes. The Wilders were basically any anthro girl who could show up and play, so they brought eleven main players and nine others. The Saddleback high wore their bright red jerseys and soccer shorts, team color sports bra and full panties, red socks over foam red shin guards, and the bright red designer soccer cleats. The Wilders wore their green and yellow jerseys, green shorts, yellow sports bras, yellow full panties, green socks over foam shin guards and mass market white soccer cleats.
The two teams were not in the headspace of a soccer match, it was a war. They mentally weren’t there to play in the slightest. Even though two soccer goals had been set up on opposite ends of the field and even though there was a scorekeeper, the two parties were largely uninterested in normal rules for soccer. The two teams had met beforehand and hashed out a plan.
This was a grudge to be settled over non-regulation fifteen-minute quarters with unlimited substitutions at the break between quarters. A point would be scored for each element of the opponent's clothing in your goal, excepting that bras were worth two points, panties worth three points and players were worth six points if they could be layed out and kept there. Of course if you put a player in the goal with clothes she had two minutes to make it to her own goal after the end of regulation time wearing anything she had on at the time of her being put there. Clothes in the goal at the end of one quarter would be counted again if they had not been retrieved during the next. Given the uniforms that meant each human girl was wearing fourteen points: three on her top, four on her bottom and three on each leg/foot. Each player was supposed to start the game worth twenty points although many of the anthro rank and file wore far less however leaving many of the saddlebacks fuming at the unfairness of it all to see partially naked beasts strutting their stuff like that knowing that they were already cheating.
"Alright girls lets all play a fair game out there" shouts out their coach oblivious to the intentions of the teams of girls.
The eleven human players took to the field with nine substitutes behind their goals with their coaches cheering their teammates on. Proud family members of the Saddleback high focused their cameras on their girl and waited the start of play. Only one or two of the wilders’ parents were so equipped.
Angela Smarz was the Saddleback’s team’s captain. At seventeen the 5’9’’ 135 pound long-haired blonde beauty already sported a lean 34B 24 34 body and was decidedly active in the ganger scenes She had fought six times in the streets and won all six fights. As the small town banker’s daughter she was not well-liked in the south section of the town.
Her opposite was Swiftstreak. At the 5’5’’ 130 pound pretty cheetah girl sported a 35C 26 36 body. Her father worked odd jobs somewhere to the south and her mother was a ‘pet’ (prostitute) for humans. She had been in a number of street fights between neighborhood girls and so jumped at the opportunity to apply her species special talents to the fight.
At the sound of the whistle eleven human girls and eleven assorted anthro girls screamed and rushed toward one another. They clash in the center of the field to the sounds of curses and screams. Hair was pulled, faces punched, legs and thighs kicked and bodies kneed. Kicking was particularly effective given the cleats. A crocodile girls sends the Ball flying across the field with a tail swipe and the mob runs after it trampling over one another in the process.
Angela took swift down with a twisting head lock before the cheetah could go after the ball in a sprint. Once on the ground she smashed her right fist into the cheetah’s cute snout while holding the lock with the left arm. Swift mrewled out a pained cry and blocked her face with one hand and ripped at the girl’s long blonde hair with her other. Angela moved on her ass avoiding Swift’s legs as the cheetah girl tried to tie her up and get a top position to pull her head free. The hard fake grass of the field did nothing for their wriggling bare legs, but abrasions and bruising were the least of their worries.
The Saddleback high’s biggest girl was their goalie,Chavez. The 5’10’’, 150 pound eighteen-year-old was a nasty fighter and had recently dehorned a young buck.
that very Buck had been the older brother to a sixteen year old doe on the field who naturally had it out for her. The doe stood 5’7’’ and weighed a dainty 120 pounds. She was a streetfighter by choice since she got the news, training for the day she could get her revenge for her brother.
Chavez had the deer down on her knees struggling as the latino girl stomped and twisted her right foot cleats into her brown pelt. Chavez held the girl’s short nubby antlers in both hands and alternated knees to the face and chest with stomps to the thigh. The doe’s jersey was already stained with blood from her nose and she was almost helpless. Out of nowhere another wilder fighter rammed into Chavez from behind with a high kick to the small of the woman'x back.
The big girl groaned and fell hard to the ground spinning over to face her new attacker, some rodent girl. The rat stomped down and cleated Chavez’s right thigh. She screamed and drove her own left foot up and sank her cleats into the rat attacker’s crotch sending the small girl slightly airborne and falling down with cradling her crotch. Looking around Chavez saw one of her younger teammates on her hands and knees blood dripping from her nose. She sat up and was met by doe’s right fist to face.
Chavez went down and the deer crawled on top punching. Chavez took the punches and bucked the prey girl forward. Chavez immediately bit into the girl’s jersey covered side. she screamed and tried to roll off but the big girl held her and rolled on top still biting the animal girl under the arm. The girl Chavez had crotched jumped on her back and now the latina had two wilders trying to down her.
Angela stood up dragging Swift’s blood stained jersey off. The Wilder team captain was bleeding from the nose and mouth, her cheeks swollen and her cat eyes unfocused. Angela’s right fist was knuckled barked, but it had done a real sweet job in a short period of time.
Angela looked around to her goal to see if she should take the jersey there and saw that five of her teammates were under their opposites, Chavez was doubled teamed and one of her girls was still down.
Angela raced from one fighting pair to the next, throwing the jersey in her goal as she passed. Despite warning screams from the crowd none of the targets turned to face her. She quick kicked each beast in the face or head usually stunning them. Then she checked on her teammate while attacking the enemy with four or five hard stomps. She quickly moved to the next trouble spot leaving her girl on top. She turned the tide on two of the battles this way then moved to a third. The human girl’s right hand had been stomped and her face ripped open by claws and kicks. Angela dragged her to her feet and yelled for her to get back in the fight. The tall brown-haired girl went to where Swift was just getting back up thus occupying the big cat.
Angela finally made her way to Chavez who was still fighting the two anthros girls. Angela reached into the tangle and dragged the deer off by the antlers. She screamed out and reached back over her head for Angela’s wrists. Angela ignore the scratches and dragged the 120 pound bitch by her antlers backwards across the stone, giving her hard kicks in the kidney’s every few steps.
Chavez wrestled herself on top of the rat who had attacked her from the back. Both were scratched up and te rat was missing clumps of fur. Chavez’s face was bloody and her right arm badly bitten. She banged the other girl’s head against the hard metal of the goalpost several times until the bitch stopped moving. She stood up stripped of the girl’s shorts and panties with one pull and then stomped her big right foot down on the girl’s thin grey furred bush, grinding the soccer cleats into the young pussy. That woke the girl up screaming. She sat up and grabbed for the offending foot. Chavez dropped forward spearingg the rat's belly.
The rat girl gasped and spit out blood from her mouth. On top of the rodent Chavez grabbed the girl’s fritzy whiskers in a balled fistwith her big left hand, drew back her right fist and started hammering the girl’s face until the rat's whiskers gave out and separated from her snount with bushles of uprooted follicles in Chavez's hand. The rat screamed in stinging agony until she got shut up by chavez with her now free hand hammer pounding away into the rat's face splitting the girl's lips and then knocking her two buck teeth loose as she found her rhythm of pounding away. Tired of beating the unconscious rodent Chavez realized she had to score and so hefted the rat upon her back like a potato sack and jogged down the field to hand the rodent's body off to a field kicker who deposited the rat in front of the enemy goal propped with her ass up face down. The girl then field punts the unconscious rodent girl in the crotch to get her just past the goal line for a score just in time to get full body tackled by the wilder's bear Goalie and a fox.
Chavez from her end of the field sees that the human girls were either holding their own or badly beating their anthro opponents though more articles of clothing were being shed by the Saddleback team in general as beast girls bite and claw it off. The buzzer sounded ending the first quarter of play.
The score was announced, Saddleback high 12 points, 1 player (6), 1 panty(3) 1 bra (2) 1 skirt (1) Wilders 33 through an assortment of random bits of pilfered clothing. The northside girls were concerned. While the anthros staggered to their side to lick their wounds. All the Wilder supporters yelled for the unconscious girl to crawl out of the goal, but she never moved. A referee announced that she was still breathing and would be left in play.
The Saddlebacks put in three substitutes. The Anthros put in eight leaving only the doe in from the previous quarter. She was named Cudbite as the humans learned from the deer girl going ballistic and demanding that she stay in. Not only did the Saddlebacks need to score they needed to thrash the fresh rotation if they wanted a chance.
The saddlebacks grouped near their goal protecting themselves in a defensive circle. The wilders approached yelling and taunting the red clad humans. About two minutes of some really nasty taunting, cursing, and ethnic slurs ate up the clock. Finally the green and yellow clad girls attacked and a fresh shoulder to shoulder fight broke out.
Chavez and the deer tangled again, exchanging face punches and kicks to one another’s legs. Angela went down with one of the new animals on top of her a lizard of some description. They rolled under a couple of other girls and ended up in a pile. Other girls went down and soon it was a melee of twenty-two where cleats and fists flew in every direction.
Angela lost one of her red shoes in the tangle. She had one cat bitch biting her right arm and a bird tearing her skirt. She had her right hand full of black kitty fur scruff and her left hand pulling a green and yellow jersey up over that scaly bitch’s head. Somebody bit her thigh. She kicked out and knocked a green and yellow clad beast off a human.
Chavez’s nose and lips were split by the doe’s hard fists, but the big fighter managed to roll the smaller cervine off and crushed her nose with a head butt. As cudbite moaned holding her blood spurting snout Chavez jerked the lizard, disoriented with her sports jersey pulled over her girl off a short skinny blonde and laid her over the deer like a log. Chavez pounded the lizard girl with her right fist while choking her with the left hand. The doe struggled under the weight of her cold blooded teammate across her chest and face and Chavez straddling her waist.
Another girl named May (you might remember her) was face down on the outside of the pile with a ferocious muscled wolf on her back. Both girls were scratched and bruised respectively, but now the canine went to work from a commanding position. Using both claws she jerked May’s head up and than smashed it down face first into the ground, again and again. Snapjaw roars, with her face was a mask of bared fangs. The wolf girl savagely rammed the girl’s face into grass and then scrubbed it back and forth.
Her team on the sidelines were yelling from the far end of the field. The wolf finally turned to them and understood. She climbed off the unconscious human and staggered to the Saddleback’s goal. She wiped the blood from her open forehead off on her already stained jersey, leaned over and picked up a bundle of clothes. She straightened up losing two shoes, a sock and a shin guard, but then she ran down the field toward the goal and dumped the clothes.
As the wolf turned around, Angela managed to strip off a green and yellow jersey. She turned and through it into the goal. A goat grabbed her around the neck from behind and dragged her down into the pile choking her. Angela kicked her socking foot and one cleat wildly, reached back over her head and clawed the choking girl’s face. The caprine girl let go and twisted away leaving the blonde gasping.
Chavez’s pounding had caused the lizard lying on cudbite to turn onto her back erratically twitching in time with each new impact Chavez stripped off the girl’s shorts and panties past her tail. Cudbite reached up under Chavez’s red jersey past the broken lizard and grabbed the big girl’s sports bra. The material stretched and stretched. Chavez threw the scaled girl’s panties and shorts into the goal and responded to the deer by smashing her bloody nose yet again with the right fist. The impact smashed the back of her head on the grass with her antler nubs impaled in the dirt.
Snapjaw ran back to the pile and stomp kicked Chavez between the shoulders knocking her down on top of Cudbite. She started to kick again, but another saddleback kicked her cleat up at out the pile and buried it deep between the wolf’s legs. She screamed and fell backwards holding herself.
Angela crawled out of the pile turned around and started pulling Wilder’s off Saddlebacks by their tails. All the girls were scratched, bloodied and cleated but the human girls had been taking a beating this time. As she turned the tables locally some of the girl’s just rolled away crying but enough of the others climbed on top and kept fighting. When the buzzer sounded the battle was still going on in front of the Saddleback’s goal.
When the clothes were counted the Saddlebacks had scored two shoes, one sock, one shin guard, one jersey, one short and one panty. The Wilders though had increased their score by nine points over the Saddlebacks. However this time they had lost two players. They substituted six fresh players. Their coaches went to work trying to revive the two unconscious girls and refresh the four badly hurt ones. The Wilders were badly hurt as well. They had seven girls they chose to swap in with Snapjaw, Cudbite and Swift staying in this round, the one rat Chavez had hurt so bad in the first quarter was again able to stand and punch-drunkenly stumble back into the field buck naked and not at all ready for what was coming.
So now the third quarter was ready. Angela and May prepared their veterans and their six fresh girls to face down Swift’s army.
This time the Wilders charged the goal. The Saddlebacks split into two wings and avoided the initial charge. The beast girls turned and then found themselves between the two wings. The red jersey girls attacked and now the animals were back to back fighting surrounded by the saddlebacks. Chavez’s got tackled by the deer which carried them both out of the melee larger melee.
As soon as a girl went down the opponents would stomp her with their cleats. The screaming, groaning and sobs intermingled with curses and yelps. Fists, elbows, claws, jaws and cleats thudded hard against faces, bodies and legs. Nails opened up arms and faces, the anthros claws did real damage to the half naked humans. It was impossible to say who was ahead at the midpoint of the quarter. Chavez’s big fists rained down in the scrap until Cudbite tackled her and carried them both out of the main fight
The deer and Chavez were locked in a tangle of fists, knees, cleats, head butts and elbows. The furious ground fight came to a pause with the deer on top between Chavez’s locked long legs. The herbivore groaned as Chavez’s bloody, bruised knees bit into her sides. The beast’s right hand clawed at Chavez’s face, but Chavez had captured the doe’s thumb in her teeth. Her left hand had ripped the neck out of Chavez’s red jersey and found its way to her right boob, pushing down the already damaged sports bra to get at the bare nipple. Chavez had the deer head firmly between her thighs. Cud’s tongue cutely flopped as her face turns purple, the fight starts to leak out of her and in it’s place she starts shutting down as the fog of unconsciousness closes in. Chavez’s free right fist struck short hard punches into Cudbite’s lower belly. Her body surged back to life with each hit, her back arching and legs sliding weakly on the grass , but a handful of seconds was all the exhausted an beaten doe could withstand. With a final sigh of capitulation she sagged limp, squeezed unconscious between Chavez’s thighs.
Angela lost her red jersey and bra as two anthro girls worked her on right in front of the goal. Another human off to the side holding a broken arm and scooting on her ass away from the fight. Swift the Cheetah saw Angela in trouble and pulled away from the human she was chasing trying to get her claws on the human’s captain.
Angela lost her red jersey and bra as two anthro girls worked her on right in front of the goal. Another human off to the side holding a broken arm and scooting on her ass away from the fight. Swift the Cheetah captain saw Angela in trouble and pulled away from the human she was chasing and leaned into the three girl tangle trying to get her claws onto the white girl. Unfortunately for Swift as she leaned in to get a piece of Angela The girl she had been chasing spun around on a dime and kneed the feline in the back while she was distracted. The big cat screamed and reached across grabbing the offending girl’s hair. Then Angela kicked out with her still cleated foot and struck Swift under the chin, snapping the cat girl’s head back and blowing out a tooth. Swift fell to the side bleeding badly from the mouth and the cleat cuts under her chin.
The girl who had been chashed by Swift climbed over the fallen Cheetah and jumped onto one of the two girls who were ripping Angela apart. Now the four girl battle rolled almost into the goal. Another human girl was out of the fight. The Crow, who had kicked her face in, stripped the girl and staggered toward her goal carrying a red jersey, red bra, red shorts and red panties. The beaten girl rolled over and crawled on her hands and knees bare assed, wearing only her shoes, socks and shin guards out of the melee.
The suddenly passed out deer was rolled her onto her belly by Chavez who put her big calloused hands around the doe’s antler nubs and begins to pull as hard as she can on the nubs. The girl’s fibourious skull growths creak and splinter at their bases. Cud had seen Chavez break her brother’s rack and would do the same to her. The Wilder’s coaches and subs yelled for their girls on the field to stagger back and save Cudbite or at least stop her body from being de-horned. The rat from quarter 1 was on the task.
Chavez saw the rat girl coming. The mighty Latina reaches down on the unconscious herbivore’s body and slips her arms in between the deer’s torso to hug her from behind. The rescuing Rat girl screamed in fury and managed a limping run. Chavez waited until the last second, and suplexes’d the deer full body slamming cud into the rat with the limp body of her teammate being the bludgeon. Cudbite was propped against the rat’s body balanced on her head and shoulders with her lower half decisively folded over so that her legs were hanging by her head and her butt was on display in the air. It was hardly a dignified position to be in, but Chavez found some practical use in cudbite’s compromised state.
Chavez steps up onto cud’s buttocks and uses the folded over deer’s body as platform to springboard off to make a leaping curpstomp on the pinned rodent’s head that comes crashing down in three point landing with cataclysmic results as the rat’s snout is crumpled and petite breast popped like grapes. and shouts in triumph. Chavez grabbed both the rat and deer girl’s tails respectively and starts dragging them towards the goal. She kicks the rat in just fine but takes the time to clack cudbite’s skull against the metal rim twice at an angle to pop off the doe’s antler nubs and jamming them up her ass. The round ended with the teams still largely tangled in a midfield brawl. This time the refs had to pull the teams apart.
The Wilders had scored seven points: jersey, bra, shorts and panty. They had put one girl out with a broken arm and beaten six others to the point they had to be helped off. Unfortunately three of their girls were now piled up, two were lying over on the field and Five other Anthros were really too hurt to play, so some of the exhausted and nearly helpless beasts had to go back on the field. The Saddlebacks were fresher and had the lead. Despite their injuries Angela and Chavez remained on the field.
The pack of now panicking anthros chittered among themselves picking straws using plucked bits of fur off each other’s back.
The whistle rings out and the saddlebacks charged ahead and met the wilders midfield for a fight to the finish. Chavez went down with three anthro girls practically trying to kill her. Angela dodged around a frog girl's tongue and raced to protect her team mate. She delivered a perfect kick to one girl’s head with her cleated foot and sent the animal’s head flying backwards. The girl fell away holding a ruined mouth full of blood and broken teeth.
Angela dragged the third girl off of Chavez. The big goalie sat up, blood pouring from the split lips, jersey hanging off one shoulder and sports bra hung under her battered tits. She grabbed the last beastgirl’s shorts and pulled them down to her knees. Then she ripped down the panties exposing her bushy crotch. As Angela choked the other girl, Chavez rammed three bloody fingers into the brown cunt, pulled them out, rammed four fingers in, pulled them out and then tried to push her entire hand in. The anthro bucked and twisted, then went limp in shock. Angela let her drop.
Chavez stood up. Then she staggered back to the fight, her body painted in her own bruises and blood. Angela had stripped the three downed girls and was limping to the goal with most of their clothes. Chavez found Swift the cheetah crawling toward her end of the field as the anthros at large rout on the field. The big goalie lumbered after the Cheetah captain and stomp kicked her in the back. Chavez staggered to her foe’s head, put her feline’s face between her thighs and jumped, coming down to leave a cheetah face shaped indent in the dirt. Not sure if she had finished the job, she pushed herself up from the face downed cat, taking a moment of catching her breath kneeling on the warm spotted mattress. She then got up and stomped on the limber girl’s tail with no forthcoming response.
Angela saw a chance to take a running kick into the only scrap on the field left where a beast was winning and it was Snapjaw mailing her longtime rival May. Angela came at the distracted wolf with a snapkick in the face. The toes of her shoe shattered the wolf girl’s front teeth and she hung for a moment, knocked out the beast on her ditrigrade knees and then toppled forwards enveloping her human rival below with her puffy chest of fluff and milkers. May being still straddled below the canine after she fell over was still in the grips of primordial terror from the awful mauling inflicted on her by the now shaggy pelt draped harmlessly on top of her, she screamed and flailed blindly with her fists pounding on the back and sides of the out of commision wolf for minutes on end until eventually she was smothered by snapjaw’s chest in the most embarrassing knockout of the match. The last quarter was a massacre as furs feathers and scales alike were broken across the field. Finally the buzzer rang and the refs moved out to stop the maiming. The final score was Wilders 36 and Saddlebacks 70. The wilders in general were piled up in the goals The human girls had not escaped harms way either though. They had lost eyes, broken arms, cracked teeth, broken noses, wrenched backs, a dislocated shoulder and one lost nipple. Still Saddlebacks had ruled the night and the girls had firmly established their dominance over the motley crew of beasts as the girls pranced around around with their prizes and raided the anthro teams changing room for things to swipe.
Chavez, May and Angela in particular were joint heroines on the Northside after their selfies went out with Cudbite, Snapjaw and Swift’s bottoms stacked up on top of a dumpster rim with their slack tails parted by the arms of the victorious girls to show off those vaginal vents in the open air for the whole world to see.
>End

>Kidnap sparkle OC that urinates rainbows
>Turn her into a submissive fuck pillow that is never allowed outside
>Her new life is cleaning, cooking and being fucked into.her drooling sparkle puddle

>Insufferable Mary Sue appears in local anthro populace
>Good at everything, incapable of failure, she champions "Anthro Rights" constantly and makes a general nuisance of herself
>Until one day she sets digitigrade paw on the property of the most mild-mannered human in town
>Noted only for his extremely large property full of rescued anthros, he is a pillar of the community
>She was disturbing the peace like usual, he exited his residence and approached her calmly
>Reportedly, he politely asked her to move elsewhere, as her ruckus was causing problems
>She insulted him offhandedly, but did in fact move along, only after he had gone back inside
>That was the last anyone ever saw of her
>She just vanished overnight
>Nobody knows the truth, that he personally acquired each of his so-called "rescues"
>Nobody noticed when his collection grew by one
>If you had asked him, though... he'd tell you his most recent acquisition was his absolute favorite
>Soft-spoken, withdrawn, hopelessly addicted to his presence, unwilling to leave the house - much less the property
>Nothing at all like the rude Mary Sue that terrorized the town so long ago
>Not his Marceline, no sir

>She humms a happy tune as she prepared another meal for her master
>The multicolored bunny nuzzled him and sets his breakfast next to his bed
>The bed of course filled with other anthros but she politely waits her turn
>She of course is already sexually sated, giving the pancakes a pretty rainbow swirl required a bit of work
>The awkward part was crouching on the counter while vigorously rubbing
>Her master loves the flavor.

>They say Dragon Lords are impressed with brash, assertive acts
>Usually that means a younger, lesser dragon would challenge his superior for an Alpha to witness
>Changes in rank are peaceful agreements after violent but non-deadly duels
>But claws and fire were useless against the sheer testicles this human possessed
>He simply entered the hall, dragged his daughter out from her chambers, and gave her then untouched butt a mighty slap that echoed throughout his domain
>All without even introducing himself
>Many a dragon had tore out their claws and spilled their blood in an attempt to impress her father enough to allow them to even approach her
>And yet there she was, one moment screaming in confusion, the next panting and moaning as this human's cock stole and defiled her purity
>None, not even her father the Dragon Lord, could react
>He couldn't attack his son-in-law, his daughter's mate was part of the family
>The other dragons also could do nothing, who were they to challenge the Dragon Lord's successor
>He shook his head in confusion, when had he started considering this human his son?
>In the four minutes he had known him he had spent the last three mating with his daughter right before his eyes
>And so they watched powerlessly as the Dragon Princess was taken before them
>The Dragon Lord gulped in nervousness, trying desperately but failing to stealthily hide his throbbing arousal
>Only a lesser, weaker male would be ashamed enough at his own masculinity to try and hide it
>But to be aroused at the sight of his daughter being taken would also mean acceptance
>She was being bred by a strong male, there was nothing more he could ask from his son-in-law
>The Princess squealed, her eyes rolling backwards and body writhing in orgasm as she accepted the sperm of her new husband
>The human looked up into the Dragon Lord's eyes
>He pulled out, resting his shiny, still dripping penis onto her now flat but soon to be bulging belly
>And he grinned, knowing he had won

rosie would be a quick fuck.
she's relaxing on the park bench near the running waterfall you built. fish are splashing in the quiet summery afternoon. you sit next to her and she starts to blush through her dark blue fur making some small talk.
"Hi mayor the town is lovely this evening, i'm glad you invited me to this place. it's paradise." you could swear she was purring.
you both know why your next to her. she's anticipating it. you are the patriarch of the community and have conditioned the residents. her tail is now stroking your back and she plays coy.
"It's been a little too warm for me though, I only wore my dress to feel the breeze more. It's quite embarrassing." she waved her short dress to feel the air between her legs. but she did it in a way that you couldn't see.
her innocent act is already causing your shorts to bulge. you could just take her and pin her to the wooden table and fuck her in the open. no one would stop you, in fact your other villagers might just masturbate to the open display. but instead you reach over to touch the tail that had been caressing you the entire time causing her to jump. you trace your fingers up the appendage that disappeared under her dress. there you caress her fuzzy warm ass.
she purrs louder and twitches as you caress her. "You always know how to get my purr box going. can we do it over by the water fall. the mist feels feels so cool on my fur."
Her request was adorable. especially as she rolled her words with her purring voice. she stands up and the wind catches her dress giving you a full view of rosie. her perfect pink lips were soaked. as her legs parted to step over the bench chair thin lines of slick film stretched over her fluffy thighs. she must have been stewing in the fluids the moment you sat next to her.
you follow the horny cat to a small grassy edge of the waterfall. the roaring water was a whisper to her loud purring.
you start at her toes, caressing the claws out of her paws. she squirms and moans at the touch. you love teasing your animals this way, they adore every moment of attention you can spare.
you move up to her anckle messaging all the way up her thigh. you press your fingers deep into her fur and bring up her checkered dress, dragging it up her body revealing more of her nude blue fur. she pulls her arms up ready for the dress to come off but you detour.
you caress your hands up her stomach to her chest feeling the weight of her beautiful perky tits. her nipples poke out and you glance your palms over them causing her to shudder and tighten her thighs together. a hot breath exits your nose teasing her body further.
after a healthy message and teasing she is left panting. her little cat body is begging for more. you pull up the dress completely slipping it over her outstretched arms.
she then starts to undress you. unbuttoning your flowery tropical shirt and stroking your chest with her pads. there were some scars from other play sessions with your harem but to her she pressed her favorite ones, the ones she marked on your body. her arms smothered your skin and wrapped around your back pressing in slightly where she made her mark. her purring and panting melted all the background noise as the cooling water of the waterfall coated your exposed flesh.
your hands roamed her form, stroking her fur pressing in the cooling water that beaded up on her outer coat. your manhood practically shot out as she pulled down your shorts.
"Did you not have a good time with Audie?" Rosie teased, "Your cock is so hard still."
Earlier that morning you were buried in your wolf villagers pussy. It was a pleasant morning but you were hungry for more.
your hands roamed to her hips and she spread her legs for you. she was wetter than before. her clit escaped her hood, the pleasure button begged to be played with. so while her paws rushed to smear your pre-cum on your shaft.
your fingers danced on her clit. each little tease and touch had her react with a jiggle of her thighs. she widened her stance and moaned in that waving pleasant purr. she moved your hands out of the way to give you full appreciation to your manhood.
her short snout hovered over your rock hard cock. It started with a few gentle licks, like she was testing the flavor of something knew. but she loved the taste, you knew that already. her raspy tongue sent you to another world though. you bucked forward with the power that could poke out an eye. she was ready.
the smooth entrance of a warm vibrating textured hole greeted your sensations. she sucked it like it was a bottle rocket popsicle. you grabbed her furry head and road through the waves of her purring tongue.
it didn't take long for your pulsing member to threaten release. she was just too damn good. you thrusted with reckless abandon into her mouth and exploded deep inside her throat. her purring never stopped nor did she cough. she swallowed every drop that escaped. now your oversensitive glands were being assaulted by her tongue. she teased and milked you sucking on your further. you pulled out of her maw and saw her bright and smiling face. she gave you a view of her open mouth tongue lolled out to show that she didn't waste a drop.
you were sweating and and panting from the experience. after that you gave her a similar treatment. tongue lapping at her cunt and playing with her sensitive button. you may not have had a raspy tongue but you had a strong tongue and could stimulate deep inside her lips. her paws were entwined with your hair as you lapped at her pretty kitty she rolled her hips with every touch. but you had no intention of getting her off this way. you just needed time to recover to give her a proper fucking.
she was on her back panting and purring. now you two were completely soaked from the spray from the waterfall.
you gave her pussy several kisses and sucked on her eraser head of a clit. you moved up her furry body. kissing every inch as you passed. only stopping to give each of her nipples a few sucks and playful pinches with your lips. she was a desperate heap by the time you met her eye to eye.
"You're really amazing you know that." she whispered into your ears.
her legs were splayed, her chest heaved with each breath. it looked like she ran a marathon and just collapsed. you lined up your cock and and tease it inside. this reignited her energy and she latched her arms around your body.
rosie was pressed her chest to yours and she rolled her hips on your dick. you didn't give her the full shaft yet and you could hear she was pushed over the edge. she was screaming out to the waterfall and her tail shook violently under your ballsack.
you plunged the rest of your length in and pushed her into the soft grass under her. her screaming cries stopped and her eyes were wide. she was frozen as you moved in and out of her.
you look over at her and she was as still as a statue. but her pussy was convulsing on your dick and rapid breathing on your shoulder. you power through it her tight hole was milking your shaft.
you glance back to see her paws hanging in the air, each toe curled as she rode through the amazing orgasm she was feeling. then her legs closed around your hips locking you in place. she seemed to return to reality as her panting resumed followed by moans.
"You're kissing my cervix. I never felt so amazing in my life. Please, it needs your cum."
she pressed her muzzle into the side of your neck huffing your scent. hot breath on your neck cool breeze over a warm body wrapped around you. everything felt wonderful.you press one final time and release what you could to her needy cunt.
you held her close not pulling your deflating cock out. not that you could. her passed out body was wrapped around you like velcro.
you decided it was a good time to take a nap.

Big fluff wolfess going to high school. A soccer player that plays a mean goalie. I can get down to that.
>Your a pathetic lanky faggot
>Bully team captain and goalie for the school is walking down the hall
>Practically fills the entire area with her strides
>Everyone steps out of the way to avoid her wrath
>You make yourself smaller by tucking in your books to your chest
>Her friends a cheetah and shark girl are next to her
>The cheetah is smaller while the shark is near her exact hight
>The wolfess stops infront of you smelling the air
>She turns to you and takes a big wiff
>"Look here girls we got our selves some human to push around"
>She hoists you up like you were a book and strolls down the hall
>The girls are laughing at your predicament
>She stops at her locker
>It's empty from her never really doing any of her school work
>She shoves you inside
>"Don't go anywhere, I'm not done with you yet"
>Everyone is laughing as the locker slams on you and locks
>Luckily it was already nearing the end of the day so you didn't miss any of your classes
>But you make some attempts to grab the attention of a janitor that passes by
>Oh no he has airpods in
>So your stuck there for an hour as the halls empty
>Then the wolfess shows up she opens the locker and wears a big toothy smile
>"Let's go little human the girls are waiting"
>She hoists you out and carries you to the girls restroom
>The air smelled like cigarettes and broken hearts
>She set you down next to the sinks and you see her friends waiting the cheetah has a cigarette in her mouth
>"You couldn't grab any others?" The shark asked tail thrashing behind her
>"Shut it, he's the only human in school."
>The wolf smells you again, "I love the smell"
>The cheetah tosses the butt of the cigarete into the toilet, "it's fine. As long as he puts on a show. You promised this for weeks."
>"Oh he'll do it. Wontchya"
>She smiled at you causing a shiver a fear to shoot up your spine
>You have no idea what they were talking about
>Then it clicked as their faces took on a more innocent feminine look
>The wolfess whispered into your ear to try and not embarrass herself
>"We want to see a boy naked in person."
>You blushed as their eyes were glued to you
>No one besides your mother has seen you naked
>Your heart raced but if you didn't the girls would probably beat the shit out of you and tear your clothes off
>You set your stuff on the counter and start to strip
>The wolfess' nostrils flared as more of your skin was exposed
>You were down to your boxers and you could see the girls were blushing and breathing slowly
>It was kind of exciting to be infront of them like this, if your face didn't feel like it was on fire
>The cheetah took a wide crouching stance you could see her pink panties under the school skirt
>The wolf was stroking her arms in a hugging motion
>The shark covered her eyes but peeked between her fingers
>You slipped off the boxers
>They were in silence holding their breath
>A mixture of admiration and "I didn't know it could be that big" was said
>The wolfess was silenced her eyes watching it sway
>You ask if you can get dressed but they shook their head
>They wanted to touch it and smell it
>The three of them fondled you balls and shaft some harder than others
>The wolf pressed her snout onto it and inhaled when she pulled back she was panting
>There was noise coming from the outside and they shot back to reality
>"Get your clothes on and go." They whisper yelled.
>You dressed as quickly as you could and ran out the door face still burning
>The next day the wolfess patrolled the halls she stopped at you again and picked you up
>"Come with me shrimp I got a present for ya"
>She hauled you off into the girls locker room
>She opened a locker and slammed and locked it
>"Keep quiet and enjoy yourself in there. I have practice to go to."
>The small slots of the door gave you a front row view of the open showers as well as the seating bench
>It was quite cramped in the locker and you had no idea when practice was over
>The smell of flowery soap and moisture from the room kept your mind occupied
>You were shifting thinking about the previous day
>Not that it had left your mind
>Three athletic women pressing their snouts to you was a sight you would hold in your mind forever
>There was a sudden burst from out of sight and female chatter and barking
>"Hurry it up ladies get clean and fuck off!" The wolfess shouted to her team "I'm tired of looking at you."
>Over a dozen girls poured into your view
>You could barely keep track of all the movement
>Then their outer layers were shed revealing sports bras and panties
>Every size of breast your eyes could soak in
>Your penis was practically banging on the aluminum of the locker door
>The wolfess stepped in the way her large fluffy body taking up your whole view
>She started to strip exposing more of herself
>Dark inset nipples peaked her massive mounds
>She leaned down looking you in the eye nose flaring as she inhales
>"I can smell how hard it is" she whispered
>She slipped off her sweaty panties and tossed them into her pile as she stood
>Fluffy pubic fur you could bury your face in gave way to her dark glistening pussy lips
>She turned around and showed you her giant moon of a fluffy ass
>She strolled through to the back of the showers letting you view the rest of the girls
>They were naked and chatting some had their legs spread enough for you to peak at everything they have to offer
>You must have died and gone to heaven
>Then a pair of orange eyes shot to yours
>The cheetah girl squinted and stared right through the slots
>She licked her lips and smiled lewdly
>She was chatting with the large shark girl
>"Hey you should stretch more that would probably help you out"
>The shark girl was oblivious to the Cheetah's scheme
>She was told to take a spot facing away of the little locker window
>Her shark tail kept you from seeing her perfect ass but her hour glass grey body was slick with sweat
>The cheetah helped her get her stretches in starting with some over arm turns that showed you her side boob
>Her nipples were pressed on her flatter chest
>Then she ordered the shark to touch her toes and lift her tail high
>Your heart stopped as the shark bent over giving you front row seat to her virgin slit and asshole
>You almost came as she held that pose you could see her clit hood and tight unblemished lips
>When the stretch was done the cheetah smiled at the shark and told her she did great
>Once the shark was gone the sneaky cheetah smiled lewdly at you through the locker and gave you a show
>She bent down low the same as the shark girl
>But she held her tail down and slowly brought it up
>As her pussy came to view she spread her legs a little letting her perfect pink labia part slightly
>She moved her paws up her sides to her tight round rump and spread her cheeks
>She had nothing left you couldn't see
>You saw her pink vagina and asshole spread enough you could cram a finger through it
>You felt wet in your pants no doubt you came a little
>She turned and smelled the locker smiling and licking her lips before returning to the other girls
>You were dazed from the sights
>The shower heat and hot bodies were just a little too much for you to handle
>As the room quieted down you saw the wolf nude sitting on the bench
>No one else was around from your little port view
>"Hoped you liked the show shrimp cause you can get that whenever you want and more if you claim my virginity."
>She spread her thick muscular thighs like golden gates to her precious vagina
>"I can smell your cum from here, you really are a juicy one. Better have saved me some"
>You knew you had plenty, your dick never calmed down even when you passed out
>She unlocked the locker shuddered from the wave of your scent
>"God that's intense, human cum just wrecks my brain"
>She gave you puppy eyes as she asked, "get naked again for me"
>Your dick bursted out as you undid the painful right pants
>Your underwear was ruined from your ejaculate
>The wolf was crouched watching you strip off your pants a paw wandering her dark folds as you free you manhood
>Her eyes were now twice as big
>"That monster gets bigger?!"
>You were unsure as to what she meant you never really looked at other guys more humans but apparently she was impressed
>"I knew humans were large but this is insane"
>Her eyes were stuck on your throbbing erection
>You would turn left and her head would follow turn right and again her eyes followed, like a dog you were holding a treat at
>You notice something behind her large crouched body
>You catch a glimpse of her dark tail tip just around her round ass
>She was wagging her tail staring at you
>"Well, are you going to claim me? That monster will make me howl"
>You ask for her to let you grope her fat chest
>"O-of course." She stammers
>You smile at the large wolfess, your legs trembled and you reach up to pet her exposed breast
>Fluffy soft pillows, warm to the touch
>You bury your face between them
>Your hands fumble to touch her nipples but they aren't out
>You inspect them, every girl had them poking out but this large wolf didn't
>You pull them close and suck on them
>She let out a moan and something hard hits your tongue
>You let out an audible pop as her nipple left your mouth as erect as your cock
>She stared at it and then the other
>"That felt amazing, do the other one"
>She shifted her second mountainous tit to you
>After a little teasing her other nipple was free
>She was panting her hot breath on you fondling her needy sex between her legs
>"Please I really need you now," she moaned.
>She laid back onto the bench her legs spread giving you a view you would have loved plastered on the ceiling in your room
>Her perfect pussy was nestled between strong thick thighs, fur slick and shining from her fluids
>Feminine oder permitted the flowery soapy air
>You needed to bury your cock in her immediatly
>Shaking you shifted up between her legs that could crush you like a grape
>Anticipation, hormones, and pure lust driving you forward this mountain of a woman
>You needed to claim her
>You pressed your cock onto her lips, she was rather small compared to the rest of her body
>In fact it looked like a tight squeeze still as you stare at your dick nudging into her slit
>The wolfess had shut her eyes tight and whined pathetically
>"Please hurry, it itches so much."
>You slid your dick's head in to test the waters
>The warm, tight, and pleasurable waters
>She was clamping down on every inch you gave her making you work hard to shove in another
>You were a quarter of the way in and she was writhing her hips on your direction
>Fluids splashed your face as she bucked hard upward pulling off your dick
>Her toes curled and she grasped at her massive breasts messaging them
>"Oh! God! Thats the stuff!"
>The wolf finished her spasm and resumed her heavy breathing
>Her muscles in her nethers we're still contracting
>Dark anus pulsing as her short orgasm finished
>The sight only made you lust more for the wolf
>You press your body over her furry stomach
>The fur was silky soft, you could practically sleep on top of her
>"Wait, what are you doing?" She said in a daze
>You inform the wolfess that you haven't even given her the full length
>Her mind looks like it melted as her eyes dilate
>"Uh, wait. You mean you aren't done?"
>You give her an inch and run your fingers through her fur
>"Oh, oh God!"
>She moans out your name as you are halfway inside her
>You make sure to hold on and keep her from bucking you off in the throws of passion
>It became a test as you grip her long black fur and thrust through her right vagina
>After a sweating struggle you finally hilt the beast woman
>She starts muttering something but it's nearly incomprehensible, something about being filled and stretched
>You didn't care anyway your mind was now focused on pounding
>And you pulled back and forth in quick procession her tight hold trying to stop you with her vice like muscles
>You were being milked by an angel, she reachs down and caresses you and pulls you further into her forest of fur
>Her moans were now howls
>She howled your name as your entire pelvis was hit with her fluids
>You succumb to your own needs and release inside her flooding her womb
>She throws her head back as she feel the fullness of your load
>"Yes! That's what I needed! Thank you! It's amazing!"
>You try to say something but your face is buried in her stomach so it's muffled
>Honestly you don't want to leave you would love to huff her warm fur
>But she gets up and pulls away leaving you straddled on the bench
>Her tail is wagging as she gets on the floor and rolls around on her back
>A content happy smile while panting like a puppy
>You ask what she's doing
>"I don't know, it feels good."
>After her roll she sits down and let's you rest your head on her lap
>The sound of her tail batting the wooden bench is all you can hear
>"I wasn't kidding, you can do that to me at anytime, anywhere."
>You smirk at the once bully of the school
>"Come on, I'm serious, I'll beat up anyone that makes fun of you too. I do anything for this fuck session to be a permanent thing."
>The proposal tantalized you
>No one would mess with you if your the boss wolf's boyfriend
>"Come-on say something, I'll even let you stay in the girls locker while we shower, they do everything I say."
>"Hell I'm sure you could be in the shower with them, with that monster cock they won't complain"
>The boss wolf did have control over every female as well, she could probably force them to give you a show or even fuck you one at a time
>You lazily grab her paw and intwine your fingers with hers
>Right now you weren't interested in dealings and harems, maybe later when you get horny again
>But right now you mind of liked the desperate large wolf that had a human fetish
>She blushed and turned her snout up in a huff
>She never let go of your hand and her tail sped up even more
End

>no ferals setting:
Due to weaponry and superior tech, human civilization became the dominant species. Prior to this, the norm is that meat comes from tribal wars and slave trade.
>Livestock
Before in the war, they sometimes double as manual labor; but now, they are strictly separated as laborers and food with special exceptions. Majority of them are bred for food. The conditions range from industrialized to free ranged. "Free ranged" animals are raised in a cult like environment where they have short but happy lives. The workers tends to do dangerous jobs like mining. While originally treated completely like slaves, the nature of the jobs requires them to be incentivized.
>Rats
Most of them live in the sewers of human cities, they are deem unclean thus spared from fate of livestock while not being nearly a big enough threat to warrant a campaign of extermination. Humans are generally expected to kill them on sight but they are sometimes given food and medicine in exchange for sewer work. They usually commit petty crimes but they try to avoid doing anything too grave due to the one sided human justice constantly threaten a full scale genocide. In a sense, they are trapped in the disgusting sewers. The manholes are covered with grating locked from the topside as there is rarely any reason for anyone from the topside to physically go down. While they can escape, they made hidden sewer cities rather than risk being seen by humans.
>Other primates
Partly due to mutual respect, a shared sense of superiority over other races, distaste for each other's flesh, and primates in general making lousily slaves; primates generally leave each other alone and operate city states on a similar model.
>Fish
Both humans and the fish civilization understand that neither of them can truly defeat the other and how little do they have to gain from it so they try to leave each other alone.
>Horses
Due to being loyal allies of the humans and being mostly useless in day to day stuff, horses live in subordinate but self-governed regions. At first glance, they look like typical anthro slaves but they are nude by their own laws. Their status is heavily determined by fertility. Most of the males are geldings and posting as a stallion is a grave offense.
>Pets
Typically cats and dogs. They underwent a process called domestication. Legally, they are closest thing to a human that lives in close proximity of humans. While they have many restrictions on how they live, they have something akin to human rights and a degree of social mobility. While there are some jobs available, most of them stay as slaves doing small house work.
>Zoo
A zoo is filled with mostly the enemies of humans; wolves, lions, bears, elephants (rival species) to name a few. Exterminated save for the a last few of their species are held naked and imprisoned. A large collection of sperm and egg cells are held in cyro. In a rare event that they managed to escape, their population and genetic pool is too small to rebuild their species without the gene bank. A few are kept alive to replenish the genetic supply. The females are kept around longer while the males are sold off (usually to skin for their fur or leather). With exception of transfer to another zoo, all of them leave the zoo infertile.

>jerk off infront of her nose as she's all tied up
>the scent sends her squirming wanting you more and more
>her binds tighten on her wrists as she whines wanting to please you
>you explode over her snout coating her in your fluid
>you make sure to take a dollop and rub her snout with it
>her eyes roll back in the head as she has an orgasm from the scent alone
>her tail never stops wagging as the rope holds
she would also give the best cuddles.

Imagine turning 18 and receiving this for your birthday; a massive wifwolf who is perfectly submissive towards you.

>"Youngsters these days are spoiled. Back in my day we had to train our wifwolves ourselves."
>"They just don't understand how easy they have it. All the work to make her obedient is what made us appreciate our wifwolves."
>"That's when you even got to training her. I got my wifwolf fresh from the wild, I had to deflea her and teach her English myself."
>"You were lucky to get a wifwolf as a gift. I had to go out into woods at 18 with no weapons or equipment and capture her myself."
>"Was she alone?"
>"Aye."
>"You were lucky. I had to choke out my wifwolf and then carry her unconscious body back to civilization while beating back her packmates with a stick."
>"You were lucky to have a stick! I was dropped me off in the woods at 16, nothing but the clothes on my back, and had to wrestle every wolf there with nothing but my bare hands, and then carry my new wife 100 miles back to town while she clawed at me."
>"Luxury! My dad threw me into the mountains from a helicopter when I was 8 years old, had to forage food by myself for months, gain the respect of the local wolf pack, become their leader by the time I was 10, impregnate every female in the pack the day I hit puberty, then travel several hundred miles across land and sea back home with my harem in tow!"
>"But you tell kids these days that and they won't believe you."

>Cute dog wife
>She's into every type of bondage
>She even wants to go out to fancy dinners tied up
>Rope panties knot her putty in stimulation as she walks
>Her tail wags non stop the entire evening
>When you get home she wants more
>She wants to be ravaged in uncomfortable positions

>"Don't worry dear sister, MY husband will be home from work soon"
>"I don't think I have ever seen you this worked up before. You really should have come to us sooner, your nipples are practically diamonds"
>"Don't whine just yet, you can save that when you cum for the fifth time, he will treat you right. Just remember I'M top bitch."
>"You hear that? His keys just went through the front door."
>"Oh look at you shiver, maybe I should get plowed first to let your pussy marinate more."
>"Your bitch scent is soaking into the walls, I'll be smelling your needy cunt for weeks"
>"He's coming up the stairs. Oooh is it gonna feel good for you, I'm getting wet just thinking about it."
"Look at my beautiful girls all ready for me"
>"Hope you like your present. My bitch of a sister has a drowning snatch and needs a savior."

>Female deers when you invite them into your home and they see all the rifles and antlers you have mounted above your fireplace

>They see their crush's horns on the wall
>He talked big game about taking out a human for her
>Said he was going to claim her only after he succeeded
>Then he vanished once his horns came in
>The doe is looking at them on the human's mantel
>She's terrified and turned on at the same time
>A collar is wrapped around her neck as her clothes are torn from her body
>Like good prey she accepts her fate
>Her first time changed her world
>She grabbed the antlers tightly, not as a means to reconnect with her old life, but because she needed something sturdy to keep her head from hitting the wall
>She creamed herself so many times she forgot his name
>A few days later of being a fuck pet she saw another set of antlers
>Her mother was grabbing tightly to them getting the same treatment she did
>Her mother became her sister-wife

>Strong knight losses fight
>She's stripped of honor, weapons, and clothes
>Forced to bear her victor on her back and his offspring in her belly
>After 8 months it's time to take her very pregnant self to visit her parents to give the news
>Her family are nobles with a large home
>You bring their daughter heavy with puppies on a leash completely naked to their front door
>She's trembling as you talk to her parents telling them the good news
>They're shocked, ashamed, delighted
>They first thought she died, but to see her situation and that they will be grandparents drowned her parents in competing emotions
I would rub her belly and cause her tail to wag while we spread the news

Defeating strong anthro warriors and collaring them is so good.
Their toned and hard bodies softening and plumping up from an easy life of serving their masters and bearing children.
Once proud and with numerous titles to their name, reduced to shamelessly craving human dick whenever their wombs aren’t full of cum.
The only title they hold now is breeding slut.

>Before, a proud knight.
>Now she lies in chains.

>Heritage armor from her proud family is melted down and pounded into a collar and cookware
>She's now using her lineage to cook for you and your offspring
>You little ones don't even believe that she was once a proud warrior that slayed on the battlefield
>She puts on a brave face but you can tell she's dying on the inside
>That feeling disappears once you bring her to bed
>Her collar is attached with a chain of the same metal that protected as she is brought naked to bed
>Her body and mind are completely conquered as you give her another load into her drooling pussy

The once proud ice dragon of the frigid north, stoic, powerful, and knower of uncountable ancient spells and mystical mysteries very few had the privilege of even hearing about.
She once had a name, the words themselves full of arcane power that struck fear into travelers and beasts alike who ventured near her domain.
But it was stripped from her like so many other things, a beast like herself was unworthy of it, she was not even allowed to think the name, the title having slipped entirely from her mind.
Her new names were easier to remember, something along the likes of slut, sow, beast, mule, lizard, etc.
But on occasion, her master would call her by her favorite name, snowflake.
Such a fragile and small thing, perfectly describing how she felt since she had first met him.
He had climbed her solitary snowy mountain as she slumbered atop her hoard, the single human quiet enough to not wake her and rouse suspicion.
Though as he entered her cave, he made sure to get her attention, loudly declaring that her stolen wealth was hers no longer, and that she would serve him for the rest of her days.
Annoyed that she had been woken so rudely, she had breathed a cloud of bone freezing mist from her maw, intent on killing this annoyance and returning to sleep.
It turned out not to be so simple, the human getting closer and requiring more of an effort to stop than she had realized.
The fight went on for less than an hour, her claws swiping, fangs gnashing, and deadly breath spraying with fury at the human who had dared wake her.
Then, the unthinkable happened, the mighty ice dragon who wore frost as a second skin slipped on a patch of ice on her cave floor, landing face down.
Embarrassed that such a thing could have happened, she tried to rise back up but the human was already upon her.
Somehow able to overpower the larger dragon back to the ground, he stripped her flanks of their armor and exposed her frosty nethers to him.
She was marked as his ever since, his burning hot rod stabbed into her depths over and over, her screeches of pleasure sounding over the mountains, scattering animals and causing avalanches.
She had been conquered soundly, the only weapon the human used came from his pants.
Now she had been reduced to this same mortal’s mount and plaything.
Her hoard had been seized just as easily as her cunt, affording wealth and knowledge to the citizens of the nearby cities she had plundered in ages past.
Now that she was forced to live in the south, she melted. Used to a more comfortable frosty climate, snowflake was constantly covered with sweat.
She wished she could choose her own clothing, or lack there of, her modesty be damned.
But instead she was forced to wear her saddle and bridle, along with whatever revealing outfits her master required her to wear.
Her collars, one for her neck and tail were both a reminder of her status, or lack there of, and infused with a simple frost charm that kept her from burning to a crisp entirely.
Her body had reacted strongly to this change in climate, her scales becoming thin and soft to dissipate the overwhelming heat, her deadly ice breath serving more as a snowcone maker, and her sleek and thin body had been fattened with milk and honey abundant in these southern lands.
And much like her new home, she had become just as fertile, her breasts swollen with milk, several magnitudes larger than what they were in the north, going from small lumps on her chest to motherly mountains, sloshing back and forth and making her movements clumsy with their immense weight.
Her hips and thighs followed suit, her ass filling out into what could only be called a bubble butt, soft and easy to grapple onto when she was being mounted and bred.
All these changes had scared her at first, she felt her power wane by the day, becoming weaker and softer the longer she was kept down here as a mere servant.
Soon, the human was able to overpower her large frame without the aid of a slippery floor, the extra weight of her new body and the draining heat allowing him to manhandle her as he saw fit.
That night he truly broke her in, her secret thoughts of rebellion and revenge replaced with a surprised infatuation for being completely dominated by what she had previously assumed was a lesser being.
Her begrudging obedience had been replaced with fervent adoration, no task was beneath her now if he willed her to do so.
Her nipples harden at the mere sight of him, something even the most freezing of blizzards couldn’t do.
Her pussy aches for him at all times, her womb burning hotter than the beating sun above her without his cum inside.
She loves being ridden, serving her master like a domesticated beast and showing her obedience all in one action.
She takes pride knowing that her body itself services him, keeping her master cool in these hot lands, and pleasing his lust for her with her new curves.
Bearing his child will be the highlight of her long life.

Yo. Just whipped up this first half of a story, toying with the whole "defeating a knight and stripping her of her honor" idea from earlier. In my usual fashion, I got so caught up in the preamble, I didn't actually get around to writing the sex scene yet. And I got fairly brutal with this one. I really wanted to sell the humiliation and total defeat aspect of it. Kind of a slapdash effort, really. But enough talk.
https://rentry.org/w6bww
I'll probably write the second half and finish it later today.

>What /collared/ setting do you like the best?
I've thunk a bit on this and came up with the following:
It is the far distant future, so far that the continents have repeatedly merged and split, sunk below the waves and arisen again. Its continents currently form a supermass that encapsulates three great inland seas, while around the continent archipelagos, island chains and lone islands dot the seas.
Through the many lands, countless citystates, petty kingdoms, tribes dot the lands, the most prominent of them ruled by human god-kings, revered by the masses of the anthropoid variants (creatures designed by humans as subservient helpers in the long millennia that preceded the collapse) as creatures beyond their capacity. This reverence is hardened by the ancient artifacts, nanomachines, tools and weapons only available to use to the genetically human. The rule of the human god kings is unquestioned, no matter how cruel, pointless or bad it is, as all of them are worshipped as gods.
As for the anthros themselves, they live lives of poverty, helplessness and abuse by either by their human overlords or by other anthros that claw their way upwards through the endless masses of beastfolk. Wars constantly dot the lands as the god kings declare wars upon eachother that ravage the countryside, burning the crops and enslaving the people of their rivals, but never bothering to attempt breaching the walls of their cities, mostly out of an unspoken agreement.
In the countryside the beastfolk live in relative homogeneity of race due to self segregation, while members of all races can be found in the cities. In case of reproduction between different races or between a human and a anthro, the race of the child is always the race of the childs mother, a direct result of a choice in the engineering of the races many millenia ago.
The technology of this world is a weird mix of ancient artefacts, remnant technologies and ancient tools retroactively discovered.

I've been wanting to do a collared pokemon story but everytime I think of one I don't know how it should start. Like should all the pokemon be anthro? Would it be normal for pokephilia to exist? Would it be best to have the start of the journey and slowly realize his starter is interested in doing more? Or is it just too autistic and be burned in the idea pool?

making them all anthro would be the safe bet, many pokemon are already anthro but I don't think many people will care if you want to do regular pokemon
pokephilia could be a subplot of the story and be somewhat taboo in that they're mostly for fighting and fucking them could either be seen as a little weird or completely normal as they are your property and are naturally attached to their masters
I suppose it depends on what direction you want to take the story
I do like starters becoming more and more brazen with their advances as they level up and evolve, especially if they're a fire type

>For their unwavering loyalty to their human masters, the dogs were rewarded with a large expanse of fertile land and permission to establish their own cities and kingdoms
>Although theoretically independent from direct human rule, no major policies are enacted without consulting humanity first, and most Dog monarchs have at least 1 human advisor among their court

>walk into your dragon rookery
>the smell of dragon lust clings to your nostrils
>you spent all nitght with your beauty no way she would have the energy to perform again
>you look at the time of the year and rush to visit your dragon
>you stumble onto her raping another female dragon burying a toy between both their loins
>"Master, you came. I have found a friend to spend my heat cycle with."
>the second dragon is wearing loosly fitted collar and reign anchor points
>she put on the equipment before you even managed to tame her
>"she's ready for you master, I spoke to her for only a moment and she wanted to live with us."
>your dragon bends her over and yanks her tail high to give you a good look at the second dragon's soaked hind quarters
>"Yes," the second dragon thrums, "Take me too, I want to be placed in your care."
>"See master, she's practically begging for it."
>You spent the dragon heat season satisfying two dragons simultaneously
>luckily they would bury their snouts into their cunts when you became too exhausted
>The new girl almost drowned when she returned the favor you always new she was a wet girl
>in the end she became a valuable ally and mistress to your rookery

>When another one has visited your rookery a few times, but wants to move in permanently.

>dragon lust streams on the air
>satisfied dragon roars echo through the mountain
>another dragoness catches it and knows there is a nice place to live during their estrus
>after spending weeks in orgasmic bliss the dragon falls for the human just like the others
>while male dragons fight and kill for their lands humans have cultivated and turned the land to their needs
>as much food to keep their bellies round
>steel ingots that go down their gullets smooth to give their beautiful scales the metal luster that satisfies their vanity
>their former mates would bring broken weapons and spears that tear up their insides
>they would fight amongst themselves to find the hierarchy of who is the top dragoness, but the human hand would come down and correct their bestial behavior

>Grab the water hose and spray the fighting dragonesses to break up the fight before walking them away from their horns or straps. They keep snarling to each other but with you between them can't do much else.
One should not stop them from figuring out their natural positions in the rookery by themselves. Intervening and trying to directly place one of them above another is likely to just breed contempt and will not last. What you should do is break up violent fights and direct them to use other means of competition. One should remember most fights for dominance are not done with tooth and claw, and do not draw blood. They are more resembling wrestling matches.
>One of them cares less about her status among her sisters. Either she's less competitive or thinks smarter.
>She knows what really matters is how you rank them in your head and gaining your favor requires more than physical prowess.
>All the dragonesses get along fine enough but she leaves most of the fights to others and prefers to stick close to you.

>The scales on your dragons are much harder than those in the wild because you've been giving them high-quality steel to feed on.
>It's much better than the rusted iron pieces and softer metals they mostly get in the wild, with occasional steel mixed in when they raid something. Attacks have their own risks of end up being hunted in turn, so steel is hard to come by for wild dragons.
>Dragons are also known to eat raw ore if they can't find anything refined.
>But your girls don't have to worry about that

>they house dragons also get better food allowing them to grow stronger
>the down side is they require more exercise due to not having to hunt for meals but you set up nice exercise courses for the girls
>allow them to satisfy their competative natures and better situate themselves on their own inter relationships
>they would even make a game of it and the winner will be satisfied by the other giggling girls
>as for the single dragon that knows better than her sisters she participates in the festivities
>it's also a nice spectacle for the common folk to watch dragons race
>house dragons are faster, stronger than any wild counterpart
>it sometimes draws envy, other wild dragons seek to partner with humans to live with society that humans built

>You've had a wild one circling in the area. She's not tried to approach, not after your dragons got territorial and made it very clear she's NOT welcome and chased her away.
>As the weather grows colder and she shows no intention of escaping the months of chill you get curious, and worried.
>Your girls voice their complaints as they walk after you to into the woods.
>"She should leave. We don't need another" one of yours says.
>"We need to see why she's risking the cold. Then I can decide what to do with her."
>"Could be anything. Wild ones can be unpredictable and should not be trusted" the second dragoness comments
>"I recall certain someone being wild once" you retort and get a huff in response.
>Some time later, your dragons say they caught her smell. You climb on the back of the once wild one and tell them to lead the way.
>The trail leads you deeper in the woods where she's busy biting down a deer carcass. Spoils of her latest hunt no doubt. Growls of dragons, and a few sharp words from you to keep your girls in line, fill the air as you wait for the unknown dragon's reaction.
>She dropped her offensive posture once your voice rang out, eyeing the two who almost mauled her in the past. She tries to relax and asks if you would converse with her. She says she tried to meet you, but...
>Snarls intensify on your side as her words are met with renewed hostility. "Easy girls, easy."
>You ask why she's still in the area and has not flown after the prey to the south. Very few decide to brave the winter here.
>She says it was not by choice and gestures to her side.

>You see her wing, and understand what she meant.
>Two of her wing fingers sit in an unnatural angle, broken or disjointed.
>Your mount shifts, shuffling her wings. Both the girls turn visibly less hostile and almost look at the wild one with sympathy,
>She had heard how humans always have warm pens and saw how well fed their dragons always looked. "And how healthy they are. I have not seen scales so gleaming ever"
>She asks to be taken in, or at least aid to fix her wing. Although it won't save her from the cold, she could at least fly again after it has healed.

>dragon dames are naturally in harems
>their male mates with them and then flies off to mate with the other females in their lairs
>as territory shrank due to overpopulation the dragon dames would sometimes find themselves in the same lair as the other mistresses
>they squabbled but never interfered with the male's decision
>unless it directly harmed themselves or their eggs and hatchlings
>a human makes a fine substitute, dragons after all are beings of pure primal instincts
>and they offered more than a single male dragon would
>stables similar to horses but instead of demeaning splintering wood and straw they are given human comforts
>fountains to drink from, soft pillowy bedding to lay comfortably exposed belly up, nice stone for their claws to mar
>the dragoness never saw anything so beautiful in her wild life as she strolled into the quarters she will be resting in
>the rookery also had a larger open area to sleep in
>the two girls the human traveled with took purchase of prime spots in the center of their room
>gleaming gold shimmered in their scale from a diet high in gold gold coin and solid steel bars
>the human sat her down and thumbed her damaged wing
>she snarled at the pain but made sure it was away from him to not draw the ire of the other dragons
>last thing she wanted was to ruin something that would cause her to be expelled from the warm comfort so many dragons given themselves to
>he affixed a splint causing a shudder of pain to roll through her back
>"You have two broken meta carpels on your third and fourth fingers and a bruised radius, it will take a month for you to recover enough to fly safely."
>relief washed over the dragoness, the concept of flying safely was enough to let her know she wasn't going to be a worthless drake

>To lose your wings... to be bound to the ground like drake... The worst fear any dragon has. Their bodies are strong but their wings are vulnerable. She managed to avoid a terrible fate.
>Her body is not used to the high concentrations of metals. Need to start small as even the tiniest piece of steel or gold contains more metal than what can be found from the minerals in the wild.
>But as sure as the time goes on, the shine of her scales becomes alike her new sisters.
>Harness and saddle training is still ongoing. Wild ones tend to feel trapped in them and forcefully fight to escape them, but she has learned to control her instincts somewhat. Her cooperation is helping the process along and she can wear them longer and longer.
>Eventually they will turn from source of discomfort, to comfort.

>The new dragoness adjusted well during the winter
>Her wing has been freed from the bindings and stretches out wide
>The other dragons marveled at her wingspan
>Length gave more time in the air and her breed was perfect for long trips
>You inspect her and patted her hide
>She was fit and ready to soar when the frozen air thawed
>In the meantime she asked about the other perks that comes with a human male
>Something you avoided to bring up due to human proclivity
>The newest edition to your family has spied you kissing mouth to snout with your first dragon
>"Can I try that mouth ritual with you master?" she boldly asks in front of the other dragons

>The two who have been with you longer look to each other before turning to you.
>Giving it only a moments consideration, you give them a nod.
>Grin forms on their snouts and one runs off. "I'll get the toys"
>Other one saunters away, hips swaying. "I'll prepare the sleeping area"
>You walk in front of the inquisitive looking dragon and take her head between you hands.
>You guide her head down and place your lips against hers.
>When your tongue brushes against her lips she brings her own to yours, mimicking your gesture.
>You pin it down with your own and stroke her neck with your hands
>When the first girl returns carrying a box in her jaws, you grasp the horns of your partner and pull her away.
>She licks her lips, giving out a low hum. "So is the purpose of it, tasting one another? It's not unpleasant..."
>You look her in the eyes and hold her gaze in yours
>"Tell her"
>She tries to look to her sister but you pull her horns to keep her still. "Tell me what? What is this?"
>"Did you know that humans do not mate seasonally? They do it all the time. And they have gotten very creative with it." Your first helpfully informs her

>The dragoness watched the human grab the gear from the boxes
>each dragon flanked her sides with some wing binders and metal rods
>a lewd smile on their muzzles
>they would take time and plant human styled kisses on portions of her body and up her neck causing a shiver to trail down her side
>"Don't worry," the first whispered softly, "we've done this many times, you will enjoy it just like you did with the riding gear."
>the thought tantalized her as the dragons licked and tickled her with their tongues
>She returned the favor giving them reciprocating affection
>this kept her occupied while the human set to work
>The human used her harness anchors to strap metal rods keeping her hind legs spread wide
>wing binders and forearm shackles locked her in place
>the second pulled out of a deep passionate kiss and smiled lovingly at her newest sister, "Enjoy your time, we'll take good care of you."
>The dragoness was too lost in the newly awakened brazier of passion to realize what happened to her limbs
>she looked down to see a glimpse of the metal that bound her in a precarious position before a hood was wrapped over her head
>her world was blacked out and she could feel the hood being strapped to her horns
>the other girls giggled as she shifted in the bindings
>her vent drooled, unable to escape the gaze of her sisters and her human master
>"Aw, look how needy she is," the first said, "She must have never found a mate before."
>The second pressed her body close rubbing scale on scale thrumming softly to comfort her like a mother, "When we're done with you, you won't need to worry about going unloved in any season."
>The human stripped and started to caress the pussy, pulling strands of sticky fluid away after he petted her clitoris with a thumb
>The trapped dragon arched her back from the sensations and groaned desperately for more
>he straddled her tail and slipped his hand inside getting a feel for the tight rigid pink flesh that dwelled inside

>she humped his hand in return driving pleasure with the intruder
>he pulled back letting her stew in her own fluids
>"Careful girl," the second said, "You aren't going to get off that quickly. men are passionate creatures and like to draw out sex till you are panting unable to move."
>and right she was, foreplay alone seemed like a lifetime for the dragoness in the hood all sense of time vanished only the soft teasing of her captors kept her company
>gentle kisses and touched from her sisters to the assaulting warm grip of their master, her master.
>she was brought to the edge and her tail pushed her hind quarters up into the air, wings strained in the bindings to the point she thought she almost broke them again only for her to painfully drop away from climax
>she whined pathetically in her mask on the verge of tears as her vent ached for just a single touch
>"Don't worry dear," the first one whispered,"You gotten master aroused quite nicely, his cock is right above your entrance."
>the new dame swallowed looking down between her legs.
>her hood kept her from seeing it but she desperately wanted to see the man that teased her so perfectly
>her utter domination at the hands of the man that rescued her would be complete if she could just witness the union of her core with him
>both dragons gripped her horns and pulled the hood off
>she saw his arousal for a mere second before it was buried away in her tormented hole
>she let out a roar of pure ecstasy and thrusted wildly in response
>the two dragonesses pinned her down as the human thrusted wildly into her spasming cunt
>she felt complete as she passed out with a full womb
>her contractions stopped hours after he finished inside her
>the bindings were undone and put away
>her sisters got a turn as well but she was too enamored with her own euphoria to notice
>she only knew they were finished as she was joined in the center of the room in the sleep pile their sent mixed with his

>Visit the anthro red-light district on a whim.
>Leave each club, dance house, and love shack with their most expensive whores and dancers hanging off of you, saying their bodies belonged to you after getting fucked so well.
>They tease you about how it wasn't fair to leave them behind after ruining them for anyone else, and they help you choose only the choicest trim from the next locations to add to the growing group.
>They pick out collars and leashes for themselves at a sex shop and soon your walking your new harem out of the now gutted red-light district.

This is the story of a savage fight I had with my feline roommate. At the time she was a senior in high school. I was a grad an finally wanted to get back at her for the years of abuse she’d put me through before I say good riddance to her ilk forever. According to the rules of our crowded apartment, might made right and to lose was to pay according to the psycho mentality of the anthos living on the flat I had taken brutal beatings and more than a few sexual humiliations at the hands of my three roommates. With my growing size and strength I had returned the favors to the rodent and then the wolf. Neither girl challenged me anymore and more than once spread her legs without a fight when I felt like it, but Southpaw was still the top bitch of the house.
I picked Saturday morning to challenge her again. The last beating she gave me was weeks old and the pain was gone. I heard her in the shower so I entered the bathroom, sat down on her sink and proceeded to to stroke my cock to an alert state. She came out of the shower, glistening wet with her fur a sparkling sheen. At 5’10’’ and 175 pounds she was an athlete, strong as a fucking Amazon bitch straight from the jungle with hard tits an all muscle ass broad and a proud mound. My face had been shoved into her furry crotch more than once over the years. She was merciless and nasty, given to a couple of hours of abuse after a beating. Nothing was out of bounds with this dirty cunt and it had taken me awhile to learn how to fight back. I was 5’11 and 200 pounds of lean muscle myself with eight inches of snake hanging down under with which I fully intended to split her with. Her face turned red with rage when she saw me. Then her blue eyes went cold.
“Okay, I see the house human needs another lesson. This time you’re going to eat carpet again. Don’t tell me you like it, don’t you bitchboy?”
“I’m leaving this place and You’ll need a new ass and cunt when I’m gone.”
There was a roar of laughter. I looked at the cat’s well manicured claws. She opened her mouth and made biting motions with her teeth. The look in her eyes was a reflection of my own battle lust.
She and I circled one another cautiously. The cat fighter feinted twice trying to set me up for a snap kick. I slapped away her hands and twisted out of both kicks way. She looked frustrated for a moment, cursed me and reoriented her stance. I step forwards in that moment and caught her right in the face. She froze for a second, shocked at the fact that her favourite punching bag could actually hit back. I launched forward and connected with a hard right to her left eye. Her spittle flew and her hands came up. My right knee dug into her belly. She groaned and grabbed for my hair. She caught my scalp and jerked my head to the side and tried to take me down, but I pushed my shoulder into her and drove her body back into the side of the apartment. The wall gave a little and her furry ass busted through the siding. She groaned as I drove my shoulder into her gut again and again. She dropped hammer shots to my back and tried to chop my neck. I kept moving in and out, using the wall for leverage. I wanted to gut this young cat quickly so I could punch her face in. She gave up trying to punch her way out. Suddenly I felt ten claws dig into my ass. She got her fingers deep into the flesh and then ripped upwards along my back, leaving ten bright red trails in my previously unmarked skin. The pain was so great that I arched my back and stopped ramming into her. Suddenly her knee came up and dug into my bent over belly. I grabbed the knee and tried to stand up. She hopped on one foot and pulled down on my hair to keep me from putting her to the floor
We awkwardly remained grappled like that a time. I lifted her trapped knee up. She leans back on the wall for balance then kicked her other ankle out from under her and down she went.
She fell down the side of the wall and ended up on her ass, her left leg up in the air trapped in my arms, her right leg bent under her. I shifted my weight to my right foot and drove my left foot straight into her feline cunt. She roars and grabbed for my foot. I got it away and stomped her again, this time smashing her hand against her pubic mound. I got my foot back minus some skin on my calf that was left under her claws and started to kick again. She rolled to the side and got her right leg out from under her. Instead of risking getting swept, I twisted and rolled her over using her leg. I tried to go for what some would have called a Boston Crab, but she pushed up and rolled under herself bringing her head beneath my crotch, her left leg straight up in the air and her right trying to find away to get control of the situation. I knew hands were reaching up for my cunt. I let go of the leg and dropped down trying to drive my knees into her torso.
My knees came down. One hit on the upper chest and slid down onto her left arm, crushing the bicep to the mat. My right knee crushed straight into her right tit grinding deep into the orb and then rolling across the crushed flesh to land on the mat. I had really hurt her. She screamed, but as an experienced fighter, she didn’t just lay there and suffer. Instead I felt her sharp teeth dig into the underside of my left ass cheek. I should have stayed in position, but try and not react to a panther biting a hole in your ass. I squealed and moved forward on my knees pulling my flesh out between her clenched teeth. Suddenly her legs clamped around my upper ribs. I felt her hands trying to get to my crotch, but luckily my knees were still either pinning her arms or blocking them. I felt her tense her legs and prepare to crush the air out of me. I had my left hand on the mat for support. I reached between her legs and hooked my index finger inside her cunt lips. I was instantly rewarded with a scream.
The cat’s body arched up involuntarily trying to avoid the fingernail of my index finger tearing at the flesh inside her cunt just behind her pubic bone. As she arched and twisted, I suddenly withdrew my finger, made a fist and sank it into that stretched out lower belly. I heard her groan as all the air left her. Her feet lifted off the floor, her ass bounced down and her knees came up to defend her convulsing gut. I must have gotten a nice shot to her ovary sacks. I rolled to the side freeing her up to curl up into a ball.
I scrambled to my feet and took aim to plant my left foot to her head in savage kick to the Kitty’s wincing face. Crack. Her head snapped back The squeal was like stepping on a puppy’s tail.
Her head bucked one way, and an eye flinched shut as pink tinted spit cannoned out her glistening predatory lips. Her powerful legs shivered like a scared newborn lamb.
I reach down and grab the incoherent cat by her right wrist which I use to pull her up and trap her other hand between my legs. Roaring out loudly she is lifted sideways into a fireman's carry! “N-NO!” Her voice attempted to growl - but cracked as her gut muscles protested. She arched over their shoulders, so she flailed free arm of hers trying to find anything to grip. It was too late. *CRASH* The back of her head is spiked into the carpet, and her brain turned to spoiled-brat stew. The feline putters out a slow exhale, that trapped arm now sprawled outward, shoulder-height, fingers splayed flush onto the floor. Her bloodshot eyes bulged from their sockets, then rolled back. Both legs folded, with her barefoot and high-heel that clung by the Reinhardt’s toes now square by her ears, each buttocks cheek firmly pointed in the air, with only her shoulders down, the rest suspended in an unconscious bodily arc. She looked relaxed, and her maw lay open for drool to seep blood and spit at the corners. She exhales in a quiet, and gargled groan.
I huffed out and took a few deep breath as I sat there on the bedside looking down on the psycho cat who laid motionless after I’d driven her head down. Bent with her legs spread... It felt good to finally get out up over her.
I stood up from the bedside looking back over my shoulder in satisfaction at the animal woman’s unconscious form. I turned and lowered myself, straddling the feline’s back in a mock wrestling pin and lifting her floppy arms experimentally. Three times the cat’s arm flopped limply back to the mat when I let got. she was out like a light. I grinned again
"Shouldn't underestimate anyone, kitty," I whispered huskily, before planting a deep kiss on the unresisting lips of my beaten dorm-mate.
>end. probably will do a sex part later today.

>something something anthro woman falls into the radioactive human cum
>she ends up becoming the next kaiju
>thus another giant human is sent to fuck her into submission
>resulting in another pile of the aforementioned radioactive cum to be cleaned up by the anthro workers
>and so the cycle continues

>Your pokemon team squeaks out a close win for another badge.
>After recovering at a pokemon center the whole team gets a nice reward.
>Each belly is filled with the best pokeblocks and poffins the city has to offer and each womb is filled to the brim with cum.
>Your team's friendship levels have never been higher.

>former tribals, captured years ago as youths carry out the ultimate betrayal against their kind
>revealing the location of their settlement was one thing, going out and raiding it for their mothers, younger brothers and sisters, and nieces and nephews themselves was another
>some were more cunning, they had learned much from their human masters
>why go out and capture bitches when you could simply... buy them?
>they wore human clothes, they wielded human weapons, why not set up a human economy?
>and so the slavetown was born
>canines lived in the town
>canines guarded the town
>canines raided for slaves
>and captured canines were enslaved
>many dogs came with coin, thoroughly inspected the female for any defects, and left with the highest of quality slaves for their masters to rape and conquer in bed
>canines were loyal, so unquestionably so that slavemasters could be trusted to send back their profits and not attempt to cheat out their leashholders of a single coin
>as a reward for their loyalty they were eventually they were given autonomy
>they, and any offspring they bred remained property of their human households
>but they enjoyed their servitude for their human masters, anything for the alpha
>all they had to do was deliver young, fresh bitches back home

>In Anthro Corp. the anthros are Human Resources
>As in, they are Resources for Humans
>"I need a new desk, this one can't stay up after our hourly fuck"
>"I want a cocksleeve that doesn't choke after two inches"
>"I think my chair is pregnant."
It is the duty of HR to address those needs.

>Mother and 18 yr old son are indebted to the church because, I don't know, their husband/father committed the sin of stealing donations and skipping town.
>Owner intends to use the mother to sate his lust, but after she passes out from vicious orgasms, the priest grows tired of her and plans on sending her to jail
>Son steps in to help ease her burden
>Etc etc, both are subjected to the pleasures of carnal human sin
>Mom gets impregnated, son renounces masculinity for the sake of being a 'breeding' sow
>Happy End

appreciate the content, here's a little thing
>"MOOOO!~"
>Your crotch dampens again as the cow atop you shudders with pleasure, her movements becoming jerky and then stopping altogether.
>And once again, your own orgasm starts to ebb away as she braces herself on your chest.
"Keep going."
>Bessie's whorish tits wobble above you, dribbling milk as she tries to continue, her trembling thighs able to give a few more pumps before they give out.
>Her heavy weight slams onto your lap, hilting you deep within her sopping cunt.
>"I-I'm sorry master *pant* I c-can't keep-"
"I don't remember saying you could speak." You say, cutting her off with irritation.
>The cow bows her head, her laborious breaths washing over you, smelling like grass and fresh hay.
"If you can't please me then what good are you?"
>She squirms at your words, embarrassed and ashamed.
>Lifting her fat bovine ass off of you, she quickly replaces her pussy with her mouth, taking you into her throat.
>She was skilled with her mouth at least, slurping and swallowing your member with ease.
>Cleaning up her mess with her tongue, she starts to slow, needing breaths more and more often.
>It was still pleasant, but not enough.
>Fed up, you grab one of her horns and slam her head down into your crotch, making her gag on your cock.
>You keep her there for a moment, feeling her throat squeeze you as she starts to struggle for air.
>She knows to let you have your way with her, any resistance would only earn her a punishment.
>Bessie's tail whips back and forth anxiously, unable to stay still as her lungs begin to burn.
>Her throat spasms around your cock, trying to gulp down air past your dick to no avail.
>Sighing, you release her head, letting her pull off of you and gasp for precious oxygen, tears running down her cheeks to meet with the saliva and pussy juice smeared across her face.
>Rising from the bed, you seize the coughing cow by her horn again and toss her onto your spot you had left.
"You're lucky, do you know that?"
>Looking down at the still panting cow, you take an ankle in each hand.
"If you were any other minotaur I would have gotten rid of you weeks ago."
>Pulling her legs up so that they were on either side of your head, you line up with her swollen pussy.
"I've kept you around this long because you are quite nice to look at."
>Thrusting into her, you go balls deep immediately, the sound of her thick thighs slapping with your hips reverberating around the room.
>"M-MooOO!"
"Your proportions are rather generous, even for a cow." You say, gripping one of her massive udders and jiggling it for emphasis.
>Giving another strong thrust into her hot cunt, the cow lets out another moo of pleasure, her back arching and head falling backwards.
"However, you only look the part, a true whore knows her pleasure comes second."
>Speeding up, the minotaur grips the bed sheets in her hands, her tongue lolling from her mouth.
"No, what you are is just a lazy, greedy, slut. Your bull must have had to steal just to feed you."
>Putting more strength into your thrusts, the cow's eyes cross and your crotch is soaked again.
>"MOOOOOOOO!~"
>This only makes you go faster, leaning down over her body and pushing her legs above her head.
"I didn't let you serve me just so you could lay there and be a hole to put my cock in."
>Putting her fully into the stretch, you look into her hazy, unfocused eyes.
"You can't expect to pay off your debt like this, you're barely keeping up with the interest as it is."
>"I-Interest?!"
>Giving her a light corrective slap across the snout, you continue.
"Yes, interest. But I wouldn't worry about that, your usefulness to me is quickly running out."
>The cow's eyes are filled with fear, even as she moans and moos though another orgasm.
"I'll admit I've been working you hard, but to be this worn out over a few months is unacceptable."
>You had toyed with the idea of selling her milk, but with how saturated the market was with the stuff it wouldn't be worth the effort, despite the copious amount she made.
"So, what am I supposed to do with you? You can cook and clean, but any animal off the street can do that."
>Bessie's ass ripples as you pound into it, her heavy tits bouncing with the force and slinging milk into the air.
"Should I send you to the authorities? It would be a shame for them to ruin your body in a work camp."
>The desperate moos start to sound suspiciously like no's but you'll let it slide and at least let her plead.
"Speak."
>"P-Please don't sen- MoO! send me- Ahh! there! I-I-I want to serve you m-master!"
"Yes, I am much nicer than they will be. If you're struggling here, you won't last long there."
>"I c-CAN please you! You know I c- MOOO! can, I just n-need more time between- haah~ lovemakinnnng!"
>Feeling yourself start to get close, you think on it a moment, taking a fat leaky nipple in your hand and rolling it though your fingers.
"Hmm, while it's true you did rather well at pleasing me at the start, why shouldn't I recoup some of my losses at this point?"
>The cow's pussy clamps down with fear as she cums again, her eyes wide with fright.
>"MoOOOOoOOoOOOOOOO!"
>She was nearing her limit, maybe one or two more orgasms and she'd be out like a light.
>"Guh-hive me t-till toMOO-rrow, I'll f-figure so-huhmething o-out, please!"
>You wouldn't be happy to see her go, and she did well enough at her other obligations that you decide it was worth it to humor her.
"Until tomorrow then."
>"Oh th-hay-hank moo! Thank y-yohoo mooster!"
>The cow wraps her arms around your back and pulls you against her voluptuous body, her mouth placing grateful kisses across your face and neck as she cums around your cock with relief.
"Before you go, I expect the room cleaned and dinner in two hours so don't sleep for too long."
>"MOO-Kayyyyy!"
>With that, your cow's eyes roll back in her head, lost to the pleasure as she starts to go limp.
>Nearing the end, you get into high gear and savagely pummel into her fat ass, the minotaur too overstimulated to even moan at this point.
>Giving one last thrust, you bury yourself inside as much bovine cunt as you could, emptying your seed into her womb, shot after shot.
>Getting your own breath back, you take pne of Bessie's large nipples into your mouth and suck, sating your thirst with her creamy milk.
>Pulling out, cum dribbles out of her abused and swollen pussy, another thing she'd need to clean.
>Wiping yourself off on her belly, you also wipe a few tears from her cheek and then leave the room.
>Enjoying the breakfast Bessie had made, you try to imagine what she had in store for you.
>You had let her leave to get whatever it was that would solve her problem, she looked nervous but not afraid from what you could tell.
>Maybe she actually had found the solution, or was planning to escape like her bull did.
>Nah, she didn't have the courage for that. And even if she did, she'd be found just like the bull was.
>You weren't sure what his fate had been, but his best hope was to be placed in a work camp, the other possibilities were not as bright.
>In any case, you hadn't told Bessie, letting her believe he'd gotten away and abandoned her with full pockets.
>A kindness or cruelty you weren't sure, but it didn't matter either way, she didn't need to concern herself with those thoughts, it would only distract her.
>Taking another bite of your steak and eggs, you remember how long It took for Bessie to get used to the smells of cooking flesh.
>She used to retch whenever she made you meat, but now it seemed not to bother her, though she still could barely watch you eat it.
>As you were reminiscing, a quick knock comes at the door before it is opened.
>It seems as though your cow was back, along with someone else she was ushering in.
>Curious, you direct your attention to the two, Bessie removing her cloak she wore for public decency.
>"M-Mom?" A feminine voice asks unsurely.
>It came from the new figure, a short calf bundled in a robe, her head only coming up to her mother's breasts.
>You can see the resemblance, she looked like a much thinner and younger Bessie, a little tuft of fur on her head.
>"Oh! Yes I forgot to mention, dear, you need to undress when entering master's home."
>Hesitating and trying not to stare at her mother's body, the calf looks your way.
>You say nothing, simply watching her as you eat your meal.
>Turning her back to you, the young cow slowly lets her robe slide off of her, revealing a delicate body of soft looking skin under a fine coat of fur.
>It lands in a pile around her hooves, the calf covering her crotch with a hand and small breasts with her other arm before turning back to face you.
>While her facial features were almost a match to her mother, her body was the complete opposite.
>She was thin with almost no fat on her, lithe but pear-shaped with decently wide hips for her size.
"Little young yeah?" You say around a mouthful.
>This comment seems to bristle the younger cow, as her retort was quick.
>"I'm eighteen."
>She'd need to be taught proper etiquette on how to speak but that could come later.
"Little small for a cow."
>This only angers her more, but her mother steps in before she can say something she might regret.
>"Y-Yes well, Beaduric may be a little on the smaller side, but I'm sure there won't be any problems with pleasing you." Bessie says pointedly to her daughter.
>Weird name for a cow.
"Hmm."
>Looking over the girl still shielding her privates from you and trying not to look at her mother's to much, you don't find yourself impressed.
"What can she do?"
>Stiffening, the young cow appears to be caught off guard.
>Getting an encouraging nod from Bessie, Beaduric stutters a reply.
>"I c-can cook, clean, do-"
"Your mother does that already. I'm sure she let you know what I need." You say flippantly, waving her off.
>The calf's mouth hangs open as if you had sucked the air out of her lungs.
>Nudging her daughter, Bessie tries to coerce her into talking.
>"I-I-I can f-f-fu f-fffuc-"
"Let me put it this way, your mom is having trouble satisfying me in bed, can you take up the slack?"
>Caught like a deer in headlights, the cow freezes.
"Yes or no girl." You say, unable to keep the rising irritation out of your voice.
>Bessie starts to look worried but before she can say anything, Beaduric stomps on the floor angrily.
>"I'm not a girl!" She shouts, her hands thrown down at her sides with indignation, revealing her body to you.
>Sure enough, when looking at his exposed crotch, a small penis sits where his hand had covered.
>And he wasn't hiding breasts on his chest, although he did look like at least an A cup regardless.
>You couldn't believe you were looking at a bull, though that word might not be the best description.
"Why are you so small?"
>Still looking insulted, the "bull" crosses his arms and pouts, letting out a little "humph".
>"I... wasn't able to give him enough milk after he was born..." Interjects Bessie.
>"I had to sell almost all of it to keep us afloat, when there was still money in it."
>Bessie looks ashamed, unable to look at her son and twiddling her fingers.
>"The rest I drank myself to i-increase my production so I could eventually give some extra to Beaduric, but, well, his father insisted I sell that too instead."
>"He said by the way things were going it wouldn't be worth much soon, and by then I could give all of it to my darling son, but..."
>Scoffing, Beaduric looks like he took a bite out of a lemon.
>"He was right eventually, the deadbeat, but by then it was too late, I'd stopped growing."
>"Oh I'm sorry honey! I know how you must feel about me because of all this..." Bessie cries, covering her eyes with shame.
>Beaduric's angry disposition immediately crumbles as his mother weeps, turning to hug her side as best he could, his arms unable to reach completely around her.
>"I-It's not your fault mom, I don't blame you at all, you know that r-right?"
>"My sweet baby boy, what did I do to deserve you?!" Bessie wails, grabbing her son and bodily lifting him into a bearhug, squishing him between her massive tits.
>Finishing your breakfast, you let the two console each other a little more before getting back to business.
"While this is touching, this doesn't exactly solve the problem. I'm not into males, even if they barely fit that description."
>"W-What?"
>Bessie's mood goes from sad to worried in an instant.
>"But l-look at him! He IS basically a cow, you even thought he was one at first!"
>She thrusts her small son forward in the air so you could look at his feminine body again, noticing him try to cover his little cock that had gotten hard while hugging his mother.
>It was true, his build was so weak that the average cow was easily more of a bull than he was, even his own slutty mother could be considered more masculine.
>Seeing you were thinking about it, Bessie does her best to show off her son, doing all she could to save herself.
>"Why, j-just look at this ass!" Bessie says, turning Beaduric around in her hands to present his butt to you.
>"Nice and taut and smooth as silk!" The desperate heifer ends her sentence with a slap to her sons ass, making him yelp like a schoolgirl.
>"U-U-Um mom...?"
>"Hush now sweetie, mommy knows what's best remember?"
>Spreading her son's cheeks with her fingers, she presents his puckered donut to you.
>"This tight virgin hole would love nothing more than to be stretched by your fat cock! If you think he sounds cute now, w-wait till he's begging for your cum inside him!"
>Bessie was starting to sound a little delirious, but she wasn't making a bad argument.
>"H-He may be inexperienced now but I'll teach him how to suck your dick and use his ass like a pro!"
>Looking over her quivering son for more selling points, the frantic cow spots the "biggest" problem with her pitch.
>"And don't worry about t-this tiny thing." Bessie says, cupping her son's balls and still erect cock. "Even when he's hard it's smaller than my finger!"
>"Just think of it as h-his clit! Or we can cage it and you don't have to worry about it at all!"
>Closing her fingers around Beaduric's member, she hides it from view inside her hand, simulating a cage.
>Unable to find anything else to pimp out her son with, she sets him down with a nervous smile.
>Dazed, Beaduric can't find his footing and stumbles.
>"M-Moommy..."
>Leaning against his mom, he cums, shooting two little strings of white onto his mother's large thigh.
>"A-And he's easy to clean up after, see?" Wiping up the cum with a finger, Bessie pops it into her mouth and licks it clean.
>The silence that followed was deafening.
>You weighed Bessie's promises in your head while she tried not to have a nervous breakdown in front of you.
"If you can deliver on everything you just said, then we don't have a problem anymore."
>Relief explodes on Bessie's face, falling to her knees as she embraces her child.
>"Hahaa! Yes! I'll start training him as soon as I can, thank you master!"
>Holding him close, she peppers Beaduric's face with kisses, snapping him out of his stupor.
>"W-What's going on Mom?"
>"Oh my darling! *muah* You don't know how precious you are to me! *muah* *muah*"
>"Did we c-convince him?"
>"Yes, and it's all thanks to you my wonderful boy!"
>Clearing your throat, you get the attention of the two bovines.
"Clean the table."
>"Go on, your lessons start now dear." Bessie says, giving Beaduric a little push forward.
"Oh, and one more thing." You add as he comes over to you. "I'm shortening your name to Bea, it suits you better."
>Slapping your new slut on the ass who lets out a squeal, you let him take your dishes away, optimistic about this interesting turn of events.
>Having two servants was not as efficient as you had first thought.
>Bessie constantly needed to help Bea with basic tasks, either because he couldn't reach something or he didn't know how to do it correctly.
>Still, an extra pair of small hands did make the Bessie's chores easier, and she seemed happy to work with her son, showing him what needed to be done.
>He was still getting used to the nudity, stealing glances at his mother and covering his body whenever he saw you looking.
>The little perv had been put on dusting duty, the morning's tasks having been taken care of swiftly, his mother preparing lunch in the kitchen.
>Watching as he struggled to dust a tall shelf, you appreciate how his butt jiggled slightly with each jump.
"Do you know how much you look like a little cow, Bea?"
>Bea's shoulders tense at your words, freezing him in place.
>"I-I'm not-"
"I didn't say you could stop."
>Grumbling to himself, Bea continues dusting the shelf, his butt again bouncing as he hopped.
"You really are a pathetic excuse for a bull."
>Clenching a puny hand into a fist, Bea doesn't respond, moving to the piano to dust it next.
"But that's a good thing, bulls don't have curves like yours."
>Bea blushes at your words, but wears a scowl on his face.
"To be honest, even your hips are pretty wide for a young cow, they're-"
>"S-Stop calling me a COW!"
>Whirling to face you, Bea glares at you with fury, his thin arms trembling with rage at his sides.
>Despite the display, he looked as intimidating as a kitten.
"Looks like you like being called a cow to me." You say, gesturing to his crotch.
>Looking down, Bea lets out a high pitched moo, covering his pitiful erection with the duster.
"And since it's your first day and I've been teasing you, I'll ignore that interruption. Do it again and you'll be punished."
>Gulping at your firm words, Bea's anger wanes.
"Go on, you're not done dusting yet." You say, shooing him away.
>Going back to the piano, Bea removes the duster from his crotch so he could continue his chore, replacing it with his other hand quickly.
"Put that hand behind your back."
>Looking uncomfortable, Bea does what you ask, removing the hand concealing his arousal.
"No wonder your mom thought I'd like you. Like she said, with that thing you basically ARE a cow."
>"S-She just said that because she didn't have any other choice." Bea growls cutely.
"Oh, so she lied to me is what you're saying."
>Caught off guard, Bea stumbles and starts stuttering.
>"I-I don't- u-um I m-mean-"
"Bessie, come in here for a moment would you?" You ask through the doorway.
>"Coming master!" Bessie singsongs back.
>The chopping from the other room stops and a pair of hooves clop on the floor as your cow enters the room.
>"Lunch is almost ready, how can I serve you master?" Bessie asks, wearing an apron.
>It was one of the few articles of clothing you let her wear, along with a few less practical articles.
"I just wanted your input for a moment, then you can get back to finishing up."
>"Well of course! How can I help?"
"Would you say Bea looks more like a bull or a cow?" You ask, pointing to Bea. "Be truthful."
>"O-Oh, well..."
>Bessie is conflicted, looking her son over as he stares back at her worriedly.
>"He's not your average bull, b-but that just makes him that much more special to me!" Bessie says sweetly, trying to cushion the blow.
>Bea knows what she meant, his lip trembling.
"That's not what I asked."
>"Oh dear... well he definitely has my hips, that's for sure."
>Looking down at his waist, Bea grabs at his hips self consciously.
>"My eyes and muzzle... oh, my butt too."
>"M-Moooooooom..." Bea whines, squirming at his mothers words, his little cock twitching.
>"I'm sorry honey, but I can't lie to master..."
>Turning more towards you, Bessie takes a breath.
>"With how short and... soft he is, he looks like a cow."
>Bea sniffles, biting his bottom lip as his dick starts to leak.
"What about that cock of his, would you say that it's a bull's cock or is it a cow's clit like you said?"
>Bea's legs begin to shake as his mother looks at his cock, needing all of two seconds for her answer.
>"That's... a cow's clit."
>Screwing his eyes shut, tears streak down Bea's cheeks as he starts cumming from being humiliated by his own mother.
>His cock fires thin streaks onto the floor, his knees knocking together.
>"Oh baby I'm sorry!" Walking over to her son, Bessie crouches down and hugs him into her chest.
>"That doesn't mean you're not still handsome Beaduric." She says, combing her son's tuft of hair with her fingers.
"Well now that that's settled, I think I'll take your mother's idea into consideration and treat you like the proper cow you are Bea."
>Bea glares at you with puffy eyes from his mother's cleavage, wiping his tears on his mothers apron.
"Bessie, Bea is your daughter now, and you will address her as such from now on."
>Glancing down at Bea with concern, Bessie rubs her daughter's shoulder.
>"He- S-She won't like that very much master..."
"Her opinion doesn't matter, now go ahead and finish lunch if you would."
>Bessie kisses Bea goodbye on her head before standing back up.
>"Of course master, I'll have it out soon."
>Leaving you with Bea, Bessie clops back into the kitchen.
>The still defiant girl in front of you struggles to speak, unable to look at your face.
>"I-I'm n-not a c-c-c-cow."
"Clean up your mess." You say, ignoring her, pointing to the streaks she squirted on the floor.
>Obeying, Bea drops to her knees, looking around for a rag.
"With your tongue."
>Shuddering, Bea gets on her hands and lowers her face to the floor, beginning to lick up her cum obediently.
"Good. You'll make a fine cow."
>Lunch had come and gone, a delicious chicken salad for you and leftover veggies and some hay for your two cows.
>Bea had been quiet since she'd been put in her place, picking at her lettuce as she was absorbed in thought.
>Hopefully thinking on how she could better serve you, but you knew that was unlikely, she still needed a bit more adjustment.
>Finishing your lunch, Bessie goes to take your dishes, taking your half empty cup and putting it to her nipple.
"Thank you Bessie, lunch was delicious." You say, giving one of her colossal cheeks a squeeze as she refilled your glass of milk.
>Mooing sweetly, she pushes into your hand to give you more to grope.
>Bea tried to not make it obvious she was watching you two, but the blush on her face and the inch she was sporting easily gave her away.
>She at least seemed to have a quick refractory rate if nothing else.
"I think someone's jealous."
>Bessie giggles at Bea, just as she hurriedly looks away with a little "moo!", covering her shame with her hands.
"Poor thing, she doesn't look too comfortable without her clothes."
>"She'll get used to it I'm sure." Bessie says, more to Bea than you, giving her daughter a look.
"No I understand, she just needs time to adjust."
>Tapping your chin in thought, you get an idea.
"I know, why don't you go out and buy her something nice to wear."
>Confused at first, Bessie cocks her head at you.
>"Master?"
"Get her something to match the white outfit I got you, you know the one, and make it pink."
>A sly smile works up the corners of Bessie's mouth.
>"Anything else?"
"Oh yes, and pick up a cage. I'll let you decide which one."
>Giving the cow a pat on the bum, she takes your dishes into the kitchen.
>"Clothes?" Bea asks, looking hopefully at you.
"Would you like that Bea?"
>For the first time you see her smile and nod.
>"Y-Yes please!"
>Cocking your eye at her, Bea quickly figures out what you want.
>"Please, m-master." Bea hastily adds, blushing again and looking away.
"Good girl."
>Fidgeting uncomfortably, Bea keeps quiet, not wanting to argue and lose her new clothes.
>Bessie soon returns and approaches her daughter, grabbing her shoulders.
>"Stay still now dear."
>Feeling over her daughter's body, Bessie mumbles to herself as her hands roam over Bea.
>"M-Mom?" Bea asks, quivering at her mother's touch.
>"I'm just getting your measurements baby, no need to squirm so much!"
>Bea does her best to obey her mother, but can't help trembling as the hands feel her up, failing to stifle her slutty moans.
>Feeling around her daughter's hips and ass, Bessie moves to her crotch.
>"Oh, your clitty needs to be soft dear."
>"I-It's not ahHHN!~"
>Bessie takes the impotent cock between her fingers, giving it a few pumps before it bursts into her palm.
>"That's a good girl~ get nice and soft for mommy." Bessie coos.
>Grabbing onto her mother for support, Bea moos helplessly as she's forced to cum.
>Licking her palm clean, Bessie pokes and squeezes Bea's useless member for a moment before mumbling again and nodding to herself.
>Leaving her daughter standing there shaking like a leaf, Bessie takes her cloak and dons it.
>"I'll be back soon master!" Bessie says. "Be good for him Bea."
>Brought out of her stupor by Bessie's words, Bea meekly responds.
>"O-Okay bye mom, a-and I w-will."
>With that, Bessie leaves, closing the door behind her.
>Polishing off your glass, you place it in Bea's hands and walk to the living room, taking a seat on the couch.
>The sound of running water soon breaks the silence, with an occasional clink of a dish being heard.
>Relaxing into the couch, you feel a little tired. A quick nap would be nice.
>It doesn't take long before the water shuts off and Bea wanders into the living room after you.
>Seeing you, she stops abruptly, unsure what to do with herself.
"Come here Bea." You say, patting the spot next to you.
>Sheepishly covering herself again as her cheeks tinge red, Bea obeys and comes closer.
>Gingerly sitting on the cushion, Bea keeps a healthy distance between you two.
"Finish all your chores?"
>"Yes... master." Bea answers quietly.
"Good, well I only have one thing left for you to do then."
>Tensing as you put a hand across her back, Bea yelps as you push her down onto the couch.
>"W-Wait! I'm not r-"
"Quiet."
>Covering her own mouth with a hand, Bea shuts her eyes and trembles, letting you grope her ass freely.
>It wasn't as impressive as her mother's, but it was silky, springy, and elastic, good enough for what you were going to use it for.
>Bea's tail was pressed down into her crack, shielding her entrance and wrapped around one leg protectively.
>You leave it be for now, patting her butt and laying your head back on her cheeks.
>Relaxing into your new pillow, Bea's shaking stops, letting out a sigh of relief.
"I'm going to take a nap, try not to move too much or I'll have to do something else to pass the time."
>Catching your meaning, Bea goes still, doing her best pillow impression.
>Getting comfortable on your pillow, you quickly slip into unconsciousness.
>"I'm hooooome!" Bessie singsongs, the door closing behind her.
>Opening your eyes, you sit up and shake the grogginess from your head, getting ready for what was to come.
>Bea relaxes into the couch, her job as a pillow over for now.
>Entering the living room, Bessie spots you two on the couch and grins, holding a fancy shopping bag in the air.
>They had just want you wanted master!"
"Perfect, why don't you show Bea what you got her and help her get dressed?"
>"Can do!" Bessie says gleefully, setting down the bag on the coffee table.
>Curious, Bea gets up from the couch and goes over to her mother, eager to dress herself.
>Bessie pulls out several pieces of clothing, covered in bright pink cowprint.
>Bea to her credit seemed to have been expecting this, only deflating a little.
>Still, she starts putting on the outfit, her mother helping her with the more tricky pieces.
>First to go on was a string bikini bra, hearts cut into it to reveal her erect nipples.
>Then a tight sleeveless crop top went over it, cut high enough to still show off her bra and chest.
>Her panties were next, matching her bra it was a high leg side tie bikini bottom.
>And of course it was crotchless, the heart cutout letting her clit poke freely into the air.
>Seeing that she was being clothed in the girliest, most revealing clothing possible, Bea starts tearing up, refusing to help put on any more.
>Not seeming to mind, her mother takes up the slack, humming along as she dressed her daughter up like the little cow slut she was.
>Next was a pair of thighhighs along with a pair of arm warmers that ended in gloves, covered with pink cowprint like all the rest.
>And last but not least was a thick leather collar, hot pink with a cowbell hanging off the front.
>Straightening the bows that held Bea's panties and bra on, Bessie takes a step back to look at her work.
>"Oh aren't you just the cutest thing!" Bessie gushes, putting her hands on her cheeks.
>"I can't WAIT to put mine on as well, be right back sweetie!"
>Nearly skipping out of the room, Bessie leaves behind her silently crying daughter, barely able to stand straight from how badly she was shaking.
>Looking her over, you admit covering a cow with cowprint was like putting a hat on a hat, but it was exactly what you had been looking for.
"No need to tell me how much you love it, I can see for myself that you can't get enough."
>Knowing exactly what you meant, Bea looks down anyway, her little cock poking out of her panties and betraying her once again.
>Letting out a sob, Bea doesn't even try to cover herself, simply standing there and letting you look over her body lecherously.
"Why don't you do a little twirl for me?"
>Doing a poor spin, Bea shows you her rear and you see that her panties were backless, letting her tail and ass hang out.
>A pair of hooves and a ringing cowbell accompany Bessie as she struts back into the living room.
>She was dressed in the exact same outfit as Bea, the only differences being hers was much larger with classic white cowprint and cartoon cow heads for cutouts instead of hearts.
>Seeing her daughter again, Bessie can't help but pull her into a hug, mooing and squeeing with delight.
>"Oh I almost forgot!"
>Remembering something, Bessie puts Bea down and fishes around in the lingerie bag.
>Pulling out a pink bow, Bessie grabs Bea's tail and ties it on the end, completing the outfit.
>"There you are, perfect."
>Beaming at you, Bessie presents her daughter.
>"What do you think master?"
"You did an excellent job Bessie." You say with a nod.
>Happily clapping, Bessie looks down at her daughter.
>"Master bought you all these nice clothes, what do you say Bea?"
>Struggling with the words, Bea can't look at either of you.
>"Th-Thank y-you m-m-m-master."
"You're very welcome Bea, but you can really thank me by dancing with your mom."
>"Eee! C'mon Bea, Show mommy what you got!"
>Twisting her body, Bessie's tits slosh back and forth throwing droplets of milk around, her cowbell clanging with the movement.
>Watching her mother, Bea timidly copies her, her tears slowing.
>Unlike her mother, Bea's A cups stayed where they were on her chest, but her movements were cute nevertheless.
>"Shake whatcha' mama gave ya girl!" Bessie cheers happily, hip checking Bea.
>Stumbling from the gargantuan hip bumping her, Bea watches her mother shake her ass for you.
>Doing her best to mimic her mom, Bea shyly turns and gives you an eyeful of her butt, wiggling it.
>Again, she couldn't hold a candle to her mother, but her jiggling peach had it's own charm compared to Bessie's wobbling booty.
>Your cattle were starting to get into it, both their bells clanging as they twerked and gyrated, Bea even trying some of her own moves.
>Enjoying the sight of both your cows bouncing their asses for you, your pants begin to feel tight.
>Standing from the couch, you unbuckle your pants, letting them drop to the floor.
>Hearing the noise, Bessie looks over her shoulder at you and smiles nervously.
>"B-Bea, another rule you should know is when master undoes his pants like that, that means he's ready to fuck."
>At the last word, Bea acts like a bolt of lightning hit her, making her spring up in the air.
>Sitting back down on the couch, you say nothing, letting Bessie lead Bea over to you.
>Bea's eyes were locked onto the bulge in your underwear until her mom plants her butt right on top of it.
>The little cow looks at you with fright, her eyes wide as she stares.
>Reaching up and grabbing a small horn, you pull Bea's face into yours, kissing her deeply.
>Bea moos submissively as you dominate her mouth, squirming in her seat.
>Her flat teeth click against your sharp ones, her wide tongue letting yours pin it.
>Putting her arms around your head, Bea presses her body to yours, her clit sandwiched between you two.
>She moans into your mouth, trying to suck more of you into her before you break the kiss.
>Panting, Bea almost goes in for another kiss before you stop her.
"Lets see how good you are at kissing something else." You say, signaling Bessie.
>Pulling Bea off of you, Bessie plops her between your legs, kneeling behind her.
>Scooting forward so Bea's butt was against her crotch, Bessie straddles her from behind, her heavy tits resting on Bea's shoulders.
>"N-Now let's impress him." Bessie says, voice quavering for a moment.
>"Pull his cock out Bea, don't make him wait."
>Reaching up to your waistline with shaky hands, Bea pulls down your underwear, not ready for you to flop out onto her face.
>"Ah!"
>Looking at the meat across her muzzle, Bea's mouth hangs open, drool starting to drip out of her mouth.
>Her starry eyes can't look away, awestruck by your length.
>Seeing her daughter in complete cock shock, Bessie chuckles.
>"See honey, this is what a REAL cock looks like."
>Bea mindlessly pushes her face forward into your crotch, her flat nose taking a huge whiff of your balls.
>"O-Oooohhhhhh~"
>*sprt* *sprt*
>Overwhelmed by your scent, Bea cums on the front of the couch, her clit twitching like crazy.
>Unconsciously, Bea lets her tongue out and drags it up your shaft, coating it with her spit.
>Going for another lick, her mom pulls her back.
>"You're going to have to do better than that dear, let momma show you how it's done first."
>Taking your cock in her hand, Bessie gives the tip a lick before sucking you into her mouth.
>Her tongue swirls around your length, her hand stroking whatever wasn't currently inside her.
>With each bob of her head, the bell around Bessie's neck clangs, starting a rhythm.
>Having warmed up, Bessie takes you into her throat, her lips placing a kiss on your base.
>"Whoa..." Bea says from between her mother's ample cleavage, surprised her mom could take you in one stroke.
>Not slowing down, Bessie rises up and quickly swallows you again, her breasts laying on your thighs.
>Grabbing a huge nipple in each hand, you pinch them between your fingers, warm milk spraying out.
>Bessie moans into your cock, the vibrations making your cock tingle.
"Mmm, good girl Bessie."
>Giving you a few more bobs, the large cow pulls off of you with a *pop*.
>Letting saliva spill from her mouth, Bessie pushes Bea forward.
>"O-Okay Bea, show me what you've learned."
>Gulping, the small cow closes her eyes as she brings your head to her lips, giving it a kiss.
>Opening her mouth, Bea sucks on your tip, getting as much as she could inside.
>It wasn't much, but it was good enough to keep you stimulated.
>"Okay Bea, get him into your throat like I showed you."
>Trying to fit more of you into her, Bea brings her head down as far as she could, your tip brushing the back of her mouth.
>Coughing, Bea tries again, but is stopped once more by her gag reflex.
>"No, no, no, like this Bea."
>Gripping both of Bea's horns, Bessie pushes her head down into your crotch, forcing your cock deeper.
>"MmMGHhp!"
>Bessie keeps the pressure on, driving you into Bea another inch.
>Struggling against her mom, Bea tries to pull off of you but Bessie is stronger, getting her down to your base.
>Your cock bulges out Bea's throat, pressing into the back of her pink collar.
>Her tears had started up again, running down her cheeks as she convulsed.
>*sprt* *sprt* *sprt*
>Pulling her back, Bessie removes you from Bea's throat.
>Coughing and sputtering, Bea can only gasp as she chokes down air.
>"Okay, deep breath!"
>Bessie doesn't wait long for Bea to recover, slamming her down balls deep in one go.
>"Good girl! Keep going, master is getting close!"
>She was right, you feel your orgasm fast approaching despite the sloppy and amateurish blowjob.
>Rising up, Bea is quickly forced back down, gagging on your cock again, her bell clanging away.
>It was quite the sight, Bea barely holding on as she was repeatedly forced by her own mother to ruin her throat on you.
>Spittle sprayed from from her mouth and nose, her teary eyes rolled back in her head as she took you to the base again and again.
>You grunt, alerting Bessie that your limit was reached.
>"Okay Bea, mouth open and tongue out!"
>Taken off of your cock for the last time, Bea does as she's told, coughing up spit as she lolls her tongue out.
>Pumping your shaft, Bessie lines up your tip with Bea's mouth.
>"It's coming Bea, now don't swallow it all, master likes to see our hard work!"
>Your tip was placed squarely on Bea's tongue, her mouth panting hot air over it, eagerly waiting for your seed.
>"C'mon master! Give my little girl a nice mouthful of your thick human cum!"
>Encouraged by Bessie, you couldn't last any longer, your cum shooting down your cock and into Bea's slutty mouth.
>Shot after shot splattered into Bea, her mouth quickly filling up and pushing out her cheeks.
>Seeing as her daughter couldn't fit anymore, Bessie takes over and suckles on your tip, getting her own reward.
>Finishing inside Bessie, she tenderly licks your head as your orgasm subsides, popping you out of her mouth after she's sure you're spent.
>Showing off her prize, Bessie opens her mouth and swirls the cum inside with her tongue, Bea doing the same.
>Grabbing her daughter's face, Bessie angles Bea's head up so that their lips meet, Bessie pushing her cum into Bea's mouth.
>Moaning, Bea swishes her mouthful around before giving it back to Bessie, who takes it happily.
>Snowballing your load to each other back and forth, Bea starts swallowing.
>Struggling with the amount, Bessie rubs Bea's throat with her hand, helping her gulp it down.
>Swallowing throatily, Bea twitches, her clit shooting again.
*sprt* *sprt*
>As Bea finished her reward, Bessie ends the kiss, nuzzling her daughter lovingly.
>"Good job sweetie~ Don't forget to thank master."
>Her mouth finally empty, Bea looks at you, her face a complete mess.
>"T-Thank you mooster, it- it was really g-good."
>Bending down, Bea laps up your spilled cum, her spit, and her own cum off the couch, getting every last drop.
>"Don't fill up too fast Bea, we haven't started round two yet."
>"R-R-Round two?!"
>As if on cue, your cock starts to rise again, encouraged by the fear in Bea's voice.
>"Honey, we're not even CLOSE to done yet. Take a break and watch mommy, you'll need it."
>Rising from her crouched position, Bessie steps over Bea to get on the couch, covering her daughter with wet arousal from her drooling pussy.
>Straddling you, Bessie's thick cowprinted thighs frame your cock, the tip brushing against her panties and dripping lips.
>Letting out a breath, Bessie lets her hips fall, spearing you all the way inside her in one go.
>"HNnMOOOO!"
>Getting her first orgasm out of the way, Bessie leans forward, her large tits pressed against you and the back of the couch.
>She takes a moment to adjust, wiggling her hips to feel you inside her.
>"Oh Bea... This cock is going to ruin you just like it did me."
>With that, Bessie raises her hips and drives them down again, a wet slap sounding through the room.
>Bessie's cunt was boiling, her walls gripping your meat and bathing it with her natural lubricant.
>Getting into a rhythm, Bessie's cowbell rings along with her ass plaping in your lap, accompanied by occasional needy moos.
>Her voluptuous body jiggled with every slap of her hips, her plump waist and legs making nice places to grab, her fat squishing under your fingers delightfully.
>"Haah!~ YEssss! Squeeze me ma-HAHster!"
>Bessie's fur was damp with sweat, her breaths heavy as she continued to impale herself on your rod.
>Everything about her screamed fertile, but as a consequence of all her curves, she wasn't very athletic.
>She was still a Minotaur however.
>Leaning back, Bessie angles your cock to hit her favorite spot, stabilizing herself by holding onto your shoulders.
>"Ah! Ah! Ahhh! Right th- therrreeeee~!"
>Her huge tits bounce in your face, milk spraying everywhere as they clapped against each other inside her loose top.
>Snagging a nipple with each hand through either cow shaped opening, you tweak the sensitive buds and are treated to a shower of milk.
>"MOOoOOOooOOO!"
>Letting her head fall back, Bessie moos at the ceiling as she cums again, your crotch flooded with her juices.
>The tempo of the plaps felt and sounded noticeably wetter, Bessie's milk, sweat, and juices coating both of you liberally.
>Her bra and panties were soaked through, the inside of her drenched thighs covered with sticky strings attached to each other and your crotch.
>Bessie's second orgasm was taking a toll on her, her speed had slowed and she needed to occasionally rest her hips on your lap, grinding and stirring your cock inside her.
>Her breaths came as pants now, her tongue hanging loosely from her mouth.
>She was doing good, you could feel yourself starting to reach your peak as well, three orgasms usually being the limit for Bessie before she became a glorified fleshlight.
>The big cow moos as you give her immense rump a spank, her legs shaking more and more each time she sits on you.
"I'm getting close Bessie, give me a good finish."
>"Y-Yes moohstarrr..."
>Speeding back up, Bessie's pants become faster and more forceful, almost snorting with each breath.
>She gets a determined look on her face, her hips slapping faster and faster, leaning forward again so she could use her ass easier.
>The smacks of her thighs meeting your lap reach a blinding top speed, her pussy squelching around your cock each time.
>"Nheed cum, need coom, n-need cuhm." Bessie chants to herself between thrusts.
>Her ass was a blur, slap after slap raining down on you as she worked for your cum.
>The cowbell around her neck was ringing nonstop, looking like it was going to fly off at any second.
>Making your hips rise up to meet Bessie's with each thrust, the cow moos loudly, about to cum again.
>"Mahster! I ne-heed your- AH! c-cum ins-hide m-Moo! N-Need it DE-HEEEP in m-my womb!" Bessie begs.
>Grabbing onto Bessie's hips, you put more force into your thrusts, the big girl spasming as she started to cum.
>"Mark me-hee as y-yours!"
>Reaching the point of no return, you slam home, Bessie's legs giving out and driving you as deep as you could get, her ass pinning you to the couch.
>"MOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!~" Bessie screams, her pussy clamping down on you tightly.
>Your load fired into the needy cow's pussy, directly into her womb and painting her walls white with your seed.
>You hear a girlish voice cry out as well, higher pitched than Bessie's motherly tone.
>Filling your cow to the brim with your hot spunk, Bessie grinds your cock into herself, trying to milk out every last drop.
>"Thank you m-master, I love it when you f-fill me up."
>Resting heavily against you, Bessie closes her eyes, getting her breath back.
>Even for her bulk, Bessie was still comfortable enough to let her rest on you, her tits and thighs doing a great job of cushioning her body.
>The two of you stay like that for a moment, with you rubbing her back and groping her ass.
>Then, Bessie lifts herself up with a *shlorp*, your cock slipping free of her puffy hole.
>Rolling off of you, Bessie lands with her back on the couch, spent.
>"Okay Bea, y-your turn."
>Hearing her name, Bea stops playing with her clit, gulping.
>The little cow was petrified, her eyes locked onto your member dripping with cum and her mother's juices.
>Despite this, she still leaned forward from her kneeling position, letting your drooping cock rest on her face once more.
>Her shaky breath washed over you, her eyes closing as her face was further stained by sticky fluids.
>Nuzzling into your cock, Bea licks at your balls, taking one into her mouth and gently sucking.
>The other one was next, Bea cleaning your nuts expertly with her wide tongue.
>Soon your cock rose from her face, ready for its new hole.
>Letting out a whimper, Bea pulls back, knowing what she needed to to.
>But before she moved, her mother called out to her from the couch.
>"Come here baby, let me make it easier for you." Bessie says, sliding her bra up and letting her boobs free.
>Quickly standing, Bea trots over to her mom, wanting anything to distract her from what was coming.
>Once she was close enough, Bessie sits up and plucks Bea from the floor, lifting her up by her hips.
>Turning her daughter so that she was upside down and her butt was facing toward her face, Bessie plunges her muzzle between Bea's cheeks.
>"A-AH!~"
>Held firmly upside down between her mother's breasts, Bea could do little else other than let her mother make out with her ass.
>Squirming against the tongue inside her, Bea spreads her legs wide to let Bessie deeper inside, making little girlish moos.
>Removing her tongue, Bessie places a kiss on one of Bea's cheeks, turning the girl right side up again and facing her at you.
>Setting the prepped cow down on the couch, Bessie pats her bottom encouragingly.
>"Go on now. Remember, master doesn't like to wait."
>Taking a wobbly step on the couch, Bea nervously makes her way over to you, placing a hoof on either side of your legs, her sopping ass facing you.
>Squatting down, Bea takes your cock in her gloved hand and lines you up, fitting your tip inside the back of her panties and between her cheeks.
>She stops as she feels you press against her snug ring, her nerves getting the better of her.
>Grabbing a double handful of her tight ass, Bea moos as you squeeze her, relaxing and letting an inch of you inside.
>"OHHhhhggghhhhh-!"
>Taking you inside her for the first time, Bea clenches back up, squeezing her prostate against your tip and making herself cum.
>*sprt* *sprt*
>As her clit squirts, Bea loosens up again, another inch slipping inside.
>"GHAHHhhhh!"
>This time Bea stays still, panting as she recovered from her orgasm.
>"Keep going dear, you're not even half way yet." Bessie instructs. "Just because you came doesn't mean you can stop."
>Taking a breath, Bea tries to fit more of you in, letting her butt drop another half inch.
>"Moooooo~"
>Straining, Bea tries to keep going, but appears stuck.
>"I-I can't! I can't take any m-more, he's huge!" Bea says, looking between her legs at your cock.
>"If you're my daughter, yes you can. You just need a little help, here, let momma give it to you."
>Standing up from the couch, Bessie moves on tired legs over to Bea, kneeling in front of you like she did before.
>Wrapping her hands around her daughter's hips, Bessie gives Bea a tender kiss, calming her trembling.
>Accepting the kiss gratefully, Bea moans as her mother coos soothingly.
>Once she thinks she's ready, Bessie then begins pushing on Bea's hips, driving her down.
>"A-ahh! M-Mommy!"
>Forced to fit more of you inside, Bea's little inch spurts over her mother's breasts, little drops landing in Bessie's expansive cleavage.
>The larger cow kept going, penetrating her daughter further and further onto your cock, Bea's clit twitching and squirting like mad the whole way down.
>"I-I can't- AHH! *sprt* "It won't fi- Uhhnn!~" *sprt* "Mom stah-HAH-P!" *sprt* "Mommy noooughhh~" *sprt* *sprt* "M-MOOMMY!" *sprt* "MOOOOOOO!" *sprt* *sprt* *sprt*
>Flattening her daughter's prostate against your cock, Bessie just giggles at Bea, her huge tits sprinkled with liquid love.
>Finally getting her hips down into your lap, Bessie hilts you inside Bea completely, the little cow violently shaking from back to back orgasms.
>Limply falling back against your chest, Bea struggles to stay conscious, mooing with each ragged breath.
>"Oh Bea, I'm so proud of you! Your first cock!~" Bessie gushes, feeling at the bulge in Bea's taut tummy.
>Weakly looking down at herself, Bea joins her mother's gloved hand with hers, rubbing your cock through her belly.
>"S-So f-f-f-fulllllllll."
"Your pussy feels amazing my little cow." You say, feeling up Bea's sides and playing with her small nipples through the holes in her bra.
>Bea clenches on you, making a noise.
"Nice and tight, just like your mom said."
>Beaming, Bessie nuzzles Bea on her cheek affectionately.
"Maybe even a bit too tight, but it won't be hard to stretch you out."
>Pulling on the buds between your fingers, Bea writhes against you, trying to free her chest.
"Oh, you've got sensitive little titties huh girl?"
>Pinching her nipples, Bea moos, grinding against your cock.
>"M-not-"
"Not what, girl? Did my cow's brains get scrambled after she took all of her master's cock?"
>Struggling against your teasing hands, Bea forces out the words.
>"Y-You can order me around, change my- Ahhn! n-name, dress me in s-slutty clothes, and f-fuck me with your g-giant cock, b-but I'm not a g-g-girl!"
>"Bea!" Bessie scolds. "Master gave your pussy a gift and you backtalk him? I raised you better than that."
>Crossing her arms, Bea pouts, clenching around your cock.
"Well, well, I thought we already established this, I suppose you must not have realized it yet cow."
>Patting one of Bea's thigh-highs reassuringly you whisper into her ear.
"Don't worry, I'll help you."
>Bea shivers at your words, letting out a frightened moo.
"Bessie, you said you drank your own milk to make more when it should've gone to Bea?"
>Looking to the side ashamed, Bessie nods.
>"Yes... for extra to sell. I needed to drink a lot to make more milk but it worked, that's also why I'm a little more... plump than other cows, drinking that much milk fills a girl out a-heh..."
>Accentuating her point, Bessie jiggles her tits, making them slosh and drip their white cream.
"What are you doing with all that extra milk now?"
>"W-Well like you said it's not worth it to sell, so I've been getting rid of what we don't use."
"Why are you doing that? You've got a little cow here to feed." You say, patting Bea on her chest.
>She whimpers, the cock inside her warm hole still hard as ever.
"I want you to start feeding Bea your milk. Only. No hay, no grass, only milk for your growing girl."
>"But master, I don't understand... she's not a calf anymore." Bea says, confused.
"Oh but she is, look how small she is, she's got plenty of room to grow."
>Rubbing Bea's tiny breasts and thighs, Bessie realizes what you mean.
>"Oh! Of course master, only milk from now on!" Bessie nods, looking delighted.
"Make sure she drinks as much as she can, and you can have the rest when she's finished, try not to throw away anymore."
>"Yes master, I'll make sure we don't waste it."
>Bea puts two and two together and squeezes your cock, figuring out what you two were planning.
>"M-Mommy..."
>Cupping Bea's cheek in a hand, Bessie smiles sweetly at her daughter.
>"Oh Bea, I'll be able to give you all the milk you should've had and more."
>Bea snivels, knowing there was nothing she could do to stop your idea.
>Patting the cheek she was holding, Bessie wipes away a budding tear.
>"Now, now, I think you've had enough time to get used to his cock, get fucking girl."
>Feebly rising from her squat, Bea slowly comes back down, moaning out through sniffles.
>"Faster, or do I need to help again?"
"It's okay Bessie, it is her first time after all. I've got a better idea."
>Standing from the couch, you take Bea with you, with her legs unable to support her she slides back down your cock to the base with a *plap*.
>"HaAAH!~" *sprt* *sprt*
"Lay down on the couch, would you Bessie?"
>Doing as she was told, your heifer climbs on the couch and gets on her back.
>Pulling Bea off your rod with a *pop* the little cow can't help but moo slutilly.
>Laying her down on top of her mother, Bessie pulls Bea up between her tits and places her so that her armpits fit right atop her breasts, their faces almost parallel.
>"W-What's he doing mom?!"
>Stroking her daughter's tuft of hair, Bessie murmurs and moos gently, attempting to calm Bea down.
>"Master is going to pop your cherry and make you a woman dear."
>Taking a cheek in each of her hands, Bessie spreads her daughters ass for you.
>"Claim my daughter's virginity master~"
>Positioning yourself between Bessie's thighs, you dip your dick back inside the big cow, lubing yourself up again.
>Bessie moos appreciatively, her pussy trying to keep you inside as you pull out of her and line up with Bea.
>Holding onto her mother tightly, Bea screws her eyes closed, bracing herself.
>Her hole clenches against her mother's hands, trying to keep you out but only looking more inviting as it opened and closed.
>Sticking your head inside, you feel her ass winking, trying to force you out.
>"Hnnn!~"
>Fitting the rest of your cock inside with one thrust, Bea's hole squelches as it was filled, coated with your cum and Bessie's juices.
>"GAHHhhhhnnn!"
>Bea's pussy twitches rhythmically, letting you know her sandwiched clit was cumming between her and her mother.
>Waiting no time, you pull back and thrust all the way in again, faster this time.
>"Ohhhh f-fuck!"
>"Language Bea, though I suppose this is a special case..."
>Rubbing her daughter's back, Bessie does her best to soothe the little cow as you wind up for another thrust.
>Plapping against Bea's cheeks, the girl squeals, clenching around you again as she cums.
"I hope you can hold on Bea." You say, leaning over the two cows. "I'll let you be my fuckhole this time, but you're going to need to figure out how to last."
>Slamming home again, Bea can only moan with pleasure.
"Or at least find some way to still please me while cumming your brains out, you little quick shot."
>Picking up the pace, you angle your cock downwards, crushing your small cow's prostate with each thrust.
>With every push into her tight ring, Bea's moos get louder and louder, her composure falling apart.
>Her ass began to turn red from the harsh pounding, her cheeks blushing as they rippled.
>Going faster, Bea's moans started to get choppy from your powerful strokes.
>Biting her lip, Bessie hugs Bea close, giving the girl a kiss.
>"I can feel his fat cock through your tummy Bea, he's really fucking your pussy hard isn't he?"
>Bea can only answer with a strained "YES!" before she goes back to her mindless moaning and mooing.
>"That's my girl~"
>Putting more power into your thrusts, Bessie starts to move as well, her tits wobbling on either side of Bea.
>Both their cowbells were ringing now, synced up with each slap of Bea's ass as it was ravaged.
>You had lost count of how many times the little cow had cum, but it was more than her mother could have managed and still stay conscious.
"You're impressing me Bea, despite lasting all of one thrust, here you are, still able to moo your heart out."
>Bea's only answer is to change all her moans to moos, her surprisingly long tongue lolling loosely out of her mouth.
>Bracing yourself on one of Bessie's huge milky tits, you grip the back of Bea's neck and give it a squeeze.
>"MOOOoOoOOoOOOO-!" Bea cries, her voice cracking.
>Her tail thrashes side to side, the bow on the end just a blur of pink.
>Bea's ass lifts up into you on instinct, loosening up a bit as well, letting you drive into her further.
"Oh, did my little cow like that?"
>"YeHEhh- Y-Y-Y-MOOO~ YAheeEEEE-!"
>Giggling at her drooling, incoherent daughter, Bessie looks up at you and smiles.
>"No, she LOVED it master~"
>Feeling yourself start to approach the edge, you jackhammer into Bea, the the two bovines rocking and jiggling with every powerful thrust.
>Bea was in another world, screaming and yelping at the top of her lungs, your cock fucking her stupid as her back to back to back orgasms overloaded her brain.
>She couldn't even moo anymore, only able to make high pitched squeals and shrieks, her eyes rolling back in her head.
>"Aww, her first mind break~" Bessie coo's.
>It was getting easier and easier to plow Bea, her ass loosening up and accepting your cock greedily.
>Bea's cheeks had turned a bright red as you blew her back out, the sheer punishment you were putting into her starting to make her pass out.
>As you felt her body begin to go limp, you took your other hand off Bessie's giant boob and grab Bea's tail.
>Giving it a tug, Bea's head cranes back, her open mouth letting out her loudest moo yet.
>Bessie's eyes sparkled as she watched her daughter get railed to oblivion, mooing alongside Bea happily.
>"Go on master! Give your cow's tight pussy your hot creamy filling!"
>Groaning, you give Bea's neck another squeeze, hilting in her wet sloppy hole, pushing inside as far as you could.
>You cum hard, blasting Bea's insides with your jizz, filling her up shot by shot.
>Bea just gurgles, only half conscious but loving the feeling of her ass packed full of your seed.
>Running out of cum to blast into Bea, your orgasm subsides, your cock spent.
>As you slowly pull out, Bea's pussy clenches around you, trying to keep as much of your gift inside her as possible.
>It was only marginally successful, her hole stretched enough by your cock beating that she gaped, dripping your cum down her taint and onto her mother.
>Admiring your work, you catch your breath and point to the lingerie bag still on the table.
"Did you find one that you liked Bessie?"
>Looking to where you were pointing, Bessie simply nods, whispering sweet nothings into her daughter's ear.
>Rising from the couch, you stretch your back and walk over to the table, fishing out a small box from the bag.
>Returning to the cows, you thread an arm between Bea and Bessie and lift Bea bodily out from her mother's cleavage.
>Pulling her into your lap, Bea lays heavily against you, almost comatose.
"You did good little cow, but there's one last piece to your outfit."
>Opening the box, you find a small cage inside, hot pink like the rest of her clothes.
>Taking it out, you put Bea's limp cock in it, needing to squeeze it inside a bit even for her tiny size.
>With the other half around her little sack, it clicked into place, locking tight.
>Taking the keys out of the box, you jingle them in front of Bea's droopy eyes.
"I'll free you once you can please me all by yourself, until then, your clit is going to stay in that cage."
>Not responding, Bea nuzzles into the nape of your neck, letting out a weak moo.
>"Oh Bea, look at the mess you made..." Says Bessie, looking down at herself.
>The cow's stomach was coated with Bea's watery cum, giving it a glossy sheen.
>"Aww, you used your mommy's bellybutton for your clit, that's so cute~"
>Stretching her tummy, Bessie squishes her navel, filled with her daughter's transparent liquid love.
"Go on Bea, help your mother."
>Giving the little cow back to Bessie, the heifer takes her from you and places her back on top of herself the same way when she prepped her.
>"I'll clean you up too baby... My word! Master really did a number on your butt didn't he?" Bessie says, rubbing Bea's tender cheeks.
>Sticking her face into her daughter's ass again, Bessie's tongue delves into Bea's abused hole, cleaning her up.
>"GuUUHUUUUUHHhhhnn~"
>Brought back to the world of the living, Bea arches her back as the wet tongue explores her pussy.
>Slowly relaxing back down onto her mother's belly as she adjusts to the long muscle inside her, Bea's own cum smears over her face.
>Knowing what to do, Bea uses her tongue to lazily lap at her mess, scooping up the liquid and bringing it into her mouth.
>The two stay like that for a moment, cleaning each other, Bea slurping her cum out of her mother's navel like a belly shot, her mother giggling as her daughter's tongue tickled her.
>Soon the two finished, Bessie Sliding Bea down further into her crotch.
>"If you wouldn't mind dear?"
>Doing as Bessie asked, Bea pressed her face into her mother's cunt, her own tongue doing the exploring now.
>"Moo~ Just like that hun~"
>Having rested enough, you decide to join in and go over to Bessie, letting her suck you clean as well while her daughter tended to her.
>A week or two had passed since Bessie had given her daughter to you, your new acquisition accommodating to her new life slowly.
>She initially complained about her cage, rubbing the little thing whenever her clit tried to get hard.
>But she knew the rules, she was staying locked up until she could preform adequately.
>So with help from Bessie, Bea started training her holes, soon able to deepthroat you in one stroke like her mother.
>Unfortunately however, Bea remained a quickshot, her stamina actually decreasing as she become more adept.
>Funnily enough, Bea's cage actually did come off despite her lacking skill, though it was released without your permission.
>As you were viciously plowing Bea's hole after another failed attempt at pleasing you, her little pink cage just flew away with one of your thrusts.
>Initially suspecting she had found a way to take it off, you had gone searching for her cage, intending to lock it back on along with a significant punishment.
>After you found the thing in the corner of the room, you had to go get the key and unlock it as it had closed again.
>Shutting it over Bea's clit, you got ready to reprimand her when her cage hit the ground with a *tink*
>Thinking she must have broken it, you look it over for any cracks or pieces missing, finding nothing.
>Confused, you put it on her again just for it to fall off once more, but this time you realized what had happened.
>Bea was simply too small for her cage now, she hadn't tampered with it at all, it had just slipped off.
>Instead of chastising her, you praised Bea for obeying you and not touching her clit long enough that her already insignificant size had shrunk by half.
>Bea ate your approval up, her little clitty standing proud at barely half an inch.
>As a reward, you allowed her to stay cageless, under the stipulation that her newly freed nub was off limits.
>This wasn't hard for her as days ago Bea had changed from rubbing her clit to fingering herself, finding that she loved the feeling of being filled much more.
>But still determined to please you and meet the goal you had set for her, Bea tried powering through her orgasms, making her legs pump and head bob even while her whole body spasmed.
>It was slow going, her record being seven of her quick orgasms before she just couldn't continue.
>You still needed to help the two cows and fuck them, but you were impressed enough by Bea's progress that you allowed them time to improve.
>Bessie at least seemed more energetic, a little pep in her step when going around the house doing her chores, able to complete them fast enough to have a little time for herself.
>That time was usually occupied with feeding Bea extra milk between meals, like the one you were finishing up now.
>Taking the last bite of your hamburger, you look over at Bessie, the cow holding Bea in her lap as she nursed from her teat.
"Very good job with dinner Bea, you've learned a lot from your mother over these past several days."
>Pulling off her mother's large nipple with a *pop*, Bea lets out a tiny burp.
>"Oh, excuse me. T-Thank you master, I've been trying really hard to cook your m-meat just how you like it."
"And you've also started looking more like a true cow, just look at those boobs!"
>The little calf was beginning to fill out nicely, her hips flaring out noticeably and her flat chest already exploding out to a double D cup.
>She definitely had her mother's genes.
>Shyly covering her nipples, Bea blushes.
>"T-Thank you master, I'm happy you like them."
>She was still getting used to exposing herself, but you had caught her several times feeling up her new tits in the mirror, always shrieking when she discovered you watching her.
>She still didn't know that you knew she fingered herself and sniffed your clothes when doing laundry, the little pervert.
>"Hehe she's starting to look just like her mother~" Bessie coos, placing a kiss on her daughter's head.
>"Oh I know, why don't we try putting your boobies to work? I bet you'll do much better this time."
>The time before Bessie was referencing was when Bea's breasts had just started to come in, only small mosquito bites on her chest.
>Bessie had first demonstrated how to give a proper boobjob and then had let Bea try her tits at it.
>She was awkward and uncoordinated, barely able to push her small bumps up to either side of your cock.
>This time however was different.
>Taking a seat on the couch, Bea crouches in front of you and puts her breasts in your lap, having a noticeably nice weight to them this time.
>Pawing at your waistband, Bea frees you from your pants, your cock flopping out onto her pillows.
>Unable to resist, Bea sniffs and licks over your cock fervently, completely unabashed.
>Quickly taking you into her throat, Bea pops you back out again with a needy moo.
>Pulling her tits apart, Bea sandwiches your lubed dick inside her soft cleavage and adjusts her grip.
>Immediately starting to pump her boobs on you, Bea does her best to copy her mother's technique.
>"There you go Bea! Use those boobies like I showed you!"
>Cheering her daughter on, Bessie was sat beside you, giving you her much larger tits to grope.
>Pumping away on your cock, Bea was still an amateur, but both her previous practice and size upgrade made the experience much more pleasurable than the first.
>Feeling a couple wet drops hit your stomach as Bea's breasts slapped against your crotch, you look down.
>Seeing a few white streaks, you knew it couldn't have been from you.
>Looking at the little cow, you soon find the source, Bea had started lactating.
>As she kept going, more and more milk was sprayed out from her nipples, soon misting up onto your chest.
>Curious as to what you were looking at, Bea matches your gaze, discovering her new ability for herself.
>Suddenly stopping her ministrations, Bea quickly stands up, shocked.
>"I-I'm a cow."
>Standing there with her tits in her hands, Bea's eyes glaze over.
>Something inside her switches on, and something else breaks, shattered forever.
>"I'm a c-cow, I'm a cow!"
>A goofy grin spreads over Bea's muzzle, her fingers playing at her dripping nipples.
>"Mommy I'm a COW!"
>Hopping excitedly in the air, Bea doesn't even notice that she was cumming.
>Her little half inch spurts out a weak clear spray before it goes limp, bouncing along with Bea's excitement.
>Not only did she not notice that she came, but she also didn't realize it would be the last time her clit would ever get hard and cum like that again.
>Although at this point, you wouldn't exactly call her impotent squirts "cum" anymore anyway.
>Bea didn't seem to care though as she hugged her mother tightly, mooing with Bessie happily and prancing around the room.
>Squeezing her nipples over and over, thin rivulets of milk spray from Bea's chest, making a mess.
>You let her enjoy herself, the last little bit of that envious and pathetic nobody who she was before was completely gone, replaced with a happy bubbly cow.
>The rest of the day Bea couldn't stop squeezing her boobs, eventually needing her mother to hook her up to her pump so that she stopped spraying milk everywhere.
>It was the happiest you'd ever seen Bea, and since that day, her demeanor only changed for the better.
>"Masters home! Master's home!"
>Stepping through the front door, you're greeted by your two cows, one barely able to contain her excitement.
>Bea's body jiggled as she trotted up to you, hugging you tightly against her large chest.
>It had been over a month since you first let her serve you, and her progress had been outstanding.
>With the addition of her own milk to her diet, Bea had grown even faster, bursting with new curves.
>What had started as a frail and delicate calf had blossomed into a thick, voluptuous cow.
>Bea giggles as you squeeze her ass, enough meat on it now that along with her thin waist, her hips flared obscenely and could be described as "child bearing".
>Her hip to waist ratio was incredible, even though her hip's width was mostly average for a regular cow.
>Her small frame had given her an hourglass shape once she ballooned out, most of her growth focused on her legs, hips, and breasts.
>Speaking of, Bea's tits were her pride and joy, huge K cups that she could rival some of the bustier cows with.
>Of course her mother still had her soundly beat by miles, but on her smaller body, Bea had fantastic proportions.
>"Hehehe, I'm horny if you are master~ My pussy feels so empty without you stretching it out and filling it with your hot human loads, feel like helping a girl out?~"
>Bea's voice had gone from feminine to outright girly, higher pitched and submissive, especially when she leaned into it.
>"Did you finish your chores?" Bessie asks, her tone indicating that she already knew the answer.
>"No..."
>"Then you know what to do missy, don't make master waste his breath telling you to do what you should've already done."
>"Aww... Okay mommy."
>Nuzzling her face into your chest, Bea separates from you and sticks her tongue out at her mother as she passes her.
>This earns her a spank on the ass, Bessie's hand sending ripples though the smaller cow's butt.
>Moaning like a whore, Bea shakes her ass at her mother before scampering away, dodging another spank.
>"Honestly, that girl only has a mind for dick now... well, she IS at that age." Bessie says, shrugging as she embraces you.
>The larger cow holds you close, sighing wearily from her day of work and trying to keep Bea's fingers on task instead of inside herself.
>Gripping the heifer's cheeks you play with her ass as well, her flesh much more pliable than Bea's.
>Mooing appreciatively, Bessie leans some of her weight on you, resting her gigantic tits, heavy with milk.
>Her daughter wasn't the only one who had grown, her mother's thighs and ass had gotten even wider, along with her tits going up two or three sizes as well from all the stimulation and leftover milk.
>Her nipples though had the biggest change, already sporting giant tips, they had engorged even further from the daily suckling.
>Both longer and wider, Bea started having trouble fitting her mothers teats in her mouth now, they were so big.
>In fact, Bessie could easily overfill Bea's early training bras with just her areola alone with how puffy they had gotten.
>And of course, with the bigger draw on her tits, the more Bessie supplied, as you were well aware of as she was currently soaking through your shirt.
>Patting her butt, Bessie takes the sign to release you, looking down at your shirt with a blush.
>"I-I'm sorry master, but you do know how leaky I am nowadays..."
"It's fine Bessie, just add it to the wash."
>Stripping your shirt off, Bessie nods and takes it, leaving for the laundry room.
>The rest of your day is rather relaxing and uneventful, Bea occasionally visiting you in the living room when she could, shaking her ass and making it clap before her mother called her.
>Nearing the evening, you soon started smelling something heavenly, the two beginning to cook dinner.
>Walking into the kitchen, you see your two cows happily preparing some vegetables side by side, their curves rubbing against each other.
>They had matching cowprint aprons, Bea's being pink naturally, her favorite color.
>"Master!"
>As the two noticed you enter, they both smile and stop the little chat they were having, watching you walk behind them.
>"Didja come for a little bit of desert before dinner master?" Bea asks coyly, bouncing on her hooves to jiggle her butt for you.
>"Looking for some of my cake? Or do you want mommy's pie?"
>Using a free hand, Bea grabs one of her mother's titanic cheeks, spreading it to show off her pussy.
>"Oh Bea, you've grown into such the little slut haven't you~" Bessie titters, bumping her hip against Bea.
>Stumbling, Bea grins and bumps her back.
>"How could I NOT be? Master's cock ruined me and made me into this little slut, just like you said it would."
>The two giggle to themselves, their tails swishing back and forth, batting each other on the ass.
"I just came to see how my girls are doing, something smells great!"
>Getting behind the two, you run a hand around each of their waists under their aprons.
>"That would be the onions, we bought you something I think you'll enjoy master." Bessie says, pressing her butt into your crotch.
>"Steak!" Bea chirps. "A big 'ol porterhouse."
>Suddenly laughing, Bea looks up at her mother.
>"Did you see that wolf the butcher had? She was toooootally jealous of our titties, she kept checking us out!"
>Bessie brings a hand to her mouth, stifling a laugh of her own.
>"Oh I know, poor thing couldn't stop staring."
>Feeling up your cows, you cup a large breast in each hand, feeling the differences between their chests.
>"F-Fuck I love these things, I wanna get even bigger."
>Rapping Bea's knuckles with a wooden spoon, Bessie chides her daughter.
>"That's enough of that kind of language dear, you're a slut, not a sailor."
>Rubbing her hand, Bea nods obediently.
>"Y-Yes mommy."
>Going back to cooking, the two continue chatting as you grope their curvaceous bodies, letting out an occasional moo when you rub something sensitive.
>By the time you had your fill, their legs were shaking and the insides of their thighs were liberally coated with their arousal, dripping down from their crotches.
>Giving both a spank on the ass, you leave for the dining room, the food almost done.
>"Thank you master~" The two call after you, their voices dripping with lust.
>The meal was delicious as always, Bea had cooked your steak to perfection, she really was turning into quite the little cook.
>Straddling her mother, Bea greedily drank from Bessie's tit, gorging herself on cream.
>Initially resisting her diet, Bea had quickly become addicted to her mother's milk, taking every opportunity she could to nurse.
>Whenever they weren't busy doing something else, you would usually find the two together with Bea latched to her mother's chest, sometimes even vice versa, both mooing with pleasure.
>There was a distinct difference between Bessie's and Bea's milk, where Bessie's was thick and creamy, Bea's was sweet, almost sugary.
>As Bea's production had steadily grown alongside her mother's, the cows had quickly become unable to keep up with four huge boobs worth of milk.
>With the market still flooded with minotaur milk, the two decided to bake with their excess supply instead.
>They made cookies, cake, ice cream, pudding, cupcakes, basically any pastry or dessert they could put milk in they did, selling them at the local farmer's market.
>The two had done very well for themselves, and being their owner, for you as well.
>There was only one issue with this however, they were paying off their debt at an incredible rate, even with the stacked interest.
>Unaware of this, the cow's debt was something the two had simply forgotten about these past weeks, preoccupied with more important things.
>You would tell them soon enough when they got closer to paying it off, it wouldn't be right to keep them in the dark after all.
>Releasing her mother's nipple, Bea catches a few squirts of milk on her tongue before swallowing.
>"Mmm, thanks for the meal mommy, I'm stuffed."
>Rubbing her daughter's back, Bessie combs the hair on Bea's head, the tuft having grown longer like her mother's.
>"You're quite welcome honey."
>Turning so that she rested against her mother's tits, Bea gives you a grin.
>"Don't worry master, I've still got plenty of room for your stuffing~"
>Rubbing her tummy, Bea gives you her "fuck me" eyes while her mother rolls hers.
>"Honestly Bea, where do you come up with these? You certainly didn't hear them from me."
>Hopping off her mother's lap, Bea goes to take your dishes, giggling to herself.
>"Hehe, just something I'm good at I guess, along with a few other things you DID teach me~"
>Leaving for the kitchen, Bea's hips swing back and forth invitingly.
>Where her mother had a natural cow's sway to her hips, Bea walked with an exaggerated sashay even when you weren't watching, training herself to walk that way at all times.
>She had also gotten over her nudity hangup and didn't hide herself at all now, rather trying to accentuate her best attributes instead, especially around you.
>Bessie soon to followed her daughter, taking what remained on the table and leaving for the kitchen as well.
>Smiling to yourself, you rise from your seat and make your way to the bedroom, the sounds of dishes being cleaned in the background.
>Soon the two join you, Bea almost tackling you on the bed.
>"Oh master, I've been looking forward to this ALL DAY!"
>Kissing you, Bea's full lips press against yours, her mouth opening, begging for you to enter.
>Pushing your tongue past her lips, Bea moans, her tongue swirling around yours as you explore her mouth.
>Surprisingly, Bea is the first to break the kiss, breathing heavily as her eyes twinkle.
>"Master, mommy and I want to try something, would you mind scooching up further?"
>Intrigued, you do as Bea asks, laying higher up on the bed.
>Watching you hungrily, Bea seems to get an idea.
>"Master may I have permission to touch my clitty?"
>Seeing as she had been reasonably well behaved, you nod.
"You may."
>Letting out a girlish "Eeeee!" Bea shuffles up to you, straddling your waist.
>After she began making milk, Bea's clit had shrunk even further, just a nub now.
>Compounding this, all the extra girth of her hips and thighs made it look even smaller, barely noticeable unless you looked for it.
>Even her nipples were longer now, the thing in her crotch basically a bump.
>What was interesting however, was that her sensitivity had skyrocketed, the tiny thing actually acting like her clit.
>Stripping you, Bea forgoes her usual deepthroat to get you lubed, instead sitting on your cock so that it ground into her crotch.
>"HnnnnnguhaaaaaahHHNNNN!"
>Rubbing her button against your cock, Bea cums, her clit drooling over your shaft.
>Still grinding, Bea smears her juices over your cock, cumming again with a few more strokes.
>Leaning back, Bea looks over her work, your cock glistening.
>"T-There, *hah* all w-wet and ready to go~"
>With that, Bea moves off and over to your side, Bessie waiting patiently, laid down across from her daughter.
>Your crotch now bare, the two then descend on your cock hungrily, sandwiching it between all four of their tits.
>"Mmm, there we go. Okay mommy, you ready?"
>"Girl, I've been ready since before you were born."
>With that, the two rise their chests together before slapping them back down, the heft of their combined tits whapping against your crotch.
>Hot pillowy flesh engulfs you, the two matching each other's movements as they stroke you with their breasts.
>Your cock was swallowed again and again in the most comfortable prison imaginable, their tits sloshing as they went faster.
>You couldn't help but moan, the two putting serious work in to stroke you with their heavy breasts like this.
>"I think he likes it mommy~"
>Eventually, they become desynced, one pair of tits slapping down before the other, rubbing over each other enough to start squeezing out milk.
>Nearing your orgasm, the two were huffing and puffing, moving that much weight around was taking a toll on them, their tits covered with their milk and sweat.
>"C'mon master *pant* don't hold out on us! Coat our boobies with your cum!"
>Slipping and sliding over each other's chests, Bessie and Bea were tiring, their speed slowing down as you got to the edge.
>"Oh! He's about to cum Bea, last stretch, here we go!"
>Speeding back up again, the two get back in synchronization, their boobs wobbling as one as you thrust into them from below.
>You last a dozen more strokes before you take a breast in each hand, pressing them into your crotch as you start to cum.
>"Yesss, gimme that nut master!"
>Moving her head forward, Bea goes to suck your tip into her mouth, but is stopped by her mother.
>Nabbing her daughter's horn, Bessie keeps Bea's head away, instead pushing her own face into the two's combined cleavage.
>As your tip was wrapped by a pair of thick lips, you burst inside Bessie's mouth, the cow moaning triumphantly into your cock.
>"Hey! No fair!"
>Rope after rope shot into Bessie's mouth, her tongue lapping at your head to coax out as much as possible.
>Swallowing your load, Bessie releases you once you stop cumming, smirking at her pouting daughter.
>Opening her mouth, Bessie lets her long and wide tongue all the way out, still coated with your cum.
>Offering it to Bea, the girl begrudgingly sucks on her mother's wet muscle, taking it into her mouth.
>With how long it was, Bea had to swallow the organ into her throat like your cock to fit it all inside.
>Tongue-fucking her daughter's throat, Bessie hummed happily as Bea got her leftovers, taking what little remained of your cum from her mother.
>Pulling apart, the two cow's tongues wrapped around each other in the air, dripping drool on top of their breasts, adding to the mess of milk and sweat.
>They slid over each other dexterously, looking as if they were trying to tie knots together.
>Eventually they parted for good, the only thing connecting them now being a few strands of spittle between their mouths and tongues.
>The lewd sight quickly woke your cock back up, poking up between their breasts once more.
>"Hmf, still not fair." Bea says, bringing her tongue back into her mouth.
>"Oh hush girl, you can have him for the rest of the night, I was just getting mine first."
>With that, Bessie pulls her soaked chest off of your crotch, crawling back behind you and sitting down.
>Pulling you back to her, the big cow brings you into a hug between her legs, your head placed safely betwixt her milky breasts.
>"You mean it mommy?" Bea says hopefully, the twinkle back in her eye.
>"Yes yes, go on now baby. Make master happy." Bessie says, motioning Bea to continue.
>Clapping and mooing with glee, Bea moves up and straddles you again, wasting no time in impaling herself on you.
>"Hnnnnnnnngggggghhh~"
>Taking you inside her pussy with one stroke, Bea cums as her prostate squishes against your cock.
>"Thaaaat's betterrrrrr~"
>Leaning forward, Bea looks into your eye's lovingly.
>"If you don't mind master, I wanna stretch this out for as long as possible."
>Slowly rising from your crotch, Bea makes it near the tip before slowly going back down again.
>"Just squeeze my nipples when you wanna paint my insides with your thick gooey cum and I'll make sure to empty those fat nuts for you as fast as I can~"
>Resting her head in the crook of your neck, Bea fucks you at an uncharacteristically slow pace, wrapping her arms around you as she pumps away.
>The three of you stay like that for a while, Bessie and Bea each holding you in an embrace, the smaller cow making love to you, tenderly.
>Eventually, you squeeze Bea's tits when you start to feel sleepy, the girl immediately kicking into overdrive and wringing your cock for all it was worth.
>Bessie cheered her daughter on as she rode you, the big cow rubbing your chest soothingly.
>Bea came over a dozen times, but by now she was able to keep going no matter how hard her legs quaked, able to suck and fuck on autopilot even as her brain melted.
>As she felt you bust deep inside her, Bea gave you a few more pumps before she sat on you one last time, reveling in the warm feeling of being filled.
>Coming down from her latest orgasm, Bea snuggles into you, her eyes heavy.
>Nuzzling her head under your chin, Bea kisses your chest as she drifts off to sleep.
>"I-I love you master..."
>"Oh-!"
>Covering her mouth with a hand, Bessie started to tear up.
>Hugging the two of you tightly against her, Bessie kisses you on the top of your head affectionately.
>"Master, you've made Bea and I the happiest cows in the world. We -both- love you."
>Placing her muzzle on your head, Bessie happily kisses you again, soon drifting off to sleep after her daughter.
>Even though you knew they couldn't hear you now, you still voice what the tender feeling in your heart wanted to say.
"I love you both as well girls, you're the best cows a guy could have."
>A few days later, you decide to break the news about your cow's debt after breakfast.
>"Whatcha wanna talk about master?" Bea asks, finally stopping her stream of morning innuendos.
"Well Bea, you and your mother are almost all paid up."
>Cocking her head, Bea looks at you confused.
>"Huh?"
"Your debt I mean, remember?"
>Realization hit's Bessie first, the cow not sure what to say.
>Freezing, Bea soon became much more animated once she realized what you were talking about.
>"B-But I don't- I don't wanna-"
>Panicking, the small girl leaps from her mother's lap, pacing for a moment before running off to somewhere in the house.
>"Bea!"
>Standing up, Bessie goes to follow her Before Bea comes running back into the dining room, bumping into her mother.
>"Mommy c'mon lets go!"
>Getting behind Bessie, Bea uses both her hands to bodily push her mother to the front door, calling back over her shoulder to you.
>"We'll be back master, I promise!"
>The door quickly opens and slams shut, leaving you to clean up the table this time.
>Hours and hours go by, longer than the cows had ever been from your home before, beginning to make you worry.
>As you start to wonder if you should go and look for them, the front door bursts open, your two cows standing in the doorway.
>They were quite the sight, even more so than usual.
>The two were dressed in matching clothes, though to call them clothes would stretch the definition.
>They were wearing bright pink fishnetted sleeves along with matching fishnetted leggings kept in place by garter belts around their waists, affixed tightly.
>Both were also clad in high heels and wore thin, high leg thongs that left nothing to the imagination, the word "SLUT" written on the crotches.
>They had little else on in terms of "clothing", but were covered with accessories.
>Bea and Bessie both had heavy makeup on, with pink eyeshadow over their lids and plenty of lipstick accentuating their plump lips.
>They had also gotten golden piercings, both in the navel and a big cattle ring through their noses, matching their golden bracelets and hoop earrings.
>Bea even had a new golden micro cage for her clit, her thong doing a poor job of covering it.
>And lastly, both of them, right under their pierced navels, had gotten matching womb tattoos.
>The two looked like bimbos right out of a strip club, Bessie doing her best not to feint while Bea stood confidently, thrusting her tits out.
>"We have a deal for you master."
>"We're gonna buy your thick and creamy human cum, enough to knock both of us up."
>Turning around, the two cows bend over and spread each other's cheeks, presenting their wet holes to you.
>"And to pay for that honor, we will sell ourselves to you, and only you." Says Bessie.
>Both cows look back at you, their eyes filled with love.
>"You'll own us, body and soul, forever." They say in unison.
>Turning back around, the two strike a pose and heft their tits up.
>"We hope it's enough~"
>Waiting on your answer, the two cows watch you hopefully.
>All you an do is dumbly nod.
"Deal."
>"EEEEEEEEEEE!"
>Both Bessie and Bea squeal happily, the two hugging each other and hopping excitedly.
>Rushing over to you, your two cows place kiss after kiss on you, giggling and laughing as they remove your pants.
>"C'mon master! *muah* Lets make it official!~"
>Pulling you to the bedroom, Bea suddenly stops right outside the door.
>"Oh! Wait one moment master, mommy and I need to get ready first."
>Pushing her mother inside, Bea blows you a kiss before shutting the bedroom door, rustling and giggling following soon after.
>A few moments pass before the the two call for you from behind the door.
>"Come iiiiiiiiiiiin~"
>Opening the door, you see your two cows laying down on the bed, with Bea on top of her mother.
>Bessie was on her back, legs spread with Bea's head between her legs, the smaller cow giving you a smouldering look.
>"Give mommy that huge humie cock of yours first, she deserves your primo cummies."
>Spreading Bessie's lips open with her fingers, Bea drags her tongue over her mother's pussy, making the bigger cow moo needily.
>"Mommy's ready for another baby master~" Bea says, beckoning you forward.
>Walking between Bessie's legs, Bea removes your underwear, your cock springing out and catching her in the face.
>"Haaaah~ Use my throat please, I'll get you all nice and wet for her~"
>Plunging yourself into Bea's mouth, she takes you all the way to the base without so much as a gag.
>Stroking Bea's cheek, the stuffed girl looks up at you with adoration, swallowing to hug your dick inside her.
>Her tongue slips out and licks your balls, then coiling around your cock as you pull out of her throat.
>"There we go, all ready to rock mommy's world. *muah*" Giving your tip a parting kiss, Bea lines your head up with Bessie's entrance.
>Thrusting forward, your cock burrows into Bessie's hot tunnel, splitting her walls open as it goes as deep as it can.
>Bottoming out, Bessie moos throatily, making Bea bite her lip.
>"Mmmh, mommy loves your cock master, almost as much as I do~"
>Grinning at you, Bea licks where your crotches meet as you pull out, slurping up what she can.
>Pushing back in, your hips plap against Bessie's ass as you put more force into it.
>Picking up speed, your thrusts jostle the two cows, Bessie crying out with pleasure as she cums.
>"Unf, I can't wait 'till it's my turn~"
>Bea had front row seats to Bessie's breeding, her face speckled with her mother's juices as your cock pistoned in and out of her.
>"God, your cock is amazing, I can feel every time you hit mommy's cervix~"
>You can feel it as well, your glands pressing against the entrance to Bessie's womb every time you hilt, her hot insides squeezing you.
>Taking hold of Bessie's love handles, you give yourself a better grip to drill into the moaning cow, her pussy trying to hold onto you every time you pull out.
>"You broke her with this dick and you broke me with this dick, we couldn't leave it even if we wanted to."
>Bea continues her lewd comments, licking at your crotch and Bessie's clit, panting heavily, her own words working her up.
>"Yeah~ You own this pussy, it's your property, fill it with your cum and mark it as yours~"
>Her words working on you as well, you go into the final stretch, pounding Bessie faster and faster, slaps and shlorps echoing through the room.
>"Oooh, here it comes mommy! Blast her with your baby batter master!"
>Giving Bessie your last few pumps, the big cow screams at the top of her lungs as she cums again.
>"BREED ME MASTER!!!"
>Obliging her, your hips slam forward one last time, your tip mashing against her cervix as you cum.
>Bessie's eyes flutter as her legs wrap around your waist and lock you in place, Bea following suit and wrapping her arms around you as well.
>Your balls tingle as they unload, your white hot cum spattering inside Bessie's cunt.
>Putting her head to her mother's belly, Bea is uncharacteristically quiet.
>For a moment.
>"Mmm fuck yeah~ I can hear each one of those juicy cum ropes hit the back of mommies womb!"
>Kissing the womb tattoo, Bea turns around, looking her mother in her sweaty and tired face.
>"You're pregnant mom. There's no way you aren't."
>At hearing those words, Bessie tears up, grabbing her daughter by her face and pulling her into her chest.
>"Oh baby, I'm so happy, our family is getting bigger!"
>Popping out of her mother's cleavage, Bea gives Bessie a smooch, their new nose rings clinking together.
>Nuzzling each other, Bea suddenly looks back at you with a glint in her eye.
>"My turn!"
>Flipping over onto her back, Bea lands on her mother who lets out an "Oof!"
>Getting settled between Bessie's breasts, Bea spreads her legs in a split, looking at you expectantly.
>"Put a baby in me too Master~"
>Pulling out of Bessie, cum seeps out of her vacant hole, dripping down her ass and onto the base of her tail.
>Not quite back to full hardness, you slap your messy cock on top of Bea's crotch, your cum and Bessie's juices spattering over Bea's caged clit.
>"Mmmnng- c-can't believe how long it took me to realize how much I love to worship this f-fucking HOG."
>Her eyes are locked onto your member, her hands rubbing your cock and smearing the mess over it as she massages it back to life.
>"This is what a real cock looks like, what a real MAN looks like, superior in every way..."
>Biting her lip again, Bea brings her fingers to her mouth and licks them clean, moaning at the taste.
>"Please master, make me your breeding sow~"
>Getting more of your cum on her fingers, Bea fits them into her hole, lubing it up and spreading it for you.
>"It's all I'm good for~"
>Your cock throbs at Bea accepting her place, getting hard and ready for its next slutty pussy.
>Pulling back, you drag your cock over Bea's small clit, making the cow moo cutely, cumming even while caged.
>Your cock gets even messier before it presses against Bea's hole and squeezes in.
>"HAAaaaaaaaiiii!"
>Taking you all the way, Bea's orgasm doubles up, her back arching as she's filled, screaming girlishly.
>You immediately start plowing her, not giving the little whore any time to recover.
>She clenches on you over and over again, entirely on reflex as she's already gone, her eyes crossed and her tongue hanging limply from her mouth.
>"That shut her up didn't it master?" Bessie says, taking Bea's ankles in each hand.
>Pulling them up, Bessie puts her daughter in a full nelson.
>"Gosh she's so cute when she's taking you though, I can't stay mad at a face like that~" Bessie says, rubbing Bea's fucked-silly face.
>"You don't mind if I-?"
>Snaking a hand down to Bea's gilded cage, Bessie looks to you for permission.
>You just nod again, too busy blowing Bea's back out.
>With your approval, Bessie's fingers toy with the cage for a moment before rubbing it like she was trying to work out a stain.
>Bea convulses beneath you, screaming with pleasure as another orgasm is forced out of her.
>Leaning over your two cows, you use your hands to take a nipple from either, squeezing them between your fingers.
>Milk sprays from the girls' chests, both of them mooing in unison.
>You toy with the sensitive buds mercilessly, sending milk everywhere, slamming into Bea as you feel your second orgasm coming.
>Since you were already going flat out, you try longer strokes at the same speed, the noise of Bea's cheeks clapping ringing in your ears.
>Letting her daughter's legs and clit go, Bessie grabs the two unoccupied nipples and squeezes, adding their milk to the fray.
>The cream from the four tits pooled in every crack and crevice on their bodies, misting the cows' skin with a layer of white.
>It frothed at your crotch, acting as extra lube for your final stretch.
>"Do it master, make us yours." Bessie says, locking eyes with you.
>Ramming home into Bea's pussy, her legs wrap around your waist like her mother showed her, making sure your load got as deep as possible.
>Following her daughter, Bessie does the same, the two pulling you into Bea's crotch as you burst inside her.
>Throb after throb shoots your cum into Bea, the cow squeezing you and mooing as she was bred.
>Making a heart with her hands, Bea places it over her womb tattoo where you bulge out her belly.
>As your last shots leave you, you tire, leaning onto Bea and resting your head in her mother's cleavage above her.
>The three of you bask in the afterglow, both pairs of legs refusing to let you go.
>It's quiet, the moos, moans, and cries all silent for a moment, before Bea's hoarse voice cuts through it.
>"T-Thank you m-mooster, I promise we'll m-make good pets."
"You already are Bea." You say, rising.
"Both of you are."
>Your cows beam at you, with their mascara running and bodies covered with milk, it was the prettiest sight you had seen in a while.
>Only then do their legs relax.
>As you pull out of Bea, your cock grinds against her prostate, making her cum one last time.
>"GuuhAAAaah!"
>Her little cage leaks the last of her juices, flowing down her crotch to mix with the cum leaking out of her.
>Which subsequently flowed down her ass and into her mother's gushing pussy, the two of them forming a cum waterfall.
>Your job done, you give your cow's butts a pat and walk to the bathroom, turning on the shower.
>As the water warms, you're soon joined by Bessie, carrying Bea in her arms.
>"Room for two more master?"
"Who did you think I was running this for?" You say, taking Bea from her so she could take off her slutty apparel.
>Helping Bea with her own "clothes", you hand her back to her mother, who cradles her in her arms.
>Getting into the shower, the three of you simply stand under the warm water, you and Bessie pressing your heads together.
>"Put me down momma, we need to clean master up."
>Doing as her daughter asked, Bessie sets Bea down between you two, the girl squeezing between your legs and taking your soft cock into her mouth.
>Despite appearances, Bea merely suckled on you, licking off your leftover cum and giving your balls a good spit shine.
>Pouring some soap over her soft breasts, Bessie starts rubbing your body clean with them, cooing,mooing, and murmuring affectionately.
>That's when you notice something on Bessie's chest.
>A brand, the letters of your initials to be exact.
>Running a finger near it, Bessie looks down at what held your curiosity.
>"Oh, that was Bea's idea, though most of this was Bea's idea." Bessie says, her tits gliding over your chest.
>"It's so everyone knows who we belong to, who our master is. Hehe, look at mine~" Comes Bea's voice from below.
>Bessie Pulls her massive boobs apart so you could see down her cleavage at the small cow who was presenting her ass to you, a matching brand across one of her cheeks.
>"We belong to you master, and I want something more permanent than a collar to remind me."
>Standing on shaky legs, Bea squeezes up Between you and Bessie, her head popping up inside her mother's udders.
>"And now it's official! With your cows filled to the brim with calves, you're stuck with us!" Bea says, grinning.
>"I hope it's a girl." Bessie says sweetly, Holding her daughter close.
>"Me too, though if mine didn't take we'll just have to keep trying, wont we?~"
>Squeezing your cock gently, Bea gives you a naughty smile.
>"Oh by the by, in the fine print of the contract there's a part that says I can buy whatever slutty clothes I want."
"Contract?"
>"Contract?"
>With both of you confused, Bea shrugs.
>"It was mostly a verbal one, but I said the fine print stuff really fast, donno what to tell you if you didn't hear it, that's business for ya."
>Patting your little bimbo on the head, all the three of you can do is laugh.

https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1664/60/1664607101412.jpg

Imagine having literal dozens of pussyballs and anusballs all lined up, each one stuck onto standing vibrators as both a display of all the bitches you've caught and to keep them wet and ready for use each night. They'd have no way of talking, their only method of communication is to squeeze your dick. The better they squeeze the more release they get. That will be their only utility in life and your main team will witness what will happen should they fail in battle.
Those on oral duty get to be facefucked, this is where males usually end up. If they're unlucky their mouths get to be used as cleanup, forced to lick your cock and whoever's hole you just fucked clean. It might be a pussy, it might be an asshole, it might be another pokemon's dick, it might even be another mouth they're forced to kiss and snowball for your amusement. Either way they will not be allowed to retreat back into their ball until it's all been swallowed.
The really lucky males will be allowed to stick their dicks out, if only to be forced to breed the female you've chosen for them. Otherwise they will be teased, caged, and denied for months on end until you've got a box full of throbbing cocks locked in pink, girly cages, all desperate for release.
Any pokemon you decide to switch out will be instantly loyal, infinitely thankful that you've released them from their unending sexual torment.
But despite it all they'd still rather be put on your degenerate display wall of pussies and assholes than be stuck inside the PC.
Anything but the PC.

Yeah, I'm disabling the consent feature.
As if they have a choice...

But consider, when the light suddenly turns green, you'd know that it's time to release the mind-broken slut and catch yourself some fresh meat.

she gets incessantly teased with just enough to keep her pussy nice and wet. she can't think about anything else but cumming. she tries to paw at her own vagina but it just phases through so she's completely at the mercy of her master. all the while she is fed a bunch of denigrating messages about her attitude to her situation while he never shoves his cock in her. that the only way out is to submit. even when the master doesn't tease her she's stuffed with vibrators that tease her endlessly. after a few weeks the red light turns green and she's a panting and wet for her master, wanting him to shove his penis inside her for the first time.

your broken pokemon look at the new comer and giggle as she twitches on the shelves. they sometimes will take her and happily lap up the lubrication she leaks, after all they know what it was like being stuck in such a situation. and when the master isn't looking they will let the poor girl get off.

Not if they don't want to end up back in her position they won't!

>Member of your main team gets your newbie off while she thinks you're not looking.
>It's been so long that she's clearly forgotten what it really feels like to be trapped in a Pro-ball
>The next time she's asleep, modify her pokeball.
>Wake her up with a quick rub.
>Her light immediately turns red as she starts to shake.
>But she knows that it's too late for her now.

>a month of teasing later she learns to respect your methods and to not get in the way of their training
>you kept her on edge for most of the days the itch was unbearable
>even the ac fan on her twat was enought to have her creep up close to the edge thanks to the incessant buzzing of the vibrators you left in her on low vibration
>inside her little prison she was mewling pathetically viciously rotating her hips trying to feel something
>once her sentence was up you let her go
>your new girl is freed and has the look of pity on her
>the poor pokemon collapsed to the ground and tells you how sorry she was
>you kiss her and bring her in to accept her apology
>but she can't get the fucking she wants until she eats a load out of the new girl
>it was her pussy that got her in trouble so you want to make sure there is no animosity between your girls

I've been toying with an idea for a "horror" themed /collared/ story for Halloween. I posted the rough concept here before but I wanna tune it up. It's your basic psychoslasher structure, but instead of some retard killing stupid young adults, it's a human raping anthro teens.
>Main girl has a group of friends
>The sporty, confident one
>the popular bitchy one
>the shy, awkward one
>and herself, the girly girl
>Rumors start spreading around their small town and school about a human wearing a mask carrying a chain with a collar hunting anthro girls at night
>Dismissed as rumor
>They decide to have a sleepover at one of the girl's uncle's remote house for the night
>standard horror tropes of the girls getting separated and picked off one by one with intense sexual encounters through the night

Ugh, is weather always so horrible in your stretch of nowhere? Don’t answer that, I don’t actually care. Well human, it seems as though I’m stuck in your hovel for a time. Hm? Fee? Oh I see, well forget it human. I’ve had daughters with men better than you. Don’t think about it. I won’t be here for more than a few hours.
>The arrogant bunny mom is drenched, her robe hanging freely to expose her breasts. She sees your bulge, and is not impressed. She’s had plenty of guys before you, and one of the lucky bastards had the opportunity to knock her up. You don’t even merit notice, at least in her eyes.
“Oh god! Oh gods! You’re plunging so deep! It’s so good! Why is is so good?! This is so much better than I’ve ever had! Harder! Harder! I’m so close! I…I…ooOOOOOOH~”
>She could not even recall how she wound up here. She strode into the human home like she owned it, and then the human convinced her to get out of her wet, clingy clothes. Now she was on her back, taking the human bareback into her! It was all such a blur, and every thrust of that human dick inside her just made it harder to recollect! All that mattered was getting more cock! More! More!
“Oh, we made a mess-you! You made a mess! Y-you’re just lucky I liked it. So I’ll let it go this time. I’m going to clean up. I…might stay a little longer."
>What did she just do? The human’s semen leaking out of her was proof enough what happened, but she couldn’t figure out why she did that? It just felt so good, better than anyone better than-NO! No. Not that good. Not that good. But what if-?
>She supposed staying with you more day wouldn’t hurt. If only to make sure what happened.
“Good morning human. What? Why am I still here? We-well all access is still cut off of course! I’m stuck here for at least another day. A day of absolute boredom. Stop staring human! My top is off because I have nothing else to wear while my clothes dry! What happened yesterday was a fluke. I had been pent up so anyone could have popped me off like that. Don’t think you’re some stud or something…”
>Her mind was clear now. It really was all just luck that made you so good and fucking her. You were just a human after all. But she just had to make sure…
“H-how! How are you still hard?! Oh I don’t care! Just fuck me human! Fuck me! Fuck me again and again!”
>“I’m sorry! I’m so sorry!” she heard herself cry. “I’ll never say anything bad again!” and she meant it. The human was as good as the last time. No, even better. His cock was reaching places nobody went, it sent a thrill through her body to have the human abuse her pussy. She didn’t want this to stop!
>Maybe she could stay one more day…
“Last shot! What am I talking about? Last shot to have me human. I know how much my body drives you crazy! You’re already hard again you little perv. So one more go. You and me! Winner takes all! Takes what? Shut up!”
> The bunny MILF refused to leave. She would not let you have the last laugh. She could not accept that anyone, much less a human, could pleasure her like he did. She had to prove she was superior. Her world could not let her accept a mere human be superior to her in any way! Call it pride, arrogance, or maybe even fear. One way or another, it would be settled today.
>The moment she felt the human enter her, she knew she was going to lose. You were still so much better. Better than her race, better than any race. Human cock was unbeatable, and she was a slave to it. Every thrust drove out a little more of the arrogant woman’s old identity. Why had she come here? What was her reason for starting this? Who was she? Pointless things. All that mattered, was feeling her body submit to the human. When he came inside her, she knew you owned her…
“Welcome home dear! Your honey bunny was so all alone without you! We have so much lost time to make up on~”
>Days became weeks, weeks became months. Whoever it was that first stepped into your home was gone. All that was left was a submissive woman that desired only to please you, if only so you could reward her. And you were a kind master. You never disappointed…
“Ooo~ thank you master! Your cock is so big, I can never get tired of it. I can never go back to furry cocks, not with a man like this! What about my daughters? Fuck em’! They’re grown up, they can handle themselves. How about make some new daughters? Fill me up master, put your baby maker in me and stuff me with your hot human cream~”

https://desu-usergeneratedcontent.xyz/trash/image/1664/74/1664743398413.png
>Playfully taking in stride the role of pretending she's a fierce heraldic animal.
>Grumpily held in place by knight gauntlets as she tries to wriggle free.
>Slutty two bit whore strung up to a dart board. Is fine with this situation.
>Good feels and meditation has achieved enlightenment, she just happens to be doing it in front of a decorative crest.

The gathering of all the tribes on this blistering savannah day was prompted by a demand for change in the matter of where tithes of tribute should flow, Rather than plunging the savannah into a bloodbath the clever human negotiators had convinced their rival tribe of lions to have the chief families of the two sides dual for the title instead. The lower tribes watched as the five chosen representatives of the tyrant queen Sabor and a squad of humans enter the watering ground/ The squad of felines and humans on the opposite sides of the clearing were peppered with warrior markings in preparations for the dual to decide rulership in these primitive lands atop a large flat rock that served as an elevated platform.
“Fighting first for the challenging human tribe. Ka’ite bushalli, the matriarch of the tribe of humans.” declared a neutral zebra shaman serving as ref.
After the applause, she continued, “Fighting first for Clan Pride is Queen Sabor.” The crowds go insane.
The rules are anything goes as long as a fighter is till standing. After a knockdown the downed party has a minute to stand. If they can’t stand they will be thrown off the platform and replaced by the next fighter on her team. A downed warriors has to get back up before it is her time to fight again on the five vs five rotation. This will go on until every team member on one side is unable to continue at which point the winner will be known.
The Lioness and chief Ka’ite stepped up. The tall charcoal African amazonian looked mismatched against the towering lioness tyrant of the savannah but none the less she had gotten a portion of the crowd roaring and cheering for their representatives as the reigning lion clan showed heavy support of their queen while members of various other anthro tribes rooted for the human.
The first dual began with the two women climbing up the stone platform as cries for battle intensified.
Without prompting, they faced their opposites and each woman snarls.
The Shaman referee, shouted “fight!”.Then they faced each other for the first time, and began circling the edges of the platform. Ka’ite’s first kicks were feints, easily evaded. Sabor’s wide swipes with claw were fast and weak, meant to control her opponent’s movement across the field of combat.
As they began attacking each other in earnest, their kicks and dodges and leaps brought up a measure of cheers from their audience. For a moment I was able to forget the reason for this fight. Lost as I was to the beauty of two nude warriors making full display of their skill and strength.
The moment ended when Sabor took firm control of the fight. Having deflected a leg sweep, she kneed Ka’ite in the gut, forcing her to cough up a gasp of air. The winded woman hesitates just long enough to let Sabor backpeddle move quickly across the arena. The perfect predatory specimen immediately started firing left jabs and circling. Ka’ite danced out of range and taunted her enemy with reminders of what she’d do to the cat woman’s pelt. The Lioness followed and took the first serious punch, a left jab to the nose. Her spittle flewand her head snapped back, but her right fist slammed hard into Ka’ite’s ribs and the clubbing left bounced off Ka’ite’s right shoulder. The woman moved back favoring her ribs and moving her arm making sure it was still working. The Lioness smiled and moved forward lapping up the small dribble of blood coming out of her nose. Whoever had bet on Ka’ite to draw first blood had just won.
The queen tried to close off the platform, but Ka’ite was fast on her bare feet. Sweat had already begun to drip from their bodies as they fenced with one another. The Lioness lunged forward with a low right. Ka’ite fended her off with a snap kick to the thigh.The beast grunted and kicked out with her left foot. Ka’ite moved away and smashed a right hook into the big cat’s left eye, staggering the muscle-toned bitch.
Ka’ite moved behind her target and stomp kicked the back of The Lioness’s right leg. The Lioness groaned and fell to her knees, skinning them both. She made the mistake of not going down so Ka’ite snapped her right foot up from the side. That put the Lioness on her ass.
Ka’ite moved away as the referee counted. Furious Sabor sprung to her feet, favoring her left leg and started stalking the scrappy smalled human woman. The bloodthirsty killer cat moved ever closer taking some jabs, but once inside she dug a right left into the girl’s long middle section hurting her. Ka’ite groaned and moved to the side, thumping som knuckles into the Lioness’s right tit and torso with a couple of jabs along the way. The Mighty cat grunted and stepped into the blonde firing right and left hooks to the outsides of Ka’ite’s big chest. The charcoal amazonian moaned and grabbed the Lion by either ear, yanking it down as she drove a knee up into the felid’s crotch and then her own forehead down on the anthro’s already swollen nose.
The Lioness dropped to one knee in a stumble, blood running from both nostrils and fired her right fist fist up into Ka’ite’s black haired bush. The tall human woman grunted and stepped away before her legs stopped working. She retreated to the center and held herself, while The lioness lifted herself from an aching uterus shot and pursued.
Sweat was pouring from the Lion woman and her sandy hide rose and fell as Sabor huffs. Ka’ite’s Onyx skin gleamed with sweat as well. They had already been going at it for five minutes. They stalked each other, respecting the hard hitting potential of their opposites. The Lioness moved in and a quick flurry of punches to each other’s face, head, breasts and arms. Sabor kept pressing and Ka’ite retreated. The Lioness’s lips were split and now Ka’ite’s nose was bleeding. The Lioness bent forward and sank a long looping right into Ka’ite’s belly just above her bush.
The tribe leader groaned and bent over. A clubbing left to the side of the head put her down, tits first on the stone. The Lioness raised her hands and strutted about, her tits, belly and thighs shaking with each step.
Ka’ite got up. A mouse on the side of her head to just to her eye socket grew. Her swollen face looked completely distorted now. Her previously hard bitten sexy look was now just macabre. The Lioness moved in for the kill and got three hard lefts to her nose and mouth, rocking her and sending lion spittle, blood and sweat flying. The mighty cat backed up and shook her head. Ka’ite moved forward and kicked Sabor in the lower lower belly. The carnivore grunted and grabbed for the foot, but Ka’ite avoided the capture. Ka’ite responded with a jumping snap kick with the other foot to Sabor's face. The crowd roared at the surprising technique. The Lioness’s head snapped back and she staggered. Ka’ite moved forward and hammered an overhead right down onto Sabor's already badly bruised right breast.
The musclebound orb splattered cat milk around the human’s knuckles. Sabor groaned and grabbed forward hugging Ka’ite’s side digging claws into her back. The bloody human replied with right knees up into The Lioness’s crotch. The Savanah tyrant grunted and groaned with each knee biting the human's breast in the process, but she held on and pushed forward driving the girl backwards. They might have gone over the edge, but Ka’ite lost her balance and landed hard on her ass with Sabor on top. The Lioness snuck in three sharp punches to the human until the ref dragged her off.
Ka’ite got up after forty seconds. Her ass was raw from the stone and the back of her was revealing some clawmarks.The Lioness was up at twenty seconds and grinning. Ka’ite moved slowly staying out of the beast's range. The meat eater pressed the action moving against Ka’ite’s jabs, taking nasty face shots in the process.
Still the heavy-weight feline got in close and started whacking away at Ka’ite’s middle putting more deep bruises in the tissues. Ka’ite groaned and fired back driving shots into the back of Sabor's neck until the bitch had to back off.
Ka’ite tried another kick, but Sabor blocked it with her knee. Ka’ite moved to the side and circled. The cat moved reactivly but always tried to force the human back toward the edge. Ka’ite fired a hard right and Sabor stepped under it. Ka’ite’s mouth exploded in a big O when the brutal cat queen sank a right deep into her already black and blue belly. Ka’ite grabbed hold of the big cat and jumped upward, bringing all her weight onto the back of the Lioness’s shoulders. The crowd has never seen this kind of maneuver but the effect was to overbalance the leaning cat. Sabor hit the floor tits first with Ka’ite on her back. Ka’ite hammered rights into The Lioness’s kidney evening the score for cheap shots until the ref pulled her off.
This time Ka’ite was the one with a smile and she was up quickly. The Lioness rose slowly wheezing and snarling. Both her tits had been crushed into the stone and it looked like the end of her nose had been smashed in. The Lioness was really breathing hard now.
The Lioness began to slowly stalk again. Ka’ite opened up Sabor’s right eyebrow and then her left cheek. The Lioness clawed both of Ka’ite’s tits in reply. Then they started slugging at less than two feet away from each other. Blood and sweat flew from their faces as they tried to finish one another off. In the end, Ka’ite moved away bleeding from an open gash on her forehead and a ruptured mouse by her eye. Her face was a mask of bruising. The Lioness’s eyes were slits now and her face was just as mangled.The Lioness staggered forward. Ka’ite planted her left foot and snap-kicked the cat woman in the belly again. Sabor moaned and staggered backwards cradling her aching gut.
The crowd cheered as the Lioness’s head flew back and her arms stiffened. She stood there like a statute for a long beat, wobbling in place with her legs spread and stiff trying to maintain balance. Ka’ite gave no such respite as she took aim and delivered a field goal-scoring kick to Sabor's crotch The feline sputters and staggered forward doubling over. Ka’ite then kicked again this time into Sabor’s face at which point the mighty savannah tyrant lost all motor function. The crowd loses their mind. She fell face first into the floor, landing in such a way that her knees formed one support and her face the other. Her tits dangled and then flattened out on the stone. her slack tail tail occasionally flicking one way or the other. Queen of the savannah Sabor, lay there, stone cold unconscious from possibly the nastiest blow to her head she'd taken her entire life. The only noises leaving her were soft moans as her glassy eyes stared off into space. Ka'ite kneels over her downed enemy and playfully knocks the lioness on the forehead in imitation of a door knock, asking if Sabor's awake in there to which the majestic slack body of course says nothing. Ka’ite was gasping for breath and bleeding from her cuts and bruises but still ad an estatic grin on her face as the Zebra ref pushed her aside and started counting the lion out, testing her with limp arm drops and smelling salts. When Sabor didn't stir Ka’ite was given the honours of dragging the humbled savannah queen by the tail across the platform rolling her off the platform.
The Ref summons up the 2nd fighter on the defender’s side “Next is Queen Sabor's oldest daughter, Savanna!”
Ka’ite held up her bloody hands and then motioned for the next Anthro in line.
The pristine and spoiled princess Savanah had lived a pampered life compared to her warlord mother and was not expecting to actually fight when the Queen was so certain pre-match she'd sweep the upstarts all her own.
She moved in quickly. Ka’ite stopped her with a left jab that quickly started the young cat’s nose spurting. Ka’ite then hooked a right into Savanah’s left eye staggering her. The battle-weary woman followed up with a leg kick to the knee which put Savanah down on one leg. Ka’ite’s follow up left roundhouse kick was blocked by the lion’s blocking right arm. Ka’ite’s crotch takes a claw swipe full on the clit. She gasped and fell down on her ass, the first knockdown to Savanah.
Savanah’s leg was hurting, but she was on her feet much quicker than the exhausted, battered head of the humans. Savanah moved in again. Ka’ite knocked her face twice, but took heavy tit and belly shots. Ka’ite retreated and fired long legged kicks to keep the fat cat at bay. Savanah’s thighs were soon covered in bruise marks from Ka’ite’s striking feet, but she kept pushing ahead slowly forcing Ka’ite to stand and fight in a corner of the platform.
The lion girl’s right eyebrow ruptured in a spurt of blood as Ka’ite hammered her with jabs and hooks, but Savanah’s low blows had the tall black staggering and bent over to where the Princess could hammer her face. The mutual pounding finally ended with them hanging on by the edge of the platform. Ka’ite tried to kick Savanah’s right ankle out from under her and throw the bitch off the platform into the ground. Savanah managed to stand her ground and push the human back toward the other edge.
Ka’ite stopped her stumble and took a mauling clawswipe right to the top of her head. Ka’ite screamed and stumbled trying to escape. Savanah’s right took her in the pit of the stomach. Ka’ite bent over and the cat clubbed her across the neck. Ka’ite dropped to her knees, but Savanah’s body held her up. Savanah put her claws on Ka’ite’s shoulder and held her still as A savage knee to Ka’ite’s chin knocked her back and over the edge. The Matriarch landed on the ground on one shoulder.
The lion crowd cheered and Savannah roars in her victory as the next human climbed up.
The announcer said, “Fighting next is Bojikoi Ka’ite’s second daughter and a warrior appointee.”
She looked about nineteen. Her muscles were large but she was still lushly padded. Bojikoi was as close to fucking beautiful as a scarred up Amazon warrior with fire in her eyes could be. To bad, because her face would be a mess before she finished this war.
Savanah rushed the warrior throwing low looping shots. Bojikoi stood there and took them, grunting with each impact. Then she grabbed the attacker, hooking her forearms behind her head and began ramming high knees up into Savanah’s lower belly. Some of them scored on the point of her pubic mound. Savanah made sputtering sounds as she struggled to get away, but she took several fast knees down low before before slipping under Bojikoi’s arms.
Bojikoi hammered a long straight right into Savanah’s left ear which put the pampered young cat down hard. Savanah rolled over to her hands and knees, shaking her head of fuzziness. Bojikoi had quickly erased her jubilation at avenging her mother’s loss as her foot came down stomping the tip of the cat’s tasil to hold her in place. Savanah roars and managed to stand with her tail still pinned under foot. The spirited but unskilled lounge cat lowered her head, crouched and moved forward, fists ready. Bojikoi smacked her face three times, before Savanah got close enough to sink a fist into the woman’s crotch. Bojikoi groaned and drove a knee back into Savanah’s belly. She cried out and rammed into Bojikoi, grabbing her in a bearhug and trying to shove her off the stone pedestal. But Bojikoi washeavy and had great balance. She pushed back and hammered the young feline’s sides and kidneys. Savanah grunted and continued to push, but Bojikoi’s wide swinging right fist was turning the cat’s side into a giant bruise under her golden pelt.
Savanah tried to stop the battle of shoves with a crotch punch, but at that angle she only grazed Bojikoi’s inner thighs.
Bojikoi suddenly shifted to the side and let Savanah stumbled past her. The feline straightened up just in time to get a right hook to the right side of her face from behind. Savanah spun around and was backfisted by Bojikoi across the mouth, opening up the fighter’s lips and causing her to stagger. Savanah turned around and sank three punches into the human’s chest, flattening the right breast andrattling those ribs. Bojikoi grimaced and fired a straight right back into Savanah’s mouth, snapping the kitty’s head back as two sharp teeth come loose stopping her attack as savannah feels the thing rattling around in her mouth.
She coughs and spit out blood and the broken tooth spill out at Bojikoi’s feet. Now she couldn’t even effectively bite the human. Bojikoi stomped down on Savanah’s tail and then pushed her backwards sending the cat staggering. As Savanah barely regained her footing, Bojikoi struck her in the right side with a big left foot high kick. Bojikoi’s foot flattened the lioness’s boob and lifted Savanah off her feet. The tribal princess bounced off her ass and came to rest less than a foot from the edge.
The ref counted. Savanah was groggy and hurt. She rolled over on her hands and knees and slowly pushed up. The ref waited until she stood and then told her to turn around. When she didn’t he continued the count. She finally turned at 55 and stepped back. Bojikoi moved forward slowly, punching away at Savanah’s face. Savanah bravely stood her ground and fought back, but the warrior’s punches were like cannon shots. Savanah’s nose and mouth squirted with blood. Her damaged forehead and eyebrows were busted opened and finally an upper cut rammed her already damaged teeth together breaking two more and sending her falling backwards off the platform.
Bojikoi raised her bloody hands holding a tooth up high and pointed at the rest of The
Lioness’s family. She kissed her fists and threw the cat’s teeth over the edge making sure
they knew what was coming for them. Her sisters cheered her on. Bojikoi was an even tougher customer than her mother.
Down below Ka’ite was getting up onto unsteady feet just in time to see her daughter sending Savanah fall off the edge with a meaty thud right next to her. Ka’ite beamed
with pride for her daughter even though she was shredded by two consecutive duals and a
fall. Her other family members gave her water and a stool to sit on. On
the other hand, Sabor was barely moving still laying in the dirt. Still she had plenty of time
before the rotation came back to her and the occasionally moan and huff coming from the
Tyrant queen’s form was indicative that she was going to come to sooner than later and she’d be pissed.
The announcer said, “Fighting next is Stalker, Queen Sabor’s first daughter”
Stalker walked onto the platform and immediately rushed the warrior woman who stood
her ground and busted open the new fighter’s lip with a savage right. Stalker’s head bounced
and she staggered falling on her ass.
Stalker cursed, rolled over, shook her head and then got to her feet.
Bojikoi moved in headhunting again. Stalker blocked a left but took a right to her ribs. Her
own left smashed Bojikoi’s right tit flat and her right dug into Bojikoi’s belly. The human
fired back with a right to the left eye and a low left into the belly. Stalker groaned and
retaliated by driving her right straight down, striking Bojikoi’s prominent young pubic mound from
above. Bojikoi groaned and doubled over slightly. Stalker drove a left up into the black woman's
face and blood started flowing from her nose. Bojikoi retreated a step and banged three
lefts into Stalker’s mug, reddening and causing the cat woman’s eyes to water.
Stalker stepped in close snarling and dug a low right into Bojikoi’s already bruised belly causing the human to grunt and step back. Stalker missed the following punch and Bojikoi circled away.
Dripping blood Stalker charged after the black girl, pounding her on the ribs, in the plexus and on the arms. Bojikoi finally stood her ground and fired rights and lefts into Stalker’s face again opening up her nose and starting the right eye swelling. In close Stalker sank five rapid wide swings into the lower right side of Bojikoi’s abs causing the black Amazon to grab Stalker in a bear hug to stop the pounding. Stalker struggled to get out. Bojikoi held on until she recovered from the gut-busting, then drove her head down on Stalker’s nose, stunning the kitty princess and causing the blood from her nose to dribble.
Now Stalker held on, leaning against Bojikoi. She used her teeth for the first time in the fight and bit the top of Bojikoi’s right breast. Unable to pull her off Bojikoi screamed and pounded the back of Stalker’s head until the Feline relented. Bojikoi’s right tit showed a bloody imprint of Stalker’s fangs, but Stalker was stunned by the headshots. The two circled slowly.
Stalker moved first again and took jabs for her trouble before breaking through with a near miss of a bite. Bojikoi squealed and dropped to her knees holding herself. Before she could protect herself by falling, Stalker had levelled her with a wide right to the left cheek. Bojikoi lay on her back bleeding from a split cheek, staring at the feline above. She got up by a count of forty-five.
Stalker closed and pounded the human driving her backwards toward the edge of the platform. Bojikoi blocked but of course, her arms were already beaten black and blue. Getting hit by the cat’s knuckles or claws hurt wherever they hit. Bojikoi managed to avoid being forced off the platform using a quick left hook to the side of Stalker’s head, staggering the Lioness.
Seeing Stalker wounded, Bojikoi did a high jump kick into the pit of Stalker’s gut. Bojikoi’s big foot seemed to sink into the cat’s torso up to the ankle. Stalker grunted and whimpered as she fell on her ass gasping.
Bojikoi panted herself. Her body was tinted red now in so many spots. She didn’t know how long she could take more beatings from the heavier cat woman. Stalker managed to get to her feet at a count of forty. She moved forward and the two battle bitches started slugging away. Tits, bellies, faces, arms, heads and ribs were hit again and again. Stalker pushed close and the two of them leaned against each other hammering shots into sides, stomachs and kidneys. Blood and sweat flew with each solid impact. Bojikoi almost got pushed off the edge, but she side stepped at the last minute.
Stalker continued hammering the warrior’s body at the cost of her health. The cat’s right eyebrow burst and filled what was left of her right eye’s line of vision with blood. Her nose was twice its normal size, twisted and pouring blood. Her mouth was shredded and one lip looked to be almost hanging, but the lioness kept going. The battle of attrition continued on and on until neither woman was able to stand without the other’s shoulder.
Stalker pushed against Bojikoi, grabbed her in a bear hug, lifted her off her feet and threw her toward the edge. Bojikoi staggered, stumbled and fell on the edge, but held on. Stalker leaned over, vomited bile, food and blood out of her stomach and fell down moaning. Both women struggled trying to get to their feet. The count reached sixty and neither one had stood. The refs put their boots on Bojikoi’s side and pushed her over the edge. They grabbed Stalker’s arms and dragged her and tossed her on the opposite side.
As the two fighters fell Queen Sabor had finally come to. Her remaining unbeaten daughters were nursing her with licks to her wounds. Very slowly and painfully the bludgeoned and generally humiliated Lioness rose to her feet after the beating put on her by Ka’ite.
Savanah had just begun to move again. She was still in a bodily heap where she had hit the ground.
The announcer said, “Fighting next for the humans is Maria, Ka’ite’s third daughter.”
Maria was dark brown rather than pitch black like the rest. Her father must have been a foreigner of some description.
The announcer continued, “The announcer said, “Fighting next is Gnasher, queen Sabor’s granddaughter by a deceased daughter.
Gnasher’s pelt looked to be messy at best. She looked to be in her twenties. The smaller, dark lioness fighter looked to be in her late teens at most. Two new fighters were coming up to batter one another. Despite the human tribe being in the lead two down to three down, Some in the crown doubted that Ka’ite’s younger children could stand up to larger lion youths.
Maria moved quickly avoiding the patented lioness head on charge. She looked to be good with her fists, striking Gnasher four times before taking a shot in return. The bigger cat kept pressing, getting her lips split in order to hammer Maria’s brown tits. Maria hammered a right uppercut into Gnasher’s chin and knocked the animal backwards on her ass. The crowd shouted for Maria, enjoying the site of the smaller teen whipping the arrogant feline.
Gnasher spit blood and stood up. She moved forward, blocking two shots, taking a third to the eye and finally connected with Maria’s mouth. Maria staggered back and then took a wild right low in the belly. The brown girl groaned and doubled over, taking a hard left to the temple. Maria hit the ground like she had been hit with a hammer. She immediately rolled over and got to her hands and knees.
At a count of fifty she stood up. Gnasher came in, her bloody lips smiling. Maria stood her ground and punched the smile of the heavier woman’s face. Gnasher fired back and they slugged each other in the face, head, arms, shoulders, tits and belly non-stop for about five minutes. Most of the shots were blocked or partially dodged due to the fact that four fists were flying, bodies moving and heads bobbing. Gnasher got winded and grabbed hold. Maria stomped on her foot and then drove a knee into the gold furred bush. Gnasher gasped and fell to her knees. Maria leaned a knee between the animal woman’s big boobs and held her in place for a smashing right to the left ear and a follow on left to the right ear. Gnasher sat backwards, her ass on her heels. The ref signaled she was not technically down.
Maria stepped back and soccer kicked the lioness in the crotch. Gnasher screamed and leaned forward to grapple. Maria grabbed both sides of the woman’s head with her sweaty palms, holding her chin in position for a savage right knee to the jaw. Gnasher’s head snapped back out of Maria’s vice-like fists. She rolled to the left and fell on her side.
Gnasher came too at about fifty and spit out a mouth full of blood and what looked to be six or seven pieces of teeth. She groaned and rolled onto her stomach and tried to press up to her hands and knees. Blood poured out of her mouth. She was unable to stand. The human grabbed her under the arms and dragged her to the edge and tossed her face first onto the dirt off the platform.
She landed near Savanah who was leaning against the side of the stone crying and cursing at the humans for brutalizing her and her family. Stalker was on the other side. She was covered in welt under that coat of hers, but she had recovered well enough. No one was there to help pull her up so she would have to do it herself. Queen sabor was still lying on her side moaning. The human Bojikoi had also recovered well.
She gotup on her own and was quickly watered and fed by her supporting family. Ka’ite cheering on her kids.
The announcer continued, “Fighting next for The Lioness’s Clan is Bloodfang, The Lioness’s granddaughter by Savanah. Now Maria was a forty-five pound underdog and she was already drenched in sweat from the previous battle. Still Despite the weight disadvantages they had already put four of the savage lions down to two of their own. Bloodfang was the last unharmed cat on rotation. Ka’ite still had two young daughters, small and lightweight, but they were fresh. Furthermore, Ka’ite and Bojikoi looked far more able to continue than any of the four already beaten cats.
Bloodfang moved forward just like her grandmother, aunt, mother and cousins had done. Maria retreated, jabbing. Bloodfang pursued doggedly getting jabbed four or five times for every wild punch to the shoulder or glancing shot to the head and arms she got for her trouble. After about ten minutes Bloodfang was drenched and blowing. Maria moved forward and connected with eight hard rights and lefts to Bloodfang’s face. The spunky young feline was jarred and bloodied immediately, but she fired back heavy body shots that wounded the thin brown girl. Maria retreated struggling to breathe.
Bloodfang shook her head to clear it and stalked the brown girl again. The kitty closed and began systematically smashing Maria’s brown body with solid drum beating of knuckle shots. The hits actually started opening Maria’s right side to bleeding. Maria groaned and fired back reducing the cat’s rack to a swollen bloody wreck. Bloodfang continued to press forward.
The 130 pound brown girl was chased around the platform. Bloodfang’s face grew more and more battered, but her relentless attack on the human girl finally sent Maria to her knees. Unlike the others who fell, she had the presence of mind to quickly fall to the side and avoid a hammering to the head.
She laid there holding her ribs and moaning. She finally rose up favoring her bloody right side. She dropped her right elbow to cover the area and fought on.
Bloodfang was exhausted, but now Maria was out of gas too. The red head stumbled after the brown skinned girl. Maria was too slow to avoid the lumbering heavyweight. Bloodfang finally boxed her into a corner of the platform and hammered her. Maria fought back with her left hand opening up new wounds on Bloodfang’s face, but the lion was tenacious. Maria was forced back inch by inch, now her face was bloody and swollen too. The final battering of her tits and belly drove her to the edge of the platform and a hard shoulder punch was all it took to send her falling into the hard embrace of the ground.
Bloodfang sat down blowing hard, exhausted. Stalker was up and licking wounds with her mother and sister Gnasher was slowly making her way to consciousness after her knockout an fall. The Lions had closed the gap to four to three.
The announcer said, “Fighting next for the humans is "Jacoba" Ka’ite’s third daughter.
This was a total mismatch, but at least Bloodfang had been badly beaten and was still likely exhausted. The crowds didn’t give Jacoba a ghost of a chance even if she was the scrappiest of the human girls.
Jacoba l darted in toward Bloodfang, ducking a right left and hammered the big woman straight to the mound with the first jab.
Bloodfang cursed and grabbed for Jacoba, but the little girl straightened up and drove the top of her head into Bloodfang’s chin. Bloodfang staggered back, more damage done to her broken teeth. Jacoba fired six rapid right lefts to Bloodfang’s huge flopping tits and then finished off with a right foot to the crotch. Bloodfang connected with a wild swing to Jacoba’s head and the second the human woman retreated.
Jacoba’s right eye started swelling immediately. Bloodfang cursed and staggered forward headhunting the small girl. Jacoba blocked two shots and splattered Bloodfang’s tits with four hard rights while she blocked with her left. Bloodfang grabbed Jacoba’s shoulders with her clawwed hands and rammed a hard knee into the small teen’s crotch. Jacoba groaned and responded with a low right. Bloodfang cursed and clawed Jacoba across the back of the head knocking the small girl to her knees.
People waited for the finisher, but Jacoba drove another fist into Bloodfang’s crotch. Bloodfang screamed and grabbed herself, bending over the smaller girl. Firing from the knees, the black teen smashed the heavy pred in the middle of her wide open face with lefts and rights. Bloodfang sat down hard, blood pouring from her already busted face and a new rupture under her closed right eye. Jacoba stood and walked away.
Bloodfang stood up at a count of fifty five. Jacoba stunned everybody by running toward the feline woman, jumping in the air and delivering a perfect pro-style flying kick to the the savage's chest. Jacoba fell hard to the rock, illustrating only one of the reasons why no one in their right mind would do the move. However, in this case, Bloodfang had been near the edge of the platform. The kick propelled her backwards. One foot went over and she frantically waved her hands in the air to no purpose. Bloodfang screamed and went over backwards falling hard into the hard ground. Jacoba climbed off the stone floor, bleeding from a knee.
She shook herself out and then raised her bloody fists to the applause of the startled audience.
The announcer said, “Fighting next for the lions is Sabor!.”
The Lioness queen lumbered out onto the platform. The big tough cat queen was a mess. Her flesh had been roughed up by the fight before. Her face and body were pulverized by Ka’ite’s fists. She was still bleeding from facial wounds. Her fur was matted with blood and sweat and pulled and tangled into knots. Still she was ready to fight. Little Jacoba darted forward and kicked the lioness’s outer thigh. The queen’s long right hook missed. Jacoba moved back and fired three quick rights into the pit of The Lioness’s belly and retreated again. The Lioness caught her on the side of the head with a backhand. Jacoba stumbled and Sabor drove her big fist straight into the girl’s face knocking her on her ass. Jacoba rolled over and got to her hands and knees, nose bleeding badly. She managed to get up by a count of thirty and retreated.
The Lioness lunged after her missing with wilding rights and lefts. Jacoba ducked under a hard right, got behind The Lioness and threw six shots, right and left, into The Lioness’s kidneys. The beast groaned and swung around missing Jacoba with a nasty right back fist. Jacoba rose up and fired three hard rights straight up into The Lioness’s ribs The big woman leaned forward and grabbed the teen in a bear hug. Jacoba bit into the huge tits covering her face. The cat groaned and lifted the teen off her feet. The Lioness started walking the small fighter toward the edge. Jacoba ’s teeth were at work and The Lioness’s head was back from the agony but she held the squirming teen in her mighty arms. Finally Jacoba ’s right leg hooked behind Sabor's left knee and they both went down hard.
The Lioness rolled off the crushed brown girl. Jacoba was gasping, almost knocked out from the impact. The woman got up at the count of fifty.
Jacoba struggled to her feet at the count of fifty-nine just beating the refs. Sabor, blowing and huffingin her own right staggered forward to finish off the hurt teen. Jacoba dodged out of the way and retreated. The feline chased her for at least five minutes. The human and lion both were practically out on their feet. Jacoba suddenly stopped running, planted her left foot and Instead she lunged forward and stomp kicked Sabor's right thigh. She grunted and hammered a round hose into Jacoba’s right eye, knocking the human girl to the side. She didn’t fall; instead she pushed under the carnivore’s following left and started pumping punches into her black and blue lower belly. Sabor grabbed her in a bear hug and tried to repeat the attempt at throwing the human off the platform but Jacoba’s teeth found a nipple.
screamed tried to get her clubbed fists between Faith and her tit. Jacoba grabbed the cat woman in her own attempt at a bear hug and continued to tear at the nipple. queen Sabor jerked and twisted trying to through the tribal girl off her boob. Finally, she started punching the back of Jacoba’s head and neck in desperation. Faith let go and retreated two steps.
Sabor screamed as she looked down at her missing nipple. Blood squirted from her swollen bruised tit and she looked at the human uncomprehendingly. Jacoba spat the nipple out on the stone and stomped on it with her heel. Sabor screamed and rushed forward swinging. Jacoba dodged to the side and jumped on the cat from behind driving feline forward into the stone. She rolled off and stood up dancing on her feet and laughing. Sabor rolled over on her back holding her tit screaming in pain. She stood up at the count of fifty, spurting blood. She tried to cup the hole in her breast with her right claw. At the signal, Jacoba came forward and hammered the animal in the face with a right and a left. Sabor fired back, busting open Jacoba’s mouth, but the human stayed on her.
Sabor retreated trying to protect herself and hold her wound closed. Jacoba was merciless. Her hard little feet kicked and stomped every inch of the big woman’s legs. Sabor got beat back into a corner. She swung a right with all her remaining strength. Jacoba avoided it easily and then kicked the side of Sabor’s stiff right knee. The big cat antrho cried out and fell heavily on the one knee.
Before she could fall, Jacoba put her fists on the woman’s shoulders and drove a right knee up under her chin. Sabor’s head went back and her arms dropped limp to her sides. Jacoba didn’t let the big cat to fall forward. She leaned into her keeping her on her knees. The woman used her hip to hold up the cat woman and then hammered her right fist into Sabor’s temple again and again. The solid wet thud of the blood stained knuckles resonted around the arena. Jacoba continued pounding until she exhausted her arm. Then she stepped back and hammered both fists down on the back of the big beast’s head.
The lioness dropped face first into the stone floor and didn’t move. Jacoba staggered away holding herself and gasping. She was almost out of the fight herself. and Sabor fell forward hard onto the rock.
The refs counted over The lioness's body. The murderous cat didn’t stir. At the count of sixty the victorious human grabbed her heels and dragged the queen face first across the stone to the edge. Her face left a red trail. She rolled her limp body off the platform. She hit once and bounced, not moving again.

Milfs in general are my bag.
>Find a literal cougar who's in her early 40s, alone on a Saturday night at a bar
>More money than she knows what to do with since she focused on her career instead of relationships
>Big house with no one to share it with
>Drowning her sorrows in the finest whiskey she can since no sane man would ever give her the time of day
>You come along, giving her some cheesy pick up line
>She's obviously skeptical, but you claim you saw a pretty lady drinking alone and figured you'd say hello
>She's flattered by your compliments, words she hasn't heard in some time
>Alcohol is doin' its job, and she figures she might as well go for broke and ask you back to her place
>To her surprise you accept
>The minute you get to the door she's got her claws in you, with her rough tongue probing your mouth
>Practically drags you to her bedroom, and while she takes the lead at first, your youth outpaces her
>By the time morning comes, she's face first in her 1000 thread count sheets, soiled with cum and her own love juices
>When she comes to, thanks you for the lovely night, and offers to make you breakfast
>Clearly doesn't want the encounter to end
>Suggests since it's a Sunday and you're both off, maybe you could do something together

>A young maid sucks off her human half-brother
>Maids and servants have all been bred by the current master of the estate
>Many maid families have faithfully served a single line of human masters/fathers for generations
>Only humans may be legitimate heirs of the estate and are born from human mothers
>Of course that does not stop the men from fooling around with their loving anthro maids
>His son is also free to use his half-sisters whenever he wishes
>From the mature anthro lady whom he would call mother to his younger half-sister who doesn't even know what sex is, all pussies are his
>He is considered a man once he impregnates his first maid
>All of his daughters are now considered exclusively his servants which he will use to forge his own empire

>born from human mothers
Nah nah. What you want is to have the eldest fertile maid have the firstborn human son of the master, he’s the heir. Because if they’re property that means hes the son of the master and “born of the estate”
Plus human son anthro daughter is better overall

>firstborn son is soon to be head of another estate his father just purchased
>as a very young boy was given the literal pick of the litter
>didn’t understand and played with the whole basket of little things
>fast forward to years later in the estate his father purchased for him.
>it was last week or so he just came of age
>the whole variety harem package return to him, all having been chosen
>canine, feline, equids and bovids, lizards and avians
>a whole plethora of nubile concubines he merely thought were little animals when he was a boy. Now before him again and ready to give him as many heirs as he wishes

>every now and again you have a human son to go with the litter one of your wives had (both born by anthro mothers)
>simply betroth your son to his half sisters from another one of his mothers
>timescales don’t match up all the time, lots of room for harem of big sisters or little sisters. Maybe mix and match a selection for your son of his half siblings
>your family so big you and all your offspring within a couple generations populate almost a whole city

Reasons to ride a worgen:
>Naturally accustomed to running on all fours
>Protruding muzzle ideal for fitting a bridle
>Relatively compact size good for cramped areas
>Capable of speeds rivaling even the swiftest horses (probably not while bearing your fat ass, granted, but she may still have some decent speed in her if you rid her of the excess burden of her gear)
>Perfect position to finally pet/"pet" the giant dog
>Tack for a worgen is surprisingly cheap
>Probably an epic mount

>Pain sears through her leg as you slide the knife across her skin, adding another stroke to the tally of times you've ravished her exposed body
>She was a warrior once, the pride of Gilneas
>The chains rattle and clatter above you as she writhes against her restraints trying in vain to stop you
>You grab her by the hair, lifting her terrified gaze to meet yours, and wrap another hand around her collared throat
>It had been an easy decision when the Horde came to you, offering wealth and power in return for turning traitor
>They even let you keep your favourite captain after leading your squad into an ambush
>The dread in her expression was palpable
>You smother her with a kiss, raping her mouth with your tongue
>The only noise she can make is fearful gargling as her muzzled, open maw chokes on your spit
>You withdraw, taking one last feel of her body, pinching her sensitive nipples as she squirms and begs and rubbing your hand across her dripping cunt
>The tears swell in her eyes as she begins to sob and saliva drools down across her body, betraying her broken will
>This will do for now you think, adding logs to the dungeon's hearth and leaving her hot, shaking body in the trophy room below

>In a distant land there existed a clan of tribal humans that lived off of the land. Near their tribal lands thrived a country of nagas who prides themselves as beings of higher intellect that excelled in the arts of entrancement. The nagas would on occasion journey into the human lands and enthrall a warrior to serve as their loyal and obedient bodyguard. And enthralling a human was a sign of prestige and wealth to the nagas.
>When young men from the human tribes showed a talent for the arts of shamanism they were heralded by their people. When they came of age they were sent out into the wilderness naked and only carrying a few necessary supplies for survival. They were directed towards the naga-held lands to encounter a naga while in the wild for a battle of will. If the human was weak he would become enslaved by the naga... a being eager to serve their serpentine master without question. But, if their will was stronger than the naga they would entrance the serpent and bring them back to the human tribe.
>These nagas would become enthralled and bonded to their human master, following him eagerly and taking delight and pleasure in their obedience to him. They would become like a guiding being to the shaman, augmenting his abilities and finding bliss in their obedience to his words.
>Baitos was one such young shaman. When he had come of the age 18 he was sent into the wild to see if his will was strong enough to conquer the mind of a naga. With wit, skill, and charm he was able to subdue a naga noble that had traveled into the human lands in an attempt to hypnotize a human or two for himself. Now, he begins the process of connectiong the naga's thoughts of obedience to pleasure... in order to bring the naga into a state of correlating the two as interchangeable concepts.

>MC has a buddy, both are into anthros
>Buddy orders a anthro maid from a catalog, gets cute little waifu, recommends it to MC
>MC orders anthro maid, what shows up is 8ft Amazonian retired warrior cat anthro who gives off a deadly vibe
>MC is massively disappointed
>Too scared to make a move on her as she does her maidly duties
>She seems very cold, aloof, and intimidating when trying to interact with her
>Eventually decides it's better to just release her from the contract
>Warrior Cat is actually heartbroken and begins to cry at the news
>Turns out, she signed up for the program in the hopes that she'd find a super cute master, because that's every anthro girl's dream
>Was given bad advice plus had shaky nerves so she gave off the wrong impression
>Secretly really wanted to do lewd things
>Now that the misunderstanding is cleared up, lewd times ensue
>Happy end

Unto the hands of Cleric Don'Mura I pray this parchment and its instructions reach you.
I, Bishop Ansolare, thank you for your many years of dedication to the church. Your petition
for advancement has been approved under condition. You must first show competency by
training a fresh subjugation to be your replacement.
I have arranged for you to receive a young but capable Female Shurian Whiteling to your
post. The Holy One will no doubt wish to grant their blessing to such a unique beast of such ilk.
As for turning the creature to our Savior so that she will take to the blessings I have advice
for how to proceed with what has proven to be great success for many of my years bringing
others into our church.
Firstly
Instruct your guardsmen to beat and torture the girl. It is important that
she have wounds of her own regularly to give her incentive to become a
cleric and make use of our teachings.
Second,
Play yourself off as a slave to the infirmary and befriend the girl. Use the
teachings of the Holy One to show the girl how to mend her own wounds.
She will be far more receptive to heal herself before she'll be willing to heal
the Guard. This is why the beatings will be of such importance.
When she is sufficient enough at healing her own wounds then she will
be ready to undertake further teachings of her fellow Clerics and eventually
tending to the wounds of the guard when she becomes trustworthy. This
should be all the instruction you need to move forth and indoctrinate the
Whiteling into the church as we see fit at this time.
Remember what I taught you Cleric Don'Mura...
The closer someone is to hell, the sweeter our heaven becomes.

>Perverted twist on the greek tale of Orpheus and Eurydice
>Human loses his lover and travels to hell to bring her back
>Devil is some sexual female anthro who toys with the human, claiming that her life is forfiet
>The human knowing that all anthros are weak to human cock, challenges her to a battle of the sexes
>All the power of the underworld isn't enough to prevent the devil from being fucked to oblivion
>But it turns out his lover didn't end up in the underworld
>Her soul was sent to heaven to be reborn
>Human, with the devil's help, ascends to the heavens to find her
>Turns out this mythical god of this world is also a female anthro
>Claims that the human has no dominion over this realm and that her soul shall stay
>Human again uses his raw sexual prowess to bring even the anthro goddess to her knees, having to come to grips that her own creation has usurped her divine power
>Human finds his human lover, happily reunited
>Return to earth with both the goddess and devil in tow, turned into their loyal sex pets
>Live for hundreds of years before allowing themselves to pass and continuing their relationship in the afterlife
>The End

I can just imagined of a cute mascot having to deal with humans sexting in his public posts despite him just doing his cute thing for his product he needs to advertised.
>Humans have a reputation of being horny by making any tiny bit of anthro content related to sex
>This get’s on the dragon mascot’s nerves so much that he tells them to stop being sexual over his battery product
>This amplifies the sexting even more
>His anthro corporates told him to take a “specific” pose for the humans so they can leave their product and him alone
>”O-ok! There! You got your wish. Now please leave my account alone!”

>Tons of large, anxious anthros in need of psychological help.
>Humans are small and non threatening to anthros. Downright cute, in fact.
>Specially trained emotional support humans become popular companions for the anxious.
>Stroke her hair, give her reassuring hugs, and tell her that she's a good girl.
>Try and keep a professional facade when she calls you daddy during a snuggle session.
>"I think I'm in love with you..."
Medical ethics class didn't prepare me for this guys. What do?

imagine being a emotional support human
>spooning an anthro despite her being thrice your size
>petting her and giving her hugs whenever her anxiety acts up
>telling her how much of a good girl she is whenever she makes a breakthrough in her treatment
of course the hardest part is when your charge confesses her feelings for you.

It was midday in the late autumn, the days had already become moody and gray, the wind cold and biting. And yet that didn’t deter Tim from wearing clothes way too think for the season. He enjoyed wearing t-shirts late into the autumn, partly to show his impressive arms off and partly precisely because they were so light and thin. He pulled on his sweatpants and went in front of a mirror. Glancing at himself he saw a healthy, young man, well build and tall, on him grey sweatpants and a bright red t-shirt.
“Good enough.” He muttered to himself as he pulled on his shoes, thin, cloth basketball shoes.
Putting his keys and some pocket change into his pockets, he made his way outside to explore around the ghetto a bit.
It was a quick run to the anthro ghetto, a fenced off part of the city almost exclusively populated by anthros. He enjoyed coming to it, if for nothing else than to fool around in it. In all of polite society, humans had enjoyed a position of complete legal authority to anthros, but it was only really in the ghettos you’d be surrounded by them. And it wasn’t that the anthros were required for anything, the society had been a post scarscity utopia for humans for centuries at this point, the anthros were created and then forced into a subservient position for no reason other than entertainment. They enjoyed welfare, but they still had to work to enjoy anything above subsistance. True, it wasn’t hard back-breaking work and they could quite easily get to comfortable living, but, compared to humans, it was terrible.
He merely slowed from his run to a walk as he passed the fence gates most anthros never will and walked past the heavily armed guards. They didn’t bother checking him. Humans needed no documentation or permissions to move freely, only anthros did. And with that he was in the ghetto.
It looked as he always remembered it, large apartment blocks, painted in white, with their ground levels being taken over by various shops and vendors, crowded streets filled with anthros in perpetual rush, a underground metro, it was all there. And he could use a drink.
A doorbell rung as Tim entered the shop, his stride bringing him to the fridge. A quick glance led him to a branded beer he enjoyed drinking. And a few moments later, he had approached the end of the line. Then the anthros moved out of the way. He had always disliked this about them, they did their absolute best to avoid any bad reactions from humans. He understood it, completely, he would do the same if he was in their position, but it still frustrated him. All the attention, all the glances and looks. The asskissing.
“How much?” He asked. He knew he didn’t need to pay at all. Anthros refused to charge for their services, they even offered themselves and their property at mere motions from humans.
“Its free.” A crow girl cashier replied in a shaky voice.
“Bullshit.” Tim protested.
“Really sir, we are told not to charge humans anything.”
Tim felt irritated. Why didn’t she just give him a straight answer? He glared at her, first in frustration, then noted her.
She was a treat on the eyes, that was for sure, short of stature, as was usual for crows, of a pleasantly curvy bodyshape and dressed in a cashier uniform that strangely suited her, a black and red shirt, tucked in at her waist into her shorts. And those big blue eyes above her black beak. And, Tim noted, a black satin collar around her neck.
Maybe she was irritating him on purpose?
“I’ll only ask once again.” Tim asked, now in a playful voice, “How much?”
The crowgirl straightened herself out, puffing her chest out and crossing her arms.
“Company policy says we don’t charge our human customers.”
She wanted it. And Tim didn’t mind, he wasn’t a shy man.
Reaching out over the counter, he grabbed the crow girl by the neck and, in a forcefull display pulled her over it, leaving her head on the floor at his feet, while her legs were in the air, leaning against the counter. Pulling his pants down, Tim pulled his member out and, after ripping the girls shorts and tearing off her underwear, entered the crow girl before she had time to properly react.
In a few minutes he was done, leaving the crowgirl panting on the floor. He looked up around himself and saw the anthros that had moved out of the line standing behind him, silently waiting and observing him and the crowgirl. He cast a glance at him, a male and a female horse at the head of a twently long chain of anthros, all waiting for this to return to normal.
“You.” He pointed at the male horse at the head of the collumn. “Bring me some rope, zipties, something like that. And hurry.” He ordered and the horse man immediately hit off a sprint. He’d make sure the crowgirl remembered today.
He then grabbed his swatpants, still around his knees and started pulling them up, but thought against it. He didn’t want them to get dirty just yet. He once again turned to the crowd. The female horse was still there. “You, come here.” He ordered “Suck it clean, lest you and your stud join the crow.”
In some 20 minutes two figures were tied up and bent over the counter, one next to another, the crowgirl and the female horse next to her, having been unskilled in her blowjob cleaning, while behind them stood the male horse, keeping a tally as he’d been told by Tim he’d only be allowed to untie the two females once each of them had been creampied a hundred times.

is cool seeing tacticool anthros but how a full anthro army fare against a human army?

>POWs when captured
>"You'll never take me alive, long live the Anthro nation!"
>POW's one day later
>"Okay, here is where my squad is currently hiding. We have supply storehouses here, here, here and here; with a resupply coming in on Wednesday from this location. This is where you can find our current general and here's what you'll need to take her alive. Be careful, she's really feisty and a bit of a literal bitch, so you'll need to break her carefully. Now please, PLEASE, give me a head pat. I've told you everything I can, I swear! Just one pat!"

>glorious human empire must expand for more land resources etc.
>wolves attack in well coordinated squads but scatter and become target practice as soon as you kill the alpha
>Bulls rams charge as soon as they see a opening but it's very obvious when they are going to pull that off, boars do the same but sometimes in large groups
>a well coordinated ambush by the big cat group can cause a lot of casualties on your side but nothing than some flamethrowers to burn their hiding spots
>bears are just your typical juggernauts

>What's the best way to marked a collared bitch? Just using a collar, or do you have other methods of branding in mind?
Nothing wrong with a collar, per se, but I like using piercings. There's so much variety in what to choose for them!
The girls in the stables? Cold iron, big thick pieces deep in the ears or the septum of the nose. Doesn't get caught up in the harness even they go out to the fields, and if they get sassy then it's a convenient handle to grab while you thrash some manners into them...
The house girls get finer jewelry, if only by a little. Sterling silver, pewter if they're new to the household and might try to pawn it and make a run. Antler charms are good if your servants do not drop their horns yearly, or a dainty little nose stud, something that catches the light and sparkles as they pass by a window or a mirror. A sealed wristlet of good metal will serve too, seeing it every time they scrub a floor or wash a pan reminds them that they are property...
Slaves for the bedroom are gilded, as befits the household of a gentleman. A stud in the tongue promotes the use of it for pleasure, delicate rings through the teats provide a fine place to tug and lead the strumpet about the room. The nethers can hold many enchanting rings and bars, which excites the Beast as you couple her, and goads them into further heights of passionate love-making. Even the navel is a fine spot to hang a pretty bauble, although when the belly swells with a litter of pups then it may be rejected in the final months of her embarrassment. No matter, you may always re-pierce the bitch after she whelps them...
There are some Masters who lavish gemstones upon their property, but this is a sure sign of noveau-riche grasping after status. The true gentleman does not swell his Beastborn with pride by gifting then things above their station, but provides the necessary things in life that they may learn wisdom and be civilized by the Master's firm care...

Which fictional alien species is best to subjugate beneath humanity's benevolent boot?
Standard /collared/ tropes apply, they'd be just as eager to serve as any anthro.

I'll go for Turians and Quarians.
For Turians, whats there not to like, elegant, strong, tough, resistant species.
I'd honestly take an entire village of them, just for the sake of having them, pick a few females to be personal cocksleeves and maybe feminize Turian males just for the sake of it, an aspect of dominance.
Just imagine, Turians, a proud militant race, except now their mandatory military service is 15 years of learning how to service humans, with them becoming reserves by the time they start getting old and less pretty. Just 15 years of practice, makeup training, physical exercise for the sole reason of aesthetics, learning human tastes and favoured sex poses...
As for the Quarians, smart, already fit a few fetishes of mine (faceless, clothed, latex), cute.
I'd definetly have every single Quarian male be a trap by upbringing, simply because I prefer feminine bodyshapes to look at.
And I wouldn't even bother having a female Quarian strip naked for me, Id simply have every female Quarian wear a suit with a inbuilt stretchable vaginal and anal covering, so I can just walk up to them and fuck them through their suit.
Just imagine walking up to a female Quarian somewhere on their ship, bending her over (maybe in front of her family) and fucking her in the ass right then and there, no condoms needed, cumming in her ass, leaving semen dripping from between her legs, walking away and leaving her gaped, wincing and panting, with her strechable suit still streched well into her asshole.

There's this free computer game you can get on Steam called The Battle For Wesnoth. It's actually a really good fantasy tactics game made in 2005. It's got a standout modding scene and a relatively active playerbase, but I'm not bringing it up to gush about it.
There's a funny little interaction in the game I think you folks will enjoy quite a bit.
>Enter the Drake Faction
>Pretty much the only Anthro Faction is the Basegame
>They are powerhouses, with high damage, health, and defenses
>Numberwise they are easily the best
>That doesn't stop them from being heavily countered by the Human Faction, the Loyalists!
>Drakes have two weaknesses which the Loyalists exploit ruthlessly: they are weak to piercing weapons and each drake Unit is expensive AF, making them harder to amass and replace
>The loyalist's bread and butter is a relatively cheap spearman unit which cost almost nothing to get
>You see where I'm going with this
>Hoards of Human Spearmen swarm and surround Drakes while they each take turns impaling them with their long spears
>they continue this boarish behavior until the enemy is exhausted and their leader experiences the same fate~
>I am not making this up
>This is the actual optimal strategy used against Drakes
>Sure, a skilled Drake Player can still fight against this, especially if the Human player starts playing braindead, but it's actually really tough to beat!
Of course, all the dragons you play as in the game are male, so it might not exactly interest many of you. I just thought you'd find this interesting is all.
Tldr: If a large imposing dragon man comes to cause a ruckus in your city, just grab your friends and take turn impaling him with your spears.

I keep thinking that in a conventional multi-species setting, rodents would be very numerous from their rate of reproduction and low resource-requirements, the majority most likely being poor or impoverished, due to their short lifespans and inability to accumulate the experience necessary for most skilled labour. It follows then that they'd be an underclass in most cities, seen as somewhat lecherous and filthy, but likewise expendable, owing to their numbers and lack of connections, with the exception of extended clans hoarding wealth to better their core families. An unfortunate conclusion is that rodent girls would be disproportionately common in prostitution and generally desperate as a result of their natural libido, possibly with an inferiority complex from their size and poverty. This means they'd probably be seen as a typical first lay, to "practice" with before trying to start an "actual" relationship, especially as they age so quickly. I imagine the athletic firstborn from a minor merchant family starts coming of age and they arrange a silver dowry, of sorts, with a more influential clan to have a beautiful rodent live-in with their household so that their heir won't be looking to cause a scandal further afield. All very under the table, of course, but once he gets over his initial nervousness, he finds he genuinely loves the ratgirl for more than her body, a sentiment she reciprocates but which they both keep secret from the public and his family, who would be disgusted. They enjoy a few short years together as he comes into his prime and the expectation to find a real wife comes in, and she's already gone from her youth to her late middle-age, and will be decrepit by his thirties, something they both know.

>allowed to make one final video message to her family from the POW camp before she's taken away to her master's homeland permanently
>mother and father shocked to see their precious little girl become a woman in the worst way possible
>legs spread wide to show the cum of her conqueror dripping from her ravaged pussy
>forced to wear shredded clothes, exposing her breasts to anyone who wished to have a look for even a grope even while she slept
>has no choice to serve her conqueror in any way he demands
>but she's not crying, she's accepted her place long ago
>master slaps her face with his erect cock while she's in the middle of her message, not even allowed to finish up and say that she loves them before her mouth is put to better use
>her final message ends with him claiming her as his own by splattering her face and breasts with his scent, permanently marking her as his property
>her parents will have many, many, many grandchildren in the coming years whether they like it or not

>That feel when you are a rugged pioneer living on the outskirts of civilization who has finally cornered the stray Skaven who’s been stealing from your farm’s grain mill for days.
>That feel when after you exhaust and choke out the vermin in a short grapple with your muscular limbs you apply his own tail as a makeshift rope bind so you can hang the vile thief by a ceiling hook while you considered applications for your new property.
>That feel when it’s the next morning and you clamp your starving rat’s mouth shut with a cage muzzle and tell him there'll be food for him once he completes a fair day’s work tilling the fields under your supervision.
>That feel when at midday your increasingly spastic ratto faints in the midday sun and you mercifully drag him back to the cabin to feed him a large helping of potatoes. Your ratto is extremely confused that you saved his life. Reapplying the cage muzzle you tell him to go finish tending the fields and maybe you’ll feed him again.
>That feel when you start taking your Skaven to bed with you as a warm and fuzzy bedtoy but you had to punnish him with belt lashes when you awoke to find that he jizzed in the bedsheets the next morning. Your ratto sleeps hogtied from now with his rump in easy fucking range.
>That feel when after several weeks you have a always devoted slave rat who’s very existence revolves around working the farm for all hours of the day in exchange for the food and sexual domination you provide him.
>That feel when you go on long hunts to capture other Skaven and introduce them to their new life as farm servants.
>That feel when your first ratto dies of old age and you get a sweet fur rug and a taxiderm out of the deal.

That discussion about tactics a thread or two ago has got me thinking of late iron age warfare with anthros.
>boars in the throes of berserkergang
>armadillos in a phalanx, each in near full-plate
>buck javelineers doing hit-and-run tactics
>horses flanking and charging with impunity
>mice with pisspoor training and shoddy weapons, in insane numbers
>weasels poisoning rations and sabotaging equipment
>bears so large and strong they're worth three soldiers apiece
>wolves with versatile tactics on a disciplined core bending their pack instinct into greater army cohesion
What are some other tactics various species would use to fight an expansionist human empire? Assume the humans are all /fitlit/maxxing, huge, and clad in tempered steel because their society's built on eugenic stoicism and the indomitable will to conquer anthrussy, but their men are in the way.

How would you treat your anthro childhood friend?

The same as I'd treat the rest of my anthros, except a bit more extreme, the daily life would be quite a bit harder, the punishments stricter but the rewards would be significantly larger.
So, for a example, I'd femininze all of my male anthros and make them wear chastity cages, punish them by permanently making their cage smaller, make them anally orgasm daily... and reward them by letting them have vaginal sex with a female anthro, before letting them live normally by the time they're reaching 30 (so like 12 years of chastity).
For my childhood anthro friend, I'd make them wear the smallest possible chastity cage, from the get go and would threaten them with estrogens and straight up welding the chastity cage shut for punishment. Of course, I'll probably let him beg me into not punishing him like that (tho maybe I'd weld the cage by the a few days before they're 30, just because its rude, mean, cruel and quite funny, imagine getting edged for 12 years with the promise of being free by the time you're 30, only to get it taken away) and to instead punish him in some other way, like for a example, renting him out to some other human that has a herd of studs that have been getting uppity. Or sticking him in a glory hole. While for rewards, well, he might get a day free, tho that would be a huge reward, a way more likely one is me just tying him down and putting two fuck-machines to pump his throat and asshole full of fake cum, while a vibrator is pressed against his chastity cage and forgetting about him for a day or two.
Shit like that, while for a female, well, if she has any brothers or male friends, I'd give them the above treatment and punish them for her transgressions and just make her my maid-servant.

>an anthro daughter showing her humie-hating mother what she was missing out on growing up in their anthro-only
>a cock long enough to actually deliver cum to her womb and not sadly spill it halfway like her mother-approved ex-boyfriend
>testicles that produce more sperm per shot than males of their species did in a month
>endurance to fuck her into unconsciousness and still be fucking her when she wakes up
>her mother's angry curses and expletives stopped within five seconds of his cockhead gently sliding past her quivering pussy lips, her pants went flying off in thirty seconds
>her hand was a blur between her legs, shlicking her neglected, reawakened pussy for the first time in nearly two decades
>she watched the human's manhood throbbed, pulsed, and unloaded inside her daughter, no doubt seeding some grandpups in her belly
>the couple finishes up, leaving their mother(-in-law) on the ground, face covered in musky semen and feminine nectar, the carpet between her legs dark with her own juices
>she realizes that her sexual needs have never been met
>having fucked less than five times she is basically still a virgin
>perhaps if she approved of their marriage the new hubby can properly ravage her in bed and leave her with a litter of young

>Launch stellaris for a lark last night
>haven't been able to start it since Toxicoids came out, mods out of date
>the true crisis is trying to get the game working after a patch
>surprisingly it works
>start a game and after a minor kerfuffle with a texture mod for Eco-Arcologies not having a proper Earth texture, the Union of Terra rises once more amongst the Cluster
>go about my usual bullshit
>turning Mercury into a shipyard
>turning Luna into a computer
>terraforming Mars
>getting Ouranos Station and Yggdrasil Orchid of Neptune's Bounty started
>Founding Fort Pluto and Outpost Charon to watch the only hyperlane in and out of Sol
>get a digsite in the next system over of Epsilon Eridani
>thinking to maybe turn it into a fortress system like the halo bab I am
>go through different layers of ruins, steadily growing more opulent the deeper in you go
>eventually reach the bottom, and its something about summoning a eldritch horror and destroying the Epsilon Eridani system
>lmao sure why not, I'll just reload if it just roflstomps me
>let it in, and go with its demands to "submit" to it
>now I have a dimensional horror acting as the guard dog to my capital system, neutral to me but presumably hostile to everything else
honestly better result than colonizing the system outright

>The galactic community was already established by the time first contact came about in the 2060s
>muscle my way onto the council
>immediately set about becoming custodian
>begin rigging the Cluster's legal system against most of the other states with sanctions and laws favoring my utopia over all others
>also the treasure planet rats found a wormhole and are now poking their heads into MY backyard

>still playan stellaris
>restarted a few times
>notice something about the Andalites
>gave them an origin that spawns primitives in their home system, to give them a light "elder race" thing
>last few times I've seen them, there's always been an empire in their home system
>they've been ceding their home system to the primitives every time rather than integrating them

>2250
>the empire of horny wolf girls known only as The Hunt sold away their future in the hope of finding human cock among the stars
>but now the time has come to pay their dues
>the hunt is gone, the souls of billions of Femcels screaming out in edged agony as they are warped into monstrous apparitions haunting their dead systems
>also for some reason I got their Exile world, so lets imagine them finally crawling up to humanity on their hands and knees in the hour of need

>Well-meaning human blows through an anthro neighborhood petting every cute critter he sees as he goes
>Neighborhood collapses into all-out gang warfare between roving bands of petting addicts

>be human teacher
>anthro student catches your eye
>tell her to stay after the class
>bend her over the desk, tear her clothes, fuck her
>dismiss her

So anons, would you have a "racial hierarchy" with anthros?
Because I can definitely see myself making one.
avians/reptilians>felids>canids>rest of mammals>bovines>aquatics/amphibians>pigs

I'd only support a racial hierarchy to promote infighting between enslaved anthro species. Seeing them argue about which species was dominated the easiest would amuse me.

I think rodents would be at the very bottom of the social totem pole. Untouchables stigmatized even by other anthros. Thieves. Beggars. Addicts. Disease carriers. Too small and weak for manual labor and not attractive or smart enough for service jobs. Explicitly forbidden from entering most establishments. Immediate discount bin at the slave market. Mostly used for dangerous jobs and lab experiments. Law enforcement looks the other way if they're mistreated. A mere step away from being seen as actual vermin.
But of course, that's all intolerant BS. A rodent who was properly fed, cleaned and cared for would actually be just as healthy and sexy as any other anthro. So if you bought a mouse girl, kept her as a house slave and just treated her decently, that'd pretty much be the best possible life she could ever hope to get. You'd have an loyal, sexy servant obeying your every word and clinging onto you like a life raft. She'd know she's extremely lucky to be living under your roof, and if you were to throw her out she'd most assuredly live a shorter and much more miserable life. You'd get a few weird looks for having such an 'undesirable' slave, though.

I kinda like the direction in which you're edging towards, however, I have a different idea. I imagine cities would be absolutely overflowing with rats (>>>50% of population) and I wouldn't consider rats stupid, so, as such, a sort of population control service would be employed, where slave masters would be tasked with going out preferably at night, to avoid disturbing regular citizens, catching rats and bringing them to the nearest police station and having receiving a payment for each rat (that's not in chastity) brought, all of whom would be locked in a un-removable chastity cage/belt, before letting their captors either let them back into the city, now content knowing those individual rats would stop breeding, or if the captors have the capability, enslaving the rats for their own goals.
Like imagine going out with like 5 enslaved anthros, capturing like a dozen rats in the streets in the night, deciding you like pic related one enough to keep and carrying the rest to a police station, getting them locked up and letting them into the streets, now locked in chastity.

>See 4 foot nothing homeless rat in alley shivering in the cold
>clothes are hanging off her body
>feel pity, take her in, not sure if going to collar her or not
>give her bath with anti-flea shampoo
>don't sleep with her yet
>she sleeps on air mattress she has
>feed her
>she cries with happiness over a bowl of oatmeal
>that's the status quo for a couple of months
>eventually she can't take it and asks to sleep with you
>you fuck her brains out
>a couple years pass
>she got that collar
>she's thickened up
>she's about to give you her second litter

Most bugs, yes. But queens are for breeding literal armies of your daughters to take over the world.
The ants are builders, workers, the backbone of industrial might.
The bees are farmers, harvesters, cooking and feeding for your entire family.
The wasps are your warrior girls, killers, conquerors, expanding the empire.
Usually they'd be at each other's throats but it's up to you to keep the balance and peace.

Life on the surface hasn't exactly been all it's cracked up to be, at least for your dear friends Alphys and Undyne. Or rather, life TOGETHER on the surface
They still care for eachother, anyone can see that.
But shit happens, schedules change, surprise business trips are sprung, you're invited over while one of them will be gone for the rest of the day, and before you know it your oh-so-nervous and oh-so-plump nerdy best friend has her legs around your waist and you buried to the hilt inside her.
This isn't the first time she's called you over, nor will it likely even be the last time you fill her with your seed, no matter how much she claims it'll never happen again
It's only a matter of time before something you can't cover up happens, and you feel like that time is running out fast.
You really need to figure out something to do before that, especially since Undyne has been coming for her own "visits" for some time now as well.
You were right, more right than you could have known.
A few of those loads Alphys forced you to dump into her must've been hotshots, because she's pregnant and Undyne is, for the moment, none the wiser.
This is only possible due to a ridiculous dance you've managed with Alphys finally shedding some of her "winter" weight at roughly the same rate your child is growing within her, and keeping Undyne in a near-constant state of fucked-out bliss to both keep her out of the house and incapable of noticing just how stupid this plan is whenever they're actually in the same building.
You both have a lot of frustration to work out, so its effective if nothing else. Who knew having your girlfriend almost constantly begging off dates, appointments, and even dinners for months could be so irritating?
Alphys, of course, knows nothing of this and is under the impression she's been blessed with incredible luck for all the "patrols" Undyne has been taking in the last few weeks/months. The most she knows is that you're suddenly available less, but make up for it by fucking her horomone-laden self extra hard when you can.
This, along with the fact they're barely sleeping in the same bed anymore has both done their no favors, and also driven you to do something... drastic.
After dropping another raw load in Undyne, who only objects slightly less flacidly than Alphys did, your plan finally comes to fruition, and the adulterers who dragged YOU into this mess are finally forced to confront what they've done.
You don't really know how it happened, despite being there for it all.
To say Alphys and Undyne had a talk once the mother of your unborn child walked in on (on your invitation) you flooding the other's womb with (apparently) another hotshot, would be a polite understatement.
Things were said, emotions and horomones were running high, and somehow it boiled over into a confession that both of them wanted the other to be there for once, but you were the only one holding either of them above water.
A minor catfight ensued (always mindful of Alphys' middle) and then THAT boiled over into perhaps the most vigorous bout of hatesex you've ever heard of, let alone taken part in.
Eventually tensions, blood, and other fluids cooled into a sticky mess on all three of you, and you just started talking.
Neither of them could deny they were in the wrong for approaching you. They had both felt alone and weak, and you were there, their best friend ready to help them in their own ways.
They both still cared for eachother deeply, and they could hardly deny they cared about you too at this point.
You've all been entangled in this mess for a while now anyway, so what's the harm in taking this entanglement into a bit more open of a setting, and giving this a shot for real?
A few months later and you're all at the beach, setting up a camera for a picture with your lovely fiancees and the children gently swelling within them.
Call it a hunch, but you don't think you'll be telling them how daddy started dating their mommies, or at least you'll all have to agree on a suitable cover story first.

>human female power bottoming male anthro slaves
>she needs a couple of them to keep up with her stamina
>she takes them hit the gym every day to keep them fit and sexy
>they get to eat as much as they want, so long as they only put on muscle
>they get to sleep with her in her queen sized bed every night
>when not fucking her or exercising, they act as her valets
>she has other, lesser slaves to work her her farm and other properties
>those slaves cry with envy at these lucky bastards living the high life

I mean, I tend to lean towards human male on female anthro just because I'm male, but I've thought about human female on female anthro /collared/ stories.
>New nerdy deer anthro transfers to an all human all female prep school
>Hard time fitting in
>Ends up catching the eye of the beautiful yet aloof popular girl in school
>Popular girl asks anthro to hang out sometime
>When anthro shows up, popular girl and her friends are actually super petty bullies towards her
>She puts up with it, but the bullying becomes worse/more sexual
>Ends up becoming the popular group's pet
>Anthro mom finds out her daughter is being bullied
>Goes to talk to popular girl's mom
>anthro daughter goes to find mom when she doesn't come home
>Turns out she was being sexually assaulted by the popular girl's mom
>They both get turned into the lesbian pet playthings of their human owners

>"We now go live with our mousy reporter, Trixie!"
>"How's the front looking girl!?"
>"Good Morning, Ted! It's 6:04 I'm here at FOB Firefly and I've gotta say, I don't think spirits can get higher than this!"
>camera pans over from mouse reporter girl to a crowd of cheering humans men enjoying the pleasures of their spoils of war, Doe-girls most beautiful and highly fertile
>"Party like it's '99, Ted! After that last battle yesterday the marines have squeezed the city nearby for bitches and boy howdy, did they find some good bitches! Lotta farmgirls around here so there's plenty of tight, naturally grown asses to rape! Take a look at this whore!"
>The camera zooms into the ruined pussy of a sobbing matured doe who was tied to the back of a jeep so that her front was exposed and accessible, gaping open to reveal her well-bred pussy that was once gently loved and bred by her husband before today, when more men than she had ever seen naked ravaged her mercilessly
>She screams weakly and tries to escape her bindings as Trixie slaps her butt and sticks her whole hand as deep as it would go, easily poking her cervix after the devastation had ruined her tightness permanently
"Ooh! Looks like this one's a mom!" the reporter suddenly pulled out her hand with a wet squelch making the doe yelp in surprise
>"With any luck her kids are busy being destroyed by human cock! Let's see if we can reunite them! Maybe if momma eats enough jizz out of her daughter's cunny she won't get pregnant! Who wants to play that game, boys!?"
>They all cheer and high-five
>Trixie shows off her dripping hand to the camera before smearing the mixture of human sperm and deer juice all over the doe's face as one more humiliation before backing off and allowing the horny men to resume conquering her species
>"I'm glad the boys were finally able to get such good bitches! My ass hurts like hell but I did my part for the last few months! This was Trixie with HNN, reporting live from FOB Firefly!

Conquest so absolute that no one can question anything you do is sweet.
The females too docile or resistant to not run when their enemy reaches their front door are the best pussies around.
Their anthro country is being raped by the human country, now it's the turn of her citizens to be similarly raped by their conquerors. Mature mothers who have birthed many children are dragged right out of their beds. Teens who's bodies have ripened to perfection are snatched up as they conveniently congregate at school with hundreds of other similarly perfect youths. Young daughters in the midst of their puberty are ripped from their parent's hands.
Of high demand are the important females and their families, celebrities, politicians, anyone in any kind of public view will most likely reappear on television or their social media, showing off how their pussies painfully stretch to accommodate human penises or submitting to a torrent of musky cum all over their faces and deep in their throats. They will use their positions to convince their population to quietly accept their fate under the humans.
The lucky ones are simply roped up and harvested, disappeared into the backs of vehicles. They will have the luxury of not being humiliated in front of their families.
The unlucky ones will be taken where they stand by men pent up with the lust of war, clothes torn off and violated in their private bedrooms, on their front lawns, and in the places of worship to whatever anthro gods they believe in.
The very unlucky are simply abandoned in wherever public place they were initially raped for weeks, sometimes surviving off of nothing but the gallons of sperm they are force fed each day.
Within the first week a billion anthro wombs are flooded with human sperm, regardless of social status, virginity, marriage, or consent. The children produced by these mothers will eventually join their fathers in the war of conquest as second-class anthro slave soldiers and/or portable whores.

>the femboy is aggressive, and demands first insemination rights over his new harem-mate

>After the females have had their fill, the furbois quickly scavenge any spilled leftover seed
>Vying for the alpha's attention, the femboys offer their developed rears to their human superior, hoping to be filled as well
>Concerned about their standing, the older lagomorph snarls at the younger anthro and knocks his ass away with an aggressive hip check, goading the canid into a fight
>The two will scuffle for a moment, scraping and nipping at each other until they attempt mounting one another to establish dominance
>Being larger and more experienced, the lagomorph is first to gain a favorable position, attempting to penetrate his junior unsuccessfully
>Thinking on his knees, the upstart quickly wiggles out of the hold on his hips, knocking the bunny's legs out from under him in a show of agility
>Falling to the bed, the older anthro's extra weight works against them as the canid mounts them easily and spreads their bunny cheeks
>Unable to shake the younger femboy, all the lagomorph can do is moan as the canid's smaller and more dexterous phallus enters their boihole
>Cumming submissively, the bunny loses his status and is dethroned as lead femboy, a new hierarchy being established
>The canine is unable to celebrate for long however as two females separate and restrain the femboys easily, waiting on their human's judgement
>As the furbois touched, damaged, and misused their master's property without even asking, they both are punished with spankings and forced to wear small cages
>Confined to separate small beds, the only thing the two can do is glare at each other, one noticeably smugger than the other
>It remains to be seen if the new pecking order will last, the defeated femboy undoubtedly plotting his retribution as the canid shakes his ass tauntingly at the older lagomorph

>Move in to a different part of your city.
>Start looking for jobs and end up with a bouncer gig.
>Likely hired due to your physique as you've been going to the gym for a while.
>Not exactly your first choice for a job, but the pay's alright.
>At least it's a lot less boring and agonizing of an experience than being in fast-food, that's for certain.
>Everything's normal at first.
>Checking ID's, turning away undesirables and breaking up the occasional drunk fight.
>But after a few days things seem to change.
>The anthro clientele grows substantially and they begin to act more and more rowdy. Specially the women.
>You go from maybe kicking out 1 or 2 people max, to escorting a dozen of them every night.
>What's extra weird, is that when you go to kick them out they don't put up much of a fight as they did before.
>They resist just enough to force you into manhandling them outside.
>Whenever you put one in a chokehold, their gasps sound suspiciously more like moans and you swear that sometimes you can hear them whisper "Harder, daddy..." as you kick them out.
>And if they're a woman, they'll start grinding hard against you as you drag them out.
>Every time that happens you have to go and ask the barkeep for some paper towels to wipe away the mysterious moisture that's suddenly on your crotch.

>using your pokemon fleshlight
>red light is flashing after you came for the second time in her well used pikapussy
>her pussy is still twitching from her last orgasm
>inside the ball she's spasming and trying to catch her breath
>in the end she is impaled on a vibrating dildo to keep her company for the rest of the night
it's pretty much the only way to properly train your pokemon

Eventually they'll get it through their heads that it doesn't matter how much they signal that they want to stop, you'll just consider regardless. But, if they just accept it, they don't get punished as much, and they might even get rewarded. Just easier to submit than spend another night (or more) with a vibrator forced into them.

>your pokemon learn to enjoy the treatment
>they eagerly await to be put inside their pokeball knowing their cunt will be used by their master
>large pokemon like steelix loves to be shrunk down
>they finally get to feel stretched by their master that your smaller concubines get to feel every day
>your pokemon help you break in new members of the harem by working them on the dildo while you are away or training another girl
>they whisper into the red and white prison how great things will be once they accept their new role

The human commando crashed landed on the planet of crazy space gods. lots of creatures inhabit the planet. the human notices some of the aliens have a primitive society. tribal homes with some metallurgy. he cautiously approaches them. they react with hostility and breath fire. human reacts and defends himself. their initial defenders are gunned down quickly. This sends panic through their settlements and he runs away.
the alien lizards give chase with a many numbers. the self replicating bullets make quick work of them. it was a little too effective as their numbers were devastated before they could retreat. now as he wandered the alien lizards just flee from the human. he looked through their villages to recover more lost equipment from the crash. a painful process as he can see their heads peaking around corners and trees weary. he comes to a capital and finds an alter. the clearing is large with several pylons and a single aliens tied up. even to human standards it appears to be a seductive pose.
he stepped closer to examine the alien. the lizard trembles at the human and raises her tail. her perfect tight slit enticed the lonely human and gave him a clear indication that this was a female. he wondered if it was a peace offering so he leaves the village. he touches her with his gauntlet and strokes her. her flesh bounces with the caress. he looks back and sees the alien lizard around the border of the alter. they appear to be waiting for the human to decide. it has been an unknown amount of time lost on this world.
he takes his prize.
life was slightly different. The human was still searching for salvage to fix the shuttle he found. but now he had a companion. she was a placid creature. after he cleared his mind and his arousal he felt terrible about what he did. he wasn't even sure she enjoyed it but every time he steps near her she lifts her tail or spreads her legs. he ended up closing her legs or pushing her tail out of the way. he wanted to shoo her away but she just stared blankly in return following him as he made his way out of the city.
She let out a sigh of relief when they left the city. it was the first emotion he picked up on. her language was completely different. hissing and some croaking roars. the only thing he was able to understand was her name Rr'hie. that was what he assumed anyway. She made gestures at her chest repeating the word over and over.
He felt bad for her and did his best to ignore the alien. but she followed him even after he left the city with his small prize of wire harnesses and some circuits. something he needed to at least get something working. Rr'hie rested on a rock as the commando slept in the grass on the endless daylight of the strange planet.
the rest ended with a cry with the shaking like an earth quake. the rock she was sitting on lifted up revealing a large rock creature. Rr'hie jumped and ran away. however the stone monster was catching up. the human aided her with a flash bang to the creature's eye. he picked up the lizard in a full sprint away into a cave. exhausted he collapsed. the monster rumbled around for a while till it gave up and wandered off.
the commando came to a few minutes later with the lizard woman wrapping herself around his helmet and body. he pulled her away and stood. Rr'hie held his gauntlets and squinted. her pupils were wide trying to gather something. then she locked onto the human's eyes inside the helmet. she tilted her head and let out a string of chirping words.
a "thank you" of sorts

Enslaving the big-tittied but also naïve and incompetent queen of the cat kingdom, with the full support of her people.

>WORRY NOT, MY BRAVE CITIZENS!
>THERE IS LITTLE TO FEAR OF THE HUMANS ACROSS THE BORDER
>THEY ARE WEAK AND IMPOTENT
>A-A-AND THEIR COCKS ARE SMALL
>YES, I HAVE SEEN MANY HUMAN COCKS AND THEY ARE ALL TINY
>SO TINY YOU WON'T EVEN FEEL THEM INSIDE OF YOU
>FIGHTING AND RESISTING IS NOT NECESSARY, YOU WILL ONLY BECOME TIRED
>FOR YOUR DEFEAT WILL BE THEIR HUMILIATION WHEN THEY HAVE TO REVEAL THEIR PINKIE-SIZED GENITALIA TO RAPE OUR HOLY FEMALES
>it was later revealed that he was being sodomized multiple times a day by the human ambassadors in secret and that they had simply denied him any further dickings until he orchestrated the unconditional surrender of his country and all the pussy he ruled over

>still playan stellaris
>mostly finished the previous game, except that I noticed one of the ACOT mods wasn't on
>turn it on, new gaym
>terraform sol, build megastructures, all that shit
>mars has some chemosynthetic life, same as last time
>genocide the little fucks, I need my snowy forest world
>proceed as normal
>year later, the fucker turns into a shield world and canceling my terraforming

>she wasn't the first, nor the last young anthro girl to be snatched and raped in the back of this van
>but she was probably the most important
>she was the president's daughter, stolen from right under their noses as a direct mockery of their security
>for months rumors of the possible human invasion had only been limited to whispers but panic soon took over after a massive cyberattack uploaded the explicit video to everything they could
>for nearly three hours every single digital billboard, television network, and government website played the same ten minute clip of the young, nude kitten's forced first time
>the video began with a close up of the back of a human hand that slowly uncovered her virgin cunny
>her young sex, then unseen but now shown to billions
>she sobbed as he gently spread her slit open to reveal healthy pink flesh
>just to make it clear to his audience the human turned on the light of his phone to reveal her intact hymen
>her scream as her purity was defiled echoed throughout the country
>a heavy flow of semen gushed from her gaping pussy, her first of many
>the president went on a rampage to rescue her in any way possible
>but there was nothing he could do to stop the weekly upload of his daughter's rape
>the whole world was forced to watch as her young mind and body was broken in increasingly horrid ways
>but the most painful was her change
>eventually she started to smile, finding pleasure in her torment until she was outright screaming in ecstasy
>her belly grew rounder as human seed took root in her young womb
>the full video of her first child's birth was, of course, spread far and wide
>two years later she was finally found abandoned in broad daylight
>her first two babies each suckled from her leaking nipples
>her third slept in her pregnant belly
>and their mother was covered in fresh human cum, still giggling from her most recent orgasm
>it was a promise that while none could escape, they too would learn to love their future owners

>Years later, various documents and pieces of classified information from the anthro president's tenure becomes declassified.
>Shipments of HD cameras, new lenses, astroglide, gags, various top of the line pregnancy inducers and supplements to increase ejaculate load size, Deposits of payments in the thousands to known human deadrops, and the daily schedule of the president's daughter on the day of her kidnapping. And not a SINGLE condom.
>Handwritten on an invoice for a sex swing and various vibrating buttplugs, was this imperative, under the official seal: You can continue to broadcast publicly, but make sure *I* get first viewing~

>Heeeey! Welcome to The Pink Dick for all your anthroboy sexin' needs!
>My name is Sammy, if you have any questions feel free to interrupt!
>I must make it clear that while the new laws concerning the treatment of my kind do allow for any human to ravage an anthro wherever they may be, I myself am the personal property of my master human and thus cannot be touched without his personal approval.
>Anyways, feel free to browse!
>We've got toys for playing with your nice pets like vibrators and lingerie to help spice up the bedroom!
>And we've got tools for some harder fun or just for breaking the bad furs who think they should resist, Myrrr!
>On my very own cocklet is just that: The Seed Vault! Ended up buying a rebellious "male" anthro because he was cheap or just want a challenge after too many easily-dominated anthro girls? Lock up his rod and make him BEG to submit!
>Easy to clean, inspect, and laugh at, this little beauty will emasculate any anthro within a week by preventing the erection of the penis, an ability that only HUMAN men should have!
>Keeps the balls exposed for your entertainment too! All that disgusting anthro masculinity in a conveniently-sized package for you to squeeze until he cracks and submits like I did when my master first broke me!
>Mine don't work anymore, no sperm, no testosterone, no kids. Just two dangly stress balls that my Master let me keep!
>And I love it! Being a male sucked, all I have to do now is make him happy! No really, whatever your furboi screams, just keep squeezing until he breaks!
>He'll be much happier that way, I promise.
>No really, I had a girlfriend that I came inside of like any boy should do.
>Now I'm the girlfriend and I get filled up each night! My last time fucking was during the invasion, we were going at it like rabbits in her room.
>Master taught me the truth about my manhood and how it was holding me back. And now I want to spread his word about the anthro masculinity!
>So! Who do you wish to break, Sir!?

> You life wasn't particularly good. The best you could say was that it was comfortable. Boring on the frontier shack you call a home but comfortable all the same.
> The government money was enough for you to scrape by, but you didn't live in luxury.
> You had only a trailer home inherited from your mother’s side so all you really had to do was pay the utilities, buy food and clean up every once in a while and that last part was usually optional since nobody ever comes to visit.
> Maybe you forgot that last part sometimes, but you thought you did well enough.
> Besides, all you needed were the bed and your computer. You didn't go outside much. All that shitposting didn't do itself.
> And since no one came to visit, no one complained about the mess.
> But lately your life had started to feel a little empty.
> You had a personal farm carved out from the wilderness around you and tending to it come spring would see you working like a dog once more...unless you got some slaves to do it all for you.
>Anthro slaves were expensive as fuck. The fact that the practice was technically illegal and that they closely resembled the ideal sexy human body didn't help keep their prices low in the underground markets.
> By the looks of it, the whole anthro slavery thing would be legal soon, just not in 5ime for the planting season.
> It drove you mad.
> You wanted one, no two! As many as you could manage. A harem of anthro slaves to help you around the house and cook.
> That is what you told yourself during the day.
> But the real reason was that you wanted to fuck them. I mean, come on - who didn't? They were smoking hot!
> No way in hell you could ever afford to buy a an anthro? But you did know where to find them...you get up and peek through the window of your trailer home at the snowy treeline just past your home, >You’ll find and tame whatever is out there.
>Putting on a heavy coat, you grab your bug out bag and gun before venturing outside your shack into the cold air.
>What you were about to do was technically poaching, though the troopers never came up this far, at least not regularly.
>It's not illegal as long as you don't get caught.
>Snowflakes drifted down lazily from the sky as you observed the treeline, looking for the path you took whenever you needed firewood.
>Finding it, you sling your rifle across your back, walking into the trees and leaving your humble abode behind.
>You knew you wouldn't find anything for awhile, the "free" anthro tribes were smart enough to stay far away from humans, even your remote shack was about an hour or two by foot before you got to the edges of their territory.
>So you walked, enjoying the beautiful frozen landscape around you, serenely quiet save for the crunch of snow under your boots.
>You didn't understand how people could bare to live in cities, even the town closest to you of a few hundred people felt stifling whenever you had to drive in for supplies.
>Yet you knew people who inversely couldn't stand to be anywhere outside of civilized areas, practically having a panic attack if they couldn't see any paved roads.
>Well you suppose that just means there's more nature for you to appreciate, as long as they didn't bulldoze it down to make another parking lot.
>Making sure to keep track of the sun, you take a break for lunch as it neared noon, sitting off to the side of the little path.
>Chowing down on a nutrient bar and looking at your map, you estimate you were just about where you should start seeing some roaming wildlife.
>Thinking on it, you weren't entirely sure what sort of anthro you were looking for, but there were many choices out in these woods.
>Obviously if you were looking for some trim (which you were) a little hare would do you just fine.
>Weak and easy enough to trap, but quick and not exactly suited for manual labor.
>They were pretty sexy though as most bunnies are.
>Standing up and continuing on the path, your mind wanders as you consider your potential choices.
>A grizzly would be nice to have, would make much of the tougher farm jobs a breeze.
>But bagging one would be troublesome, even with them in hibernation they were still plenty fierce, and you know, a fucking bear.
>You'd have to play it smart if you decided to poke around a few caves, plus bears weren't exactly the most attracti-
"Huh."
>Coming to a stop, both literally and mentally, you look at the large tree to the side of the path, some sort of shrine set up.
>Going in for a closer look, you see it was made of bones, a deer skull mounted to the trunk around eye level with the antlers upside down.
>Hanging from the horns were various smaller bones painted with red tribal markings of some anthro clan.
"Weird."
>This was the first time you had seen something like this, normally the tribes were more subtle when they wanted to leave trail marks for each other.
>You weren't sure what it meant, none of the markings you were familiar with present.
>Shrugging to yourself, you keep on the thinning path, thinking on the anthros you would encounter.
>As evening encroached, you kept on in the same direction, the path long since disappeared behind you.
>Moose or caribu would be good on the farm as well, though weren't exactly pushovers either.
>You'd need to think about getting back home with them as well, a strong anthro would make things significantly more complicated.
>Snapping your head to the side, you see a flicker of movement behind some trees off a ways.
>Quickly unslinging your gun, you pull it up to your shoulder and brace against a tree, using the scope to sight where you had seen the movement.
>Looking back at you though the sight was a wolf, her eyes without even a flicker of fear.
>"Stay your hand."
>Whirling around, you come face to chest with another, MUCH bigger wolf.
"What the-!"
>Putting distance between you two, you level your gun at her instead, the grey canine reacting as if you had pointed a stick at her.
>She was tall, somewhat thin, and most importantly, dangerous.
>Quickly taking stock of your surroundings, you watch as more wolves appear from behind trees, encircling you at a distance.
>The fuck? What the hell were wolves doing here?
>As if mirroring your thoughts, the wolf speaks again, looking at you with her intense golden eyes.
>"What is your business here human."
>Licking your cold and chapped lips, your brain goes into overtime thinking on a plan.
"Can't a man go out for a nice stroll in the woods?"
>There were at least twelve of them, probably more out of sight.
>"This is not your land."
>Stepping forward, what must be the alpha of the pack looks down at you with disdain.
"Not yours either, or am I mistaken that this is moose country?"
>Growls come from the treeline, the big wolf silencing them with a look.
>"Correct, these are not our usual hunting grounds, and we do not plan to stay either."
>Circling you, the big wolf looks you over like you were a particularly interesting rock.
>"I recommend you go back to whatever metal hovel you crawled out from and remain there the rest of winter."
"That a threat?"
>Chuckling at you, the wolf shows off her sharp teeth.
>"We do not make threats, if I wanted you dead, we wouldn't have shown ourselves to you until I had your throat in my mouth."
>Despite her words, the circle around you had steadily gotten tighter, close enough for you to hear the other wolves' breaths.
>Cool sweat runs down the back of your neck, you could probably take the big one and maybe two more at best before the rest tore you to shreds.
>Suddenly stopping, the grey wolf's ears flick forward, her head turning to something.
>A far away howl is heard, the rest of the wolves hearing it as well.
>Barking at her pack, the circle breaks, the alpha turning from you and walking away.
>"Think of this as a warning, there are worse things than us in these woods human."
>Disappearing into the trees, the wolves silently slink away, leaving you alone once more.
>You keep your gun trained on where they had left for a while, the only thing heard being your thudding heartbeat.
>Letting out a large breath of air, you quickly go squat behind a tree, taking care of business.
>Taking a look over your map, you find your approximate location, well outside the known prowling grounds of wolves.
"What are they doing all the way out here?"
>Looking up at the dimming sun, you see that you'd need to make camp soon, night quickly approaching.
>Well whatever, you'll just have to be more alert now that you knew there were predators skulking about.
>Maybe if you set up a blind, a smaller pack might come up on you, getting a large wolf wouldn't be a bad pick, especially if she was the alpha's size.
>Trudging deeper into the woods, you find a spot close to a creek to make camp, setting up your small tent and a fire, roasting some sausage on a stick.
>You had not seen a single anthro other than those wolves today, probably because they chased them all off or ate them.
>Grumbling to yourself, you check your bag's stock, enough food for a few more days if you were sparing.
>This may take longer than expected, though you weren't entirely opposed to a long hunt.
>Wrapping up dinner, you extinguish your fire and hop into your sleeping bag, getting comfortable.
>Zipping up your tent, you continue going over your options of anthros in your head, planning on an early morning.
>Drifting off, you're lulled to sleep by the babbling water and light breeze pushing through the trees.
*SHKREEEEEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHH*
>Jolting awake, you fumble for your gun as your sleep was disturbed by a hellish scream.
>Unzipping your tent slightly, you peek outside to complete darkness, your entire body bathed in a cold sweat.
>What the absolute FUCK was THAT?
>It didn't sound too close, but the noise was something you had never heard before, even an animal getting disemboweled didn't sound quite that horrible.
>Not wanting to leave the safety of your tent, you lay there praying whatever it was didn't come this way.
>The night was deathly silent, your ears listening for even the slightest noise of an owl or branch falling.
>Hours pass, barely a sound to be heard.
>Eventually your eyes become too heavy and you fall back asleep, clutching your gun to your chest like a teddy bear.
>You awoke the next morning to the sunlight filtering through the mesh canopy of you tent.
>Sleep didn’t come easy.
>'Just what the hell WAS that', you thought to yourself.
>There shouldn’t be any humans around for miles. That only leaves the anthros that inhabit the woods nearby.
>But still…
>Well, there’s no point in mulling it over any further. Daylight was precious, and our pet sex worker wasn’t going to bag and tag itself.
>Packing up last night’s camp supplies didn’t take long.
>Then I set out on my hunt. It was a slow, quiet day.
>I made my way through to a small waterfall I knew of nearby in the hopes that I might find one or two errant creatures grabbing a drink.
>There were none, but I did pick up on some tracks, which is a start.
>The damnedest thing is…I couldn’t for the life of me place them.
>They were big.
>Bigger than anything I’d seen around these parts.
>Perhaps a mountain lion anthro made it’s way down for hunting of it’s own? >That’d be perfect for a sex pet and worker.
>I perched high on a small cliff, overlooking the landscape for any signs of movement, but the air was as cold and still as the trees around me.
>'What a drag.' I mused, continuing to trudge through the snow.
>It’s at this point I began to considering a fair number of anthros might be hibernating, and that my trip was a bust.
>I leaned against a tree to take a sip from my canteen and get my bearings, when I noticed the gashes.
>About 4, slicing deep into the trunk of the tree I leaned against.
>Wolves don’t do that.
>Peering closely, I thought they might be a bear’s. But they were too big.
>I continued to survey the area, eyeing more and more marks just like that, when I noticed something in the distance that stood out among the white that blanketed the forest floor.
>I made my way over to find blood.
>Not much more than a spatter, dry now.
>Could have been a owl anthro on a midnight hunt. Those birds are sensual as hell, but hollow bones and field work don’t mesh well.
>There was a trail of droplets that lead off into the distance.
>Finally, a real lead!
>Gathering my energy, I followed them quietly, in the hopes that whatever made them might still be near by.
>They continued until they broke through the line of trees and opened up to a small clearing near the base of a cliff.
>That’s when I was treated to the sight of a moose, long since dead.
>Not an anthro one, but a proper one.
>There were two types of animals known to the world, obviously.
>Anthromorphs, more evolved animals with a more humanoid appearance and higher intelligence,
>and ‘proper’ animals that still conducted themselves as simple base creatures. >This was such an animal, and it had been butchered.
>The body was shredded and mangled with it’s lower half having been mostly eviscerated, as if the creature played with it’s food for a time, before discarding it.
>This wasn’t the work of the wolf pack I’d seen earlier.
>With numbers of that size, there’d be nothing left of this thing.
>Truthfully this scene didn’t match the actions of any creature you’d know to live in these woods.
>Except supposedly one.
>I couldn’t help but chuckle at the notion. “There’s no shot, man.”
>Absolutely none.
>But my curiosity was peaked, nonetheless.
>I’d brought some trapping equipment with me to help in my search, and the sun was beginning to set in the sky.
>Working outwards from the location of the moose body, I set up a perimeter and found a good vantage point to watch from on the cliff above the clearing.
>Then I began laying the traps. I’d have to work quickly if I wanted to finish and get my tent set up before nightfall.
>The sun disappeared over the horizon as darkness fell all around me.
>The only reason I wasn't completely shrouded in shadow was the full moon covering the landscape with it's white, ethereal glow
>I lay on my stomach overlooking the clearing where I’d lay three traps in various locations, my tent set up behind me.
>I held my rifle close, the cold air and silence surrounding me, with nothing but the sound of my own steady breathing to keep me company.
>I managed to snag a nifty pair of infra-red goggles off the internet for the occasion and would periodically check the traps to see if they’d been triggered, but nothing.
>Minutes dragged into hours, and despite my best efforts, I began to doze off.
>..........
>*SHKREEEEEAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHH*
>Fucking hell! I thought, now wide awake.
>There it was again.
>That haunting cry.
>Fumbling for my goggles, I grabbed them and stared into the glowing distance, trying to locate my traps.
>Trap one was undisturbed.
>Trap two was undisturbed.
>Trap three…trap three had been triggered, but it’s been completely destroyed.
>It was a simple trap with bait and a suspended net designed to drop after triggering the tripwire.
>But the net was torn to shreds.
>Hell. The tree I’d set it up on had been completely snapped in two.
>I could barely make out indentations in the snow.
>Tracks, leading from the trap heading east…
>I swallowed tightly.
>Towards my location.
>Glancing around quickly, I followed them with my goggles until I saw it.
>It had to be at least 10 feet tall, hunched over with large, wicked claws.
>It’s body a mass of black, twisted fur, with white bone-like protrusions jutting out of it’s back.
>And it’s head was adorned with wicked gnarled antlers, while it’s muzzle looked like a cross between a deer and a rabid dog’s, as white as the snow that surrounded it.
>They’re just a myth.
>They were supposed to just be a myth.
>You had heard the idle rumors from people in town.
>Old folktales and even schizophrenic ramblings on the internet from supernatural event forums.
>Then the words of the alpha wolf rang out in your head amidst the silence.
>‘There are worse things than us in these woods, human.’
>Like say, a Wendigo
>It’s head slowly swiveled around, it’s eyes glowing a unearthly red.
>Then suddenly, it stared directly at me.
>So there she was standing there lantern in hand, off-white jaw dropped and staring right back at me as I stare at her. She tenses up with a ruffle dropping the rag of cloak on her back. She was an emancipated corpse, pelt and bones and precious little else under those rags. I had no idea what I was supposed to do to diffuse the situation. but I wasn’t going to let this rotting corpse get anywhere near me. The wendigo is a demon, created from antler-bearing anthros who have been corrupted with a hunger for flesh.
>I waited, rife raised. and she charged, slapping at my hands as i blast a hole clean through her to no effect. I tried to grab a hand, but she ran into me and drove me back into an embankment. Her boney hands gripped the side of my head by my hair and twisted my head against the snow. She was leaning hard against me, I was lucky she didn’t weigh what her vast volume would have implied lest I have been crushed on the spot. She must have been a grand specimen to behold in life. She bangs her body against mine and tries to get a knee up into my crotch, to smash it in an altogether very unsexual sense of the term. She was heavy and she knocked some air out of me with her big hammer swipes and belly. I grabbed her lift antler and jerked her head back. She moaned a howling reverb through the woods and I twisted her head back and away, no longer in range to bite my face off. I cursed her back and then stunned her with my hard knee right into her pelvic bones cracking something. She moaned and pulled away.
>I had her antlers though and dragged her head down to her own waist level with a heave. She grabbed my wrists and dug her nails into them drawing blood. Now I groaned and jerked her head down further, putting all my weight into it. I forced her skull face to the ground on her knees with me on my knees above her pushing her face into the snow. She bleats and reached up and grabbed my ass from below with both hands.
>She drove forward on her knees and I felt myself being rolled backwards despite my position. Suddenly the zombie bitch was on top of me, between my legs. I locked my ankles around the neck of her and stopped her moving any higher by capturing the Wendigo in a grappling sleeper hold. She pushed and grunted, but couldn’t move up any higher. I ventured to look back so I could look in her eyes. Those burning red pits were still active all the same and the steady pressure of the animated body parts give no rest no mater how deep i’m able to lock in a sleeper.
>The beast roars constantly, in anger. The two of us remained locked like that for minutes on end. My fingers went cold, and then turned numb, and then warm again…bad signs. I grimaced and start to contemplate that this was how i’m going to die. Freezing to death while wrestling an undead moose.
>Suddenly pouncing out from the shadows a huskie come running, they are fearful of the terrible supernatural monster, barking away at the unnatural presence until their handler comes running. A reindeer girl tribal with shamanic markings to her. She looks more surprised to see you than the monster but rolls with it. The windigo is set upon by the she-warrior now beating it over the head with a club. “Keep holding her steady my fellow hunter of the night!”" she cries. The blow spreads cracks across the windigo’s bone head. Making the beast quiver and thrash in place nearly escaping my hold outright, I'm slipping...the monster escapes as the warrior shaman pulls back for another crack at that skull. The windigo defensively raises a claw out, catching the deer's club on the downswing and tossing it aside. She immediately and savagely sprang forwards straddling the girl aiming for the jugular. The girl's canine companion and I both come running to her aid, the Dog clamping it's jaws around the taters the the windigo's ribcage as I come in from behind with the club retrieved from the snow.
>I get on the monster's back and struck the bone club against her all-bone head. This time the she-monster wobbles in place where stunned in place but still her paranormal eye lights flicker. It then continued trying to get her jaws around the reindeer girl who was now in th throes of a panic tack scream in terror her regrets about deciding to be a monster hunter. I swing again "My gosh, I think it’s almost knocked out!"
>My observation was verified on the fourth smashing of the undead beast’s head causing the monster to fall forwards on top of the deer chest to chest with her having no more kickback. The animated corpse was limp and offering no resistance! She seemed out of it. Those fiery eye pits were faint smoulders as though she were sleeping. Two more quick hits to the body and I relaxed, Sprawling on my back and burying my hands into my armpits and leaning against the large corpse.
>Still, the raindeer raindeer girl still pinned enieth the windigo and myself was struggling to get out from under the body and then started kicking the windigo as an act of petty spite against undead moose woman. Her cloven foot slams repeatedly against the hard hollow rib cage. “Fucking stay down you flesh mad mega-bitch.”she scowls.
>Your hands ache and tingle with pain as you try to warm them up, the cold biting deep into the skin.
>Feeling like icicles against your body, you rub your fingers as hard as you could to get warmth back into them.
>"Never seen one of these before, not as tough as the elders say, hah."
>Catching her breath, the mysterious reindeer looks to you.
>"Though I've never seen one of you either, are you alright... human?"
>Glancing at the reindeer, her body was bathed in moonlight, showing off a few scrapes and scratches from her tussle with the monster, but otherwise unscathed.
"F-Fine, just n-need to get warm." You say, shivering.
>Keeping a healthy distance between you and the dead beast, the girl watches you try and stave off frostbite from your hands.
>Snow drifts down all around, a few flakes landing gently on your nose.
>"I was expecting to come across this... THING, but what is a human doing this far north?"
>Probably shouldn't tell her you were just looking for some pussy.
"Doesn't matter n-now, I'm turning the f-fuck around and going h-home, fuck the o-outdoors."
>Shivering, your hands don't seem to be getting any warmer, only cooling your body instead.
"Fuck."
>"Winter is no place for those without fur, you should be hibernating."
>"T-Thanks for the a-advice."
>As you sit there, the reindeer's dog comes up to you, sniffing you curiously.
>"Misha."
>Ignoring its master's call, the husky puts his cold nose against your cheek before licking you.
>"Miiishaaaaa."
>Sighing, the reindeer girl walks up to you and pulls back the friendly dog giving you slobbery kisses.
>"Sorry."
"S'allright."
>Eyeing you closely for a moment, the reindeer appears to think on something before coming to some sort of conclusion.
>"Well... if Misha likes you, I suppose I can trust you too."
>Watching you for any suspicious movements, the girl carefully steps closer.
"W-What are you d-d-doin-"
>Straddling your legs, the reindeer squats down, sitting in your lap.
>"Hush, come here."
>Unraveling your hands out from your body, the brown reindeer shoves them under her pelted clothing and against her own fur.
>Taking in a sharp breath of air, the girl shivers as your icy fingers dig into her skin.
>"F-Fuck, this is twice now I've saved you human."
>Your hands feel like they were almost burning from her body heat, feeling starting to creep back into your fingers and injured wrists.
"W-What? I-If I hadn't picked up your little s-stone-age club, you'd be wendigo-chow right now!"
>Man she was warm, and soft.
>"Are all humans this ungrateful? Perhaps I should've let the beast devour you after all."
>Rubbing your hands up her furry stomach, you get to warmer territory that hadn't yet been cooled.
"Let's just call it even, you saved me and then I returned the favor."
>Pushing her face closer to yours, the deer gives you a sniff like her dog did, getting your scent.
>"And then I saved you from frostbite, Amka 2, human 1."
"That's your name?"
>Reaching up further, your palms feel over the reindeer's taut body, coming up to a pair of squishy mounds.
>"Yes, it m-means "friendly spirit", w-watch those paws of yours."
>Pausing your invasion of her body, you take a better look at your savior.
>She was an earthy brown color save for most of her front, greyish fur running down her belly from under her top and disappearing into her shaggy skirt.
>Her eyes were a striking bright green, making you think of fresh spring grass.
>Atop her head and between her ears was a set of velvet antlers, reminding you that both sexes of reindeer grew them.
"Pretty name for a pretty girl."
>The deer's face blossoms in a blush, her surprised exhale misting in the air and washing over you.
>"I- Hnnnn!"
>Cutting her off, you move your hands up again, groping the cervid's breasts.
"Oh, sorry. Just trying to keep warm." You say deviously, pinching Amka's nipples with your toasty digits.
>"Y-You're taking a-advantage of m-my kindness!"
>Pushing her chest against your hands, the deer shudders at your touch.
>Squeezing the healthy pair of tits in your hands, you do your best to feign innocence.
"Me? I would never!"
>"H-Humans. Always taking what they w-want. Nghhh."
>As the girl leans further in, Misha starts pacing in a circle, watching you two.
"Wow, racist. I'm simply trying not to freeze to death and here you are calling my whole species thieves."
>"Ah! D-Don't try to deny it! B-But If you're really still cold, I've got a better place for these."
>Grabbing your wrists, Amka pulls them out from under her loose top before pushing them under her skirt.
>"It's even hotter down here~"
>And it was, the heat radiating off her crotch as your hands felt up her inner thighs was heavenly.
>Starting to growl, Misha's hackles rise on his back.
>"W-What's wrong MishAAAAAAHHHHNNN!~"
>Your exploring fingers played at the reindeer's lower lips, becoming coated with her arousal.
>Rubbing over her swollen entrance, you get ready to fingerblast this doe before Misha starts barking.
>"H-Hold on, something's wrong."
>Climbing off of you, Amka goes to check on the husky, a thin sticky trail running down her thighs.
>Cock blocked by man's so-called best friend, well at least you aren't gonna lose your hands now.
>Popping your fingers into your mouth, you suck them clean of Amka's fluids, enjoying her taste.
>Sighing, you let your head fall back, landing on top of some furred rock.
>You should go back to camp soon, you were starting to feel pretty hungry.
>Watching the reindeer try and calm the blueballing dog, the rock shifts under your weight.
>Waitaminute.
>Springing up from your seated position against the reanimated wendigo, you move as fast as your tired legs will allow.
"RUN!"
>Turning to look at you, Amka freezes at your words.
>"W-Why?!"
"'Cause it ain't dead yet!"
>Pointing behind you as you run past her, you both watch as the eye sockets of the wendigo flare with crimson, the ragged body jerking unnaturally.
>"Oh spirits protect us!"
>Sprinting after you, Amka and Misha easily catch up, weaving between branches and bushes like a dance.
>You on the other hand simply barrel through them, not caring about the scratches and scrapes you were earning, desperate to be anywhere but here.
>*SHKREEEEEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHH*
>"How is she not dead?!" Calls the reindeer.
"I don't know! But we really pissed it the fuck off!"
>Hearing the crash of branches and small trees being snapped like twigs behind you, you curse to yourself, not daring to look over your shoulder.
"It's coming!"
>Dashing over a fallen tree, Amka's hooves kick up white snow behind her.
>"I know!"
>Catching a thicker branch to the chest that you didn't see in the dark, you grunt and soldier on, any pain irrelevant compared to what that thing was going to do to you.
"How do we stop it?!"
>"Uh, the elders said something about fire?!"
>Fantastic.
"Great! Let's just pop a squat and light us a big 'ol campfire, you think it likes s'mores?!"
>"Not helping!"
>Following the fleeing deer over a frozen stream, you watch her graceful form, her cute little tail poking up from her skirt.
>Running for your life with a boner was not easy.
>*SHKREEEEEEEEEE*
>The sound of ice crunching tells you the wendigo was right on your heels and closing fast, a strange, gnawing hunger building in your gut.
>You realize that both anthros were faster than you, and in the case of the wendigo, much faster.
>Maybe you should've taken track in highschool.
>Stealing a glance backwards, all you could see in the darkness was a pair of burning red eyes, only a few dozen yards away, locked directly onto you.
"SHIT!"
>Ahead, Amka looks back, her face filled with worry.
>"Keep going! There's a- AH!"
>Not looking where she was going, one of Amka's antlers snags a tree branch, clotheslining her and sending her to the ground.
>You briefly debate leaving her behind, but as you get closer to her fallen form with Misha pawing at her, you know what you had to do.
>Grabbing under her arms and pulling up, Amka rises fairly easily, if a little dazed.
"Come on!"
>Pushing the reindeer forward, you try to get back up to speed, the wobbly deer going off course.
>This was a delay you could not afford, the wendigo uprooting a tree right behind you, nipping at your back.
"FUCK!"
>Tackling the doe back to the ground, both of you sink into the snow, the enraged monster overshooting your dive and destroying more foliage.
>*THWUNK*
>*SHKREEEEEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHH*
>Looking up from your snowy grave, you see the wendigo had gotten stuck between two large pines, scraping the bark with her claws as she tried to get free.
>Jumping up, you look around for anything heavy like a branch or rock, but find only ones too small or large to be effective.
>Writhing between the trees, the wendigo shakes the snow off the pines' boughs, starting to come loose.
>Frantically looking for something to help you, you spot a dead tree, leaning ever so slightly in the wendigo's direction.
>Running over to it, you tackle the wood, trying to push it over so it would fall onto the beast's head.
>The monster screams, seeing what you were doing, deeply gouging the trunks she was stuck between.
>Cracking under repeated shoulder strikes, your tree gives way first, starting to drop.
>Angling it as best you could, you guide the falling wood in the direction of the wendigo, taking several branches with it as it plunged.
>*SHKREEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAKKKKK-*
>Landing on the beast's back with the sound of breaking bones, the tree pins it in place, much to the wendigo's fury.
>Thrashing about wildly, the powerful creature was no match for the awkward weight on her back, unable to escape your impromptu trap.
>Falling to your knees, you gasp for breath, your heart trying its best to beat though your chest.
>Gathering yourself, you look back at the trapped wendigo, who was staring at you with unimaginable hate.
>It then speaks to you, voice like an icy dagger shoved through your chest.
>*WILL FIND YOU APE... EAT YOU LEGS FIRST...*
>Stumbling to your feet, you try not to think on those words as you stagger over to Misha who was guarding a deer-like hole in the snow.
"Amka, you okay?!"
>Pushing up from the snow, the reindeer blinks blearily at you, nodding slightly.
>"What- what happened?"
"Oh nothing much, you just knocked yourself out while I trapped A FUCKING WENDIGO!"
>Looking to where you were pointing, Amka yelps, the burning eyes focusing on her.
>*MORSEL... COME HERE... I HUNGER...*
>Hearing those words, your own stomach growls, as if the beast was projecting its insatiable craving onto you.
"So we light a fire now yeah?"
>Not hearing you, the reindeer was still recuperating, staring back at the burning eyes.
>Snapping your fingers in front of Amka's face, the doe flinches before answering.
>"Uh y-yeah I think so."
>A deep lifeless chuckle comes from the monster, making the hairs on the back of your neck stand on end.
>*YES... FIRE... BURN TREES... FREE ME...*
"I don't think that's going to work Amka, besides, getting a big enough fire started is going to be tough without dry wood."
>Looking at the sky, you see dawn starting to approach though the trees and falling snow.
"Do they die in the sunlight?"
>Shaking her head, Amka bites her finger worriedly.
"Well what else did those elders of yours say? I don't know how long those trees are going to hold her."
>Thinking to herself, the doe is silent for a moment before her eyes widen.
>"Silver."
>*SHKRAAAAAAAAHHHHH*
>Thrashing against the trees, the wendigo doubles their efforts trying to get free, her claws splintering the bark underneath them.
"Looks like we have a winner, so, you got any silver on you?"
>"No."
>Pausing her wild movements, the monster looks at you, neck creaking ominously.
"Welp, we're boned."
>Picking Amka out of the snow, you pull her close and cup one of her furry butt cheeks.
"Wanna pick up where we left off before we get hunted to the ends of the earth?"
>"What? Here?!"
"I mean hey, we were about to do it practically on top of her before she came back to life."
>Looking past you, the reindeer studies the wendigo for a moment.
>"We have to bargain with her."
"Uh, I don't think we have anything she wants. Besides y'know, us."
>Going up as close as she dared, Amka speaks to the trapped creature, trying to keep the fear out of her voice.
>"Why are you in these lands demon?"
>*HUNTING...*
>Cocking her head, Amka looks confused.
>"Why here? Surely there is plenty for you to-"
>*UNICORN...*
>Both you and Amka freeze.
>"A unicorn? Here?"
"They're real?"
>Looking at each other, Amka asks another question.
>"W-Why do you hunt the noblest of equines beast?"
>*WILL FREE FROM... HUNNNNNNNGERRRRRRRRRRRR*
>The last word drones out hauntingly, reverberating through the trees and into your body.
>Stepping back, Amka looks at you worriedly.
>You however now had something to work with, the hunger in your gut deepening.
"I know what to bargain."
>Walking around the trees, the reindeer follows you with curiosity.
>Getting behind the wendigo, you look at the massive ass before you, made of matted fur and torn skin.
"You can't catch a unicorn if you're not a virgin, everyone knows that."
>Snarling, the monster swipes back at you with a hoof, trying to keep you away.
>Ducking the limb, you smack the beasts ass, your hand stinging as it bounced off bone.
"So, what can you offer us in exchange for me not going to town on your wendussy?"
>"Eew."
>You really hope the wendigo bought your bluff, you had absolutely no desire to fuck this living corpse.
>Growling, the monster tucks their bony tail between their legs protectively and answers with what you were hoping to hear.
>*WON'T... EAT YOU...*
>Doing a little dance, Amka looks positively thrilled.
"That's it?"
>Stopping her happy movements, the reindeer gives you a look.
>"W-what are you doing?"
"A unicorn is quite the prize, is not eating us really all you can offer?" You say, poking at the monster's thighs.
>Hissing like a steam engine, the wendigo forces out her next words.
>*LET YOU HAVE... A... PIECE...*
"I was thinking more along the lines of a wish."
>"A wish?"
>*WISH...?*
"Don't you know? Unicorns grant wishes, isn't that what you were going to catch it for?"
>*NO... TO EAT...*
"Well how about this, you don't rip us to pieces and instead take us with you to catch this unicorn."
>"What?! No! You can't do that, the spirits-"
"And in exchange, we'll free you and won't kill or fuck you."
>"You aren't serious, human you can't be-"
>*DEAL...*
>Looking to the reindeer, you give her a cocky smile.
"So, what's your wish gonna be?"
>Amka though, was not smiling.
>"Humans. I don't know who's greedier, you or her."
>Turning away from you, Amka storms off in the opposite direction, calling her husky.
>"Come Misha, we won't have any part in capturing or defiling a pure creature, the spirits will make them answer for it."
>Watching the reindeer go, you didn't want her to leave but the temptation of a unicorn wish was too overwhelming.
>*FREE... ME...*
"Yeah, yeah one sec."
>Turning back to the wendigo, you walk up to her and grab the trunk across her back.
"Holy shit this is heavy."
>Trying not to give yourself a hernia, you lift the log just enough for the bony wendigo to adjust herself, getting a better position underneath the wood.
>Jerking her back, the monster knocks the tree off a little, enough for you to roll it the rest of the way.
"Phew, there we go, now lets go catch us a-"
>As the wendigo stands to her full height out of the trees, you realize you might've made a mistake.
>Realistically, there was absolutely nothing stopping her from grabbing you and literally tearing you in half.
>Hopefully she was a wendigo of her word.
>Bracing for those knife-like fingers to plunge though your stomach, the large anthro looks down at you.
>*DAY... TOO HARD TO CATCH...*
>Looks like your gambling luck was still in the green.
"Oh, well, mind if we go back to my camp where I tried to c-catch you? Uh, no hard feelings right?"
>What sounded like an affirmative growl escaped the large bleached skull, enough of a reassurance that you let out the breath you were holding.
"Cool, cool, so I think it was back that way, let's start- AHH!"
>A pair of cold black hands reach down and grab you around the chest, lifting you bodily into the air.
>*I... KNOW WHERE...*
>Stomping off back through the path of destruction she had made chasing you and Amka, the wendigo carries you back to camp.
"Oh, guess that makes it easy."
>Arriving back at the cliff, the wendigo puts you down.
>*HUNGRY... BE BACK...*
"O-Okay."
>The mythical creature slips back into the forest, disappearing quickly for something so large.
>Well, you might as well eat too.
>Finding your pack, you pull out some firestarter and grab a few dryish looking twigs from the clearing, setting up a little fire.
>Lighting it and warming up a small pan, you fish out a few links of sausage, throwing them in.
>As you wait for the meat to cook, a loud crash lands to your right, making you jump out of your skin.
"FUCK!"
>Looking over, you see the wendigo was back, face red with something else's blood.
>That something else turned out to be a full size grizzly, the animal dead on the ground where it had been dropped.
>How could something so loud and destructive creep up on you like that?
"Jeez, you almost gave me a heart attack!"
>*NO... HEART STILL BEATING... CAN HEAR...*
>Well that's terrifying.
>Bending over her prey, the wendigo opens its mouth, clamping it over the bear's head.
>You watch with horror as she rips the animal's head clean off its body with one pull, proceeding to crunch right though bone and cartilage like they were pork rinds.
>The smell of burning catches your attention, your sausage starting to blacken.
"Crap..."
>Taking the pan off the fire, you place it in the snow, making it hiss with steam.
>Eating your half burned links, by the time you got to the last one, the wendigo had finished her own meal, licking her entire head clean with a freakishly long tongue.
>Did she get bigger? She looked bigger.
>Unable to take another bite of your poorly cooked meal despite still being somewhat hungry, you raise the sausage up in the air, catching the monster's eye.
"Here, have the rest, I know you're still starving."
>Flinging the link at the wendigo, it sails though the air before landing in the beasts open maw, the jaw snapping shut with a loud click of bone.
>*MMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMMM...*
"You know, if you cooked your food it would taste a lot better."
>The wendigo doesn't answer, staring at you ominously from her spot on the red snow littered with viscera.
>Squinting at her, you grab a small burning stick from the fire and toss it in the beast's direction, making her hiss and move away.
"I thought fire didn't work on you."
>*NEVER SAID THAT...*
>Okay, you felt a little better now that you had a contingency plan if this deal with this supernatural being went tits up.
"So uh, what do we need to do to catch this unicorn?"
>*SLEEP... WE HUNT... TONIGHT..."
>Rising, the wendigo goes over to a group of trees and uses one as a cat scratch post, sharpening her claws on the trunk and sending bark flying.
"Right then..."
>Taking a look around your camp, it was all kinds of messed up from the night before, so you decided to spend the morning cleaning up.
>Packing up the traps in the clearing that didn't get destroyed, you also find your gun stuck in a tree.
>The stock had almost been split completely off, the rest of the furniture not fairing much better.
>Looking it over, it seemed like it could still fire, the metal parts mostly intact.
>Getting back to camp, you see the wendigo sleeping, you think, curled under the tree she had eviscerated.
>Following her example, you crawl into bed inside your tent, starting to feel the night's activities taking a toll on you.
>Getting comfortable, you're out like a light before you know it, a dreamless sleep overtaking you.
>*WAKE...*
>Jolting back to the world of the living, your vision is filled with two burning orbs.
>Stifling a scream, your brain quickly reminds you of everything that happened yesterday.
>*HUNT... NOW...*
>Watching you get out of bed shakily, the wendigo waits patiently as you load your sleeping bag and tent into your pack, slinging it over your shoulder.
"Okay, lets get goIIING!"
>Getting picked up again, you are brought face to skull with the monster.
>She definitely got bigger.
>*QUIET... UNICORN... HARD CATCH..."
>Placing you on her back, you ride wendigo's frigid body piggyback style as she sets off on all fours.
>You felt like a ghost, weaving through the forest without so much as a sound.
>There had to be some sort of witchcraft or magic going on to make this possible, there was no way a beast this big could be this quiet.
>About an hour passes with you two slinking though the forest, never once even snapping a twig.
>The two of you pass by several animals on your hunt, catching sight of an anthro owl flying up in the canopy.
>Not a single one of them noticed your presence, even if you were only a tree or two away.
>Despite the ravenous hunger you knew she felt, the wendigo didn’t even spare a glance at them, having bigger fish to fry.
>Another hour or so goes by with you two searching the woods, always progressing in a specific direction.
>You were getting rather uncomfortable resting on this bony spine, and the smell wasn't too great either.
>But you kept your opinions to yourself, not wanting to disturb the monster underneath you.
>Then all of a sudden, the wendigo stops in her tracks, something taking her interest.
>Pulling you off her back, she gently sets you down behind a tree, putting a claw to her non-existent lips.
>Leaving you, she moves away slowly, methodically, entirely focused on something only she could sense.
>Not knowing if she had found the unicorn or not, you stay silent, bracing against the tree to keep still.
>Minutes go by, nothing to be heard save for the breeze blowing snow gently around as it fell from the sky.
>Your legs began to tire as you waited, but you still didn't move, remaining exactly where the wendigo had left you.
>More time goes by, enough that your boots were covered with snow.
>Then, the night's tranquil silence is broken by a far off, yet familiar scream.
>*SHKREEEEEAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHH*
>She found something.
>Still remaining rooted, you watch as birds, critters, and a few other animals scamper past you in the opposite direction of where the wendigo was.
>Another minute or two and you started to hear the crashing of trees and branches coming your way.
>As it got closer, you also heard another noise, sounding like heavy breathing and terrified neighing.
>Oh shit, this was happening.
>Coming to your little patch of forest, you hear something running near your tree and then the voice of the wendigo.
>*CATCH!*
>Whirling out from behind the tree, you blindly jump into the path of whatever she had chased towards you.
>Smacking against something white, you grab onto the creature and bring it to the ground, it struggling in your grip.
>Panting and snorting, you see it was a pale horse, one with a long singular horn on it's head.
>As the thuds of the wendigo's hooves stomp closer, the unicorn in your grasp screams as it fights to break free, kicking and biting at your head.
>Taking the attacks, your hold starts to weaken, the unicorn filled to the brim with adrenaline.
>Wiggling out of your grasp, the anthro unicorn stands on their legs and tries to flee, right as the wendigo bursts through the treeline.
>Snagging a hoof, you trip the equine before it can run again, sealing its fate.
>Pouncing, the wendigo slams a large hand across the back of the unicorn, pinning it to the ground.
>The horse tries to scream, but has no air in its lungs to do so, only gasping out breathlessly.
>*YES... YES... YOU ARE MINE...*
>Keeping her hand solidly on top of the unicorn, the wendigo bends down to put her face right up to theirs.
>*WIIIISSSSHHHHH...*
>"W-W-W-W-W-What?" Squeaks a terrified feminine voice.
"Listen up, we want our wishes for catching you, and none of that sneaky genie or monkey's paw crap either."
>"What are thou- a human?"
>Craning her head back at you, the unicorn looks at you with wide eyes.
>Getting up, you march over to the downed horse and grab a hold of her as well, just in case she tried any funny business.
"You got first dibs big girl."
>You see the blazing orbs of the wendigo grow more intense as she prepares to ask her one desire.
>*WISH... FOR... NO MORE... ACCURSED... HUNGERRRRR...*
>The end of her sentence turns into a growl, making the unicorn whimper feebly.
"Well you heard her, alakazam her wish so I can get mine."
>Peering up at the living corpse above her, the unicorn shakes her head.
>"I-I can't doth that! She is cursed!"
>A deep rumbling noise comes from the wendigo, promising only horror.
>Shit, you didn't want to be responsible for killing a unicorn, especially by the hands of a wendigo.
"I've got bad news for you, either you abra kadabra something outta your ass, or she's gonna chow down like a fat boy at a buffet."
>Biting her lip, the unicorn winces as the wendigo lets out her long tongue, dragging it across the equine's face.
>"F-Fine, I hast an idea, turn me over."
>Looking up at the wendigo, you shrug.
>Picking up the unicorn, the monster roughly turns her over, pinning her by her bosom.
>Coughing, the unicorn beckons to the wendigo.
>"Join closer, I cannot reach thou."
>Leaning over her prey, the black corpse closes the distance with the white unicorn.
>Pulling back her head, the unicorn suddenly and quickly thrusts her horn into the wendigo's chest, goring the larger anthro deeply.
>*SHKREEEEEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHH*
>Screaming ungodly, the monster lets go of the unicorn and falls back, wailing at the night sky.
>You're on top of the horse in an instant, grabbing her horn coated with gross gooey fluids and pinning her head to the snowy ground.
"What did you do?!"
>"What I quoth I would doth!"
"What?!"
*CRACK*
>Interrupted by a loud cracking noise, you look over at the wendigo to see her on her back, her body writhing.
>More cracks and snaps sound out, the large anthro's body twisting in pained positions with each one.
>It sounded even worse than when she ate that bear, guttural screams accompanying her limbs twisting in unnatural directions.
>Then, tufts of matted fur and ripped skin started flying off with her movements, new skin growing underneath.
"What the fuck..."
>The emaciated form before you started to swell, exposed bone being covered by flesh and muscles reforming.
>It was something out of a horror movie, the only thing not changing being the skull, jaw opened wide in a scream.
>Soon the writhing and jerking slowed before coming to a stop, the screaming dying out soon after.
>Laying for a moment, what was in front of you now was not the same wendigo from before, it sitting up and rising to its cloven hooves.
>It had the same fur color as the wendigo before, but the deep black was pristine, looking almost shampooed and brushed.
>She now had a furry mane about her neck where previously there had been none, fur also appearing on her tail that used to just be a length of bone.
>Looking over itself, gone was the thin and ravenous beast, replaced with a bountifully full form.
>Where there had been only skin and bone was now full of muscle and fat, shaping an incredibly feminine body.
>It was something you could actually call beautiful now, the most strikingly prominent feature being her gigantic tits.
>They were obscenely huge, even for her towering frame, hanging down freely from her chest and wobbling with her movements.
>Her breeding hips were also flared out exceptionally wide, sitting on a pair of thick thighs and shapely legs that gave the rest of her body a solid foundation to rest on.
>Everything from her hooves to her neck screamed fertility, the only caveat being the same familiar piercing red eyes inset in her bare white skull.
>*I am not sated. WHY AM I NOT SATED?!*
>Her voice had even changed, going from a ragged, icy, piercing drone to a cold, deep, feminine purr.
>Stomping over to you two, the wendigo's body jiggles and sways invitingly.
>*SPEAK WORM!*
>"Tr-Try eating something! Just looking upon thee I can tell it worked!"
>Glaring at the mare, the invigorated wendigo turns and disappears into the woods without another word.
>Still on top of the unicorn, something pokes into your stomach.
>Looking down past her breasts, you see the girl was sporting an intense fear boner.
"Well aren't you full of surprises."
>The pale face below you explodes in a blush, one hand covering her horsecock and the other her burning face.
>Positioning her head so that she was forced to look at you, you stare into her scared eyes as she tries to look anywhere else.
"My turn, I wish for-"
>"N-Neigh, impossible, thou are not pure of heart."
>Getting irritated, you point to where the wendigo had disappeared.
"You call that pure of heart?!"
>"I didst not grant her a wish, only cleansed her with mine horn."
"Oh come on, that was totally magic! There's no way that wasn't a wish!"
>Shrugging, the equine wiggles her horn in your grasp.
>"I can try the like with thou, if thou desire."
"For fucks sake."
>Wincing, the unicorn covers her ears with her hands at hearing you curse.
“…Fine.” You relent.
>I’ve come all this damn way just trying to trap some trim and it feels like I’ve walked right into a Brothers’ Grimm storybook.
>Might as well see what this babe can do for me.
>“Please. If thou would be so kind as to release me. This snow is terribly cold.” She whispered, finally starting to collect her voice.
>Carefully, you sit up and find yourself kneeling with the unicorn eye to eye.
>In the blur of the capture, you didn’t get a chance to take her body in.
>She was an elegantly thin creature, her pelt being stark white with thin trails of gold snaking their way down her creamy body in ornate patterns, with her mane shimmering a faint, pinkish hue.
>On her chest sat two small breasts just barely big enough to fill your palm, with what I could only describe as decorative gold leaf pasties covering her nipples.
>She stared at you haughtily with her luminescent purple eyes, her hands now nervously covering her privates.
>“At best,” she started. “I can help invigorate thou and the desires that lay dormant in your heart. But that is all.”
“Sure. Why not. Invigorate away.” You say sarcastically.
>Doesn’t sound like it’s gonna help much, but the transformation that the wendigo underwent was no joke.
>Still, you were beyond battered and tired from all the shit you’d been through today, so as you stand up you suggest heading back to your tent to get more comfortable and have some grub.
>The unicorn glanced around nervously as it stood up, weighing it’s chances of escape.
>It was definitely fast, but you were no slouch either.
>At this range, you could nab it easily enough.
>“Provided it’s not too far a trip.” She whispered.
>So, you two walked back to your camp on the cliff.
>During the trek, you learned that the unicorn’s name was Irisia Erisanna. >But you fully intend to call her Iris.
>Apparently, she’s something of royalty in the realm of the faeries.
>Deep in the woods there’s a veil that ordinary humans and dark spirits like the wendigo can’t pass through where the faeries live in peace with other magical creatures.
>Iris is often warned not to go to our realm alone, but she says, and I’m quoting her here, “Thine realm is so filled with its own unique magical and wonderous charm, my heart is drawn here time and time again.”
>Thankfully before she could give me any more of her backstory, we’d arrived.
>While she still didn’t trust me, she had relaxed a bit and even sounded more chipper.
>I lit my lantern to supply light and warmth while we sat inside my tent. >She spent her time marveling at every little object I had inside, from random tools, to my packaged food.
>But I impatiently snapped my fingers to get her to focus.
“Alright, Pixie Stick, time for you to keep your end of the deal.” I spoke. >She looked at me with surprised before making a serious face.
>“Right! Now, expose thine chest and brace yourself. This may sting a touch.”
>It didn’t take more than a second after I pulled my shirt up for her to jab her horn into my chest.
>Dammit, that fucking smarts!
>She didn’t draw blood, strangely enough, but it was a damn thorough jab all the same.
>An intense heat began to pervade your whole body as you collapse and roll about on your sleeping bag in pain.
>“I tried to warn thy.” Iris said plainly. “Thou are not pure of heart, so what effects my blessings would have are not known.”
>While her words rang in my ears, the burning sensation spread to my crotch, fueling a vicious hard-on.
>Without thinking, I tore my pants and thermals off, whipping them to the side.
>My cock was bigger than I’d ever seen it, angrily throbbing and flush with blood and whatever this power was
>“Goodness!” Iris cried out, stumbling backwards, “Why did you remove your coverings! And what’s with that size…”
>You swallowed hard and tried to think clearly.
>What did she say before? Invigorate me…and the desires that lay in my heart?
>I stared at her as she watched me in a panic.
>My desires…the whole damn reason I’m out here…that I almost died, was for this!
>Without hesitating a moment further, I lunged at Iris.
>Too surprised at what was unfolding in front of her to react properly, she takes my tackle head on.
>“Anon?! What has cometh over thou? Get off! Get AWAY!” She cried out, trying her best to fend me off.
>But while I’m not exactly fit, living out in the wilderness has made me rugged enough, and it’s clear this little filly had never fought a day in her life.
>Pinning her beneath me, I spoke.
“I don’t really know…what your ‘blessing’ did.” I hissed. “But I’ll tell you now, THIS is what I’ve desired since coming out here!”
>“Please I- “she began to start but I silenced her with a forceful kiss.
>Slipping my hands behind her head, I drew her in close as she tried again to push me away.
>Slowly amidst her muffled whimpers, I slithered my tongue between her tight lips and invaded her mouth.
>Her saliva tasted lightly of sweet berries as I probed every inch of her insides.
>Pulling away to catch my breath, she was a shaking mess, with tears streaming down her face.
>“M-My first... That was my first kiss, you foul brute!” She cried. >Normally, seeing a girl cry would rattle even my cynical ass, but for some reason seeing this cute, elegant mare’s face writhing in agony made me all the more aroused.
>I used my tongue to lick her neck, making my way down to the gold trails that adorned her body.
>I traced them until I made my way to her breasts.
>Grabbing them both roughly in my hands, she was pinned beneath me, so all she could do was try her best to support both our weight.
>“S-Stop! You’re being too rough!” She whimpered, but I paid her no mind.
>They were soft, yet wonderfully springy, and carefully, I peeled away the golf leaf to reveal two rock hard pink nipples, fully erect and tasting the air.
>Like a madman, I rushed to take the left one in my mouth, and Iris let out the sweetest neigh.
>“Nyyahh!?” She squealed. I rolled the tiny nub around with my tongue, sucking on it feverishly, while tweaking and pulling on the other.
>“No! T-They’re way too sensitive!” She cried. Despite saying all this, she wasn’t really resisting anymore.
>I alternated my sucking, sure to give her right breast plenty of attention as well, ignoring her protests as they gave way to moans.
>After a minute of that, both breasts had taken on the pink hue of her mane, as she averted her eyes to avoid my gaze.
>“H-Have you…finally come to your senses?” She managed to say breathlessly.
>Breathing deeply, I reared back and tore off my shirt, now completely naked with her.
“What do you think?”
>I replied, my cock standing almost upright.
>Beneath it lay her own cock, easily less than half my size and also erect, oozing a thin stream of glittering precum.
“All that whining, and you’re still enjoying this?”
>I said smugly, with proof to point to.
>“H-How uncouth! As if the likes of a savage human could ever-" She began protesting again, but I took my hard rod in hand and smacked her own little cock, cutting her off with a yelp.
“I’m sorry, what was that?”
>I teased
>“Y-You’re too cruel, just what did I- “Smack! Again, I swatted her cock with my own, and she involuntarily bucked her hips.
>“Kyah! P-Please! That feels bizarre!” She moaned, biting her lip.
>But I didn’t let up.
>I continued mercilessly bullying her own little cock with mine.
>Smooshing the length of my hot rod into her little cock so hard, I pressed them both into her smooth, warm stomach before grinding them relentlessly.
>Iris had basically given up to the pleasure, falling on her back as she continued to squirt glittering precum all over us.
>The lubrication, combined with our joint friction made sloppily wet slapping sounds and before long, Iris seized up with a cry.
>“W-Wha!?” She whimpered “W-What’s happening? M-My head feels all fuzzy!”
>I felt a thicker warm sensation spring up between us, and lifted myself off the wheezing mare to see she’d cum.
>The glittering trails of unicorn jizz smeared her belly and connected her flaccid little cock and my own, still hard as a rock.
>Iris had no idea what just happened, but her face was twisted in a perverse pleasure.
>But I was still fucking horny!
“Well, I’m glad you enjoyed yourself,”
>I said, reaching out to grab her by the horn.
>I stood up as I pulled her around to her knees in front of me, my cock landing right on her snout.
“But look at what you did!”
>I continued, grabbing my shaft and tapping it between her eyes.
>“W-Wha?” She whispered, finally starting to come to her senses.
“This erection is so painful, it hurts,”
>You say in a melodramatic way
“I only got this way because of your power, and that lecherous body of yours. Don’t you think it’s only fair that you help me deal with it?”
>I wasn’t really asking her, but I’d rather she play ball of her own volition than not.
>Blushing profusely as I coyly jabbed the head of my cock into her cheeks, smearing our love juices on her face she managed to mumble out a reply.
>“I-It is not as if I did not warn thou something strange may happen!” She said grumpily.
>“Yet, I suppose you are not wrong that I did play some part in all this. So, what does thou wish for me to?”
“Isn’t that obvious?”
>You say casually, now poking your head at her lips, rubbing it across their smooth glossy plumpness.
>“…Fine, I understand.” She says nervously, bringing both her hands up to grab ahold of your shaft
>“B-But I have little experience with the likes of carnal desires such as these, so temper thine expectations.”
>With that, she tentatively opens her mouth and begins to lick and suckle gently on the tip of your cock.
>She only takes in the head, her lips resting around the glands while her tongue flicks at your urethra.
>Still holding her horn, you stare down at this marvelous sight.
>Going into the woods trying to trap yourself an anthro, you never thought you’d wind up getting a blowjob from a fucking unicorn.
>But cute as this amateur blowjob was, this was just pissing you off.
>That burning sensation wasn’t going away at all.
>But hey, you’re a nice guy, so of course you’re willing to show her how to do it, the right way.
>Snaking your other free hand into her mane, you pull down tightly on her head, ramming a solid half of your length down her throat in one go.
>Her tired, teary eyes flew open with a panic, her hands flying to your sides in an attempt to pull you off, but you hold her firm.
“Take a deep breath and watch those teeth, sweetheart, we’re not even halfway there!”
>You say sadistically, as her eyes stare up at you with a renewed fear.
>Pulling back ever so slightly, you thrust forwards again, and again, now properly feeling the warm wetness of her mouth envelope your cock.
>Iris wretches and gags a couple times, but you ignore her.
>Your cock works its way into her throat, your head rubbing against a tight hole in the depths before pushing through to an impressive tightness.
>Iris coughed and heaved hard now.
>That was probably something important, but you couldn’t care less.
>With that, your entire length was nestled in her petite throat.
>Pulling back, you felt your glands hook on that ring before popping free and pulling out, your dick coated in the thick saliva found at the back of the throat. >Iris was a mess of tears and snot, her watery eyes looking up at you for mercy.
>But there was none.
>You slipped back into that warm hole and began your assault.
>With her horn and mane acting as grips, you used the magical creature as an onahole to sate your lust.
>Iris would buck and squirm under your thrusts, but eventually her hands fell away as you ground your cock head into the back of her throat.
>Right as the urge to cum started worming it’s way into your dick, you pulled out for the last time.
>Iris looked awful, her neat mane now completely disheveled, her face wet with all manner of fluids.
>She trembled and continued coughing after you’d finished, trying to take in as much air as she could now.
>But you couldn’t end it here like this.
>There was more to be done!
>“A-Are you quite done?” Iris managed to croak. “So rough…even though that too, was my first time tasting a man…”
“You really should try to be more honest, Pixie Stick.”
>I said, pointing to her once again erect cock.
“This little guy here says you didn’t dislike that nearly as much as you say.”
>“W-What? B-but that cannot…” Iris started, but she simply trailed off, squirming on the sleeping bag under the glow of the lantern.
>Her fluids had gotten all over her, covering her soft body in a brilliant glittering glow as she stared at me tentatively wiping away the last of her tears.
>UUUUOOOOOOHHHH!!
>Losing control of my self once again, I leapt on her.
>“Waah!” She yelped in surprise.
>I took hold of my cock and began poking and prodding for her lower hole, not even sure what I’d find down there, before grazing a wet pair of lips sitting beneath her soft jiggly balls
>“Ahhn!” She moaned. “H-Hold on! Please!” She said, throwing up her hands.
>“T-That place is sacred! I am only supposed to do this sort of thing with someone I love!”
>I let out a sigh of frustration.
>“P-Please. If thou need only to relieve thine self, and…and any hole will do…” >She started, before reaching out to take my hand.
>She brought my fingers up to her mouth and suckled on them, carefully wrapping her tongue around each as she stared at me in a trance.
>Then, she guided my hand shakily to her asshole.
>“There. If it is there…then I do not mind.”
>‘Oh-ho! This girl is full of surprises!’ I thought to myself.
>Using my now lubricated fingers, I prodded at her tight little hole until I managed to slip one digit in.
>“Mnyah!” Iris winced at the intrusion.
>I keep worming my way in until I was down to the knuckle, before twisting it around getting a good feel for her tight inner walls.
>She wriggled around with a face contorted in discomfort, but once she relaxed, her eyes went hazy with pleasure.
>I continued probing her asshole until I managed to get three fingers inside.
>By now, it had loosened up a bit, all the while Iris’ cock bobbed up and down, flinging glitter jizz all over her crotch.
>‘Alright, that should do plenty.’ I figured.
>Lining myself up to her little pink starfish, I began to push.
>Iris tried breathing deeply as I made my way forward, clutching the sleeping bag tightly.
>I pushed and pushed until finally, my head popped inside of her, and she let out another throaty moan.
>Even I had to grit my teeth as the tightness was unreal.
>Giving her little cock a stroke sent forth more splotches of precum I swiped to lube up my shaft.
>Taking hold of her slender hips, I slowly buried my cock into her dainty asshole.
>Her breathing slowed as well as she did her best to relax and accept me.
>After what felt like an eternity, I found myself having bottomed out.
>“So big...I feel…utterly full now.” Iris moaned, droplets of sweat beginning to form on her luscious pelt.
>There wasn’t a moment to waste.
>The burning sensation was at it’s peak, and holding her close, I began to rut Iris.
>Slowly at first but picking up speed I reamed her hole for all it’s worth.
>I felt like a man possessed.
>Iris made feeble attempts to get me to slow down, but to no avail.
>The warm vice of her rectum stroked my entire length and held me so tight, I felt my toes curl.
>I began to sweat myself as I plumbed her depths, the wet sound of her tight white cheeks striking my thighs with each thrust reverberated throughout the tent.
>I wanted to savor every inch of this beast, as I fully intended to claim her as my own.
>Grabbing another handful of her breasts, I came in for kiss.
>This time, Iris didn’t resist at all, her tongue meeting my own, putting up a valiant effort wrestling with mine, before submitting yet again.
>It was wetter, and sloppier than before, our ragged breaths colliding with one another.
>All the while, her cock flopped against her belly, now spurting out a steady, thin stream of cum.
>The fire in my body began to spill over and I tell her I’m close.
“Shit! I’m gonna cum!” I hiss, trying to hold off.
>“Very well!” Iris says wistfully enjoying her own series of orgasms.
>“Release thine viral seed! Use my hole thoroughly to finish!” wrapping her arms around the back of my neck.
>With one final thrust, I slam into her deepest nook as the surge hits.
>I almost feel my eyes roll into the back of my head, as rope after rope fires into her asshole.
>It’s as if I’m pissing for an orgasm.
>“Haayahn!” She yelps, the intense heat of my cum sending shockwaves through her body.
>Her own dick fires hard for a brief moment, before dribbling all over her nuts down around the point where our bodies connect.
>The burning sensation that had overwhelmed me began to wane.
>I stared back at her, basking in the glow of our intense mating session, her breathing shallow, but looking longingly at me.
>“Now then, is that a fair deal?” She whispered.
>I began to pull out of her at last, leaving her asshole sopping wet and gapped far too large to be normal.
>Fingers crossed that’ll go back to normal.
>A small gurgling noise could be heard before rivulets of cum came running out the now empty hole and spilling into her tail.
>The lantern had long since run out of oil, leaving us in the dark, with the pale moonlight bathing her shimmering white body, the gold embroidering twinkling like stars.
>She weakly reached out her arms for an embrace, and now beyond tired, I lazily grabbed a nearby blanket, and fell into her.
“Fair enough.” I sighed back.
>I slept like a rock, snuggled into my mythical fuckhole’s chest, only to be awoken by someone calling out to me.
>The sun had crept high in the sky now, it’s warmth making it’s way into the tent.
>“Hey!? You still alive, human? Hello~!” the voice outside called
>Iris also groggily rose from her slumber.
>“Gracious, it is entirely too early for a wakeup call.” Iris mumbled, gently stroking your head.
>You two continue to lay there for but a moment before-
*SHKREEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHH*
>You both lurch wide awake and look at one another in confusion.
>Iris curls up in the covers and sleeping bag while you hastily throw on your thermal underwear and poke your head outside the tent flap.
>You’re greeted by Amka and her pet Misha, who bounds over to you yet again.
>Standing along side the deer anthro is the tall, foreboding frame of the wendigo, currently bound by her wrists with rope, being led by the aforementioned deer anthro.
>“Not bad, wraith.” Amka said cheekily to the wendigo, who nodded and let out a hiss of approval.
>“Human…heavy sleeper.” She replied.
>Her voice had changed radically since you last saw her.
>It was now a deep, sensual, husky voice.
>Like an older chick who smoked a ton but didn’t quit before it scratched up her vocal cords.
>“We need to talk.” Amka started.
"Alright, but I'm not going out there, it's cold as hell."
>Rolling her eyes, Amka hands the end of the rope to Misha who takes it into his mouth happily.
>Looking at the wendigo, she appeared more passive than her usual self, but was still plenty intimidating with those smouldering coals for eyes.
>"You need to grow some fur if you're going to be out here in winter human." Said Amka, walking over to your tent.
"So you've said."
>Unzipping the tent further, you let the reindeer inside, who takes care not to rip a hole in the fabric with her antlers.
>"Hrmf, well anyways I-"
>Stopping mid sentence, the doe sniffs the warm muggy air of the tent.
>"By the spirits, what smells so... goood?"
>Peering around the tent, Amka eventually spots Iris, the unicorn bundled up in your sleeping bag.
>"Greetings?"
>Gasping, Amka lets her jaw hang open as she looks between you and the equine, as if not believing what her eyes were telling her.
>"H-Human! Tell me you did NOT do what I think you did!"
>You only shrug at the distressed deer.
>Scrambling past you, Amka pulls Iris out of her cozy spot by her armpits, bringing the unicorn close.
>"Oh noblest of creatures, this is all my fault! D-Did he hurt you?!"
>Accepting the hug, Iris wraps her arms around Amka for comfort.
>"'Twas heinous! The barbarian took me as if I were his breeding sow!"
>Glaring knives at you over the unicorn's shoulder, the doe rubs Iris' back.
>"He mounted me over and over, spilling his virile seed inside me like a beast in rut!"
>Blushing, the glare on Amka's face wavered, her eyebrows rising.
>"His mighty body bore down upon me, I was powerless to stop him as he violated mine most vulnerable areas with his impressive member~"
>Biting her lip, Amka looks down at your crotch.
>"Mmmf, he did not yield until he was spent and I was full to bursting, leaving me ravaged and bruised~"
>Grinding against the doe, Iris was off in her own little world.
>"'Twas... diviiiine~"
>Looking uncomfortable, Amka taps Iris on the back a few times.
>"U-Um excuse me sacred one, but your p-p-penis is rubbing against me."
>Ignoring the deer, Iris continues her mumbling and grinding, engrossed in her own thoughts.
>Pointing an accusatory finger at you, Amka shouts angrily.
>"W-What did you do to her?!"
"Pretty sure she just told you."
>"Not that! I mean why is she so h-horny?"
"Uh because she's a unicorn?"
>Ba dum tss.
>"You know what I meant!"
"'Cause I fuck good, I don't know!" You say, throwing your hands up with exasperation.
>Narrowing her eyes, the doe clenches her teeth.
>"You wished for her to be your whore bride, didn't you."
>Shaking your head, you scratch your chest absentmindedly.
"Nah, if I actually had a wish I'd have at least asked for ten unicorns, apparently I can't get one because I'm not "Pure of heart"."
>"Definitely not~" Groans Iris happily.
>"Pure of heart? And she actually DOES grant wishes? Like if I wish for... I don't know, to be the best huntress of my tribe, she could do that?"
>"Granted."
>Before anyone could stop her, Iris places her horn against the deer's head, the tip glowing.
>"GUh-"
>Falling on her back, Amka separates from the unicorn, her toned stomach covered with sparkly precum.
>That same stomach then tightens, flexing as it forms a row of abs, the unicorn pre soaking between the muscles.
>The rest of her athletic body gets a similar treatment, toning further and developing muscle.
>"Ooohh~"
>Unlike your transformation or the wendio's, Amka's experience didn't appear to be as drastic or painful, instead it looked like she was enjoying it.
>Running her hands over her body as it filled out, Amka flinches as her pelted skirt snaps off.
>"Oh!"
>Looking down at her swelling thighs, the doe stretches her legs as they bulk up substantially.
>"Hnnnnnn!"
>A few more subtle alterations happen before the reindeer sits up on her knees, popping a few stiff joints.
"Normally I'd say that was a waste of a wish, but damn girl."
>Amka's body had changed from already decently athletic, to something an Olympic runner or gymnast would kill for.
>Her legs looked like they had been specifically made for sprinting, large and powerful, looking strong enough to let the doe squat a redwood.
>Her taut core accentuated her hips nicely, leading up to her muscled upper body that still kept a distinct feminine shape.
>She definitely fit the huntress description well.
>Looking lower, her crotch was soaked through, dripping fluids down the insides of her thighs.
>"W-What was- I didn't-"
>Glancing up, Amka pauses, looking at you like the wendigo did at anything that moved.
>Hungry.
>Without warning, the reindeer leaps with her new legs, shooting across the tent into you.
"OOF!"
>Tackling you, Amka wastes no time in mashing her lips to yours, moaning needily as Iris watches.
>"Oh my."
>Grinding her wet pussy against you forcefully, the deer breaks the kiss with a wet *muah*.
>"Nghhh~ The unicorn better not be lying, I need exactly what you gave her!"
>Grabbing at your underwear, Amka only relents when a crack of thunder rips though the valley.
>Sitting up suddenly, the reindeer seems to get her wits about her.
>"O-Oh right, the reason I came to find you..."
>Looking down, Amka's green eyes fixate on yours.
>"A storm is coming, a bad one. I wanted to warn you so you didn't get stranded out here."
"A storm? The forecast didn't say anything about that, it was supposed to be mostly clear all week."
>Climbing off of you, Amka picks up her ruined skirt and looks over it, tossing it outside with a sigh soon after.
>"Yes well, I'm more inclined to believe the wendigo when she says there's a thunderbird in the area."
>Wringing her hands, Iris adopts a guilty expression.
>"Thunderbird? Oh I doth hope mine absence wasn't noticed, I care not to spread worry."
>"Well in any case we need to find shelter soon, the blizzard will be here before nightfall and it'll be freezing even for those with fur."
>Stepping out of the tent, Amka mumbles to herself something about wishes, leaving you and Iris alone.
"A blizzard, great. There's no way I can make it home before it hits."
>"Nor I."
>As you get dressed, Iris exits as well, leaving you to pack up your tent haphazardly.
>Getting everything into your pack, you look at the three girls questioningly.
"So where are we headed?"
>"Cave..." Comes the deep, husky voice of the wendigo.
>"Apparently she knows of something close by." Amka says, gesturing up to the tall anthro.
>"Ugh, a cave? Why must I be subjected to such squalor?" Iris pouts.
>"Can stay outside..." Growls the onyx monster, making the unicorn cower.
>"C-C-Cave is fine!"
>Turning to the woods, the wendigo starts walking, the rest of you following behind with Misha still holding her leash.
>Looking up to the otherwise normal midday sky, you see far off clouds billowing ominously.
>"I apologize your exaltedness-"
>"Irisia Erisanna, if you please."
"Just call her Iris."
>"That is not mine- AH!"
>Cutting off the unicorn with a spank to the ass, Iris stumbles forward.
>"Lascivious brute..."
>Rubbing her butt where you smacked it, Iris glares back at you.
"Don't pretend you didn't like it you little slut." You say, pointing between the equine's legs.
>Looking down, Iris finds her body had betrayed her, her cock flopping free of its sheath.
>Blushing like mad, Iris squeaks as she hastily covers her obvious arousal.
>Amka blushes as well, looking away awkwardly.
"Cmon, move those buns girls, don't want to lose our guide after all." You say cheekily.
>As the five of you walk through the woods, you lag behind slightly to enjoy the sight before you.
>All three of the anthros were a different flavor of sexy, each one with their own distinct feminine quirks.
>Iris with her svelte form, covered with her natural golden embellishments, was built like a runway model.
>She wasn't a stick though, still somewhat curvy due to her thin waist, moving gracefully through the snow like a ballet dancer, a little red handprint on her butt cheek.
>Amka was looking like she was ready to sprint a marathon at a moments notice, the muscles in her freckled ass and thighs easily noticeable without her skirt, shifting and stretching with each step beneath her skin.
>She was still getting used to her huntress form, her hands unable to stay idle as they explored her new features, a noticeable sheen to her inner thighs.
>And last but certainly not least, the wendigo.
>Twice your height, thicker than a jar of molasses and just as dark, her full figure jiggled sensually as she led the way.
>Dangerous, mysterious, and able to crush your head between her thighs even easier than Amka could, what's not to love?
>After another boom of thunder breaks the silence, you address the muttering reindeer groping herself.
>"So how'd you manage to catch our big friend here anyway Amka?"
>Startled, the doe looks back at you, a little blush on her cheeks.
>"O-Oh well I found her in the woods, or more accurately, she found me."
"She try to attack you?"
>"No, she seemed... confused I suppose." The reindeer says, peering up at the tall girl.
>"Body feels... strange..." The wendigo corroborates, grabbing at one of her giant tits.
>"Strange how?" Iris asks, head cocked with curiosity.
>Thinking of the words for a moment, the creature responds.
>"Many... weak hungers... meat... does not sate."
>"Dost thou mean thirst?"
>The wendigo nods slowly.
>"Thirst... itch... cold... new hungers... feelings."
>"A wendigo that knows the bite of winter? How queer."
>"The demon feeling anything other than hunger is remarkable, I assume she wished to be alive?"
>"Neigh, remember I may only grant wishes to those pure of heart."
"She got stabbed by Iris and then played the face melting scene from Raiders of the Lost Ark in reverse."
>All three women look back at you with varying levels of confusion.
"Oh right, I forgot none of you have seen a television in your entire lives, ignore me."
>"...Anyways, I had planned to capture her and take her back to my tribe to be destroyed, but she doesn't appear to be insatiable anymore, instead it's like she's... healthy?"
"She definitely looks healthy to me." You confirm, watching the wendigo's enticing eye level ass sway back and forth.
>"I know not what mine horn didst to her exactly, yet she doth hast a vitality she didn't possess before." Iris muses.
>Looking uncertainly between you and Iris, Amka mulls something over in her head.
>"Well if she's alive and not a voracious zombie anymore, should I just... let her go? It would make her no different from the other carnivores of this land."
>"Let you... capture me..."
>Flicking her wrists, the wendigo snaps the rope tied around them as if they were frayed string.
>Letting out a strangled scream, Iris runs behind you, almost faceplanting in the snow.
>Misha does the opposite, running in front of Amka and emitting a protective growl.
>Bracing yourself, you were pretty sure you and the reindeer were safe, it was kinda up in the air about the dog and unicorn.
>"Need to learn... about living..."
>Peering at the four of you from her height, the wendigo makes no attempt to attack.
>Nervously poking her head around you, Iris speaks to the giant woman.
>"W-We shall school thou! As long as thou do not e-eat us!"
>Another crack of thunder booms, much closer this time.
>Nodding once and then looking to the sky, the wendigo continues on her way, you following after her with the other two anthros behind you.
"Well, since I guess we're gonna be buddy buddy now, do you have a name?"
>The sound of the blowing wind is all that's heard for a moment before the wendigo speaks.
>"Name...?"
>"I would like to know as well, what DO they call you?" Amka adds.
>"They...?"
>"I... do not believe she hath a name." Iris says.
>Scratching your chin, you look back to the two girls.
"Should we give her one?"
>"Hmf, BEAST suits her just fine if thou ask me."
>Looking thoughtful, Amka nods.
>"I think she should have one, it's only right."
>Crossing her arms Iris frowns.
>"How about monstrosity? I be rather fond of that one."
"Be nice."
>"Nice?! I was almost consum-!"
"You were fiiiiiine." You say dismissively, waving Iris off.
>Puffing her cheeks out with indignation, the unicorn goes to say something more before Amka cuts her off.
>"How about Kirima? It means hill."
>Looking up at the tall anthro, you shrug.
"She's definitely big enough."
>"Hmm, Tapeesa? Means arctic flower."
>"Pshh, neigh, there's nought about her that's flowery." Iris snorts.
>"Palartok for quiet?"
"Doesn't really roll off the tongue."
>Thinking for a moment, Amka perks up, another name coming to her.
>"Ooh what do you think of Lusa? It means midnight."
>Looking at the charcoal wendigo, her head was turned toward you three with interest.
>"Lu... sa..."
>"Tis appropriate... I suppose." Iris concedes.
"I agree, she pretty much disappears after dark."
>"Well, what do you think? Do you like it?" Amka says hopefully to the wendigo.
>"Lusa..."
>Saying the name again, the tall anthro stares blankly for a moment before nodding.
>"Yes... like it..."
>Smiling, Amka puts her hands together.
>"Nice to meet you Lusa."
>After naming your no longer malevolent mythical murder machine, the group falls back into silence, enjoying the scenery.
>Much of your trek is uneventful as the sky darkens, the occasional thunder sounding as evening creeped in.
>The wind starts to pick up as the five of you near the bottom of a small cliff side, shaking the trees around you and blowing snow that was slowly getting larger.
>"How much further Lusa?" Amka asks, watching the sky as black clouds billow overhead.
>"Close..."
>You catch a flash of lightning in the distance, lighting up the darkening sky for a brief moment.
>Not timing it perfectly, you count at least five seconds before the ensuing thunder crashed behind it.
>Following the cliff, your little group bunches up, Iris holding your arm close.
>As the snow thickens and visibility becomes worse, the wendigo stops.
>"Here..."
>Seeing a large crack in the cliff face, you point at it.
>"You mean that cave?"
>Nodding, the wendigo goes up to the break in the wall and crouches down.
>As she looks to the rest of you by the entrance, Amka speaks.
>"That's a bear's den."
>"Yes..."
>"I don't believe the owner shall appreciate new house guests." Iris says with a sniff.
>As the wendigo licks her exposed teeth, you're reminded of the bear bourguignon Lusa enjoyed the other day.
"I don't think we're going to need to worry about that."
>Approaching the cave, you see the opening was a little shorter than you were tall, the wendigo needing to get on all fours to fit inside.
>Watching her push her way in, you look to the other girls as they eye the hole apprehensively.
"Look at it this way, if she really was going to eat us, she's had plenty of opportunity to do so at this point."
>"That doth NOT cause me ease in the slightest."
>A gust of wind tosses Iris' silky pink mane in the air, making the mare shiver slightly and cross her arms.
>"Though I suppose I lack a choice."
"That's the spirit!"
>Following where Lusa disappeared to, you watch your head as you go into the cave after her.
>Your eyes take a second to adjust to the dim confines of the den, the only thing seen for a moment being the wendigo's piercing red eyes further back.
>That's always going be incredibly creepy isn't it?
>Getting past the entrance, you cautiously straighten up, mindful of your head.
>As your night vision takes hold, you see you had nothing to worry about as the cave ceiling was tall enough for even the wendigo to kneel with her back straight.
>It wasn't a particularly large cave, but there was enough room to fit the five of you comfortably.
"Home sweet home..." You say, shrugging off your pack.
>Amka and Misha were next in, the reindeer doing her best not to snag her antlers.
>"Not too bad, especially for something on short notice."
>The cave was noticeably warmer than outside by a few degrees, mostly due to having shelter from the wind.
>Pine needles, dead grass, and shredded wood make up the floor of the cave, bedding the bear had brought in for hibernation.
>It seemed to be reasonably soft, if the way Lusa was lounging at the rear of the cave was any indication.
>A boom of lightning sounds outside, the closest yet.
>Coming in last was the unicorn, appearing through the mouth of the den and putting you between her and the wendigo.
>"Ohh... Must I be forced to sleep on twigs and brambles?" Iris complains, tugging on your sleeve.
"Y'know, for a forest spirit you're not very... foresty."
>Miffed at your words, the unicorn snorts, flicking her mane.
>"Oh pardon me for preferring a bed of grass or patch of moss to a pile of refuse."
"Well you're in luck Pixie Stick, seeing as how the roof is high enough I'll have the tent set up soon."
>"Excellent, thy mobile domicile is quite handy."
>Once again you start unpacking your tent, though this time you take out an extra tarp you normally use for heavy rain.
>Unfolding it, you give the other end to Amka, the two of you spreading out the covering over most of the floor.
>Stepping onto the fabric, the unicorn coos appreciatively as you get to setting up the tent.
>"Ooh, much better."
>The wendigo seems to be less sure of the new floor, but climbs on top of it anyway.
>"Hmmm..."
>Laying down, the tarp crinkles under the big anthro's weight as she adjusts to the foreign material.
>Seemingly pleased, she watches as you finish setting up the tent where the tarp didn't quite reach.
>"Gramercy, Anon, I cannot wait to- hey!"
>Lusa had taken an interest in your tent, fitting her upper body inside it, much to the chagrin of Iris.
>"Foul creature! Relinquish the domicile at once!" She says, stomping a hoof irritably.
>Ignoring the unicorn, the wendigo stretches out, getting comfortable in her spot.
>Amka suppresses a giggle at the equine, giving Misha some pets.
>"Looks like you'll have to share Irisia."
>Groaning, the mare hangs her head.
>"Anon... may you at least compose a fire? I desire to warm my hooves."
"Sure, but it will need to be small and near the front of the cave so we don't die of smoke inhalation or accidentally set the floor on fire."
>Looking at the entrance, Iris peers outside, the snow and wind having increased their ferocity exponentially.
>"I fear that shall only defeat the intent..."
>Another crack of thunder sounds as Amka struts her way over to you with a purpose.
>"Hmhmm, I know a good way to warm up."
>Lifting her top off, the reindeer tosses it to the side, exposing her ample breasts.
>Wrapping her arms around your neck Amka pulls you in for a kiss.
>Caught a little off guard, you return the doe's eagerness, your tongues clashing as they fight for supremacy.
>"Oh..."
>Blushing, Iris watches you two make out, rubbing her thighs together.
>Grabbing one of Amka's horns, you bend her back as you push into her mouth.
>"Mmmf!"
>Wrapping a muscular leg around one of yours, Amka is forced to let you take control, her eyes fluttering.
>The deer's mouth is assaulted by your tongue, her flat teeth parting to let it explore further inside.
>Reaching down with your other hand, you grope Amka's firm ass roughly.
>Breaking the kiss with a pleasured moan, the doe places her forehead to yours.
>"By the spirits... human I need you inside me NOW!"
>Letting go of you, Amka helps you undress, getting you down to your thermals.
>Stripping your underwear off, your dick springs into the air, making Amka gasp with surprise.
>Taking your throbbing member in her warm hands, the doe marvels at your cock.
>"H-How...? I-I've never seen a c-cock even CLOSE to this big!"
>Amka looked as if she had bitten off more than she could chew, eyeing your member worriedly.
"Mostly home grown, but you can thank our little horsie over there for the extra bump."
>Pointing to the kneeling unicorn, she had her own cock in her hand as she watched you two, blushing as she was watched, her tip squirting out a spurt of glittery pre.
>"T-Take her."
>Squeezing your length, Amka looks a little scared.
>"I-It's too thick, it's like a tree trunk!"
>"Verily, yet if a dainty mare like myself can take it, thou should hast no trial."
>Still looking hesitant, Amka nervously plays with your tip, unsure what to do.
>So you take matters into your own hands, pushing the cervid down onto the tarp and positioning yourself between her thick legs.
>"W-Wait! At least let me take you like this."
>Turning over so that her back was to you doggystyle, Amka presents her freckled ass, her little tail twitching with anticipation.
>Despite her fear, Amka's pussy was gushing with arousal, no doubt still pent up from earlier in the day.
>Letting your cock drop between Amka's cheeks, the deer trembles, feeling the underside of your girth rub up against her lower lips all the way up to her tail.
>"Be g-gentle."
>Lining yourself up with her pussy, your head pushes in, making Amka breathe in a sharp breath.
>Continuing on, you part her lips and delve into her hot tunnel, inch by inch.
>She wasn't as ridiculously tight as Iris, but her walls were much stronger, squeezing you tightly as you go deeper in.
>"AAAAaaaaaaahhhhnnnn! B-By the moon and stars! You're splitting me in half!"
>Rubbing the reindeer's lightly muscled back gently, you do your best to soothe her.
"Almost there, just a little more to go."
>Giving her a moment, you soon press on, getting close to bottoming out.
>Grabbing Amka's defined hips, you pull them toward you, giving you extra traction to help burrow through her constricting walls and into her deepest reaches.
>Finally hilting inside her, Amka lets out a long satisfied moan, which is then joined by a shorter, higher pitched one.
>A few lines of sparkly jizz shoot across Amka's back from the side, Iris' flaring horse cock spurting into the air as she cums.
>Your tip grinds against Amka's cervix as you look at the climaxing horse, hunched over as cum drips down into her lap.
"Iris, come here."
>Panting, the unicorn does as you ask, crawling over to you.
>When she gets within range, you grab her by the horn and shove her down next to Amka, her ass pressing against the deer's side by side.
"Who told you you could cum?"
>"W-Well no one didst?"
"And you don't see the problem with that?"
>Scooping up some of the glittery cum off Amka's back with your fingers, you pull aside one of the equine's cheeks, revealing her pussy and muscled donut.
>"I be not allowed to- nnngAAAH!"
>Your two middle fingers dive into the horse's asshole, squelching into the tight confines until your palm slaps against her butt.
>"Haah~ T-Thou art a fiend!"
>Bringing your hips back, you slowly pull out of Amka, the doe's walls clinging onto you as she moans.
"A fiend am I? I guess I won't overlook your rule breaking after all, it seems like you need to learn a lesson."
>Taking your fingers out of Iris' ass, you trace over her pussy lips with your wet fingers before getting to her hanging sack.
"Only good girls get fucked. Bad girls on the other hand..."
>Getting to the point where only your head was still inside the deer, you grip the unicorn's balls with your fingers.
"Get punished."
>Slamming balls deep into Amka, you simultaneously give the delicate orbs in your hand a good squeeze.
>Two cries come from the girls below you, one of pleasure and one of pain.
>Not letting them adjust, you pull back and thrust forward once more, giving Iris' soft nuts another clench.
>"F-Fuck!~"
>"FFFFUDGE!"
>Both of them curse loudly, Amka leaning back into you while Iris tries to get away.
>She can't get far however as you literally had her by the balls.
>"P-Please, I beg of thou! I pray for thy forgiveness!" Iris whines, looking over her shoulder at you with teary eyes.
>"Quiet."
>Giving Amka another thrust, you pull Iris back by the nuts, making her whimper as she scurries backward.
>As you fuck Amka and treat Iris' sack like a stress toy, the wendigo watches you three with interest, still lounging halfway inside the tent.
>Ramming into Amka again and again, her voice gets higher every time you knock on the entrance to her womb, making Misha's ears perk up.
>Cocking his head at his master's strange noises, the dog watches as Amka loses herself to the pleasure, her tongue lolling out of her mouth.
>"By the s-spirits YES!~"
>Amka meets your thrusts with her own, her toned ass slapping loudly against your legs repeatedly.
>Paying more attention to the reindeer, your squeezes to Iris' balls had changed to a rough massage, the unicorn whining pitifully while your fingers rubbed over her tender orbs.
>Uselessly trying to wiggle out of your grasp to no avail, Iris kicks her hooves into the tarp below her.
>Then all of a sudden the unicorn's back arches as she neighs with a mix of pain and pleasure, her nuts clenching in your hand as they start shooting cum.
>Annoyed but too focused on Amka at the moment, you let go of the equine's jewels and give them a good spank across the seam.
>"FUUUUUUUUCK!" Iris yells at the top of her lungs, doubling over and coating her face with her own sparkly jizz shot after shot.
>Throwing her head back, Amka similarly lets out an animalistic horny bleat as her walls clamp down on you, hard.
>Yourself only about halfway done, you power through Amka's orgasm and her strong clenching walls, much to her enjoyment.
>"Y-You're ruining me! I-I'm being r-ruined by HUMAN COCK!"
>With the doe's head back, you take the opportunity to grab her natural fuck handles, her velvet antlers feeling surprisingly warm in your hands.
>Now having better leverage, you plow into Amka mercilessly, the deer forced to scream at the ceiling as she was ravaged.
>"NNHHHAAAAAAAAAAAAAIIIIIIIIIIII!~"
>Hitting a particularly high note, Misha points his head to the sky as well, howling along with her.
>Pulling Amka up into you, her back lands against your chest, and your hands reach around to grope at hers.
>Kneading her full breasts, you enjoy the new position, starting to feel yourself get close.
>Switching to long powerful thrusts, each time you bottom out inside the doe she's briefly lifted off her knees.
>"AHHHN!~ Please! More!"
>Speeding back up with her encouragement, Amka's tits bounce in your hands under your assault.
>The reindeer brings one of her hands up to yours, holding it and helping you pinch her nipple.
>The other does the same before bringing your hand down south.
>The two of you explore over her abs and bush, wandering into her sopping cunt between her legs.
>Guiding you to her most sensitive area, Amka gasps as both your hands reach her clit.
>As you begin to reach the point of no return, the doe helps you rub her sensitive bud, her body starting to jerk.
>Resting the side of her head against yours and moaning desperately, Amka's walls start clenching on you as you reach your peak.
"Here it comes!" You grunt.
>"Yes yes YES! Give it a-all to me! Cum inside!"
>Biting down on where Amka's neck met her shoulder, the doe screams with ecstasy, her walls constricting around you like a vice.
>You're able to get one or two more thrusts in before your head kisses her cervix for the last time, creating seal between your tip and the entrance of her womb.
>Your jizz comes in blinding fast, hitting her back wall with the first spurt.
>Again and again you unload into the doe's slutty pussy, filling her to the brim and painting her walls white.
>Amka was all but out of it, giggling nonsensically while drool spilled from her open mouth.
>Pumping the last of your huge load into her, your tired legs give out with the last shot.
>Falling back, the two of you land on the tarp with Amka atop you, the reindeer down for the count.
>Feeling up the unconscious doe, you grope her curves and muscles gently, reveling in her fuzzy body.
>Man this dick was awesome.
>Your cuddling was cut short however as a pair of large black hands fit themselves between you and Amka, lifting the reindeer off of you.
>Your cock leaves the doe with a *shorp*, cum immediately spilling out of her gaped and twitching pussy.
>Then a black shadow washes over you, the wendigo straddling your body and leaning over you ominously.
>Her huge boobs hung down and rested against you heavily, like a pair of squishy beanbags.
>"My... turn..."
>Looks like it was time for the main course.
>Two burning eyes gaze down on you expectantly, waiting for something.
>Looking down through her cleavage at your messy cock, you see it had started to go soft after you drained your nuts into Amka.
"I'm gonna need a sec big girl."
>"Can fix... that."
>Turning around, Lusa replaces her massive tits with her equally huge ass, a waterfall of arousal splashing onto your face from her crotch above.
>You get only a moment before she brings that drenched pussy down and sits right on your face, cutting you off from the outside world.
>Your head is encased in thick humid fur, the portion over your face being even hotter and incredibly wet.
>The dripping cunt radiated heat like it was on fire, pressing hard against your lips.
>Letting your tongue out, you push it to the thick lips, taking in Lusa's flavor.
>She tasted smoky, like an aged whiskey mixed with a hint of black liquorice.
>Not an unpleasant taste, but one that might need getting accustomed to.
>Probing around her opening with your tongue, you eventually find Lusa's clit, just as immense as the rest of her.
>It was easily over three times as big as Amka's from what you could tell, and just as sensitive, the wendigo letting out a low groan through her body as you lick it.
>"Yessssss... there..."
>A warm and slimy tentacle licks at your base, the ebony anthro using her tongue on your cock.
>The long appendage wraps around your soft cock tightly, picking up strands of your cum and Amka's juices.
>It was like your dick was being hugged by the world's horniest eel, the end swirling around your tip trying to resuscitate it.
>Not one to be outdone, you double your efforts, worming your hands into Lusa's wet crotch.
>Spreading her lips with your fingers, you give her flower a deep lick from top to bottom, her delicate folds parting for your tongue.
>Even though you weren't bearing most of her weight, the huge anthro's new body was bulky enough to keep you easily pinned under her.
>Sticking a few fingers into her drooling pussy, you bring your mouth back to the wendigo's throbbing clit.
>Popping it into your mouth, you give her bud a gentle suck.
>This makes Lusa flinch, her thighs trembling as she lets out a low coo that almost sounds like a growl.
>Wrestling your cock with her erratic wet muscle, she breaths life back into it, getting you hard again.
>Holding her clit with your lips, you bathe it with your tongue, the fleshy bulb swelling even larger.
>"Grrrraaaaaahh~"
>As you go down on the wendigo, she does much the same, polishing your rising rod with her nimble, constricting tongue
>Massaging her puffy lips with both hands, you dip in and out of her honeypot with your fingers, your mouth still holding onto her clit firmly.
>Getting you back to full-mast, Lusa moans throatily, leaning back and grinding against your face.
>This makes you tug on her clit with your lips, giving the wendigo another jolt.
>"AAAHH-!"
>Fresh fluid dribbles down your face as you pleasure the big girl, her legs quaking with a nearing orgasm.
>Seating herself all the way back, Lusa cuts off your oxygen supply with her sweltering crotch, her pussy mashed to your face.
>Licking and sucking like a man possessed, you target the girl's weakspot repeatedly, ravaging her button.
>Unable to withstand you much longer, Lusa braces herself, her lower half squirming with stimulation.
>Locking onto her engorged clit, you give it a strong suck, your teeth gently pressing into the sides.
>This was the wendigo's breaking point, making her screech with pleasure.
>*SHKREEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHH*
>A veritable torrent of fluids washed over your face as Lusa came, making your struggle for air even harder.
>As your head starting to feel light, you pull your hands out from the writhing beast's crotch and place them against her lower stomach, pushing hard.
>Still in the throes of pleasure, the wendigo was not prepared for this, toppling backwards and falling off your head.
>Landing heavily on the tarped floor, Lusa nearly crushes Misha, who barely had time to scamper out of the way.
>Breathing in fresh air, you stand to your feet, watching the coal anthro slowly sit back up.
>Two burning eyes fixate on your form, seeing your face dripping with her fluids and rock hard cock pointing directly at her.
>Laying back down, the wendigo spreads her legs submissively, letting you push yourself between them.
>Grinding your cock against her messy cunt, your tip brushes over Lusa's sensitive clit, making her hiss.
>Lubing yourself thoroughly, no words need to be said between you as you press your head against her lips firmly.
>Spreading her around your cock, the wendigo takes you comfortably, her insides feeling like a boiling furnace.
>While not as tight as the other two, Lusa's pussy was built plush and squishy, her plump walls drenched with secretions.
>You find you didn't even need a drop of lubrication as your hips kissed hers, Lusa moaning as you hilted inside her.
>Grabbing a handful of her immensely wide hips, your fingers sink into her skin as you pull back, readying for another thrust.
>Locking eyes with her, you stare into the wendigo's fiery orbs, watching them flicker as you slam home, the big girl letting out an uncharacteristic meep.
>Doing it again harder this time, you watch a wave ripple out from her crotch and through her belly, jostling her tits.
>"Nhhhhh!"
"Oh, you like that?" You say, winding up another thrust.
>"Ye-HESSSSS~" Replies the wendigo, jostled by you spearing into her depths again.
>Giving her what she wanted, you slowly build up a rhythm, the sound of wet slapping reverberating around the den.
>Lusa's pussy was drenched at this point, her long tongue coiling around her fingers stuck inside her porcelain mouth.
>She cried out every time your cock buried into her, her husky voice ringing out over the smacking sounds of skin on skin.
>Leaning over the wendigo, you reach up to her wobbling tits, just barely able to snag her large nipples.
>The things were massive, overfilling your hands with stiff flesh, not even counting her puffy areola.
>You'd have trouble fitting them in your mouth if you could reach, your face sadly way out of range.
>Instead, you squeeze them with your hands, the pliable skin yielding to your fingers easily.
>"HAAAAaaaaaahhhh~"
>Lusa writhes as you tweak her fat nipples, her pussy clasping your cock as you keep thrusting.
>"NGGGGHH... CLOSE!"
>The wendigo's pussy squelched as it took your beating, your cock splitting her walls each time it dove in.
>You were giving her all you had, and she was loving every second of it.
>Giving her nipples another twist, the wendigo quakes, her body and cunt seizing up on you as she cums again.
>*SHKREEEEEEEAAAAAAAHHHHH*
>Your cock is bathed in a surge of hot juices, Lusa splattering your crotch as she rides out her orgasm.
>You don't slow down, still thrusting away while the wendigo comes back down to earth.
>Pinching her nipples again, the big anthro looks down, letting out a low moan.
>"Still... g-going?" She asks, confused.
"You didn't think- *huff* I'd be done that soon, did you?"
>Smiling even as you feel fatigue setting in, you keep savagely pounding the demonic woman under you, sweat dripping off your body.
>Still sensitive, the obsidian girl moves her crotch into a better position, arching her back with pleasure.
>Unfortunately this pulled her nipples out of your hands, your arms falling down under her more than ample chest.
>Running your hands down her body, you come across two large lumps, much too big to just be matted fur.
>Squeezing them, the wendigo bucks against you, something stiff poking into your palms.
>You quickly realized what you had found was a second pair of breasts, located under the first.
>You wonder for a moment how you could have missed another pair of tits that would be huge on a normal girl, but rationalize that you hadn't really been looking lower than her first pair.
>And well, thick, black on black fur doesn't exactly reveal a whole lot.
>Getting a feel for them, you massage the much more manageable breasts as Lusa grabs her larger ones, continuing where you left off.
>Unlike the nipples she was pinching, the wendigo's second pair were both smaller and more accessible, your head coming down to meet them.
>Immediately taking one into your mouth, you suck on it happily, the boob acting as a nice headrest as you hammer away at its owner.
>You flick the hard nub with your tongue, swirling around it and poking at it with your wet muscle.
>Not wanting to favor just one, you switch to the other, doing the same and nibbling on it gently.
>"Please give... SEED!" Lusa says laboriously, playing with her large nipples like you were with her smaller ones.
>You do feel yourself getting close again, but you were becoming exhausted, maintaining this speed and force was taking its toll.
>Giving her teat another suck, you're surprised when a creamy taste splashes your tongue.
>Pulling off of it, you see it had sprung a leak, spraying white milk over the rest of the dark breast.
>Curious, you latch back onto the first, giving it a few sucks before it too gives up its cream.
>Drinking greedily, you quench your thirst you had built up while Lusa pants and moans sluttily.
>Getting a second wind, you speed up your thrusts, determined to finish strong.
>Her pussy was so wet now that you were splashing your entire lower body every time you hilted, no doubt making a mess of the tarp below.
>Taking a leaky boob in each hand, you push up and brace yourself on them, noticing rivulets of milk trailing down the underside of her larger tits.
>They had begun to lactate as well, albeit with exponentially more volume, the wendigo still rubbing and squeezing her colossal tits with bliss.
>The sight put a fire in your chest, strengthening your thrusts further to really slam into her now, flinging her juices all over the place.
>Breathing heavily, you look down, streaks and pools of white coating the onyx fur everywhere, but concentrated mainly near her nipples and two more spots lower down.
>No way.
>Reaching to one of the spots, you realize your assumption was correct, the wendigo was in possession of ANOTHER set of breasts.
>While they were even smaller than her second pair, the tertiary tits were still larger than Iris', a more than healthy amount to grab onto.
>Squeezing the smaller boob in your hand, Lusa bucks hard, screaming with euphoria while her pussy squeezes your cock right back.
>Unfortunately unable to explore this newest development further, your own orgasm careens to the edge of no return.
>Driving yourself into the wendigo a few more shaky times, you bury yourself as deep as you could.
>"BREED... ME!!!"
>Wrapping her pillowy tree trunk thighs around you, Lusa leg locks you against herself securely, making sure the incoming seed got as far inside her as possible.
>Not letting her down, your cock throbs almost painfully with the load, blasting what felt like a gallon of white hot jizz into her depths with the first shot.
>*SHKREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHH*
>Before you know it, another follows right behind, sending your cum blasting into her blazing oven.
>Again and again you coat her walls, Lusa holding you close with her arms as you empty yourself into her.
>Several blissful seconds go by before your orgasm wanes, your head falling down between the wendigo's second pair of tits with a *plap*.
>Catching your breath, you look to the side, the other girls having recuperated somewhat.
>Amka appeared dazed, a dreamy look in her eyes while Iris was cradling her balls.
"Did we- *huff* learn our lesson?"
>Glaring at you, the unicorn pouts.
>"Thou art a b-bully!" Iris snivels though her tears.
>She then looks shamefully to the side, her voice getting quieter.
>"...Y-Yet I... I love it." She admits.
>Smiling, you watch as Amka rubs her crotch, still leaking your cum.
>"It's sure g-going to be hard to walk tomorrow..."
>Lusa moans agreeably above you.
>"Pussy... sore..."
>"Methinks they're bruised" Iris whimpers.
>You hug around the wendigo's waist, unable to move as she still had you locked tightly inside her with her legs.
>Which was fine, you didn't think your legs were up to the challenge anyway.
>"A-Anon if I may, I desire to t-touch myself once more." Iris asks shyly.
"You wanna cum again?"
>Nodding, the unicorn looks at her crotch.
>"I believe mine... cum hath medicinal properties we can use."
"Huh, interesting. Stroke away." You say, gesturing the jerk-off motion.
>Doing as she was told, Iris quietly thanks you as she starts masturbating.
>She wasn't very experienced in self love, but when Iris saw the three of you were watching her, she blushed and her horsecock started to dribble out drops of gleaming pre.
>"Hnnnn!"
>Grabbing one of her small breasts, Iris gently pinches the nipple, her cock throbbing.
>Moving that same hand in front of her tip, the equine seems to have a problem.
>"I-I require both hands, c-can someone assist me?"
>Scooting over behind the unicorn, Amka helps the mare to her hooves and whispers in her ear.
>"I'll have you squirting in no time Irisia, the bucks loved getting this from their does."
>Crouching between the unicorns legs, Amka spreads Iris' cheeks.
>N-Not mine special spot! 'Tis only for mine lover!"
>Bringing a hand to her crotch, Iris guards her flower, Amka looking undeterred.
>"Oh, I'm not going there."
>Pushing her snout into Iris' backside, Amka thrusts her tongue into the unicorn's backdoor.
>"O-Ohhhhhhh~"
>Iris' cock jumps at the sensation, a fresh glob of precum spurting out.
>Cupping her hands around her flare, Iris makes several squeaks and little moans as Amka eats her ass.
>Taking a wider stance, Iris pushes back into the doe, getting her tongue deepr inside.
>It soon proves too much for the mare, her flare bulging as she gets close.
>"I-I'm I-I- c-cuhm!~"
>Iridescent jizz splatters into Iris' small hands, the girl shaking in place.
>Threading an arm through the horse's legs, Amka strokes the spattering cock, milking it dry.
>"Ahnnnn!"
>Filling her hands, Iris overflows them just as her cum peters out, Amka wringing the last few drops from her cock.
>Looking like she was going to fall, Iris brings her shaking hands up to her face, letting a single tear fall into her cup of sparkling jizz.
>"T-Tis ready, I only hast to mix it."
>Bringing her lips to her thick drink, Iris slurps up all her cum she could, holding as much as possible in her mouth, drinking anything else that couldn't fit.
>Even though she just came, Iris' cock springs back to life, pulsating.
>Swishing the cum in her mouth, the unicorn staggers forward and turns around, gesturing for Amka to stand.
>Standing up with the mare, Amka is a little surprised when she's brought into a kiss, the two girls making out.
>You see Iris' puffed cheeks squish her gift, giving the reindeer a drink.
>Soon parting, Amka swallows her present, the girl's lips connected by a thin strand of shimmering cum.
>"Whoa..."
>Feeling over her tight stomach, Amka shivers, her fingers dipping into her pussy, leaking your cum and fresh fluids.
>"Ooh, tingly~"
>You sit up as best you could as Iris comes over to you and kneels down, her eyes closing as she puckers her mouth.
>Meeting her kiss, you poke through the unicorn's lips with your tongue, getting a taste for her.
>Her flavor was like creamy carbonated fruit mixed with the sensation you get from pop rocks, an odd but tasty combination.
>Giving you a portion of what was in her mouth, Iris tenderly licks your tongue with hers before parting the mouth hug.
>As you swallow, the strength Immediately comes back into your legs, a warm, pleasant feeling in your stomach radiating out into your extremities.
>As it hits your crotch, your cock instantly throbs all the way back to attention in the wendigo's pussy, making Lusa moan out a hiss.
>"Nghh... sensitive..."
>As Iris stands back up, you lick your lips.
"Wow, as weird as this sounds, I wouldn't mind having a whole bowl of that mixed with strawberries or peaches."
>"Mmm, me too~" Amka agrees, coming to rest on Lusa's side.
>Hearing your words, Iris' head turns red, a rosy blush exploding across the unicorn's face, her hands shooting over her eyes to hide her embarrassment.
>Smiling deviously, you adopt a thoughtful expression.
"We could probably even bottle and sell it for a decent profit, of course I'd need to buy some sort of milker for that..."
>Iris looks at you through her dripping fingers with wide eyes, her blush only deepening.
"What do you think about that Iris? You wanna be my little cum cow?"
>Grunting fearfully, Iris shakes her head rapidly side to side.
>"I'm not hearing a no..." Amka says cheekily, putting a hand to her mouth.
>Waving her hands desperately, the unicorn tries her best to communicate with her mouthful of cum.
>Laughing at the poor horse, you give her thigh a pat, noting her straining erection.
"We'll put that idea on the backburner, right now you have one more mouth to feed."
>Pointing up to Lusa, the unicorn follows your finger up to the hungry looking wendigo.
>Shivering, Iris takes a small step forward, and then another, the onyx anthro watching her with unblinking, searing eyes.
>The closer she got to the wendigo's face, the weaker her knees got, her legs threatening to give out as they wobbled.
>Once she got close enough, Lusa's jaw falls open, almost unhinging.
>Grabbing the smaller girl by the shoulder, Lusa brings her wide mouth over the unicorn's head.
>Screaming through her mouthful, Iris is helpless as she's enveloped by the bony skull.
>A long black tongue shoots out from the wendigo's mouth, penetrating past the unicorn's lips and cutting off the scream.
>"MMMH-GLG!"
>Iris's cheeks bulge as she takes in the wriggling appendage, the tongue slurping out the twinkling cum into its owner's maw grredily.
>You feel Lusa's pussy squeeze your cock, more hot juices coating you as she was revitalized.
>"MMMMmmmmmmnnnnn..."
>Scooping out the last drops, Lusa's tongue dives into the unicorn's throat, making her gag.
>"HURRG!"
>Iris' throat bulges as it's violated, the mare choking around the slimy black tentacle.
>Unable to stand any longer, Iris falls backwards, the tongue being yanked out as she hits the ground.
>The unicorn's equine cock flares when she lands on her back, shooting more glossy jizz into the air.
>Like a fountain Iris cums over herself, moaning whorishly.
>Little lines and stars of jizz land across her cream and gold skin, the unicorn smearing them over her body as she neighs.
>Watching the display, the wendigo opens her mouth again, her tongue slithering out of her mouth for another taste.
"That's enough, Lusa."
>Leaning back, the wendigo obeys, pulling her tongue back inside.
>Iris trembles on the ground for a moment before coming to her senses, looking over her glittery body with distress.
>"I-I didn't mean to!"
"I know. You're not in trouble Pixie Stick."
>Looking relieved, Iris shivers, the cum cooling over her body.
"Come here, I think it's well past time we got some rest."
>Turning her head to peer out of the cave into the dark woods, Amka yawns into a hand.
>"I agree."
>Even though your fatigue was mostly gone and your cock was still rock hard inside Lusa, you felt it was time to get a little shuteye before morning.
>Plus, the wendigo made it hard to do anything else since she still had you locked in place with her powerful thighs.
>Crawling over to the rest of you wearily, Iris climbs up onto Lusa's stomach and noses her way underneath your chest, laying on her back and wiggling her hips down as far as she could.
>Getting cozy, the mare lays back, her horn fitting in the huge anthro's cleavage neatly, her head next to yours.
>Misha was next, jumping up onto the wendigo's chest, turning a few times before curling up in Lusa's cleavage.
>"Hmf, I guess I get last pick huh?" Amka snorts, climbing up the cuddle pile.
>Straddling your back, the doe rests against you like a jetpack, her breasts pressing into your shoulders.
>"Bite me, thou didn't hast thy testicles flagellated." Retorts Iris, adjusting to the weight on top of her.
>As Amka lays on you, both of your combined weight presses down on Iris, squeezing her delicate and sticky body into yours, her flaccid cock squishing into your stomach.
>Fearing she might be smashed, you see that she only sinks further into Lusa's body, plenty of fat to keep you from crushing the unicorn completely.
>Leaning her head down to the unicorn's, Amka takes one of Iris' ears into her mouth and nibbles it.
>"AHhhnnn!"
>Iris moans as her ear is bitten, and you feel the mare's horsecock twitch against you, her nipples poking your chest as well.
>"I didst not mean literally!"
>Letting go of the equine's ear, Amka snuggles into you.
>"I know."
>"Why thou insolent..."
>Sighing, Iris wraps her arms around you.
>"Thou art lucky Anon's here or I'd grant thou SUCH a lashing."
>"Then I'm grateful he is here to protect me from your fury, noblest of equines."
>Playing with your hair, the reindeer nuzzles your neck while she spoons you.
>"Mmmnnn~ There's no deer alive that can compare to my buck~"
>"Thou mean MINE stallion." Iris corrects haughtily.
>Grumbling starts between the two girls, the herbivores glaring at each other.
>Before an argument can get started, the low purr of Lusa cuts them both off.
>"Our... stud~"
>Bringing her arms over you three, the wendigo hugs you loosely, her body heat plenty warm to guard against the cold outside.
>The two other girls make positive noises at the larger anthro's words, getting comfortable and closing their eyes.
>Patting Lusa's belly appreciatively, you do the same, letting sleep take you.
>You dream of a calm open tundra, snow blanketing the ground in all directions.
>"Something... comes..."
>A deep growl rouses you from your sleep, coming from the wendigo.
>Sitting up, Lusa lets you three down gently, Misha hopping down and scratching his neck.
>Your cock tastes cold air as it leaves the wendigo's warm insides, Iris and Amka holding onto you as the three of you sit on the tarp.
>"Be... back..." Lusa says, squeezing though the mouth of the cave into the early morning wilderness.
>"What's going on?" Amka asks, wrapping her toned legs around you two from behind.
>"Mmnn does not interest me, too early." Iris grumbles, nosing her snout into your chest.
"Lusa said there was something coming." You say with a yawn.
>"Hopefully with breakfast."
>Staring at where the wendigo left, you see the storm was still going, white snow blowing quickly past the entrance.
>Minutes pass with nothing happening, the three of you cuddling as Misha walks into the tent and lays down.
>Then you see a figure of someone in the snow, coming steadily towards you.
"Looks like we have company."
>Peering over your shoulder, Amka spots the figure as well.
>"Who would be out in a blizzard like this?"
>Rousing from her sleep, Iris turns in your grasp, looking outside.
>"How doth they know where we are?"
>Getting to the entrance to the bear den, the mysterious figure enters, covered with a thick cloak.
>Throwing it off with a flourish, the figure raises a blue sword in the air.
>"My beloved! I've come to rescue you!"
>A confident masculine voice greets your ears, making Iris turn around fully.
>"Jacques? W-What art thou doing here?"
>The figure was tall, almost as tall as you without the impressive set of antlers atop his head that gave him another two or so feet.
>Despite the horns, what stood before you was not a cervid but a hare, antlers stuck between his long ears.
>"That's right my dear, I've come!"
"A jackalope?"
>"A wolpertinger." Corrects the hare, pointing the end of his sword at you.
>"Tis the same thing." Iris sighs.
>"No it isn't!"
>Stomping a foot, the jackalope pouts.
>He was rather big and well muscled for a male anthro, though that was to be expected, wild males were usually larger than their domesticated counterparts.
>Eyeing the sword, you try and think of the fastest way to grab your gun from the tent.
>"Like I've said a million times before, a wolpentiger has wings,-"
>Extending a feathered wing from his back you hadn't seen, the hare continues.
>"antlers,-"
>Tapping his rack of horns with the sword, the hare then lowers it back down.
>"And fangs." He says, finishing by pointing to his elongated canines.
>"So I'm part hare, part pheasant, part deer, and part wolf." Jacques says proudly, counting each off on his fingers.
>What is this deviant art OC bullshit.
"Somebody really just hit the random button on the character creator with you, huh?"
>The wolpertinger narrows his eyes at you, realization coming to him.
>"A human? No wonder Erisanna didn't come back home, a foul ape has snared her."
>Leveling his sword back at you, the hare knits his brow.
>"W-Wait Jacques." Iris says, separating from you and Amka.
>"Y-Your n-nipples are out Irisa" Jacques says, turning his head with a blush, the tip of his cock poking out of its sheath.
>Looking down, Iris yelps before covering her chest.
>"You exposed yourself to a human? Before me?" The hare says, looking at you with anger.
>Amka grips your chest tightly, staying quiet.
>"I know what's going on here."
>"T-Thou dost?"
>Turning his gaze to Iris, the hare snaps.
>"Do you think I'm stupid?"
>"Um, 'tis not what it looks like?" Iris says weakly.
>"He's obviously brainwashed and taken advantage of you!"
>"W-Wha-"
>The jackalope's cock surges a few inches out of its pocket against its owners will, much to the hare's displeasure.
>"Tell me, did he take your sanctity?!"
"No, but I've been everywhere else, man is she tight." You butt in, smirking.
>Grimacing, the hare's tapered cock pops free of his sheath entirely, the knot at the bottom bulging.
>Oh so he's part wolf there too, neat.
>He was noticeably longer than Iris was, but not quite as girthy as her horsecock.
>Stepping forward, the jackalope doesn't notice the large foreboding shadow silently appearing in the entrance behind him.
>Raising his sword that appeared to be a blade made from ice above his head, Jacques looks down at you with disgust and bares his fangs.
>"I will save lady Erisanna from you beast, her purity shall not be yours to-"
>Feeling something grab his sword, the hare looks back to see the wendigo crouched right behind him, letting out a bone chilling growl.
>Shattering the sword in her claws, Lusa lunges at the bunny, making him scream and jump back behind Iris for protection.
>"Mine savior." The unicorn says flatly.
>Raising a hand, you calm the angry wendigo, who looked at the wolpertinger like a pitbull would at a class of preschoolers.
"Easy Lusa."
>Still hiding behind the annoyed unicorn, Jacques' voice was filled with fear.
>"The human has a pet demon?!"
>Steeling himself, the hare picks up Iris with a *hup* and backs into a wall.
>"Forgive me Irisia, I wanted to save this for our wedding night but I have no choice but to use it now!"
>Pressing the unicorn's horn to his head, Jacques looks at you.
>"I hate to use this to defeat the demon and it's master, but there's no other way!"
>Oh shit he was going to use a wish.
"Even with her magic you'd last all of two seconds." You bluff, not quite sure what it was actually capable of.
>"O-Oh yeah? I'll show you!"
>Hopefully he doesn't wish for anything too painful.
>"Irisia, heed my wish, I ask for a body that can take everything the human has!"
>A determined look covers Jacques' face as he continues.
>"Something that can be thrust upon over and over, no matter how large and hard the weapon it may be."
>"A build perfect for taking shot after shot and keep coming, quick as lightning."
>"And... make it look appealing as well, I don't want to end up a monster myself... u-um this is what I wish!"
>Smiling victoriously, the hare looked like he'd already won.
>"Granted."
>Jacques stood up confidently as we all stared at him, wondering just what sort of change would occur.
>He carefully placed Iris to his side while brandishing what little remained of his sword, a dull chip of metal and a fancy hilt.
>“Now foul human, tremble in fear as I become your undoing!” He boldly proclaimed.
>“Ahh yes! I can feel your magic flowing through me, my sweet!”
>Iris stood staring at him with what looked like exasperated confusion.
>Clearly, she’d been dealing with this guy’s theatrics for some time.
>It was then that the changes began to take form.
>I’d taken a defensive stance preparing myself for the worst, but as the changes began to become clear, that no longer seemed necessary.
>His broad shoulders began to taper inwards, and his whole frame began to shrink.
>At the outset, he was a good couple inches taller than me, but soon we were about eye to eye.
>His rough, coarser fur began to soften to a much smoother pelt.
>“Haah…” he breathed deeply, as his whole body adjusted. >His decently defined chest softened as his nipples began to swell, turning pert and puffy.
>Not enough to even fill your hand, but enough to stand out.
>the muscle definition across his body began to subtly plump up with fat,
>with his narrow hips flaring out.
>His thighs thickened as well, to the point where he rivaled Iris herself.
>But the biggest change was his penis.
>It was hard not to notice the erection he was still sporting. But with each little throb, it got smaller.
>When it seemed as though the transformation was complete, it had shrunk so much Lusa’s clitoris would put it to shame.
>Even his cocky smirk shifted into something more akin to that of a bratty pout.
>“Hmm. T-This is uh…not quite what I expected, however,” he began; his voice having undergone a change as well.
>What bass there was is now completely gone, and he sounded positively feminine in every way.
>This seemed to catch him off guard, but he tried again, putting on his best tough guy voice and taking a fighting stance.
>“HOWEVER!! Tremble before my new and improved form, for it will be the last thing you see before I send you running!”
>Amka looked upon the scene with mild amusement, while Lusa just stared at us aimlessly.
>By now, Iris’ head was buried in her hands, probably out of embarrassment.
>While he might have posed some threat before, now he looked no different than a chick without a chest. Sad really.
>“Have at thee!” he said, going in for a lunge with his busted sword.
>I effortlessly sidestep it, and with a casual swipe of my hand, knock it clean out of his grip sending it scattering to the cave floor.
>“Tch!” he mumbled, before taking another swing at me.
>I throw my hand up to block it, and it lands with almost zero force.
>I couldn’t help but let out a snicker, which seemed to piss him off even more.
>“Jacques…” Iris moaned, clearly irritated.
>But he paid her no mind continuing his “assault”.
>His form was gone now, as he threw feeble haymaker one after the other.
>I swatted them away like I was play-fighting with my little sister, before catching both his hands and drawing them to our sides, leaning in close.
>That cocky ego deflated like a balloon.
>“I-I-Irisia!” He mewled pathetically, trying his hardest to break free.
>“Alright, alright, please, both of thou, cease with thine tomfoolery!” Iris spoke, walking up to us.
>“Please, Anon. Stay thine hand.” she beckoned to me.
>After shooting lover boy a smug grin of my own, I released my grip as he stumbled back.
>“Hmpf! Tougher than you look, it seems…”
“Alright Iris, just who is this tool?” I ask disinterested.
>Before Iris can speak, he chimes in
>“Fool! You shouldn’t speak to the lady of the forest in such a casual manner!” He shouts boldly before continuing.
>“I am Jacques de la François, Noble Warrior of the House Blackwood, Heir to the Fae Fountain Merlot, and betrothed to Lady Irisia Erisanna!”
>Ugh. I could feel my eyes glazing over.
>Iris awkwardly walks over to him and gives a half-hearted gesture.
>“Yes, this…is my dear betrothed for whom I am to be wed.”
“Really? This guy?” I remark, mildly surprised.
>“Yes, truly” He interjects again. He turns to Iris before falling on his knee and taking her hand in his
>“Dearest Erisanna, the fae creatures grew worried when you didn’t return from your afternoon stroll and made mention of a forest wraith stalking about the nearby woods, so I waited not a moment more before coming to find you.”
>“My deepest thanks, darling.” Iris started, gesturing for him to rise. “It was a tumultuous time to be certain, however I suppose…thou could say I had been taken care of already, thanks to Anon.” She said, coming to my side and wrapping my arm in hers.
>Oh, the seething on Lover Boy’s face.
>“Is that so…” he muttered sullenly before glancing around the room. “…And you all are?”
>After the introductions had been made and the situation explained, we took a moment to get properly clothed.
>Jacques had brought some spare pasties and what could only be described as a thong for Iris to wear, but she seemed grateful all the same.
>Guess mythicals aren’t big on clothes.
>Then, the question was eventually raised about what to do next.
>“Well,” Amka started, using what tools she had brought with her to jerryrig a loincloth out of her old torn skirt.
>“My tribe’s not too far from here. I think I’ll take Lusa with me. There are some nearby unclaimed hunting grounds that we intended to use but, provided Lusa only kills what is necessary, I think I might be able to convince my village elders to share them with her.”
>Lusa was in her own world, playing with Misha in a corner of the cave.
>“Well, I know the fae kingdom will be ever grateful to not have to worry about the ravenous spirit going forwards.” Iris said cheerfully. “Isn’t that right, dear?”
>She and Jacques were snuggled up to one another as we sat and talked.
>“Yes yes, it all sounds very lovely. But we should get going now, my sweet. Everyone is worried sick about you.”
>Iris seemed saddened at the news, but when she spoke, it wasn’t for the reason I suspected
>“Ah, of course. It appears our fated encounter must end, Anon.”
>Well now hold on a minute.
>“Yeah, it’s been a truly interesting time,” Amka remarked “And the neighboring tribes will be indebted to you many moons, but I should be returning home as well. You should too.”
>“But Amka,” I started. “I thought we had a good thing goin’ on.”
>I take her hand and pull her close, and she snuggles into me before giving me a soft kiss.
>“We do. And I loved every minute of it…but with this new body Iris’s power gifted me, I could become one of the best hunters in my tribe! It’s been a dream of mine!” she said, placing her hand gently on my chest. >“But please, don’t be a stranger. Me and mine will welcome you with open arms anytime for a visit.”
>I let out a sigh. Maybe this was as good as it gets. I got to fuck way more chicks out in the frozen backwoods of [Northern Region] than most men would have a chance.
>I’m outta food, my rifle’s busted, and sleeping on the ground blows.
>…Nah, fuck that. I took a good look around the room at all the sexually ripe bodies that I’d still wanted to ravage and felt an overwhelming sense of conquest wash over me.
>That, and a decent chub.
>I didn’t almost die out here just to NOT get my anthro sex pet, dammit. >C’mon brain, think!
“Right, got it.” I said nonchalantly. “Buuut before we all part ways, I figure it’d be a shame to not celebrate the good fortune of our meeting, don’t ya think?”
>“Hmm…so a sort of departure festival?” Amka chided, poking my chest.
“Aaand to celebrate the domestication of our dear sweet Lusa!” I exclaim, gesturing towards her “Who just days before was ready to kill us all, now look at her!”
>She’d made her way into my cooking supplies and begun hanging utensils off her antlers while Misha hopped around her barking at the spectacle.
>She looked over with a clatter of silverware before raising a claw.
>“Oh gods above…” Amka said, before stepping away to fix the mess she was making.
>“Mmm, well, that all sounds terribly charming,” Jacques started, standing up with Iris. “But WE should really get going!”
>Iris broke away from his embrace and turned to him.
>“Well, now, wait a moment.” she said excitedly. “Darling, thou know how I’ve always dreamed of partaking in a human festivity!”
>Jacques looked annoyed at the reaction but tried his best to hide it. “Is now really the best time? Is THIS worth celebrating? With the beast who tried to harm you and the human who defiled you?”
>Iris scampered away from him to embrace me, wrapping her arms around my neck before turning back to him.
>“Ultimately, Anon saved my life, and for that, I shall be eternally grateful. Besides…it is the nature of us fae to forgive the transgressions of the unpure!”
>Smugly, I place my own arm around Iris’s dainty waist, shrug my shoulders while smirking at him
“Yeah man, I’m just a simple human. When I see a prime piece of ass” I said, smacking Iris on the cheek before getting a good handful. “I can’t help myself.”
>Iris yelped at the action, before breaking into a giggle.
>“Goodness…thou are truly reprehensible at times, though.” She chastised me but didn’t sound upset in the slightest.
>Jacques certainly looked livid at the sight but turned his head away in embarrassment.
>At the time, however, I’d noticed his cock throbbing ever so slightly in its sheath.
>“Irisia, you know I’d do anything to make you happy.” He mumbled. Iris broke away from me to give him a hug. “But I intend to stay until you’ve had your fill. Then we leave, yes?”
>“Oh, thank you my darling!” She exclaimed.
“Nice! So, it’s settled.” I said triumphantly.
>Alright. I’ve got one more night to seal the deal with at least one of these babes.
>But it’s gonna be hard to put the moves on the girls while bitch-boy is around.
“Amka, is your village far?” I ask.
>She was sitting on Lusa’s shoulders while laying on her horns, with Misha sitting in Lusa’s lap.
>“Not from here. An effortless sprint for me.” She said with some confidence.
“Perfect. You guys got booze or alcohol or firewater, or whatever you call it, right? I’ll make you a deal. You can have my two hunting traps in exchange for as much as you can bring back.”
>She perks up at the notion.
>“Ah, a fine deal indeed! Not like I need an excuse to imbibe the sinner’s swill! Come Misha! We’ll be back before sunset.”
>And with that, she deftly collected her things and her pet, along with my remaining traps, and took off for her village.
“Now…what to do for food…” I mused aloud before Iris eagerly raised her hand.
>“Oh, allow me!” She said cheerfully. “If I am not mistaken, there’s a hidden enchanted grove not far from here where the most delectable fruit and berries continue to grow year round, untouched by the ravages of nature, nor the foot of man or beast!”
“Neat. Wanna grab some snacks for the party?” I suggest.
>“Oh I would be delighted!” She said, making haste to leave the cave.
>“A-Allow me to accompany you, my sweet!” Jacques said quickly, beginning to follow her, before I stepped between the two of them.
“Hold your horses, there, Animal Farm. I need someone to help me collect firewood and fresh water.”
>“I don’t intend to let my betrothed go alone!” he said, poking me in the chest.
>I snap my fingers and whistle before calling out.
“Yo, Skull and Boobs, time to earn your keep!”
>Lusa comes lumbering over from the back of the cave, looming over us both as Jacques stumbles backwards.
>I gesture to Iris, now standing at the entrance to the cave.
“Go with the pretty lady. If anyone or anything tries to harm her, give ‘em the ‘ol 'SKKREEAHH!', got it?”
>Lusa gives me what I can only assume is some manner of toothy grin before nodding and walking off.
>“You think I’ll sit idly by while you send my beloved off with the same creature who tried to take her head just a moon ago?” Jacques said, astonished.
>“I-It is fine, my dear.” Iris replied in my stead. “She means me no harm. Now, anyways. But more importantly I’d like thou to go with Anon.”
>“B-But Irisia!” Jacques stutters before Iris bounds over and places a finger on his lips.
>“Please, Jacques? I promise, if thou let Anon in, difficult though it may be, you would be quite surprised by how much thou likes him.”
>Being the total pushover he apparently is, he relents to her requests yet again.
>“Just be careful my, dear. I don’t trust it. And I certainly don’t trust him” he said, craning his neck in my direction.
>“Don’t worry, I’ll be Fi-yiipe!” Iris lets out a little squeak as Lusa picks her up like a doll and lumbers out of the cave with her.
>“Unbelievable…” Jacques stammers, before regaining his composure.
>I heft my pack onto my shoulders before grabbing Jacques and pulling us shoulder to shoulder.
>“C’mon Jacques,” I say slyly. “Let’s take a walk.”
>The sun had risen in the sky nicely, cutting through the cool air with it’s warm rays. >The heavy snowfall from last night had already melted a fair amount, and I felt comfortable enough wearing a simple layer of clothing as me and Jacques made our way to a nearby stream for fresh water and firewood.
>I attempted to make small talk on the way to a nearby waterfall where we could collect plenty of fresh water, but all Jacques wanted to do was either talk shit or wax on about Iris.
>It got old fast, but we made it to the waterfall even faster. It was small, sitting in a nice clearing as it steadily gave way to a small river that ran out through the forest
>“It’s Lady Erisanna’s only flaw, really,” He said wistfully, continuing to rave about her while picking up another piece of wood.
>“She’s too trusting. Which explains why she humors you. You’re merely the first human she’s encountered, so she’s marveled by you the way a babe would be enamored with a toy”
>I ignored him, trying to focus on getting the water while he continued to monologue.
>“But I’m sure she’s still processing your callous acts and will grow disenchanted with you soon enough. And when that time comes, she will come running into my arms, where she belongs.” He said, dreamily hugging himself.
>This fucking guy.
“Well,” I start “Let’s look at the facts, Romeo. I fucked her once already. I’m pretty sure I could do it again. She’s a real masochist too. Should have heard the way she was moaning when I gave her little coin purse a good squeeze.”
>Jacques dropped the load he was carrying with a huff.
>I looked up from the water container I was handling to quite a sight. Jacques was hunched over slightly, covering his crotch while his wings fluttered behind him.
>'Hmm. Now that’s a strong reaction.' I thought.
>He awkwardly bent over while continuing to try and hide himself, and I couldn’t help but test him.
“Oh I’m sorry. That was rude of me. To be clear, I only fucked her mouth and asshole. I haven’t touched her pussy…yet”
>Again, he let out a whimper. But it sounded closer to arousal than frustration.
>I put down the water container and started to approach Jacques, who was too caught up in his own dirty thoughts to notice.
>Once he finally did acknowledge me, he began backing away, looking around nervously.
>“A-All you’ve done is warp her mind with your filthy human tricks and wiles.” He stammered. “True love will win the day!”
>I continued walking towards him until he backed himself into a tree.
>The only sounds around us were the gentle splash of the river nearby.
>At this point, we were inches apart from one another.
>I leaned past him and spoke softly.
“Ya know, when I kissed Irisia for the first time…it tasted damn sweet. But not nearly as sweet as those frothy love juices from that slutty cock of hers.”
>He let out a soft groan, and I with a slight glance downwards, I could see his cock poking out of its sheathe and straight up.
>Looks like I have this guy pegged right off the bat.
“He-hey man, what’s this?” I say coyly, placing a hand on his throbbing member. He recoiled again at my touch.
>“Human! J-Just where do you think you’re touching me?!” He started, but I gave his shaft a good squeeze before rubbing it lightly.
>He threw his arms up to try and push me away, but he was shaking all the same.
“This is pretty weird, you know” I continued teasing him. “Not too many guys would get hard, hearin’ about how their wife-to-be fooled around with another guy.” >Seemed like his cock had gotten as hard as it could manage, being just enough to fit in my hand.
>Dude’s aren’t really my type.
>But as I looked at him with his tiny, trembling frame, and his fluttering eyes that seemed on the verge of tears, I felt a carnal hunger in my gut.
“But hey, I’m a nice guy once you get to know me, really.” I go on, carefully caressing his member not unlike I would my own. “I’m willin’ to help you out, Jacques. ‘Cause you seem like an honest fella.”
>“W-What help…could I possibly need from the likes of you…” he mumbled again, his breathing growing heavier.
>He’d given up on trying to push me off, and now simply held the tree to keep him standing as I handled his cock

“Well, I’ve already fucked your fiancé, and given that I took her first kiss,” I talk slowly, now tracing my hands up his soft belly and over his puffy nipples. “I take it you’re both virgins?”
>“O-Of course…we agreed to save our chastity until our wedding night” he said softly.
“Well, I’ve got plenty of experience in the area of lovemaking. Especially with Iris. I already know what she likes and dislikes. And I’d be willin' to teach you all about how to properly please her, no catch.”
>“…Really?” He says skeptically.
“Really really.” I reply casually.
>“Just what do you have in mind?”
>My hand traces his neck, briefly stopping at caressing his face, before I reach up and grab his antler.
>With the slightest effort I begin pulling him downwards.
>“H-Hey!” he shouts, before he buckles to his knees.
>Using my free hand, I pull down my trousers revealing my half-mast cock to the cool morning air
>“Graces above!” He whispers, unable to take his eyes off it. “W-What is it you want me to do?”
>I take the base of my cock and lift it, so it lands right between his eyes, still getting hard as I look at him.
“Iris has got one of these, right? Now’s a great time to get familiar with one, intimately.”
>His hands shakily reached up to take my shaft and I felt the cool grip of his pads against my skin
>“This stench is ghastly” he huffed, his nose twitching furiously as he massaged my shaft “Do humans have bathing rituals?”
“Ahh, you got me there, haven’t been able to shower properly since I’ve been out here.” I replied. “But embrace it. For Iris’s sake.”
>I made sure to rub my head against his soft furry cheeks as he glared up at me.
“C’mon now. Show it some love.” I began pressing it towards his lips.
>He closed his eyes in frustration as the tip made contact. They were surprisingly soft.
“Atta boy! Now there’s YOUR first kiss! A human’s cock! I bet Iris’d be jealous!” I teased him, taking a moment to smear my own pre cum on his lips
>“Ugh…how d-degrading!” He whimpered. “How…could she ever take this monstruous thing in her mouth...?”
“Juuust like this. Say ‘aah’” I instructed, using my thumb to wedge his mouth open.
>His warm breath hit the tip of my dick, which now surged to max hardness, and Jacques’ eyes shot open.
>He tried pulling his head back, whimpering even more, but I held him in place with his horn, as I popped the head into his warm mouth.
“There we go…” I sighed with pleasure. “Mind the teeth, by the way.”
>I could still feel him struggling, his hands pushing against my legs, but I held him firm.
“Focus, Lover Boy. Use that tongue of yours. Savor it like it were hers.”
>I could feel him exhale from his nose, before he began suckling.
>It was a new sensation for sure.
>He carefully poked and prodded the tip of my dick with his tongue, as I slowly thrust it into his mouth, rubbing it against the slimy insides of his cheek.
>His hands slowly relaxed, before coming to grip my shaft again and I pulled my cock out.
“You’re doin’ great, man. You suck dick like you were born to it!” I praised him.
>Upon hearing that, his demeanor softened
>“A-As if that sort of praise would make me feel good!” He spoke with some of that old confidence in his wispy voice.
>“Is that all it takes to bring a human to submission, a little oral stimulus?”
>Still too confident for his own good, seems.
“Think so?” I challenged before poking at his lips again.
>They gave way with far less resistance now, and I continued pushing forwards.
>Jacques breathing got panicked as he’d realized my intention.
>He tried pulling back again, but I took both his antlers with a handlebar grip and sunk my cock deep into the bowels of his throat.
>He wretched and gagged as I felt his throat muscles contract around my shaft.
>I basically almost doubled over from the tight sensation.
>He tugged at the bottom of my winter coat to get some leeway, and I pulled back.
>Just enough to start the throat fucking.
>Twisting his head around like it was my plaything, he slobbered and coughed with a glorious “glurk” noise as I buried his still twitching nose in my pubes.
>His slobber began running down my nuts as they slapped into the bottom of his chin with each motion.
>It didn’t take much of this before I felt the tell-tale tingling in my balls as they contracted.
“Alright Jacques. Lesson number two! Don’t...spill...a drop!”
>“Mhmm?!” He moaned on my cock in confusion.
>The pleasure came in waves, and right at the peak, I barreled down as deep as I could.
>Surge after surge of jizz spewed forth, going straight into his stomach.
>He reflexively gagged as it coated his throat, and I took a deep breath to enjoy the post-nut bliss.
>I let out another deep sigh, slowly withdrawing my cock from his mess of a mouth.
>The ropes of cum continued even then, and I lingered but a moment until the last spurts filled his mouth.
>I knelt slightly to cup his chin, making sure to pinch his lips shut, as his cheeks bulged ever so slightly with the remnants of my ejaculation.
>This once “proud warrior” Jacques was now sniffling in the snow, tears, spit, and cum running down his face.
“Alright, now swish it around” I goaded him. “And let me have a look.”
>Jacques’ was trembling as he resisted the urge to spit it up and began gargling.
>He opens his mouth just enough, the warmth from the inside letting loose several puffs of water vapor in the cool air.
>His cheeks were filled with the creamy, off-white substance, a stray pube floating here and there.
“Good boy! Now swallow.” I ordered.
>He took a couple of deep breaths through his nose, before finally closing his mouth again.
>He shut his eyes and clearly grit his teeth, but after a moment, gulped it down. >Eventually he opened his mouth again to cough but didn’t drip a thing.
>“Inconsiderate! Uncouth! Bastard!” he began shouting, beating my thigh softly with clenched fists.
>“Of all the indignities I’ve ever suffered! So vicious and putrid! I can still taste it even now!”
>Aww.
“Jeez Jacques, calm down. You did great!” I said, helping him up. “And you looked so cute, I couldn’t help myself.”
>He was focused on cleaning up all the body fluids smeared on his fur when he froze.
>“C-Cute…as if that’d make me happy!” he spat, but his wings fluttered ever so slightly with my remark.
“Jeez, you’re still not being honest with yourself,” I said, pointing downwards. His little cock was stiff throughout the whole ordeal, trickling precum like a leaky faucet.
>“Wha-? I don’t…” he began before trailing off, shuffling awkwardly.
>But while the fire in my gut waned, it still burned all the same.
>And I still had holes in need of instruction before me.
>Nearby, I happened to notice a stump covered with some rather soft-looking evergreen brush. 'That’ll do just fine,' I thought
“C’mon, sweet cheeks. I ain’t done teachin’ you yet!” I said, stepping out of my pants and taking his hand in mine.
>“Oh I think I’ve learned QUITE enough for one day, thank you!” He said, trying and failing to pull himself away before ultimately getting dragged along.
“Don’t worry!” I continued. “This part you’ll enjoy, you’ve got my word.”
>“As if that had any value,” he said dryly, but I ignored his complaints before bending him over the stump so his ass stuck out towards me.
>It was a shapely thing, far plumper than guy’s ass should be.
>But I guess I have Iris’ oh so reliable wish-granting to thank for that.
>I took two firm handfuls and began to squeeze it as Jacques yelped in surprise
>“And just WHAT do you think you’re doing now!” he exclaimed. “Unhand me at once!”
>But I paid him no mind.
>Carefully prying apart his tender ass exposed a surprisingly plump asshole, with a delicate, fuzzy pair of nuts below, and a throbbing knotted cock below that, dripping pre-cum down the back of his thighs.
“Well how about that!” I remarked.
>“Y-You do realize that I wish to…TAKE Lady Irisia, not BE TAKEN, r-right?” He shouts back at me nervously.
>I fished into my jacket pocket to retrieve my special teaching aid.
>A little All-Purpose Aloe Vera Lotion.
>Keeps the hands moisturized and soft for those cold winter months.
>I pop off the top and smear a generous portion on one hand, using the other to carefully split his cheeks.
“Before you can give, you gotta learn to receive. This might feel a little uncomfortable, but bear with me, mighty warrior.” I warned him, carefully tracing his puckering donut with the gooey substance.
>“Gyaah!” He moaned “What IS that?” His knees lurched forwards at the sensation.
“Just getting you ready for a little…training exercise.” I reply, licking my lips.
>I poke and prod gently until I slip the tip of a finger inside
>“Oohh” he moaned, before catching himself “H-Hey! Cease this blasphemy immediately! I-I don’t want the training anymore!”
>I continue regardless, plunging the finger deeper still.
>The intense heat of his body envelopes me by each knuckle as I feel his anus contracting, not sure if it wants to welcome or exile the foreign invader.
>I make sure to gently rub the soft inner walls, and I hear Jacques struggling to maintain steady breathing
>“What…what is this? Feels so…weird…”he manages to mumble.
>No more complaints? Then let’s speed things along.
>I poke another lubed-up finger at the entrance, pushing in and eliciting another moan from Jacques, now having fully fallen over onto the stump.
>I tease his asshole thoroughly, prying it and twisting around.
>I slip in another finger, and another.
>Jacques grips the brush letting out more girlish moans, his voice ringing out among the trees.
>Eventually he relaxes enough that I’ve got 4 fingers sloshing in and out of his shimmering asshole at a breakneck pace.
>Lotion spurts out with each thrust, and his knot seems painfully engorged, the slow drip of pre-cum now a proper piss.
>After a solid minute of priming his shitter, I purposefully focus on massaging right around the place where his prostate would be.
>Daddy’s gonna milk him a wolpertinger.
>“S-Stop you accursed human!” He slurs, “This isn’t wh-what I wanted! Some-something’s happening! I can’t-“
>But his words fail him.
>His thighs tremble and his asscheeks clinch, wrapping my hand in their warm embrace as he begins spurting out his cum in thick ropes along the base of the stump.
>“Ahh! Haah!?” Jacques lets out even more sweet moans, experiencing his first anal orgasm.
>I slowly pull out my hand, his asshole now an engorged, dripping mess.
>Jacques’ breathing is in shambles as he lay on the stump in post-orgasmic bliss.
>With this bow-legged slut laying there, presenting a fresh hole to enjoy, I felt engulfed in the flames of lust.
>Pre-game’s over.
>My own dick was raging and ready to go, so with haste I smeared some lotion all over the shaft and framed myself behind Jacques.
>His head was laying on the stump, but he felt my presence looming over him and looked back with fear
>“W-Wait!” He yells “What do you think you’re doing with that thing now?! I’m not some harlot wishing to be bed! I-I’ve had enough now, so…so let us collect our things and-“
>Without waiting for him to finish his statement, I drive my cock forwards.
>The squishy donut makes the most wonderous squelching sound as it swallows me whole
“Shut the hell up already!” I finally yell out
>“Nyaahh?!” He shrieks, hefting himself up now fully alert.
>I bite my bottom lip, feeling his insides wrapping around my length.
>His body heat had warmed the lotion up to the perfect temp and I squeezed his cheeks gratefully, savoring the moment.
>“Sooo…big…I-It hurts!” He squeaked out.
“Man, that’s disappointing.” I whisper, “You’ve been talking such a big game this whole time, but you fold like a bitch all the same, huh?”
>“T-Take it out! It feels too weird!” he cries.
>I begin pulling it out slowly and his rapid breathing starts to slow, before slamming it back down, forcing him to hold on to the stump or fall over.
“No chance, Lover boy. This is a valuable lesson I’m imparting, so be grateful!” I shout, reaming his ass again.
>“Gaahn! Nyooh!” He wails, head tucked into the brush.
>I sawed in and out of his puckering asshole, our bodies colliding together forcefully as I controlled the pace.
>My hands moved from his ass to his hips, and I thrust deeper.
>I paused for a moment, tearing off my winter coat and thermal shirt, as I began working up a sweat despite the crisp air.
>My hands snaked up his delicate back past his wings until I made it to his shoulders, and I increased the pace again.
>“Ohh! It’s soo deep! It’s way too deep! I can feel you…inside me!” he moans,
>Finally, I made my way to his antlers, pulling him back into my chest in an embrace.
>His fur was thicker than the girls, making for a comfortable body to hold tight as I plumbed his depths.
>From this angle, I knew I was crushing his prostate with each stroke, his cries giving way to far sluttier moans than before.
>With the amount of heat we were generating, water vapor began to rise in wispy layers off our melded bodies.
“Hey!” I whisper in his ear, “You still with me, Lover Boy? This is a sort of pleasure…only females can enjoy…so engrave these feelings into your brain! Pay attention, dammit!”
>“I am! I swear I am!” he slurred again; his brain being wracked by dopamine.
>His own cock flopped about helplessly whipping watery cum all over the ground, and with each pump, his soft little tummy bulged out just a tad.
>My cock was buried in this bunny’s heart and soul.
>I ran my hands over his nipples, now puffy mounds upon his soft chest and pinched them between my knuckles.
>Without even realizing it, he’d begun reciprocating my thrusts, matching my rhythm.
>After all this stimulation, I couldn’t hold out anymore.
“Alright! Time for my final lesson,” I hiss. “When breeding a bitch, blow your load right in their guts to mark them as yours properly!
>“Nyooh! P-p-pleashe!” he pleaded between gasps of air. “I-I’m not a ‘b-bitch’! I belong… to Lady Iris! I cannot…be your bitch!”
>Despite saying that, he unconsciously wriggled his hips as I buried myself to the hilt in his ass.
>It hit me like a roaring wave.
>I flipped his arms above his head, locking him into a full nelson, as I came.
>I pressed into him hard, feeling my balls drain in his vice of an anus.
>“Aaahhh!” Jacques screamed, firing off his own impressive ropes of semen, spattering against the stump.
>Our bodies tensed up as I held him there against me, feeling the beat of his heart against my chest.
>His own, fresh pine needle-esque musk blended with mine as we stayed connected.
>Without another word, I slowly loosened my grip as his arms slumped to his sides.
>I slowly pulled out of his now beat-up and swollen asshole.
>It hugged my head tightly one last time before gaping open.
>Not a second later, rivulets of my spunk begin gurgling back out, running down his nuts and thighs before falling softly onto the fresh snow.
>Jacques propped himself up on the stump now, the only thing to be heard being his soft breathing and the sound of water falling upon the rocks in the stream.
>After a minute of silence, I couldn’t help myself.
“So…Lover Boy. Did you uh…did you get all that?”
>He looked back at me with a rather strange expression.
>As if he were pissed, but in a sort of trance, all at once.
>Then he looked forwards again before finally straightening up.
>“…s-sloppy.” He mumbled.
“What?”
>“You, human. You and that so called…t-training.” He continued. “It was crude and sloppy.”
“…Uh, I’m afraid you’ve lost me.”
>He hesitates a moment before speaking
>“Just how am I supposed to learn…how to properly mate and breed a bitch…with such a rushed, sloppy technique?”
>Is this guy seriously…critiquing my form or some shit?
>Then in one fluid motion, Jacques leans over the stump again, propping up one leg so his soft cock swings freely in the wind.
>Using a hand to pry apart his cheeks, he exposed his still partially gapped donut to me in an incredibly sensual display.
>Even though I’d already cum twice, I could feel the blood boiling in my veins again.
>Then, Jacques coyly craned his head back to me and spoke.
>“We’ve still got some time…before the girls return to your hovel for this celebration of yours…so until then…teach me properly this time.” He says seductively.
>“F-For Irisia’s sake, of course.”
>I couldn’t help but let out a chuckle.
“Ah, of course…my bad, man. Let’s start from the top. For Iris’s sake.”
>Me and Jacques got far more acquainted with one another during our “private lesson”.
>Though he still had his haughty, indignant attitude, it seems I’d rubbed off on him a little.
>And rubbed off in him a lot more.
>After we’d finished our “remedial lesson”, we washed off in the waterfall. >Coldest damn shower ever.
>After drying off, we gathered up what water and firewood we’d managed to find and quickly began our trip back.
>The sun had already begun to sink in the sky.
>When we got back to the cave, Misha came bounding out to greet us, letting us know that Amka was back already.
>When we stepped inside, I was surprised.
>Amka was over by my tent using my cooking supplies to prepare something, while Lusa hovered over her, eyes laser focused on the pot and drool clearly pouring out the bottom of her jaw.
>The cave had been completely decked out, with various branches and foliage woven into decorations and mounted into the craigs of the cave walls.
>Among these were some otherworldly looking flowers that gave off a iridescent, blue glow, helping lighten up the space far better than my rinky-dink lantern.
>Iris was off in a corner, putting up more decorations.
>Girl is ready to party.
>Iris took a moment to step back and admire her work when she saw us.
>“Oh!” She exclaimed! “Anon! Jacques! Thou hath finally returned from thine trip! Wonderful!”
>She scampered over.
>Jacques confidently opened his arms for a hug, but she breezed past him and collided into me, thankfully careful to mind the 12 inch horn in her skull.
>Even now Jacques groaned as he stared at us with envy like something out of a bad sitcom.
>“Seriously,” Amka chimed in from the corner, continuing to stir whatever she’d been making.
>“I was about to send Lusa to go find you guys. As if you hadn’t been hunted enough these past couple days.”
>“Was everything alright?” Iris asks us both “Thine were away for some time. Did thou manage to get along decently enough?”
>Jacques and I look at one another, and he averts his gaze, noticeably blushing.
>“Hmm. Well, while I’m not as captivated by the crude nature of humans as you are, my sweet” Jacques started “I suppose…there may yet be things to be learned from them…”
.Oh, the shit eating grin on my face was truly a Kodak moment.
>I slap Jacques on the back firmly and chuckle
“Yeah!” I say in response, my hand slowly drifting down the small of Jacques back as I speak.
>It subtly trails its way past his tail down to his awaiting asshole, worming a finger into his now pliant, puffy pussy right in front of his fiancé.
>He tenses up briefly at the intrusion, before hiding his reaction with an awkward smile.
“But the time for learnin’ has passed. Now, let’s get this party started!”

>Lure in adventurers with the promise of gold and riches if they defeat your dungeon
>get tons of dumbfuck "adventurers" that fell for the dungeon meme
>actually good adventures, I.E. human knights, are busy serving the king and managing their fiefs
>capture a LOT of desperate anthros, sell them and get rich
why haven't you set up your own dungeon, anon?

>Her owner gave his pet a firm smack on the butt, forcing out a surprised yelp from her clenched muzzle
>He laughed and told the story to the vet again
>How he had parachuted right behind the mayor as she held a press conference, pulled down his pants, and popped her cherry in front of millions
>She resisted the urge to correct him, it was a small town with no more than two thousand residents
>But in a way it was worse
>He pulled her head upwards as he raped her, forcing her to watch through teary eyes the shocked faces of her citizens as their beloved mayor was violated
>Her good friends and family could do nothing but submit as the rest of his team arrived and took their pick of cute girls and beautiful women
>And one who immediately went for a slim, less masculine boy, that weirdo
>She whined and cried as she felt the warm seed of her invader splatter against the entrance to her womb
>With more strength than she thought possible he flipped her around and tossed onto her podium, butt to the audience
>She tried desperately to cover her used pussy with her tail, cursing the signature curled up tail of her species betraying her by revealing the fresh, heavy gift flowing out of her hole to the cameras
>He stuck his cock, still dripping with their combined fluids, into her mouth
>The former mayor grit her teeth in silent anger as gloved fingers invaded her sex, poking and prodding in places not even she had ever stuck her fingers into
>"Congratulations, she's a healthy bitch and it looks like the litter is developing well!"
>The vet's comments about her health would have been flattering, had he not basically reduced her body into a used car being appraised
>If this was her fate then some ways she was grateful that her career had killed her romantic life
>She didn't have any children for her captor to have his way with
>Although he made it very clear that she would be making up for lost time
>Twenty pups, he demanded
>And if she couldn't do it, her daughters would help

>you’ll never be a teenager with a maid staff of thirsty anthro maids.
>You’ll never lose your virginity to your favorite maid’s tight pussy as the others watch, masturbating at the idea they’re next.

>Humans came into control of the world simply by evolving faster than everything else. By the time the smartest of anthros were discovering tools, humans had already begun forming a cohesive and complex society. The oldest anthro records showed humans pulling them into human life bit by bit until they were tied to humanity permanently.
>Anthros have evolved quite a bit since then, but humanity’s place at the top of the world has long since been cemented. There is no changing it now.
>Wolves in particular share a long history with humans.
>Wolves, who still prefer a natural and tribal life, often enter agreements with human landowners. They occupy and protect owned wooded areas and by extension, become the landlord's property, thus affording them legal protection in return for tributes paid to the landlord. Tributes can be anything from crafted goods, meat, skins, or even a beautiful female being sent for several days in order to “pay” the landowner personally. If relations are truly good, then a marriage is a real possibility.

>Be at home.
>Just relaxing after work.
>Chillin' like an absolute villain.
>Watching YouTube, eating snacks and scratching ma balls.
>The life.
>Should probably take down the rest of my Halloween decorations.
>But ehhh fuck it. Most of it is already gone and there's just a few fake cobwebs, lights and 1 or 2 of the bigger, harder-to-store props around.
>I'll get to it tomorrow.
>Definitely.
>Just as I'm about to drift off in my couch I hear a timid knock on my door.
>The fuck? It's like 10:30 PM. Who could be out there at this time?
>Thieves trying to check if anyone is inside?
>No, probably not. Even though I've moved in not too long ago I can tell this neighborhood is a safe one.
>Not many humans around but the locals are pretty welcoming.
>With some apprehension I carefully head towards the door.
>The police? Nah, if there's little crime then logically there's little need for them to be here.
>An emergency? Hmm... It could be.
>I'm pulled from my speculations by a feminine whisper.
>"I knew this was dumb. He's probably asleep by now."
>"Or maybe he didn't hear us because of your wimpy little arms."
>"Hey! I'm nervous alright!"
>Wait a minute, I recognize those voices.
>I remember them enthusiastically asking all about Halloween when they saw me hauling a skeleton around.
>Julie and Vivian? What are they doing out there?
>They did seem a bit *odd* in a way, with their weird inseparable duo thing, but not to this level.
>If folks here were welcoming. Then those two were practically rolling a red-carpet everywhere I went.
>I'll admit, the more narcissistic side of me enjoyed the praise. But there's a line, and potential stalking is definitely crossing it.
>"Why don't you knoc-"
>As I unlock the door a quick 'EEP' comes from the other side.
>"What are you two doi-"
>"TRICK OR TREAT! FUCK US UNTIL NEXT WEEK!"
>To say I got whiplash from that would be the understatement of the year.
>I don't think they understand how Halloween works.

What I posted in adhg when I thought of the story for the actual turning it into a story proper:
>”Alright, two routes have appeared in my mind. Either the human blood and damaged ritual transformation was enough to bring her to the side of order (can explain how that will go)
Or she merely adjusts her evil skaven plans. What do (you) guys think would be better, follow your hearts and your dongs”
Order Ratte wife would look very much like imperiumdraw’s warrior skaven priestess of sigmar. Conservative wife defending her new people, empire, and hubby. So white pill that she’s buying wonderbread from the markets in altdorf. Those kinda levels
On the other hand she could simply change her evil plans a little bit. Like some people there in the thread I made the story that she merely uses her skaven way of retroactively justifying her every whim for grandiose reasons but really she’s just following her new instincts to breed with her human

the latter. though I think you can incorporate elements of the former in the process. being real tsundere and some of her new instinct ARE to buy altdorf wonderbreed and being wholesome, but she justifies it as part of her evil plot anyways.
>yes-yes, I will hold his warm strong hand lovingly BECAUSE its the best cover to fool the stupid man-thing… (and it feels pretty nice too). Then ill give alms to the poor because…. they wont expect it? (and because it gives me the warm fuzzies inside) yes-yes, devilish indeed.
>*puts on holy twin tailed comet of sigmar broach and clings tightly to it before going out without even thinking about it*
maybe she succumbs to her good entirely later, or the paltry excuses stay as a playful tick.

I like to imagine in her new form that she took to breed abominations with his blood now becomes this perverse (from her perspective) desire to breed with her human captive. Of course in her skaven “genius” (weakness to impulses) she rationalizes that this was actually a far better outcome for her diabolical schemes because now she doesn’t need a middle man for turning his flesh into mutant hordes. Only to find out all her children are beings like her and sons in their fathers spitting image and also finding herself addicted to breeding and not much else as if the act were the finest warp stone snuff powder as skaven females are often want to

Lemme show you what I mean
>”stupid man-husband-thing ruined my ritual. Now offspring mutate all soft and cutesy”
>skiksy thought as she nursed her son. Chittering somewhat to herself
>”only skaven like me-me. And making tiny-cute man-things now”
>suddenly. Like as if she had just taken another hit from her secret stash of her best warpstone snuff. A new idea came to her
>”if all females grow up to be like breeder-matron. Skiksy can have a whole army. And take all over the surface world with an army of her own offspring, loyal to her through her matron-hood
>the plan was perfect, it was devious, this plan was DOWNRIGHT DIABOLICAL. This plan, was fit for a skaven of her clearly superior calibur
>because of course she was superior she thought, else she would have just perished from her botched verminlord ascendency ritual
>her chittering grows louder. As if a laugh from a mad wizard concocting a new spell from his dark tower- when her little one starts whining. Frightened from the noise
>”oh... shhh... hush son-thing... mommy-matron is here... shhh”
>of course. Her son and future sons, and breeder were a priority now too. How would she fit them in her plans. She wondered...

>all the does are getting captured, fucked, and taken home by the human hunters who venture out into the woods this time of year
>meanwhile this doeboy has woken up with a chastity cage around his cock after challenging and losing against a human who was going after his sister
>his plan of sawing off his antlers in an attempt to pass as a doe to get fucked to orgasm by a human instead doesn't work either
>with sexual desperation taking hold he tries to get off with an abandoned vibrator that unfortunately has a dead battery
>looks like this poor fella will be taking part in NNN whether he likes it or not!

Walking in to the pigstock of an apartment I called my home I could hear the shower just turning off, so I waited. She came out a few minutes later, wearing a blue t-shirt and bare legs. She didn’t take note of me until I mouthed out an *ahem* and then she stopped short, surprised, and I thought a little angry. I crossed my arms. I always look bigger when I cross my arms.
“I’m downgrading you from pet tonight to pest and you’re not coming back in,” I said firmly.
It took her a second to figure out the gravity of the situation. I threw my phone down on coffee table. It shows a picture of a cat.
“You know damn well it’s over rat I’ve got this cat swooning for me and between the two of you I pick her easily” I started to deadpan, and got right up in her face. I could see her getting livid, but trying to hide it.
“Tough shit” she snapped back. Then she tried to get accusatory about things. “We’re all whores to humans because you’re giving us free shit and a place to live!”
Suddenly she had some composure.
“You boinking her, too?”
What? “What's that supposed to mean?”
“The cat, you dipster That's what it means,” her voice rose, both in pitch and volume. “She left you a message about the great time she had with you last weekend. Last weekend, remember, asshole? When you called me to break up?”
“Yeah, you dumb bitch, I broke up with you so I could go out with her. I broke up with you, I don’t want a sewer rat as my pet anthro and my cat hates you on principle. You thought you could still legally be my pet if I upgraded. I might have been able to own you both if you were a useful pet but you are literally just a street rat.”
That's when she started to get livid hissing and tail thrashing. “Just get the hell out of here and be thankful I gave the courtesy of doing this myself or else that cat would be in here and clawing you to ribbons by now.”
“I’m not going back!” And then she clawed me.
It wasn't the hardest I'd ever been hit, but it was up there. A solid shot, right across my chin.
Spunky little thing is. Likes to fight. Or, she likes to bully me when I was desperate enough to take it for the clout of ‘owning’ her on paper. There's a pretty big difference.
I spun her around and pulled her in, pinning her arms. I squeezed, lifted her off the floor a little. She was trying to bite my face now, but she was too low. Couldn't reach my jaw.
“Tough little bitch, right?” I said. I shoved her down to her knees, making sure to keep a tight hold on her at the same time. Then I lowered her all the way to the floor, and by leaning my own body back, I pulled her into a backbreaker.
Just like bending a pencil against a table.
She started to gasp. “Stop you're hurting me,” she said in this pitiful little mouse voice.
You should've thought of that before, stupid. “You’re not a pet you’re a pest,” I said. Then I had an idea. I let her fall to the floor, then pinned her with my knee in her back.
I grabbed her flicking rodent ears and yanked her head back – sort of a mini-backbreaker. I got down real close, And pushed her head down – her face hit the carpet – and stood up in a crouch ear hold still maintained.
Gotta be careful, here, I warned myself. Don't want tear the thing off.
I grabbed her by the shirt collar and pulled her up – she came to her feet pretty easy, which should have clued me in that she was going to try something. Lucky for me, it wasn't much. She swung wildly, hitting me in the shoulder and leaving herself wide open for me to punch her, hard, in the stomach.
Her dainty foodpad lifted off the floor a little, and she dropped to her knees. I let her fall but kept hold of her ear.
“Stop,” she said, out of breath. “I want to stay.”
“Shut up.” I yanked her up, then swung her to the side, almost flinging her onto the coffee table. She hit with her shoulder – that must've hurt – and rolled onto the floor crawling under the table for cover.
Oh no, you're not hiding from me. I dragged the coffee table out of the way and was on her again, Sat her on the couch kicking and screaming and punched her in the stomach.
She was trying to fend me off now. It was kind of cute, really. She had her arms straight out, pushing and scratching at me, and her knees up, trying to use her feet to push me away. This is what I mean by the difference between tantrum from not the brightest kind of anthro and reality.
Stupid.
I was punching her in the stomach, and the side, and sometimes in the chest, whenever I saw an opening. Not great punches – couldn't really get a good one off, what with her arms and legs all over the place. Then she caught me in the chin again with her foot, and enough was enough. I almost hit her in the face, then thought better of it. Grabbed her arm instead, and pushed her onto her side.
Holding one arm, I pinned her other arm with my knee. That also gave me better leverage to hit her again – smack, right in the soft part of her armpit. Nice and hard.
She squeaked and broke out into a new outburst of writhing, so I punched her in the chest. Again, hitting her tit, and then punched down onto her ribs. Good shots, but I really would prefer to hit her in the weakspot that is the belly.
So I got off her to try and pin her legs down. She slid a little: her shoulders were hanging off the couch, her head nearly on the floor, but her legs up in the air. I pinned her hand against her chest, then put my knee across her thighs and leaned on them, pinning her legs down.
This was nice. Her shirt had fallen up, so her belly was exposed. Smooth grey fur, with just a hint of the muscles underneath. This was going to be fun.
“What are we up to, about a year of you living here?” I asked her, and then punched her, right on her naval.
She let out this cute little whoof. So I did it again.
This was starting to turn me on.
She was tensing her stomach just before I hit her, so I changed things up a little. Instead of waiting between punches, I just kept hitting her. Punch, punch, punch, punch, punch. Same place. Right below her belly button.
“Let's see how much you can take,” I said. She was keeping her muscles taut, but she couldn't keep it up forever. I hit her again, and again, and again. And again. Bam, bam, bam. Smack, smack, smack. My fist slapping against her pelt. Over, and over, and another punch, and another punch.
I must've hit her twenty times like that. Not as hard as I could, but hard. She was getting tired, whimpering, almost starting to cry. So then I let one go – hit her hard. Drove my elbow into her, right above the panty line.
She made some kind of strangled noise, and kicked her legs so hard she shook loose from my pin. I let her fall onto the floor. She was convulsing, it looked like. Pulling her legs in, then stretching out, then curling up again. Writhing around on the floor.
“Master, please,” I heard her say.
“Y'know, I've actually fantasized about this,” I said. “About beating you up. Always wondered what it would be like to beat you.” I reached for her again, picked her up by the scruff of her neck and dragged her over to the wall. Stood her up against it and pulled her shirt up, so I could punch her on the torso again.
She fought me on that, tried to push her shirt down. So I slapped her on the snout. That'll hurt, even when you're as out of it as she was. I slapped her again, this time following up with the plucking of her left side whiskers and her arms went up to her head, essentially surrendering. Then I wrenched her shirt up, hard, over her tits, and punched her in the stomach.
Leaned into it pretty good. She collapsed onto the floor – a little wriggling ball. Mostly naked, now, since her shirt had come off in my hand.
I dropped the shirt and watched her groan for a minute on her knees.
Slim. Muscular. Liked to be a tease stringing me along that I’d be able to fuck her before today.
But, oh well. I took her by the scruff again – awfully considerate of furs to have so much hair for us humans to grab – and hauled her up.
She was trying to push me with one hand and cover her tits with the other. I slapped her once, then took both her hands and banged them up against the wall, put them together so I could hold both with one of mine. Spent a second admiring her.
“You've got a nice body, for a street rat” I said. Then I couldn't resist the dig. “Small tits, though. That's why I went with a real pet, you know. She's got great tits.” The rat always had been a little sensitive about that.
Then I took her nipple and twisted it. Hard.
She screamed, and got her hands away from me. I grabbed them again, put them back, and slapped her tit. Same one. Did it again right away when she didn't try to pull away again. Then again. Then I let her hands go and unloaded another punch to her belly.
She woofed with a little strangled squeal at the end of it. Hit the floor on her knees vomiting blood and well, vomit and I figured enough's enough. Time to put this rat away for the night.
She wriggles slightly as I step forward angling her head between my thighs. One hand slides down her spine to the base of her tail gently taking hold of the hairless thing in both arms as I clench her head between my legs. I heave backwards and up wrenching the rodent ass end up and bear hugging her front to front in a standing position.
And then I let myself drop, keeping her head guided down and spiking her skull against the tile floor for the completion of a pile driver. She goes out like a bulb of course and a moment passes by of letting the sensations of the distinct calm that has overtaken the room pass over me. I’m left a lot more aware of every little contour and curve of her body next to mine now that there’s not struggle and screeching.
The feel of her stomach swelling and collapsing against my arms with every breath she takes, the long sinue tail draped over my back and those cute sporadic twitches her skyward pointing legs give on occasion.
The second I let her from my hug her lower body slides down to join the her head on the floor spread eagle
I ruminate as I snap a picture of her like that to my cat girl and throw the rat over my shoulders to head to the apartment’s disposal area so so can symbolically and literally throw her into a trash bin. Sure, she might learn her lesson and stay in the trash heap. But maybe not. And if she does come crawling, well, I can just send her right back home.
/end.

>You are a human space contractor setting up a planet freshly seeded with anthros. The tribes are meant for human entertainment both for by passive observation & visitations (Anything from camping trips to shoot locals with tranquilizer darts to showing up in a village disguised as furry super humans to kick ass & take bitches.You are meant to sustain an intertribal social order that keeps the tribes from killing each other & satisfy the space yiffers who want to watch the tribal furries Fuck, love, rape, BDSM, & everything else to each other in every conceivable way.
>What kind of system would you implement on the furry tribe planet for promoting the best & most varied ways in how the locals fuck with themselves while keeping them from socially growing past that?
That subject/worldbuilding circlejerk of ideas basically dominated the thread after that when it turned intofurry westworld and it's some very /collared/ applicable material. I just want to see it built on again.

>No fun porn answer: Don’t give the planet any decent staple crop plant as to keep societit’s in a permanent (and more literal then irl) hunter-gatherer period when anthro preds fight their anthro prey in a never ending battle where the curator moderates things to keep anyone from dominating. To promote sex the moderator has drones in the place of normal tribal gods that film & communicate with individuals in exchange for whatever smut scene they specify and will also give the anthros, verbal curses, blessings or boons that influence their actions. This delicate insertion of the outside controller gives the curator the power to regulate the anthros forever for example independently order all the local tribes to dogpile another tribe who invents a wheel for example.
>Even more no fun grimness.
Don’t give the anthros iq enough to be more then /pol/‘s idea of Niggers.
>More fun conversation.
How much are we as the curators of the anthros allowed to interfere with them and what resources are available to us in doing so? Are we supposed to leave them 1000% hands off after osychohistorying them into an infinite cycle of anarchy primitivism? are can we arrive as gods or provide tech and disguise it as magic for special occasions? What assists do the human visitors to this anthro Westworld have in the way of mucking up the status quo during their rampant dicking around?
Implement an Olympic Games setup (with a suitably rocks off bent of course after all. Who could forget the ‘male v female impregnation wrestling match.) tribes that know each other locally send representatives every month to an assigned gathering place to play. Every half year the winners of those games travel to a regional version of the same thing at a regional landmark (Like irl’s OG Olympics being performed at Olympus) every full year.

Whether they were naturally evolved alongside humans as their twin siblings or have been biotech'd into existence from a test tube for the latter's entertainment, decades of enhanced breeding and improved healthcare have resulted in anthros dominating at over 97% of the population in most cities. Anthros form the bulk of the destitute and lower classes due to being the descendants of abandoned or escaped pets. Many feral females hardly go three months without being pregnant due to prostitution being their only method of income. Gang warfare and starvation are the main factors limiting their population. Some manage to crawl their way into the middle class while a scant handful have managed to break into the lower-high classes.
With the difficulty of rising through the classes, the smart ones have chosen to ally themselves with the humans who have carved out their place.
The lower-class humans are tough and hardy to protect their harem and children from the criminal trash that plague the undercity. They rule as kings, husbands, and fathers to their neighborhood blocks, many of them heavily chromed with combat mods purchased with the money pooled together by their families.
The middle class humans take on a more administrative role, being more picky with the anthros who knock on their doors for any kind of salvation. Anthros here are servants, treated fairly well and never cold or starved so long as they abandon their freedom and work hard. Some females might be taken as a breeding wife, allowed to take it easy while pregnant with the master's child.
It's a mixed bag with the high class. Some are treated like toys, broken, abused, and discarded right into the garbage. Others, the truly lucky, catch the eye of an interested CEO. They are lifted to Queen status, allowed to hang off her human's arm in public view as if they were equals. Dressed in glittering jewels and gleaming silk on network TV, these females are cursed, lusted after, and admired by billions.
For those wishing for a more independent life there are those who choose to go solo, or at least the closest thing to one. Working with human fixers who are more equal business partners than masters, these anthro mercs and streetgunners usually live short, violent, but in some ways lives freer and fuller than most. Fast action, impulse sex, rough driving, and a legendary end. While Queens are bridal carried up the glittering glass towers, solo acts usually jump their motorcycles out of helicopters and straight through the skylight.
They know their lives are worthless, why bother stretching out the torture?
Some solo-anthros are semi-attached to lower class human harems, taking dangerous jobs for money and defending the castle with their human when needed, occasionally joining them officially after an extended period of cooperation. Their guns and hardware are willed to certain members of the family upon their inevitable deaths, a subtle suggestion to push them towards the business of soloing.
None enjoy deal with the middle or high class, it's strictly professional business with them no matter what they offer. Most know better than to take the bait and sign away their hard-fought freedom.
As always, there are a few who make it big, usually as movie stars or decorative celebrity bodyguards. They are most definitely taken advantage of behind the scenes lest they be disposed of and replaced.
With the recent extreme popularity of certain media depicting more exotic anthro designs, nightclubs and other related agencies have started up "Pop Clubs" to meet the demand for "new" anthros with seamless differences that could not be pulled off by cybernetics alone. They can either be generic cartoon anthros or, more desirably, outright licensed clones of said characters.
The back alleys of these Pop Clubs are regularly crowded with those hopeful to be chosen. Each week barely a dozen are let in based on their species, the closer their birth species to the character they will be changed into the easier (and cheaper) the rebirth process would be. Most of the time the whole batch is rejected right back out onto the streets, but even those who fail the first stage still get to enjoy a solid week of food, water, baths, and a soft bed.
They are grilled intensely, tested on every detail of who they are hopeful to become. Their character's history, mannerisms, and prop use. From how their character would interact with another character from a completely unrelated franchise to even appropriate reactions to certain customers, even if it is somewhat negative such as discriminating by race or physical condition, a response that is authentic to their character is considered more acceptable than not.
A transformation into a member of a fictitious species instead of a specific character tends to be much less demanding but is also less prestigious. The top girls are those who have been made into clones of pro/antagonists of extremely popular media become unquestionable queens in their own right.
Once the batch is culled the finalist then undergoes the test of her sexual ability. As any character who is popular enough to have anthro clones made of her would be in high demand, she must have the energy to satisfy dozens of customers each day.
These final examination sessions are made deliberately intense for the poor female, designed to stress both spirit and body to her breaking point. For an entire month she is abused heavily, allowed to sleep only while she is locked in the rape rack and still not free from being used. She is bound, beaten, electrified, and humiliated at the whim of her examiners, all to see how well she can maintain the facade of her character while she undergoes horrific torture.
The examination ends when her humans are impressed or she breaks character and cries for mercy.
Once she has passed, she is finally ready to be accepted into the club proper. She will surrender her freedom, her face, her name, her family, and be reborn as someone completely different.
Tubes are slid into her throat and lungs to feed her nutrient paste and air before she is lowered into the vat filled with a medical sludge called CellFIX. Initially meant for clearing away scars and tattoos, it was repurposed as an affordable method of cosmetically modifying anthros. Its effects are rather gruesome, involving the melting and reforming of her exterior over the course of a month. It changes everything from her curves, appearance of her genitalia, to the color, texture, and even smell of her fur and sweat of her new skin. Her mind remains awake and aware during this process.
The new sex worker is allowed a week to recover. It will be both the worst and at the same time the best week of her life. The metamorphosis is reported to be extremely painful for the duration of and a few days afterwards but none have ever regretted ever stepping foot into the club. For the first time she will be allowed to sleep on a soft bed and fed good food, all without stress and worry after the other girls welcome and comfort her with the knowledge that the actual work of showing off her new curves and bouncing on cocks all day is much less traumatizing than her initiation.
It is still an improvement over the streets.

>tavern owner and bar maid get broken in by men
>taken down to cellar for "job change"
>months later bar is under new management of human proprietors
>former owner and bar maid regress to bovine ancestor mentality while bearing crossbreeds in cellar for new owners.

back in days of yore anthros were a genuine scourge of the night.
We find them appealing now because of how utterly we've conquered nature. Every animal that terrified humanity has either been driven to extinction, brought to the brink, or mutated into something more useful for us. The concept of being afraid of an animal is so alien that we can barely comprehend it anymore. When we first made communities, it wasn't any political thing, it was a way to be safe from being eaten alive. That concept is so foreign now as to be fetishized. Even through the middle ages, when kings and queens were vying for power, if a single wolf was spotted near a village, the whole community could be rallied up to kill it.
Can you imagine that? An animal being spotted, and the president mobilizing the army to search and estroy it? That's basically what we did for most of our history. It's what we had to do, otherwise, a wolf, a mountain lion, hell, even a giant cow, would make you their lunch. Not anymore. Now we can end all life on the world with a push of a button. The animals that terrified us are an afterthought. The Ram, the Bull, the Wolf? Creatures that we once used as a symbol of power? Now they’re mutton, beef, and bichons. 60% of all mammalian life on earth are livestock or pets. 36% of all mammalian life on earth are humans. That leaves 4% for everything else. We’ve so utterly dominated the world that it’s beyond comprehension. We’ve seen every animal, every king of the jungle, cast down before our feet. We lock them in cages for our amusement IF we decide to let them live.
Killing them is fine.

You sometimes think humans force anthro women to eat their own kind like chicken tenders/burgers/etc. for their food commercials?

Yes. Imagine making a group of does watch as you prepare the carcass of their lover. Imagine watching as they force themselves to eat chunks of raw deer meat that you tossed their way. Their minds break bit by bit as their guts start carving more of it. Imagine making them stand guard as the meat gets smoked, their mouths watering with hunger with every passing hour. Every now and then, you take some meat away for taste-testing, the intensity of the smoke momentarily short-circuiting their brains.
Finally, the meat is done. You make the does line up, sit down, and start eating that delicious jerky they now so desperately crave. Once your hunger is sated, you toss the remains onto the floor. They immedially leap for it, pushing each other away to grab at the jerky bits. Then one of them punched the others. All inhibitions were dropped, the does savagely punching and kicking each other in a mad dash to secure all bits for themselves.
It was a brief and brutal fight that ended with the other does laying on the floor bleeding and moaning from the pain. You walk over as the triumphant doe licked up crumbs from the floor. You grab her tail and pull her fat ass up with a jank. Before her cry could finish, you plunged into her depths with a hard and steady rhythm. Before long, her cry turned to pleasure, but you cared little about that. The tight cunt of that victorious doe gripped at your cock like her life depended on it. As her mother and sister watched you, they begun to pleasure each other, hands groping their breasts, their tongues dancing with each other and dueling for carnal dominance, and their fingers skillfully coaxing fluids of lust from their vaginas.
Finally you sped up your pace, sensing your climax rapidly approaching. Your strong doe's vaginal walls gripped dowm even harder, pulling and sucking at your shaft as her womb's cervix's descended and opened wide in anticipation of your virile seed. With a final thrust, you let all restraints go.
As your balls contracted, the mother doe and sister crawled over. They began serving one testicle each, slathering your ballsack in salvia, and occasionally brushing your anus with their tongues.
Your seed shoots out with high pressure, coating the cervix of your strong doe with your thick sperm and causing her to clamp down once more as her womb forced her body to orgasm again. Her womb already began sucking up as much of your billions of sperm cells as possible, their journey towards her egg cells only started now. Her ovaries released dozens from the rentless sexual assault you put her body under, and each of them was pulsing with fertile anticipation. But that was later.
Your own climax subsided, and you began pulling out of her. When she whined, you gave her a hard smack, replacing her whine with a surprised yelp. You lazily pushed her ass aside, causing her to drop on the floor with a hearty noice, before turning around and presenting your still-hard member to the mother doe and the sister of your strong doe. You could prepare them too, but considering how they went at cleaning your cock? You just might keep them for pleasure while your newest broodmare carried your products to term.

It's so bizarre how stuff I'd normally never be interested in becomes far more palatable when viewed through the lens of /collared/.
Because /collared/ is ultimativly about the power of man over the animal. Domination over nature. It is the ability to drive into a furry ghetto and grab any furgirl that catches your eye, with no one save maybe her family and friends doing anything. It is the ability to look over a farm of cows and their young, knowing that you will sell the boys as veal by the end of the month and your cow-herd will do nothing but begin teaching their young how to serve and please you. It is being able to walk into any given anthro home and start fucking their daughters and feminine sons with their parents being mostly oblivious to what their children are being used for. It is the ability to force two anthros to fight to the death for no reason other than it would entertain you.
It is power over the animal to its most (il)logical extreme.

>Be me
>Lead a warband of 30 human men, each one of them demands gold, women, food and blood
>Raid anthro villages and small towns populated by more sedentary and civilized species
>We rape and kidnap their women and daughters. We murder and torture their men and sons. We loot their homes and churches. And in the end leave it all to burn in flame
>I love this job so much

>catch a digimon on the web
>toss it into your personal fuckdoll
>watch it use its digimagic or whatever to make it even more lifelike than it already was
>or more internal stuff like setting the value for Horny to -1 and they're literally incapable of not being horny now
>in a way digimon are even more vulnerable to having their perceptions messed with than a "normal" joytoy, since they're basically natural AIs
>or she could be a pleasure guard, ready at to both drop to her knees and worship your cock like the god you are to her and leap into action to defend you at a moment's notice, more than well equipped for either task

A bunny works hard as a fruit collector on a farm owned by a human, but she's starting to feel her age. So she decides to give it her best shot one final time. When the end of the harvest came, her master gathered the slaves, herself included. When he announced the best harvesters, her ears dropped, believing herself to have failed again. That's when he announces her name, citing her as a consistent and hard worker.
Eagerly she climbs the podium and is presented before the farm, all of them cheering her. She smiled at her master. Finally she'd become a part of his household.
Later that night, she sits in her master's horse carriage. Not his personal one, obviously, but she was allowed to sit in the carriage for property. As the convoy approached his mansion, she could see it was big, built for the social events that humans tended to throw for their fellow humans and whatever anthros managed to claw a place of status and wealth for themselves. She could scarely imagine that happening. All anthros were servants of humanity, everybody knew that. To earn a place as equals... Bunny couldn't imagine looking her master in his eyes as an equal, much less speak.
While her master's carriage stopped in front of the assembled staff, her carriage carried on to the stalls. As she stepped out, she had to move fast. The staff was already moving in to take suitcases and chests bearing the master's sigil out while the maids emptied the contents for sorting and later laundry. Two maids approached, pushing her to the inside of the building for her cleanup.
An hour later, she enjoyed warm water and soap over her fur, the maids massaging every inch of her body to remove years of hard work. By the time they were finished, she felt lighter than ever. Her old work-suit was taken away and the new suit, if you could call it that, was very conservative in its use of fabric. Already her body warmed up in anticipation of mating with her master.

Super high-tech society where anthros aren't so much slaves as they are products. Vat-grown in massive factory labs, genetically modified and brainwashed into being whatever the human customer desires. Ordering an anthro tailored to your specific fetish is no different from ordering a custom-made computer, a luxury car with a number of options or perhaps a pizza with some very creative toppings.
Choose your dream sex slave from thousands of pre-made blueprints, or design your very own custom species from scratch. What kind of (and how many) ears, limbs and breasts do you want her to have? Milk and pussy juice flavor? Natural vagina or organic fleshlight with bumps and ridges? Hair, skin, fur, scales, feathers... give her any combination with whatever colors and patterns you like. Eyes that glow in the dark. She can have the voice of any character or actor you can think of.
Her personality can be anything from shy and submissive, to happy and loving, to grouchy and uppity, to emotionless with no free will at all. Regardless of personality, her mind will of course have numerous safeguards in place preventing any from of rebellion, disobedience or violence towards you.
How about some cybernetic implants, like a vibrator inside her tongue or multi-tool fingers? Why not put an entire computer inside her? She can be your gaming rig. Eyes that double as projectors, ears that double as speakers, mouth that doubles as a microphone. Built in cellular connection with unlimited data. Connect a wireless mouse, keyboard or controller to her, or just tell her what to do.

>be in a zone of the world that’s very much /collared/ by nature
>the status quo has gotten so intense that anthros self preservation instinct up and disappeared
>area where this is taking place is isolated. And it doesn’t seem to be happening in those other places
>darwinianmutation.png
>I grew up here, and I distinctly remember my anthro classmates as far back as kindergarten would do a lot short of killing eachother to create a pecking order for attention from humans like me
>I even went back to ask my mother that day why anthros did that (she’s an anthro herself so I thought there’d be a good reason)
>all she said was “oh sweetie you should have taken a few now so when you got old enough you could have had some breeders ready-trained. It’s okay. Remember to catch a few next time okay my little man?”
>I tried asking my dad the next day. I didn’t understand his answer either
>”they’re built a little different than us son, and that’s A-ok. Do you want me to take you to the pet store for a brand new anthro? They’re cheap and they know when to ask for food- so they’re not as hard to take care of as a normal animal funny enough”
>it always comes back to if I want one
>it’s not about whether I want one dangit I’m worried about why they’re acting this way!
>wasn’t until I was older that the big picture came into view
>the anthros did this to themselves
>the families of anthros who lived there were residents in that place for so long. Selectively breeding themselves just from their normal mate selecting behavior and the same behavior from humans that the only instincts they’ve got left are pleasure, obedience, and obsession with finding a human master/mate
>literally a pet you’re able to reproduce with. Except maybe worse because even animals have a self preservation drive
>there are a lot of stories now about anthros who partake in coitus until their bodies give out. Like how there was this one story in particular my friend told that a dobie girl two rooms down sucked a guy off in the bathroom and forgot to come up for air. She passed out on his crotch and had to be resuscitated
>I’m almost afraid to go search for a girlfriend around here because she might get hurt for my sake over something dumb

I'd get her so absolutely addicted to sucking my dick (brainwashing her if need be) to the point she can't stop thinking about it for a single minute. Even just smelling my musk is enough to get her drooling. Having my dick in her mouth and slowly sucking on it feels better to her than getting fucked. If I grab her head and facefuck her, every thrust gives her a mini-orgasm. When I cum in her mouth, she has the most intense full-body multi-orgasm imaginable, so hard that she passes out. She almost doesn't want to swallow because she wants to keep the flavor in her mouth as long as possible. It's outright impossible for her to cum without having my dick in her mouth.
To reward her I simply let her suck my dick more than usual. For example, in the evening after a good, hard day's work I might tell her that she may sit under my desk and suck my dick while I'm on the computer. For five or six hour straight until I go to bed, and she doesn't have to stop when I cum, she can just keep sucking. She'd squeal in delight and almost cream herself right then and there, wasting no time crawling under my desk and unzipping my pants.
To punish her, I DON'T let her suck my dick. I might jerk off and force her to watch, or tie her up under my desk, put my dick on her face and just keep it there for hours. Making her smell it and yearn for it but not get it. If she doesn't get my cock and cum for a couple of days she starts showing withdrawal symptoms like shakes and feeling dizzy (and not in a good way). Going without for a whole week is sure to drive her crazy and desperate enough to do absolutely anything for just a lick of my glans.

https://rentry.org/p2mc8
Alright, time to stop fucking with this. First chapter of cyberpunk collared story about a fox girl from the poverty-diseased asshole of the city eventually getting turned into a clone of Krystal for a sex club that serves nerds and weebs.
Unfortunately there's not much /collared/ in this chapter but I'll work towards it. To save time I literally just used CP2077's world and gave it an anthro twist. I tried not to make it confusing if you're not familiar with cyberpunk the franchise, but the in game lingo just came to me naturally from how much I've played that damn game.
No, I don't know how I filled up a third of the chapter with just talking but I don't think taking it out would be better.
Also I have no idea what to call this, please give me some suggestions. I've got "Neon Dream of Organic Toys" if no one has anything better.

Furbois are back up holes for when you can't access your girls
>Be you
>On a business trip
>Couldn't bring your wife
>Pent up as hell
>Order room service cause you're hungry damnit
>Room service is delivered by a solid 8/10
>Call "her" a good girl
>"She" blushes and stammers out that he's a guy
>Convince him that you have a tip that he would be interested in
>Spend the next hour making the furboi cum like a bitch
>Now your food's cold
>Shit

>Furry version of Belle Delphine reveals she has a human boyfriend
>Her legion of furboi simps go mad

>dog girl wears a collar on stream
>a sign that she is owned by human
>she never addresses the collar at all
>on the tag is a link to her only fans account that is just her in pet play
>being walked through a park naked
>happily raising her tail and wagging while her human pets her
>doing tricks and being called a good girl

>several sex tapes with several mare celebrities in them are leaked on the internet
>revealing the mystery behind their pregnancies
>all of them participating in a massive orgy in horse stable
>being bred by humans and tied in bondage gear

>Because she's popular she has copycats who all try to out do each other
>Some even buy kennels to sleep in
>Furbois cry out calling it demeaning behavior
>They're just branded as incels and specist who should just let people enjoy things as long as it's not hurting anyone

>streaming colabs are just dog shows
>they do their normal stream but a human comes by and touched them looking them over
>they get judged on their looks, fur upkeep, canines, and posture
>they get their measurements taken and the girl with the best scores parades around the room on all fours by her human
>the sheer joy on her face is something that even her viewers never seen

>Belle Dolphine
>"Hello, my little furboi cuckies, it's time to pay up again! My boyfriend wants to take me on a nice vacation, so we need all your little doggy dollars."
>"Which is why I'm adding a new item to my shop, are you all ready?"
>"Tada!"
>"That's right, it's a vial of cum! Cum that's been inside me~ I know how much you've been wanting this."
>"Use it to jack off and pretend that you're touching me somehow! Guzzle it down and see if you can taste me through my boyfriend's salty meal! Fucking...I dunno, pour it on your face before work? Fucking freaks."
>"Don't worry about supply, I can promise you, we'll NEVER run out."
>"It's impossible."
>She ran out within the first hour.

I like that you can take this idea to the extreme for where enough females take the humanpill that they effectively self-domesticate. They breed and raise children in an environment where humans are to be served and they keep this going for generations.

Herm bodies are so honest whenever Human men are nearby. You can practically hear cunts gushing at the scent and their pants straining to keep their pleasure-meters hidden away. They want to be good girls amd pets for Human men, but they're so low on the pecking order that the inky ones who usually fuck them are faggot furbois who will never top, will never make them feel like females. Poor girls can't even cum properly with furboi bussy or femfur pussy. The kind of burning need only a Human can relieve.

Another thing to consider is that herm/futa holes are almost guaranteed to be virginal. They're so desperate for Human Cock that they will die virgins before they let some faggot furboi or another herm/futa fuck their holes. On the plus side, they'll never beg for you to wear a condom either, unless they want a snack for later.

>Imagine taking her on a date
>Imagine convincing her to wear a slutty, skimpy outfit completely unbefitting her age, complete with matching "jewelry" buttplug
>Imagine walking her out in town as her fat tits wobble on the verge of popping out
>Imagine the bottom of her dress creeping up so the shine of the buttplug might be seen if she doesn't adjust herself
>Imagine the embarrassment she would feel running into her friends from the knitting club
>Imagine you and her getting so horny, you drag her off the sidewalk into an alley for a quicky blowjob
>Imagine you both go to a love hotel, and the attendant think's your her adopted grandson
>Imagine peeling off her sopping wet panties and showing her the stain in embarrasment
>Imagine ordering someone several years your senior to rim your asshole to get you prepped and ready
>Imagine fucking her through the night in ever position as she's gasping for air, completely overwhelmed by your inhuman, human stamina
>Imagine her decrying her old man, ranting about how she loved your cock more than him now
>Imagine finally coming back home to have lunch with her daughters, the buttplug having been re-applied to her anus, now full to the brim with your seed

>tfw you will never have dragoness simps while you play vidya

>No cute dragon to play games with
>She always plays the smallest race healer or support class
>Despite being a big fire breathing dragoness with lush thighs and a fat dragon ass
Why can't dragons be real

Imagine anthros paying just to go on a date with a human.

>Be male escort
>Anthro women pay exorbitant amount even for just a night with you
>They're so easy to please in bed you barely have to try

Some get off just by being pet

>There are male "escorts" that have anthro women pay to just come to their house and be treated like a pet.
>They get striped naked and have a collar put on them
>They don't get to sit on any of the nice furniture
>Have to eat their food from a bowl
>If they're really good girls, they get to suck their new master off
>And even if they don't, most end up cumming just by getting called mutt or whatever equivalent they have
Now I wanna know what it would be like to have a anthro pet.

Reminder that after 10pm Friday to Sunday the Pizzaplex becomes an anthro strip club for humans only

Weekends would have too many kids, weeknights are definitely days when the girls would be dancing around in skimpy clothing.
Unless they're going to be teaching all the human kids how to treat anthros and that exist for their pleasure and entertainment.

Yeah actually this does make more sense
Weeknights would make it the perfect place for stressed out human workers to relax after a long day at work, I know I would

>humans only
>implying non-humans exist
>meaning the FazEnt still builds near-sapient AI for children's entertainment rather than hire an anthro
ADVANCED racism
I like it

>drop by for a steaming slice of pizza, a cold beer, and the hottest ass this side of town
>you can be as rough as you need to be in order to properly relieve your stress
>and because they're robotic there are dozens of them available for you to personally take into a room and fuck but each girl still knows your likes and dislikes perfectly
>want a bigger bust? done
>tighter pussy? done
>simulated pregnancy? ezpz
>want her to dispense soda from her nipples?

I mean, it does make sense from a purely utilitarian point of view.
>No biological needs.
>Designed to be perfect at whatever niche it's meant to do.
>Likely programed to be unquestionably loyal.
>Only have to stop working occasionally for scheduled diagnosis for broken parts and to recharge.
>No need for a salary.
>Might not even have rights.
